I've stayed at many Marriott and Renaissance Marriott's and this was a huge disappointment! The front desk and atrium is nice..there is a starbucks on site which is nice.  The rooms are run down and old.  There is a flat screen but that is to be expected of a Renaissance.  We got this hotel via Priceline at a rate of $75/night...good deal for the price but this is not a true Renaissance.
This place used to be a cool, chill place. Now its a bunch of neanderthal bouncers hopped up on steroids acting like the can do whatever they want. There are so many better places in davis square where they are glad you are visiting their business. Sad that the burren is now the worst place in davis.
The setting is perfectly adequate, and the food comes close.   The dining chains like Chilis and Victoria Station do barbecue better.  It's no surprise you can always pick up coupons for Linwood at restaurant.com.
They NEVER seem to get our  order correct, service is crappy, food is inconsistent and has gone down hill steadily in the last 6-9 months! WILL NEVER GO THERE AGAIN!
Disappointing. Bolt is a follow up of Fanny's Fabrics, which closed. Like Fanny's, the selection is small. The fabrics lean toward contemporary. They also have a small stock of fabrics that you can order; however, they don't have enough room to display their selections, so it's like trying to paw through your closet when it has twice as many clothes as the racks were meant to handle.   The woman who works there most of the time is very nice and helpful. However, my mother and I both bought fabric there, and we both had the same problem: the employee helped us calculate our yardage without taking the repeat into consideration. I brought my pillow forms with me, so there was no doubt exactly how large they were. My mother was able to make her project work, but I came up a pillow short. By the time the pillows were made, I realized I was short, and I returned to Bolt (all in a month's time), the fabric had sold out, with no plans on reordering.   Fortunately for me, I was just making a number of large throw pillows. Now I don't have the number I wanted, but I can be flexible. What if this had been an upholstery job and my piece was partially completed? Obviously, unacceptable. My advise is to feel free and shop here, but figure out your measurements on your own.
I wish I could give them zero stars. The call takers are rude. The technicians are incompetent. The manager doesn't know what customer service is. It is overpriced. I was quoted $230. I went to another locksmith, who actually got my lock off, and was quoted a total of $79.  The technician was late twice. He could not pick the lock which is not unusual and said he would have to drill through the lock. Ok. But, failed to bring charged batteries. He never offered to come back with charged batteries as soon as he could nor offered to send someone else. He said he could, however, come back around 10 hours later and do it "under-the-table." Usually when you need to get a lock off, you need it off that minute. I said no. He charged me $30 for a service fee...a service that I never received. I contacted the manager, which seems to be a task in itself, and he said that I was rightfully charged $30 because I "refused" the technician's offer to come back later. I doubt the manager knew it was an under-the-table payment. I still have not been reimbursed my $30!
Great coffee and pastries. Baristas are excellent. All the other staff are sooooo lost and vacant.
Almost desolate restaurant and dingy evironment. That's a star.  Decieving lunch menu. (claimed dishes were 550 before 3 on Saturdays and was still charged $2 more) That's a star.  Congealed beef soup. That's a star.  Friend's dish didn't come for 30 minutes after I got mine and he didn't get the soup that came with it. That's a star.  Asked for water 5 times and didn't get of until right before the bill came. That's a star.   Welp, I seem to be out of stars! Whoopsie Daisy! I wanted to be more forgiving since the waitress was new but even the manager who stepped in for her was screwing up. And it doesn't excuse the mediocre food.
When we first arrived at the Coco Key, we were greeted by a number of staff members as we checked in, the process was slightly awkward because the staff appeared new or in training, which can happen from time to time. No harm no foul.  The foul part came when we entered our room. The carpet was soggy near the bathroom and the entire room was permeated with a musty smell. Something along the lines of aeu-de-someone-flooded-the-toilet.  After unpacking--which I shouldn't have done, but I'm a sucker for any opportunity for sticking things out and making them work. We called the front desk.  Shortly thereafter, a housekeeper appeared with a spray bottle to investigate. She agreed that the carpet needed to be cleaned (which would happen the following day), and began spritzing, what I can only assume to be anti-mold stuff? I didn't ask--which clearly you can see from this point means I have some sort of timidness for communication. I really need to outgrow that.  Long story short, by the time she had hosed down the carpet, walls, and doorways with her spray bottle, we were left coughing and choking on the fumes and were forced to spend the night with the door open in a weak attempt to ventilate the room. I did not leave my heart in FL. but I may have donated a small portion of lung tissue.  You're probably asking..."but did you die?"  I am very much alive. However, I am very doubtful that I will ever return to the coco key.
I love ale house. I'm here all the time. The 1 star isn't for the place or for the service. The 1 star is for the management. You give absolutely zero respect to the game of soccer.  I've been coming here since you opened and I've seen numerous times where you understaff for finals of tournaments where years past have shown you will be at capacity.   It's a shame you have a great establishment and great employees. If only management could sort it out this place would be 5 stars
This has not been a pleasant experience. According to our server, the restaurant is short on staff. This means our service has been frightfully slow. We have been here over an hour with receiving our food. Most of the food was good, except for the steak that was tough. This is a trendy place. Great spot to be seen. Food is just okay.
Had the worst experience there today when I tried to have a breakfast. The service was slow waited at least 30 min for my French toast and when it got there I pulled a long grosse hair out of it. I'm never going there again!
I wanted this to be a great place, but I wasn't impressed.  I went there for dinner on a Monday.  I tried the pulled pork sandwich--it seemed like a sort of specialty.  My husband had the burger.  The buns left something to be desired.  The fries were okay but a little cold.  But at about $10 per entree for bar food, it wasn't as good as it should have been.  Service was fine--they were overstaffed.  I don't think I will be back anytime soon.
Bummer. I was very disappointed.  So I finally stopped in for take out.  I got the fried haddock sandwich with fries.  The fries were frozen and greasy..  The haddock sandwich was not good.  Tasted  very fishy and frozen.  I had such high hopes their take out would be good.
The ramen here is less than great. It came out luke warm and oily. The service we received was NOT good. I will not be returning.
I just got done with lunch here. It has been okay in the past, but today, the service was a failure on multiple levels. First, it look a long time for my food to come out, and the waitress initially brought the wrong order. Then, it look 20 minutes before I was able to chase down the waitress to pay my check. Finally, when I received my check, they charged dinner pricing for a lunch. I was running late to get back to the office, so I paid it, but all said, the service was inexcusable. I write in the hopes that you will take corrective action, whether in coaching your staff, or hiring more people for the lunch rush.
Brasserie zero zero... we were hoping for a ten based on how highly recommended it was however, we were very disappointed with the quality of the food. We ordered escargot and artichoke to start. Escargot was covered in a bitter green sauce- butter and garlic would have really helped. The artichoke wasn't cooked properly and was minimally seasoned. It was also small portions, about a fourth of an artichoke in size. Even after sending back the artichoke it still was tough and not fully cooked.   We ordered the lamb chops for our main with a side of mashed potatoes. The potatoes were sour and not as creamy as expected. For $35 we received two lamb chops with a tasty mustard sauce but the accompanying vegetables were tasteless and again, disappointing. The ambiance and service was great and we had a yummy creme brûlée brought to our table for the birthday we were celebrating but we wished the rest of the meal had lived up to the hype.
For the price we paid (about $50 for 2 people) the food was only so-so and the service was AWFUL. Our waitress sounded like a robot, and we had to grab another waiter several times because she never came back to check on us. The food came out and it looked like it had been sitting in the back a while, it was barely warm and a film had formed over the top of my ravioli. Overall, very unimpressed and I don't think I would go back or recommend this location to a friend.
Fix the Beer.  The hardware is the problem. At least 15 out of the 45 taps are faulty.  Sorry guys, but I have given you 5 years and other customers will notice, Please Scott.
So my roommate borrowed my clock radio and apparently left it set to this station. This meant I got to wake up to my normal 7 a.m. radio alarm hearing some god awful "dude-bro"/man child apparently named "Lunchbox" YELLING literally at the top of his lungs. Gee, can you think of a more UNPLEASANT way to wake up at 7 a.m? I honestly think I would have rather woken up to a cheese grater across my face than listen to this frat-boy douche yelling like a 5 year old having a tantrum in the name of some morning show bit. Then one of the other hosts couldn't even identify a Bon Jovi song playing? Are you kidding me? Where the hell did they find these people and please wherever it was send them back and get them off the damn radio or any job where they are actually required to speak for that matter. As for me I have re-adjusted my radio dial to a different station and banned my roommate from ever borrowing my clock radio again!
Was not that great. We sat for like 15 mins before getting our drink orders done. We were literally the only table in the restaurant taken. We had like 3 different waiters. Appetizers all came out within like 5-10 min intervals of each other. All 3 of us ordered 2 different rolls and it took like 30 mins to come out. Sushi was alright but I would say to much for the quality.
I think SideBar is the only restaurant downtown where you can have a 2 hour lunch and only spend 15 minutes of that actually eating and enjoying it.  The rest is spent waiting.  Mainly for grilled cheese, which apparently takes 45 minutes to make.  Maybe they were furiously Googling the ingredients or something?  Who knows.  But for some reason it took an ungodly amount of time and was last to the table.  The service was also slow, mainly because as our waitress noted, they don't have trays so she couldn't carry drinks or food for 4 people, which resulted in multiple runs back to the kitchen and bar.  Which is understandable because it TOTALLY makes sense to not have serving trays in a restaurant.  I mean, how out of place would that be?  Trays?  In a restaurant?  I can't imagine.  That would be like having alcohol at a bar.  Too foreign a concept.  Anyway.  I get it isn't the best or classiest place downtown, so I cut it some slack, but an obscene wait for food and a borderline inept waitress are two things you don't want to deal with on a Thursday when you are a hung over and hungry group because you all maybe had one martini too many the previous night.
If this isn't your first time at the specialty coffee rodeo and if you know you're way around a pour over, burr grinder, and espresso machine then most likely you will be slightly annoyed that the baristas talk to you like you've never heard of pour over and that they are the only place in Boston that serves good specialty coffee. I know coffee, am passionate about coffee, and Im always looking for the best roaster out there.  George Howell is a legend but the coffee here is honestly not that impressive.  One story - I ordered an Ethiopian pour over and asked for it to be made on the machine instead of by hand as I wanted to watch the machine in action. I paid $4 with my CC. I was then told that they don't have any Ethiopian but they would make me Kenyan which is very similar (not in my opinion but ok I'll go with it - there was Ethiopian on the shelf so I'm a little confused... why can you just go grab it and make it for me? That is what I ordered.)  Next I'm told they can't use the machine because it isn't on. Long story short I get my coffee after 10 minutes. And after drinking it I am never asked how it was, if I was ok with them switching out the coffee I ordered.  I don't know about you but I expect more.   I've decided that my coffee money is better spent elsewhere supporting people and roasters that are starting out. Sorry George, but ya let me down.
Called in flowers over the phone and I was pretty unimpressed with the arrangement they delivered.
If service is any indication, then I'm never going back.      We were basically seated at a table by the host, then told quite rudely by the server that we couldn't sit there.  Then we proceeded to watch as the host and server fought over whether we could sit there or not (while we were trying to scurry away).  Finally we were moved to another server's section, who basically treated us like crap as well.    I really can't figure out why we stayed?  Cheap beer, I guess.   The food is unremarkable (good wings, though), parking is a pain, and there are so many better places to go.
A few months back i went in for a toothache and ended up needing a root canal after diagnosis from Dr. Austria. the front desk then comes to me while I'm still in the chair stating it'll cost $1400 because ive reached the cap on my insurance. i told them i couldn't afford it, they then purpose a payment plan im thinking wow they really want to help me. Being desperate and scared I signed this inter-office agreement. the dentist per their chart, extirpated my canals. That's it. i tried to be ahead of the game and paid $300 toward the  treatment. But after looking around more and after talking to another dentist and insurance i decided to go to a different location where the complete treatment would be half the price and same quality (better work actually) the front desk at the new location treats me with respect and doesn't make me feel like I'm scum. Bethany dental front desk staff didn't help at all with the situation. after numerous contacts explaining ive done a root canal elsewhere they have billed me for nearly $800 for a supposed root canal (it would of been more if i hadn't blocked them from my bank) i actually received an email from them stating "we accessed the pulp chamber and cleaned the canals which is a root canal" I'm not stupid Google exists and honey a root canals consists of way more steps then just cleaning the roots. If all the dentist did was extirpate my canals then bill me for that, nothing else!  Before doing any kind of expensive procedure at Bethany Dental, don't me like me and rush into it, take an extra day and look elsewhere other wise they'll keep billing you for something they never even completed at outrageous costs.
Might be helpful if you were looking to buy, but if you need help with something you currently have then good luck getting any help or response.  I walked into this place around 5:30p on a Tuesday and there are seven workers sitting around and no customers in the store.  I went in to find out about a cracked screen on my galaxy I got three weeks ago- didn't drop it or have anything hit it to my knowledge.  I figured it happens and was lucky I had insurance and was willing to pay the deductible.  Some guy named Chauncey looked annoyed to have to help (which he didn't help at all so I don't know why he was annoyed).  Immediately thought of everything they could say to get rid of me.  I purchased at a third party store, not a corporate store (had no clue of this myself); I could pay $350 and cancel the contract if I didn't like it; I could buy a knew one.  Now I know why everyone hates Sprint- they don't care about their customers.  Then some other worker wanders over and says, "you know it can crack if you carry it in your pocket" and walked off like she had just saved the day.  This place is terrible.  It's obvious the workers don't want to be there.  Stay away from this store and Sprint
Nice staff. Subpar food for the price.
Unbelievably rude hostess  No respect to customers.  Server, Dani was the only reason for us to stay... The level of unprofessionalism and unpleasant look that the two hostesses gave are just horrible. I have never experienced this low level of customer service...
I used to love this place.  The food is very good, and thankfully that hasn't changed.  However, after eating there about 12-15 times (usually the same dish), I noticed the portions were smaller than ever.  I asked the waitress, and she said it's the same as always.  She's been there for a while, so she obviously knows the difference and is just denying it.  It's not my imagination because my wife noticed my plate and said the same thing.    I ordered a combo plate that you can choose up to four items.  I wanted three, and asked to just double up on the eggplant (which I ALWAYS do). The waitress said there would be a $2 up charge to double eggplant or babaganoush.  I looked at the menu, and the appetizer portion (which is bigger than the combo portion) of eggplant is only $1 more than the other items.  So where did the other dollar come from??  The babaganoush was the exact same price on the appetizer menu as the other items!  So where did the $2 up charge come from??  It made no sense to me whatsoever, but I did't feel like arguing about it.  Even if there was a legitimate reason for the up charge, they should have it on the menu, like they do for grape leaves.    The whole thing put a bad taste in my mouth.  Like I said, the food is tasty, but I might boycott this place just for the principal of it.
My brother in law suggested this place, and we came here right after arriving in Orlando, so we were starving.  The service was good, the food was absolutely terrible. Every single dish. I ordered the mofongo de camarones (shrimp with mashed plantain). The shrimp came separate, and the garlic sauce lacked any flavor - it didn't even taste like garlic! The sauce that typically comes with this dish (in a separate cup) looked and tasted like oil. So gross.  I would never eat here again.
Will not be back!!! The service was just awful. We used a Scoutmob and they tried to act like we could not use it by saying they no longer accept it. However, I quickly let them know that the Scoutmob for this location was recently added. So, they decided to take it grudgingly. The food was only decent. The location is in some shady strip mall. The value was just okay. When we were about to pay, the server handed us a bill and I reminded her that we were using the 1/2 off Scoutmob deal, so she took the bill back and came back with another that was pretty much the same except $8 difference...REALLY?!? She added the 18% tax but also a so-called Scoutmob fee...RIDICULOUS!!!!
Good may have been good if my server Megan T actually used a pad and took people's orders instead of guessing and just putting whatever she thought you wanted in front of you. Manager offered discounts because everyone else in my party ate but me, and still charged me for bad food. Stay away. Place next door (Hennessy's) had great food and specials. Thanks for charging me for food I didn't eat and trying to pacify me with discounts you never applied. Boo.....boo......on the right side theTV's are in good spots to watches you eat.....well try to eat
I've been to this location twice and couldn't be more disappointed. I looked through my provider list and saw this dermatologist listed so I called up for an appointment. When I arrived, I was told that I would be seeing Stephanie Delaney. Not the doctor, but the physician's assistant. Huh. Ok. Thought I booked an appointment with a doctor...  Stephanie was very pleasant and listened to all my concerns. She suggested a round of medication to help with acne and I went on my way with my prescription. And a $20 co-pay for not seeing an actual doctor. Hmm.   Took several months of the medication and saw no difference. I call the office to see if I can up the dosage (which she suggested was the next step if the initial dose wasn't effective) and I was told I need to book an appointment. Oh, I see. I get medication that doesn't work and have to come in and pay yet another co-pay just to have the dosage changed (as was suggested the first time). And it's not like they had to test my blood or anything to make sure levels were okay. I literally sat down, said nope no changes, and got a new prescription.  Time to find a new dermatologist.
This place is only worth your time if you are looking for discount designer jeans. My advice to anyone selling anything- try eBay or even donate. If this store actually does accept your used clothes/purses (which is an obstacle in itself, unless you have the style of a 13 year old) they really don't offer a lot. I find that I get more pleasure out of donating my old clothes to a worthy cause. Also- if you do dare to try to sell something to them, give yourself an afternoon because they are highly unorganized and very slow.
So I tried calling multiple times because the parking deck says 30 min free while the website says 1 hour. Finally someone picks up but he was unable to answer my question to why the difference for prices. He proceeded to tell me to hang on and then hangs up. So I just go inside and the manager says they give us a voucher for the free hour.  The waiter was not very attentive. He didn't check on us much. The service at the Johns Creek location is much better. However, I will say the drinks were great and very strong
We were seated immediately but unfortunately in the front booth in the bar. I am sure others may find this a good spot but we did not. It was so loud from the children in the waiting area,  the bartenders behind the bar talking at an extremely high level, the waitstaff grabbing sliverware while continuing to talk to those back at the podium, and other waitstaff conversation  (including a high five session). We could not hear or have our own conversation.  The food. Well it is what it is, whoch is why I don't regularly go to the OG and don't expect too much, they didn't improve on my opinion. We ordered two never ending bowl, one with chicken (highly over priced at $4). Had two refills.  On all dishes there was very little sauce.  The new Mushroom sauce had no flavor and 5 small mushroom pieces (nothing like the advertisements). On the second refill with chicken, the chicken had clearly been placed on another plate, one with red sauce, removed and placed (red sauce and all) on to the bowl with white sauce.
I just had a terrible experience here at the Shaking Crab in Quincy.  The server brought us our crab and told us that the crackers were in the washer and would be out in a minute or two. Then 10 minutes passed, still no utensils, we asked again and a different server told us that they didn't have any more, that they kept going missing. This went on for the rest of the time we were here. After 20 minutes of having our food the 3 of us were given one cracker. The crab was ice cold. The staff then avoided our table.  We informed the manager and he did not seem to care. I normally would never post anything like this, but that was the worst experience I have had at a restaurant.  I would give them a negative star if I could. The food was NOT worth the money it cost us.
We asked them about adding the gooey half boiled eggs that you'd be able to get at any other ramen place - and they only serve hard boiled eggs! This just seemed extremely weird to us and as owners of a ramen shop I would highly recommend they add that to their menu. Sorry but it's a necessity. As for our meals, they were unremarkable. Extremely bland and I honestly regret wasting time, money, and calories.
Worst food ever ... It was my wife's birthday and we were in Orlando celebrating by going to bunch of theme parks ... She is so fond of indo Chinese cuisine , so I really wanted to eat out ... Pulled out yelp and saw this place advertised so .... It was the most disappointing experiance ..  That f'ing place does not even know what is indo Chinese , they even justified it is indo Chinese .... Pls avoid this place ....the server was an a'Hole who was suggesting all crap ...
I dined at this restaurant before the most recent owner took over and the prices were never as high as they are now therefore I have not dined there until this past weekend, 3/16/13.  Went with a group of friends and although the food we ordered tasted fine, the price just does not justify it.  They're making a killing on food profit.  My husband and I shared the pick two cold appetizers (we chose babaganoush and hummus).  It came out on a small saucer and contained maybe a 1/2 c of each for $10.75.  I asked if it came with bread and they said no you have to pay for that separate so that was another $5 for the lavas bread (what was I suppose to eat with the dips).  Then we split their house salad, which was priced at $10.75 (no protein added) and it was a basic sized salad with lettuce, some cous cous, 2 olives, some feta, tomato and cucumber.  I know I will not come back to eat here.  I can find the same type of food that taste just as great and pay the price that it should be.
Here's a breakdown of what my boyfriend and I spent in about an hour: 2 entries for $20 total - this got us a ride up the elevator 3 drinks $22 total - this was pretty reasonable and the pours were generous  2 putt putt golf games for $20 total - this is outrageous for sub-par (pun intended) course 1 $5 game card - this got us two games of SKEE BALL (are you kidding me? I'll go to ormsby's and pay a quarter next time.   Total - $67 in about an hour in a half. No thanks.   I'm sure they are trying to recoup their investment quickly but unless they lower prices, I will chalk this up to a one-time visit.
HOB Boston. What can i say. Though it is part of a chain, i really couldn't quite feel the typical HOB vibe. The food was average and uneventful.  The semi private concert i attended was great and that raised the star level to 2. They could use some more people who enjoy working there. I couldn't feel the pride nor the funny bone that usually is part of the HOB team. I know there is room for improvement and i know the management has the costumers satisfaction as a priority.  That is why i am sure that they will make it their mission to review all the constructive criticism and make the proper adjustments.
So we sat at the bar after a 45 minute wait. Excited to try what I remember to be great coffee, I ordered my food and a Lavender Mocha. We watched as they prepared our coffee. When it was done, however, instead of serving it to us (seated right in front of them), the coffees were put a few feet away (within arms reach) on the till. We waited and watched as the coffees just sat there. Several waitresses passed by ignoring the coffees. After 10 minutes somebody decided to finally serve them. They were completely cold. I really don't see why this happened.   We both ordered Cassoulet. It was bland, greasy and low quality. I'm surprised to say that the Tangine I ordered the last time I was here was actually better tasting, which is rather sad as I imagined the Tangine was a bad exception.   There are some things that were still delicious. I love the waffles still. And the focaccia is great. But for the high expectations that arise from the price, hype and 45 minute wait each time, Cafe Medina is absolutely awful.
The wireless is spotty to the point of being useless.  It was very difficult to even get this review posted, much less do a meaningful work-related task using the internet.  I do not recommend staying here if you depend on a reliable internet connection.  Staff state it is a free service so it should not matter if it works or does not work, and there will be no further effort to fix this ongoing issue.  The quality of the food for breakfast was slightly below that of a school cafeteria.  The waiter was surprisingly inattentive given that there was only one other table to serve (at minimum I expect a single glass of water).  It takes about 3-5 minutes to enter the room due to the quirky key card system; one must insert and remove the card timed perfectly or the lock faults and the process need to be retried.  In spite of the above, the beds were comfortable.
Dime a dozen lounge near the Douche Ranch.  Meh.
I went to do my usual grocery shopping this evening got done collecting my items starting working my way to the registers, once I get close enough I notice there is only 1 register open for all items, 2 registers open for 12 items or less and 3 registers open for self service. My main issue is once I notice the line for the regular register ended close to where the self service lines were and several black shirts standing around not doing anything about it. Me along with several other customers had to ring and bag our own groceries which I have no issue with if that was the amount of items I had to be at that register. But to ring be made to stop because the line is full of your groceries and now you have to go and bag with 3 at that time black shirts standing in the area seeing clearly assistance was needed. I felt worst for the elderly woman with her handicap child in a wheelchair doing her best to handle everything. At the end of the day there are several people in this world looking for work and can't find it while we have people like the ones I encountered today with positions they are clearly abusing. This place truly needs a reface of their front workers I can't say the whole store but definitely the front workers.
Visited this restaurant today for their new weekday lunch hour and was immediately impressed by the friendliness of the staff and service. However, after my Caesar salad with grilled shrimp ($8 additional) showed up, I was less than impressed. This dish comes with 4 pretty small grilled shrimp, that should really only be worth $4 at most. I even asked the waitress if that was all the shrimp it came with and she confirmed it was. Will not return to this restaurant as I don't feel at all that I got a meal worth what I paid.
I love massages, good massages that is. And a good massage requires a good therapist who listens to their clients. Which, unfortunately for me did not happen!   I think the worst part of a bad massage is that you're all too keenly aware of that bad massage for every minute your are paying for! And you're literally counting down the minutes until it ends, which is completely counterproductive to your reason for getting the massage in the first place. I tried the introductory massage for NINETY minutes. Had this been a good massage, I would have been happy. I would have been ecstatic! But within minutes of my 90 minute massage commencing I knew it was going to be a bad massage. I had filled out a questionnaire prior to my massage session in which I Circled target/problem areas that I wanted to have addressed, particularly my neck, shoulders, and upper back. When I met my therapist, he read my form and confirmed these specific areas with me. But the bulk of my ninety minute massage was not targeted at the three areas I had requested. Instead, my therapist decided to give me the massage HE wanted to give. During my session, I repeatedly requested that he cover these areas in lieu of the other areas he focused on, mainly my arms, hands, legs, and feet. This was a very looonnnggg massage...which usually is a good thing, but in this case just proved to be frustrating. I couldn't wait for it to be over. I literally ran out of the room when he said it was over. When the lady at the front desk started talking to me about memberships I was not interested in being here for one more minute.  On a side note regarding employment: My dear friend worked here in sales for a brief stint which is why I tried the place in the first place. He endured an injury on the job and could not walk or stand as a result of the injury, which made performing his job duties here impossible. Short story shorter...they fired him, refused to communicate with him, and never paid him his last check.  This place has a VERY high turnover rate, which speaks for itself. They literally have employment ads on Craigslist every day!!
I'm less than impressed with Sweet. Like several others, I also found them a tad sweet for my taste, although not unbearably so. More importantly, the flavors are very hard to detect. I've had their green tea and pink lemonade flavors. The green tea cupcake's flavor was so mild I needed to work to try and find the hint of green tea in it. The pink lemonade was so sweet and icing heavy, I could barely taste the cherry.  It was the unappealing texture, however, that bothered me the most. Their cupcakes are dry and heavy. The green tea cupcake I purchased actually appeared to be unevenly baked, with the bottom half looking undercooked. The pink lemonade cake was hard and dry. I've never put a cupcake down before without finishing it, but for the first time I did.   This is not my idea of a perfect bite of cake and frosting. These bakers could learn a lot from the cupcake shops in DC and New York.
This virtual ride takes you on a scenic and sensory tour of Canada. It's a beautiful place and I can't imagine the countless hours spent putting the videos together through real flight time. That being said it is absolutely not worth the money. Unless you can't make it anywhere else in Vancouver I would skip this and visit some of the actual land, air and sea tours around Vancouver. The ride last about 5 minutes (or less) it took more time to watch the intro video (called rise or uplift or something like that ) and the safety video.  It was just an ok experience but I had an amazing time otherwise in Vancouver and the surrounding areas.
For electricity bill mishap: It might be National Grid or fire department's mistake but we were renting the apt from Riversedge and it was property manager's responsibility to inform us rather than pushing us away and acting ignorant.  I agree you can charge us for repairing the wall if it was mentioned in the lease - which was not. Also, we asked property manager before we drilled those holes and he never once mentioned that it should be "nail size" or we will be charged for the repair. As a matter of fact, lease says that riversedge maintainence willl remove the toggle bolts - do nails need toggle bolts?  These costs are minor compared to the rent we paid and as I mentioned before it's not a deal breaker but it should have been mentioned in the lease or clearly told before hand. No one like such surprises.  Thanks for offering to reimburse but not needed. Its the inconvenience.....  Lastly, As I mentioned in my previous post - Its a nice apartment but not proper support from staff.
Great atmosphere and packaging... but the cupcake tasted really bad and the frosting even worse!  I was very excited to try Sweet after it opened and the very cute atmosphere gave me hope that I would be in for a treat.  I got my cupcakes to go and I was immediately enamored with the boxes and packaging.  However when i got home and actually tried the cupcakes I was sorely disappointed.  The cake was dry- really, really dry.  Stuck in my throat and felt like sandpaper dry.  The frosting, by contrast was sweet- really, really sweet.  Cloyingly sweet- really quite unpleasant.  I ended up throwing 1/2 of each away- it was really that bad.   I think they have a great concept that is very on trend, great packaging and store design, a great location and a customer base who will pay through the nose for a cupcake- but honestly... it isn't all about marketing!  You have to have cupcakes that actually taste good... or at least are not objectionably bad!  I am not sure how they are going to make it... I hope for their sake they figure out how to actually make a product that people will enjoy eating!
The food has always been good, always. The service on he other hand has always always been bad. The waiters always leave you hanging, the owner is rude and, sad to say, ghetto in front of customers. Again, the food is spot on but the service is horrible. I have been coming here for years and it never changes. We are here today, the first time in a couple months and they have renovated. They have expanded into the unit next door. Good renovation, bigger space, better decor. Still a ways to go before it is finished but good. Wish the service was better, unfortunately I doubt I will return. I think today was it.
This is my first yelp review because I have never felt this strongly about a business before.   Regarding reliability and customer service, this is hands down the worst company I have ever dealt with.    Their cleaning employees are nice people, but awfully unprofessional and with absolutely no training.  They are basically just told to show up. There are no standards by which they must adhere, even in regards to what supplies they bring.     The last cleaner I had brought a single rag with stains and hair on it, to clean everything, even the bathroom...and no paper towels. I opted to give her my counter cloths to use for the kitchen at least, but couldn't find it after she left.. so I guess she took it with her!    Since she presumably used the same rag in the toilet as everywhere else... I had to clean AGAIN after she left.   The WORST part is the customer service and overall company interaction.    First cleaning  - I booked using a referral promo.   I have the screenshot of what I was supposed to be charged - when I made the booking. However the charge on my credit card was DOUBLE.  **Customer service said the quoted price was due to an error in their website design and thanked me for bringing in to their attention..but did not refund me the balance.   The cleaning was just ok, but I opted to give it another try..BIG MISTAKE.    The second cleaning:  I had a scheduling conflict and moved the cleaning by 2 hours: the online system confirmed that I would be charged a $15 fee.  However, the schedule change did not take effect, they showed up when I was not home, and my whole payment was wasted.  **Customer service told me "nothing was rescheduled"...they don't know why the system did not register it..no compensation offered.  The 3rd cleaning: The pro, Omar, started by texting that he was running late.  Then he texted that he could not come due to police activity in the T and HIS WORDS: ' the situation is a lil risky for me'.    I called customer service and they confirmed that he would not be coming.  They told me they would refund my credit card the full amount paid for the cleaning and also issue me a $35 goodwill credit since my whole afternoon was wasted waiting for him.    **The credit card refund never showed up, and when I called 2 weeks later, customer service told me that they just gave me a goodwill credit because the pro 'was late'!   I told them that in fact he NEVER showed up **I have his messages to prove it, and I HAD been told I was going to get the full refund to my credit card.    **They refused to refund the full amount. I asked them if they have customer service calls recorded, so that they can go back to Sep 16 and listen to what I was told.  The woman told me that her manager said yes they have the calls recorded, but he will not listen to them, and that she was 'proceeding to cancel this call'.. AND SHE HUNG UP ON ME.    Needless to say I will NEVER refer anyone to Handy.  I have never in my life dealt with such disrespectful and terrible customer service.    The concept is great, their cleaners are nice but somewhat unprofessional, but the company values are extremely sketchy.    Bottom line: Handy is a scam..a huge waste of money AND time.
It honestly takes them forever to bring food after you've ordered it. It really doesn't even matter if they're busy or not nor does it matter what you order it will be a long time before they bring it. I must admit other than that it's a cool dive bar.
Just had a shellac mani/pedi. I'm usually pretty fair in the sense that I expect to get what I pay for. And since this is one of the lower-priced nail salons in the area, I didn't come in with extremely high expectations. But even with my modest expectations, I was seriously disappointed with this place. The tools used for my pedicure and manicure looked overused and unsanitary, the women in the salon carried on a conversation at the top of their lungs the entire time I was there, and my nails were unevenly shaped. I will definitely be finding another salon in the area.
Went there last night and was disappointed again!  How hard is it to take and order and fill it?  All we asked for was a salad and a pizza and for the second time in a row, no salad arrived.  At least they didn't put it on the bill this time.   I can understand if the place is jamming, but it was dead in there at 8 PM.  Maybe the staff should spend less time hanging out together behind the bar, flexing, talking about drinking and plans for later and spend some time doing their jobs.  And the pizza was only fair, not the usual excellent.  Not a good showing last night.  It will be a long time before we return, if we do return.   Great pizza can overcome poor service, but fair pizza and poor service?  That's a tough sell.
The worst Chinese restaurant I have ever been to in vancouver. The the shreaded pork had no mushrooms and is full of Msg. The lions head was full of corn starch. The fish was not fresh. We have to wait 40 minutes for dessert which we eventually cancelled thee order. You can be blind folded and bump into a better Chinese restaurant in Vancouver. Service was slow with an attitude.  The chef managed to screw up every dish we ordered. I was angry and said I would write them up on yelp. The response is their loyal chinese customers do not use yelp. wt$%&++
Jerk chicken didn't taste authentic. Chicken  taco had bone in it. Restaurant is in food court of flea market so don't expect atmosphere.
Highlights: Recently revisited BTS -- one of my favorite college hangout spots a few years back. Had an incredibly rude customer service experience. Surprised, disappointed, and won't be returning. Even signed up for a Yelp account today to encourage them to increase their professionalism. -------------------------- More details: Needing to use the bathroom after downing my taro drink, I made for the door with the large bathroom sign on it. An Asian staff guy came out of nowhere, literally stuck his arm out across my chest, and forcibly pushed me away. "Bathroom's closed," he said in an abrupt, dismissive tone. Thinking he thought I might have just come in from the street, I let him know, "I'm a paying customer." Grinning sardonically, he mocked, "Are you also a reading customer?" He pointed to a small sign on the side counter saying the bathroom was reserved for staff only. My mistake, but when I have to pee, I'm usually not looking around for small disclaimers. Did he need to make assumptions and say it the way he did? I might have expected such attitude from myself in college, but not out of people running a business. So I let him know, "No, I'm not. I'm not going to be a customer at all anymore."  Here comes my favorite part. His response? A snarky laugh with other staff, followed by "That's fine with me."  BTS, you were a staple in my college years; I was there when you first opened behind the post office! And despite your upward creeping prices since, I have come back at least once a year because I loved the unpretentious atmosphere. I'm not sure what changed, but on principle I won't be supporting a business that lacks respect for their customers.  1 star for this experience, +1 star for the memories.
I went to DryBar this past weekend to get my hair done for my 21st birthday. I had seen so many good reviews that I couldn't wait, especially since I am terrible at doing my own hair! The atmosphere immediately excited me- music, movies, laughter...I felt like I was at a club! The women working were so nice and my stylist was super friendly. I told her I wanted loose waves and she definitely did that. The reason for two stars, however, is that my hair looked great at the salon, but 25 minutes later all of my curls fell and my hair was straight. I made sure to take a cab home just so my hair wouldn't get ruined! I was so upset because it looked amazing at the salon. I eventually had to make my friend re curl it quickly before we went out. Paying almost $50 for a blowout that immediately fell down was really frustrating. Not sure if I would go back again!
Okay, I'm going to get the bad out of the way first. I have never been to restaurant where the non-alcoholic beverages weren't listed. Until here. 2 pages of boozy drinks but not even the hint of what their non-booze offerings were. Maybe if we'd shown up with a kid or stroller, we'd have gotten the non-alcoholic offerings. I probably wouldn't have gotten so bent out of shape about it if the waiter hadn't been a little taken aback that we asked about them.   Now, onto the food. We all ordered burgers. And, for the most part, were happy with our choices. I had the Aunt Patty which was very tasty. The boyfriend had a bodacious bacon burger. Dad got the Texas ranger (which he loved) and Mom had a basic burger. They were all nice burgers... our issue was that none of them came cooked as we ordered. All were cooked well done. We had 3 mediums and a medium-well in our group. I'd have kicked the review up to a 3 if they had cooked our stuff to order. There are plenty of M&E's in town who do things more consistently.
An open letter to Kreuger Farms:  Dear Mr. Kreuger,  I have been a loyal customer for over 15 years.  I have had many memorable times coming to your farm to pick fruits, pumpkins and feast on the goodies sold in your market. I expected the same experience today, but sadly, was greatly mistaken.   I came to pick raspberries, but because it was raining, was in the market area waiting for the rain to subside. While I was contemplating buying a flat, one of your employees brought over a sign that raised the price of the flats and stuck it on the cart. When I remarked about the price, she flippantly said that I was too slow and should have gotten it sooner.  I saw you come over and was about to make a comment, when you interrupted me and said, "that's what supply and demand is." And walked away.  I would like to believe that you and your staff were just having a bad day and that customers usually are usually treated with better customer service instead of being subjected to the blatant price hikes and rude comments I experienced today.  Your "lesson" in supply and demand was taken to heart. And I'm sorry to say that I will never be coming back to support your market again. Also, I will encourage my friends and colleagues who are looking for farm fresh produce and fruits to consider alternative more customer friendly establishments.   I know my change in patronage will not impact your bottom line at all, but I would encourage you to think about what true customer service means and practice that with your other patrons, before the demand for your goods drops due to how you treat your customers.  Sincerely, Former Kreuger farms fan
I had been coming here for years, but Habana's has lost it ways. The food was so bad and expensive.  Bad food that cost a lot leaves you feeling more than a little ripped off.  The drink menu does not have prices,  this is because a glass of wine is 10 dollars.  The $23 Lechon Asado could have been mistaken for bad jerky.   There are NOW much better Cuban here in Austin, let this one fade away.
I was trying to decide if I should give two or three stars.  I finally decided based on how high it's rated.  Since it has almost five stars, I'm rounding down to two.  I'm going to try to be (for me) brief.    Food & drink:  Very meh.  Interesting, in a "what?" kind of way.  But I've pretty much forgotten what I  had.  The wife had a waffle... for the price it should have been orgasmic, it was not in the top 50% of her waffle experiences.  My beverage was a Matcha Latte (had to go to website to remember) it was ok, but for that "interesting" a drink it should have been more interesting.  Maybe it was the day we ordered.  Hmm,  I just went and looked at the photos section of the Yelp listing.  I don't know if it means anything on how the place was doing that day, but my latte did not have any cute art on top.  Maybe it WAS an off day.  Or maybe they didn't like us :O  Service...  Ok, friendly, but disorganized.  It was fairly busy, but they had lots of staff.  The building and how they used it was great!  Nice and quirky.  That is what moved me to consider 3 stars.  The windows in the bathroom doors did take me back to my time in Europe (not really my favorite feature of Europe, but hey, nostalgia!).  The back dining area was worth wandering back to take a look at.  Bottom line:  If I had waited in line more than 4 minutes to get in I'd feel really bad.  As is, I can't recommend it, but if you try it and like it, maybe I'm missing something.
Just the worst. Always takes several days to get your meds. Staff is not helpful. Tell you to request refills using the Walmart app and it NEVER works. Ugh. Wish this wasn't the closest pharmacy to where I live.
It was the end of a long week, and I had promised my neglected boyfriend we would spend some quality time together.  Our destination of choice?  Ma Soba, a pan-Asian and sushi restaurant in Beacon Hill.  Opened in 1999, the restaurant has an impressive array of awards.  Needless to say, we were pretty excited to try it out.  We were greeted at the door by a friendly face, but his was the last smile we would see that evening.  Our server ignored us for several minutes after stopping by just long enough to fill our water glasses, and when she did return, only wanted to know if we had "decided what we wanted".  She took our order and left.  Not that she didn't do her job well; she was tremendously efficient.  Our water glasses were full all night, and she timed the courses perfectly.  But a smile and a little hospitality certainly would have made us feel a lot more comfortable.  We hit a home run with our appetizers.  My boyfriend ordered the pork gyoza, and they were crispy on the outside, warm and moist on the inside.  My miso soup was excellent.  For our main course, we split the Shogun Boat, which consisted of eight pieces of Sushi, fifteen pieces of Sashimi, a Tuna Roll, a Caterpillar Roll and a California Roll.  Now, we knew Ma Soba was not the top sushi restaurant in Boston.  It's not too pricey, so we knew not to expect phenomenal sushi.  With that in mind, we were very pleased with the presentation, the selection and the quality.  We were quite content after our main course, even if our server had yet to crack a smile.    However, the biggest disappointment was yet to come.  We ordered the green tea mochi, and we were horrified when my boyfriend's fork made a resounding "clank" against  it as he tried to cut into it.  I attempted a bite of my piece, but after chunks of freezer burn ice fell into my mouth, decided to follow my better judgment and send the mochi back.  We were disappointed that the restaurant even served us such sub-standard fare.  We left disappointed.  The sushi itself was as expected, but the service, the awful dessert and the lack of ambiance in the restaurant ultimately left us unsatisfied.  I doubt we'll go back.
Apparently it's a requirement to have a TERRIBLE attitude to work here. Just moved in across the street and was excited to have a juice bar across so close! Went in the first day to be "greeted" by a young woman with the worst attitude ever. I felt like I was doing her a disservice by asking her to do her job. Went in the day after hoping she wouldn't be working because the food was quite good, only to find another young woman with an equally if not worse attitude working. Whoever owns or runs this establishment needs to find people who don't suck life out of the room to represent their business. I would rather pay someone to go and get me a smoothie than go in myself.
Absolutely overpriced for the value. I wanted to support a small business but we got absolutely ripped off. $668 to fix a leak in an outdoor, below-the-ground pipe. I don't think he understands the basics of business--a business thrives by adding value. And doing so repeatedly. Not by overcharging customers.  I even tried to explain this to him but to avail.   We will never use this business again.
I came in to get my nails done for a trip I'm about to go on and what I wanted was simple--almond-shaped nails with a black dot on the beds + a clear coat. Very minimal. I got most of what I asked for, but upon a closer look my nails (which are naturally grown) were definitely not almond shaped. They're honestly only slightly different in shape than what I came in with. And as I was getting my nails filed by the first lady, she said that she usually charges $7 extra for filing almond-shaped nails, but because it was my first time she would waive the fee--which was nice of her, but I didn't know people charged extra for certain shapes! Or maybe I'm just ignorant when it comes to nail salons (this was my first time going in about 7+ years). The other woman who gave me the manicure (not the same who shaped my nails) did an OK job. She was polite and friendly, and the coat was even. But the dots didn't all have a consistent size and one of them is totally crooked. But honestly, I could live with the lopsided dots. It's the shape I'm really disappointed about. I thought "almond" is a universal shape and thus that she knew what I meant--even after showing her a picture.   The plus side is that my mani only cost about $30 but it's still more than I would've paid for not getting the right shape. Maybe what I wanted was too simple. Or maybe they just didn't understand what I wanted. If I do come back (and it's likely that I won't, partially because of my experience and partially because I rarely get my nails done) I'll shape my own nails at home.
Did not enjoy this place at all. The Milky Sake wasn't good. The broth for the beef udon was very bland and the Miso soup was cold. The Japanese fried chicken was flavorful but that's about it.
Usually have very good experiance at joes, but my friend's turkey burger was wrong and undercooked (pink) 3 times. Unacceptable in my eyes, and I wont be back at let to this location.
I've gone in a couple of times over the past year for lunch, but I went in after 2pm and they have a very limited menu, which included nothing to my liking.  I sat at the bar both times and the bartender gave me attitude when I complained that the menu was so limited.  She wasn't friendly at all and actually only served me after I had to flag her down (even though there were only four people at the bar at the time - she was too busy doing prep work and playing on her phone).  Coincidentally, it was the same bartender on both visits.    By the way, I went in the second time because it was six months in between visits and I forgot that they only had a limited menu after 2pm.  I should have remembered after the first visit, so the second visit was a mistake and only served to confirm my opinion of so-so food and lousy service.
Granted it was Friday but the wait to get drinks and food was unacceptable. We got seated quickly but even getting waitress to come by was difficult. Had two hungry kids waiting. Messed up drink order. And messed up food order. Staff may be overworked and our waitress in particular did not seem well versed in the menu.   As far as food is concerned. Cheese enchiladas tasted like kraft American cheese slices. Veggie-changa was too breadth and didn't have much flavor. Chips were ok. Margaritas were way too sweet.   Would not go again.
We received terrible service when we ordered at Sweet Mamas today. We told the server we were on lunch break and we come from a company that is right down the road that always orders there so they usually work well with us and get us in and out in a timely manner....but not today! They were incredibly rude and put our order in late, like 15 minutes after we ordered. Then we asked where our food was and that we needed to leave soon, and the waitress said "well if you need to leave you need to leave. I will get to go boxes." We were in shock. We asked for the owners and they weren't in, so we ffigure that's why the staff was so terrible today, but my group and I decided to never go back there. So if you go and are served by a young girl that dresses like she's going to a soccer match, run the other direction and eat somewhere else! We ended up taking our food in TO GO boxes and ate at work. Now we're telling our whole company of over 4,000 employees to stay away from it!
I usually go into places like chilis with pretty low expectations. I worked at a chilis for many years so I understand the food quality and what to expect from a place like this. I'm not sure if this location is a franchise or not, but it was just horrible. From the service to the food presentation to the taste, just ew!   I always order a margarita, queso dip and a quesadilla explosion salad. Being that this is always my order, I've come to know what to expect, but this meal almost seemed like it was someone trying to replicate (unsuccessfully) the chilis' recipes. The queso dip was like warm and thick. The consistency was grainy instead of creamy and it just didn't taste good. The quesadilla salad was thrown onto the place and looked like someone had bumped the plate or almost dropped it or something. The chicken was thick and rubbery.   I know this place is in tourist central so maybe they don't have to pay much attention to quality on account that people will come regardless because they won't know, but we definitely won't be back here! The chilis on I-drive is much more consistent! It's a little more of a drive, but it's worth it.
First of all, let me say, I appreciate that this place exists, as Boston hasn't really caught on to the Bubble Tea craze like the West Coast where there's a shop every few miles BUT, the tea was horrible. And by horrible, I mean that it tasted powdered and the tapioca balls were completely tasteless and inedible. And by inedible, I mean that they weren't cooked properly and were gelatinous, borderline melting. I ordered a Sesame tea and my gf ordered a Thai iced tea. I see people ordering at the stand, and I just pity them, as I pitied myself for paying 6.50 for two gross teas that we immediately dumped in the trash when we turned the corner.  Go to Boston Tea Stop instead. It's the same price but yummy.
I used to be literally the world's biggest Milestones fan. I eat out 3-4 times a week and I came to this location very often. Unfortunately, they used to have a great menu but most of that is gone and even though the staff are great, the food has gotten consistently worse and worse.   I had three bad meals here in a row before I finally decided to pack it in and say good bye. It doesn't matter what you order, the quality of the ingredients has gotten worse and the kitchen staff seemingly doesn't care.   I'm not sure if I'm allowed to mention other restaurants, but there's another chain restaurant a block away that has been improving their menu recently and they've earned my loyalty now. It's a shame though because I often recommended Milestones to other people and now I'm forced to do the exact opposite.
I felt that the menu was limited to regional fare which has been made in a gourmet style in order to justify small portions at reasonably high prices. The actual food was well prepared and tasty, but really,two small fish tacos with no accoutrements is an entree in Austin?  My husband's entree was a piece of chicken.  Period.  Sides are separate.  Now, quality was good, but if I hadn't had peanuts before we went, I'd have left hungry. I also thought the menu was limited.
Been wanting to check this place out for awhile, so I came in on a whim after lunch.  The counter girl gave me the impression she wasn't happy to be there since she just stared at me without smiling when I walked in.  You can't substitute veggies for rice, it's an add on, you can only get the spring rolls fried (gross),  I ordered the chicken curry with veggies to go, the place is small, clean and quiet.  The dish was bland, the "veggies" were 3 pieces of carrot and 2 pieces of potato.  It's inexpensive, and close to my house, but I will not visit again.
First: CASH ONLY!  Shady stuff  Second, this is in a lot of ways a classically American Chinese joint, replete with the metal teapot and Chinese zodiac placemats, but the manager'll be quick to point out some more old school home-style Chinese stuff posted on the desk.   Food is pretty mediocre. The "chicken velvet" is some kind of egg concoction that everyone around us seemed to be ordering but was seriously undersalted. The dan dan noodles were cooked too al dente and they used too much vinegar.  I did find the manager sweet though--he was so excited to have Chinese people come. And he seemed so wistful as he stared out into the neon glow of the McDonalds opposite, hands loosely held behind his back like my old painting teacher. I suspect that he might've wanted this place to be so much more. And I think it could be, if they accepted credit.  Seriously, it's like a 7 minute walk one way to the closest BoA
I don't remember McCormick and Schmick's food to be extremely second-rate. The mussel, do not get, had no flavor and smelt fishy. That is not a good sign, mussels are suppose to smell fresh like the ocean...fishy means spoiled. What happened to the mushroom risotto? Why is it not on the menu anymore?  I recalled that being delicious the last time I dined here years ago.  The hassle of finding and paying to park was not worth it.  I hardly noticed the view being distracted by the poor quality food.
It is the most convenient store to my house. In spite of the inflated prices i still chose this establishment. The selection is decent but that does not make up for the over all cold demeanor of the staff. They are rarely helpful and make this establishment a piss poor contender in comparison to its competition.
I was going to leeba for over two years. I LOVED how Elie cut and colored my hair . I referred at least a dozen customers to Elie because they all loved my hair. Last March I got my third keratin treatment in two years. I paid $250. The week before that I had gotten a cut, color, highlight and blow dry and bought some products. With tips, I spent close to $600.00 in two weeks. When I washed my hair a couple of days after the keratin my new highlights were brassy blonde and completely burnt and shriveled up. I had to straighten my hair but it looked terrible! I went to the salon and elie agreed to fix it. He toned down the highlights and cut my hair really short trying to cut the fried hair out but it still looked terrible. When I went back for my next cut I told him I was really upset and he assured me he was going to fix it. Not only did he not fix it, because it can't be fixed, but he charged me. The next appointment I made with him he cancelled and I had to go to somebody else because I couldn't get another appointment for weeks. So when I was getting close to needing another haircut I went into the salon and made an appointment and I told him I was upset about all the money I paid for the keratin. He said we will talk when you come in for appointment. I went in the following week for my appointment on a Monday and he had called in sick. I asked when next appointment was and they couldn't offer me anything til Friday at 4:30! I told receptionist I work til 5pm and could be there at 5:15 and she said sorry, he is booked. I have tried to contact the owner twice via their website but haven't heard a word from them.....hmmmm....I know they have my number because they have called to cancel twice! Unfortunately second time I didn't get message til after I went to salon. I am so hurt and disappointed by how I was treated by Elie. And I was totally ripped off.
Note to the Yelp admin: this place actually closes at 4:55 pm, not 5 pm. Weird, I know, but I went to get an iced coffee on another hot Boston day and when I arrived at 4:55 I waited. I waited a few minutes before someone came over and told me it was closed. Still before 5 pm. Thankfully there's a Starbucks coming in soon across the street so we don't have to settle when we want an afternoon iced coffee.
The renovation is nice.  The bar area has a nice ambiance, and the patio is massive.  However, the service leaves something to be desired.    My partner and I walked into the bar on a slow afternoon at the beginning of June.  My partner asked the bartender what seasonal beers they have on tap (he was looking for a summer ale).  The bartender looks at the beer menu on the wall and says, "All the beers are listed there.  Everything is seasonal."  Then he walked away and started talking to a coworker and stocking the bar before we even had a chance to respond.  Rude.  The bartender continued to have an "I could care less" cocky attitude when he finally took our order and when we closed out.  Alberta doesn't need this kind of douche-baggery.  There are so many friendly bars to go to, I don't know that we'll be returning to ASP.
I wouldn't say Rays is the most authentic restaurant for BBQ. It's serviceable at best but the sides are pretty good. My Wife loves the cornbread, beans, and greens. I believe they've shut down recently and I could see why because often times I've noticed you when you go by it's closed.
I remember the West Coast benny being SO delicious the first time I tried it. Coupled with a nice patio and a decent view of the water, I deemed Hurricane Grill a solid B. On my second visit, the West Coast benny I was served literally tasted and smelled like garbage. Maybe the avocado was overripe, maybe the fish not so fresh anymore, I'm not sure, I'm not a scientist. I didn't complain as there were 8 of us and I really didn't want to cause a scene. The coffee was weak and bland and definitely not very fresh. Service was good though; we arrived late and the server promptly took orders and filled waters. Overall, food is lacking but location and service deem this place a-okay.
I've given this place a couple of chances and it has always disappointed me. I found the spring rolls to be average, as well as the pho. The broth was okay, but I didn't find there to be a balance between the noodles and meat. The meat was another issue I had and is the reason I won't be returning. I love chicken pho - well when the meat is tender and juicy. Both times that I can recall ordering chicken pho here  the meat was really dry and almost resembled the texture of beef jerky. Although my boyfriend likes this place I never want to return.
This pharmacy has a terrible customer service. We need to wait 30 minutes for a single prescription drug. There are only 5 people behind us. None of them received their medications in the first 10 minutes. First time and not coming back to Walgreens.   When I asked why so long they told me because this pharmacy is busy! So hire more people!!
Went for lunch today and was disappointed.    I got some sort of steak sandwich with mushrooms and onions.  First of all, for $18, there wasn't much steak which was very disappointing.   I cant say if it was cooked to order or not since there was so little meat.   There were certainly more mushrooms and onions than meat.   Also, the bread was very crusty.   Too crusty.   The dish also came with french fries which were very greasy.  Only half were edible.  The rest seemed soaked in oil and were droopy.     Overall, not a great meal.   I certainly would not go back given the price.  I can think of a number of places that are much better.  Capital grill has an amazing steak sandwich (with two to three times as much meat) at the same price point.   OR go to Servitzios down the street for much less he money and a better sandwich.
I actually love Whole Bowl. But whoever they are hiring now, both at this location and the one on Williams are racist racist racist. I've watched myself be charged for things I never was before, even watching others not be charged the same. Literally watched the quote unquote bowler give me less, noticeably. And when my sisters have patronized the NE location the service was despicable hesitabt and racist. Even found hair in the food.... given the service who knows if it was purposeful or not.  Yuck. I will not be coming back... and this was a fave. Just appalled
For starters, no Donnie....no Marky Mark, no Paul......not even Nacho or the Mom were anywhere to be found.  OK, I didn't REALLY expect to see any of them......but I would have liked the bartender to be a little bit nicer though.  She was obviously bothered that she had another customer - not that there were very many to begin with.    Decent beer selection, and decent basic menu (as I expected).  My burger was cooked the way I ordered it.......thing is, there was nothing special at all about it.  A five guys burger is tastier, and a whole lot cheaper.  The onion strings were good, but again - not great.  The special Whalburger sauce that came with it (thousand island) was good.....helped to give the burger some taste.    So, that's that.......I'll check the place out again if Marky Mark will buy me a beer.  I've got a hell of a movie pitch for him!
I ordered the immunity one. The juice tasted good overall, but I'm not stoked about the prices not displayed on the menu. 10.00 is a bit steep.It makes me feel that they know it's pricy and try to disguise it.
I decided to take my laptop to MacTronics based on a friends recommendation.  The issue with my Macbook Pro: My screen kept freezing and finally after two weeks it just stopped booting up.  Normally this would be a sensible conclusion that my hard drive was fried.  However, I installed an SSD a few years ago and those things rarely crash.  So I took it to MacTronics and explained that I wasn't sure what was wrong with the laptop but I assumed it was the hard drive even though it was SSD.  I was informed for them to run an diagnostics test on the laptop it would cost me 60 bucks.  If that came up with nothing they would need to open the laptop up that would be an additional 30 bucks.  I received a call two days later and I was politely told that they couldn't find out what was wrong with my laptop but they assumed it was the hard drive.  Which is what I assumed before I dropped my laptop off!  They also told me that I was 90 bucks in so far and that the next step was to erase my hard drive and reformat it to see if it was actually the hard drive.  The next step would cost me an additional 60 bucks bringing my total to 150 bucks.  When I asked if erasing my data was necessary they told me yes in order to keep troubleshooting.  I refused because I know that I can erase my own data, go to the Apple store and they can reformat my hard drive for free!  So I picked up my laptop, paid 90 bucks, and went to the Apple store.  First off, Apple ran two different diagnostics tests FOR FREE!!.  They also told me that because I installed my own hard drive that the diagnostics test will always show my hard drive as an error so they were looking for other errors.  They also agreed that SSD hard drives rarely crash so they wanted to take a look inside my Macbook Pro overnight FREE of charge.  I got a call the next day from Apple saying my laptop was fixed by merely replacing the cable that connects the hard drive to the motherboard!  Data Saved!  And it cost me 57 bucks!!  If you have an Apple device that is less than 6 years old DO NOT TAKE IT TO THIS PLACE unless you need data recovery.
1. I would like to make it clear that I did not visit the office, so I am not commenting on the dentist's skills/care. 2. This comment is about the front-desk staff.  I was very excited about their Groupon deal. So I called to schedule an appointment, telling them that I was using the Groupon. It was pretty difficult to make an appointment because I got one for two weeks later, and her attitude was not so pleasant. Then, she said she would email me a registration package soon. But I did not receive it until three days before the appointment. So I completed it and sent it back immediately. Later, she did not remind me about the appointment again. I had a very bad day before the appointment, so unfortunately I forgot about it.  When I called to reschedule, I apologized several times, and her attitude was still not so pleasant. She said, "You cannot reschedule until you pay us the $50 cancellation fee. It says that on the website. I don't know where, but you can go find it." You don't know where?! Because you never told me/possibly anyone about it?! $50 was even more expensive than the Groupon deal I paid for!  So I said, "When there is a cancellation policy, my dentists and doctors always call me to remind me the day before the appointment." She said, "Well, we do it two days before." No, she did not do that either. So I found another dentist. They told me about their cancellation policy the first time I called. Then, they called me to remind me two days before the appointment and two hours before the appointment.    Maybe being more responsible and courteous like the other dentist's staff would not have turned away your customer.
Aweful Aweful Aweful service!!!! . Rude hostess, she was dismissive and didn't care for our business so we went elsewhere. Band sound great while I was there waiting on hostess for short period..
I do not recommend this place at all when we ate my grandfather after halfway through eating his meal found a cockroach in his food (no joke). Then we still had to pay for it. Just when you thought it couldn't get any worse their prices were different on the bill then when it said on the menu. Overall if you read this far it was pretty bad.
Totally not my kind of place, but I won't let that skew my review too much. Wow, this place gets crazy busy sometimes. The people here aren't that nice either, at least the several times I have been here.. Not the clientele, not the staff. When it is busy, the wait for ordering a drink was so long I just went ahead and ordered two beers.  I also take issue with the beer selection. No craft beer on tap and only a couple in bottles just doesn't do it for me. I'm sure you can get all the domestic and liquor that your heart desires so this might not be an issue for everyone. I find the layout of Tequila Cowboy to be perplexing. Stairs in odd places, lots of hallways and turns, things both upstairs and down. I am never quite sure where to go. One thing is for sure though, it is LOUD no matter where you go. With the music and karaoke bar, really the only place to have conversation would be outside on the patio. Be prepared for smokers there. The bathrooms are tucked away in a corner and once they actually had an attendant there, so bring some small bills for tipping.  I tried the food once. It was ok. Not much more to say about that. Pretty standard bar fare potato skins. For upsides, the bands are usually pretty good. The decor is pretty decent too, with some fun murals to look at. There is plenty of parking if you go around back, which is just a short walk away.
This is a nice place to throw a party for a small child. So nice, in fact, that after attending two parties here I decide this was the place where I would host my son's first birthday.   My issue is with their customer service.  I've been trying to book a date for three weeks now and I can't get them to give me the time of day!   Initially  I called to gather info about the party packages. I gave the woman on the phone my email address, phone number, and preferred dates and she promised to email me once she checked her book and found availability.  A week later, not having heard back, I went on their website to book the date on my own. Unfortunately the link was broken so no go! Then I called back to book it on the phone and got voice mail. Left a message. A day later, still no call back!   Maybe they are just so busy that losing a new customer is of no concern. Doesn't seem like a sustainable business model to me.
We were having a family gathering pn September 23, '17 and decided to order some sushi. We called the order in at 12pm, so we could have it ready for pick up at 6pm. We arrived at 6pm and the employees told us the order wasn't ready. Then they said that they were busy and had a lot of large orders. I have to say my Family has been in the restaurant business for 40 years and if we ever treated customers like this, we would have never survived. FYI, THE REASON WE ORDERED THE FOOD SO EARLY IN THE DAY, WAS SO WE WOULDN'T HAVE TO WAIT WHEN ALL THE ORDERS WERE COMING IN FOR THE DINNER RUSH. Very bad customer service. I won't be returning.
A vendor brought Qdoba to a meeting in our conference room. I have a meeting in there later this afternoon and thought I'd call to find out when they were picking up their catering supplies. The guy said I'll call you back tomorrow and I told him I have a meeting this afternoon and just wanted to know when they were coming back for their items. He said "hold on" and that was 22 minutes ago. I still waiting on my headset, but although I can hear him talking to people in the background he won't get back on the phone with me.  I am someone who frequently utilizes caterers for large functions at work. This lack of respect for a potential customer has lost them quite a bit of business since people were saying they liked their food and we should use them. I'll let everyone know that will not be the case. And I'll let other coordinators here know my experience so they don't make the mistake of using them either.
This was our first time come here so we didn't know what to expect. I liked the reclining chair and the fact the you get a blanket because it was really chili in there. The service could have been better. We ordered two cocktails and an appetizer ... We finished our appetizer before our drinks ever came out. I was also told that we get free popcorn which we never got. Might give them the benefit of the doubt and return again. Have not decided yet.
Scheduled a delivery for 7 PM. An hour later, after calling to make sure the drive is on their way, they tell me that the delivery man tried delivering our order and wasn't able to because the person who answered didn't order the food. To which I argued that no one came to our door, no one rang the doorbell or called my cellphone (WHICH THEY HAVE ON FILE FOR THIS VERY PURPOSE) to deliver the food I had ordered two hours ago. Also OBVIOUSLY if the person rejects the order, YOU'RE AT THE WRONG ADDRESS. The sales representative then changes her story and says the delivery man knocked on the door and no one answered at all. This is the second time this location has completely messed something up and the fact that there was no retribution for their mistake is astounding to me. Awful customer service, not worth a single ounce of effort. Also, use a new delivery service because a delivery man who can't do his ONE SINGLE job is absolutely useless. You have forever ruined wings and Brookline. DISHONOR ON YOU. DISHONOR ON YOUR COW. DISHONOR ON YOUR WHOLE FAMILY.
I visited here several times to have service completed on my car, ranging from tires to oil changes. Each time I visit the service and customer service is getting worse.  The second to last time they argued about a sale price they had on the front of the building, he tells me oh, that ended two days ago. I ask why do you advertise something that I as a customer can take advantage of. His response was that wasn't his job.   The last time I went they left the oil cap off the car, it wasn't until several hours later when the car started running rough that I found the cap on top of the engine block, they claimed they didn't leave the cap off. It was a big mess and it smelled like oil for weeks.  Overall: I would PASS on this location based on rude customer service and lack the knowledgeable on the jobs they are performing.
These cupcakes are TERRIBLE!!  I've been to both the Chestnut Hill and now the Cambridge locations and both suffer from lack of freshness and a very artificial taste.    Most recently, I got a 6 pack of cupcakes to go at the Cambridge location which cost me a total of $19.15 (about $3.20 each).  When I got home, I realized cupcake carrier they use is not sufficient - the cupcakes are so tiny that they shifted around in the box and made a little bit of a mess (see photo).  The cupcakes weren't for any special presentation, just to satisfy my late night sweet tooth, so I didn't mind their appearance.   But I can not tolerate the staleness of the cupcakes and their very artificial taste - not when I'm paying $3.20 each for a cupcake about an inch and 1/2 in diameter!!  I had a pink lemonade, rootbeer float, and a blueberry pie.  ALL TERRIBLE TASTING!   I don't even want the other 3 I purchased so they are going in the trash.    The best cupcakes in Boston area is by far Georgetown cupcakes!   Their store traffic is so high you never run into staleness.  Their cupcakes also just have a rich quality with out tasing too artificial.    Save your money and avoid Sweet Bakery!!
Bummed. Tupelo was scheduled on the streetfoodfinder site to be at our work location from 6:30-9:30 and they were a no-show. When called, they said they were sorry, but that there was nothing they can do. They often leave early or run out of coffee when they do show. Hoping our employer can find a consistent replacement for Tupleo while the cafeteria is closed.
We all have one thing in common, we're all in the market for a car and want to find what fits our needs and budgets best. I heard Beaverton Toyota was the best place in Oregon to purchase a new car. Only half true. My partner and I walked inside and asked for assistance near the Toyota Corolla section and said someone would be out to meet us shortly. We stood by the car of our choice for 20 minutes in the pouring rain and no one came. There was another salesman helping someone and we asked him if he could send someone to help us. Another 20 minutes pass and no one shows up. I call the dealership and the receptionist was very kind and apologized many times and someone was out within 5min. I told the salesman I wasnt looking to buy today and that I wanted to look at my options. We took the car I wanted for a test drive and I absolutely loved it. The car felt planted, even on wet surfaces. The route the salesman took us on had l sorts of turns and speeds to get a feel of the car. We went inside and took down my information. He asked if I wanted to buy the car today. I repeated myself and told him I was only looking for today. He started getting aggressive and intimidating about making the sales. He kept disappapearing every couple minutes, even while we were talking.  Broadway Toyota may have a state of the art facility and greatest selection, but their service is absolutely terrible and not worth buying my car there.
I love the original, one of my favorites in the area (Can't beat Regina's on Thacher though.)  I couldn't have been more disappointed with the Peabody location.  Not an exaggeration, I have had a way better pie at Papa Gino's.  Huge letdown, but I may give it another shot when the wait/crowds die down.
Me:  Two shots of Jager please! Bartender:  WANT TO MAKE THEM DOUBLES?!!!!?  *With one hand makes a shaka (surfing) sign; with the other hand points to a sign reading "Make your Jager shot a double!"* Me:  Are doubles discounted? Bartender:  HELL YEA!!!!! Me:  Cool; two double shots of Jager please! Bartender:  *Places two double shot glasses on the bar.  Takes Jager bottle out of fridge.*  Actually they are not discounted. Me:  So a double is the same price as two singles? Bartender:  Yes. Me:  Then why did you tell me they were on discount? Bartender:  *Pauses.*  SO YOU COULD GET FUCKED UP!!!!!!   Me:  Two single shots of Jager please.
I was on vacation in Portland so I thought I would use 5 star...... which should be renamed 0 star. This is hands down the worst dry cleaning service I have ever used. With zero customer service skills, poor cleaning abilities and a rude stuff, this place should be condemned. Do not use 5 star. I wouldn't give them any starts but I am obligated by the app to give them at least one undeserving star.
I visited this location shortly after it arrived in Baldwin Park. The service was really slow as the staff seemed to still be figuring out how to run the machines. There was an advertisement for the YF app, so I downloaded it while I was waiting. When I showed the employee when I was checking out so that I could get a "credit" or "punch," the employee told me this location didn't have the app capabilities yet. I got the yogurt with strawberries blended in. I was really disappointed in the texture of the yogurt. It was grainy. The taste was fine but I wasn't able to get past the texture, so I didn't finish it. Bummer. Maybe I'll go back and try it again. I hope the kinks will have been worked out and it's a better experience.
This was by far the worst timeshare experience! HORRIBLE customer service, we actually had some employees snap at us! We got snapped at by front desk because our plane was late so he wasn't sure if we could get booked into the room that we already paid for. Then scolded by the woman finishing up our reservation the next day. The dryer didnt work. I complained & was told that it just doesnt work well.... after 2.5hrs our clothes were still wet! My fridge broke, they came & turned the setting to "coldest" & called it fixed! It BROKE, settings cease to be relevant. They didnt come back to repair or replace itn just let me wait. W had to have security let us into our room 1-3 times per day. Security snapped at us & insisted that we put it next to our phone which we did not. Nobody smiles, it must suck to work there? Waiting for security & maintenance & having damp clothes laying across everything to dry, then having to repack, move to a different condo then unpack AGAIN wasted a full day of our trip. One employee (Ana Delis) cut me off & went off on me when I told her the problems with my condo. She basically told me to tell it to someone else, she isn't responsible for our condo problems but MUCH MUCH MUCH MUCH RUDER!! This has been an absolute nightmare. I'd never own after knowing what kind of rude people they hire. Seriously... stay away from Westgate lakes orlando... the worst! I actually was in tears during our vacation because of Westgate employees & the condo.
The 2 stars are for great variety. I would have given 4 stars but removed 2 for a failure of integrity for a customer oriented business. I shop big, & very recently since October 2013 having moved to a location close to Moody Street, have started to shop here. I am a customer who LOATHES to return things, & almost never have had to do it. Once in 15 yrs shopping at Market Basket, once in 15 yrs at Whole Foods, both times because it was a wrong item that I had bought. Incident 1. Early on, I bought some snacks that had gone bad. I called them right away & When I went back there was a little fuss but the young boy who took it back admonished me & said that I should not do it again (so it was my fault!) Incident 2. A 'sweet' famous in my region has recently been made & sold here in the US. I had bought it earlier in NY & it was excellent. SO seeing them in this store, i bought two boxes - upon opening the first, we found it tasted awful & it had a weird after taste. Having had the earlier experience, i was hesitant but did bring it up with a guy at the cash counter. He said they don't take back sweets. It was sealed and frozen but OK, i got rid of it (not cheap). Incident 3 was in two parts, so bear with me - I asked for 6 samosas, (so the same man who had politely told me he would not take back the sweets), packed them & wrote the number 6 on the outside. Upon going home I found 5 samosas....so figured that I must have been mistaken that samosas are a dollar each.....& that 6 must have been the price (which would make it 1.25 each). However I was there on Wednesday this week & saw that the samosas were indeed 1.00 per samosa, so there was a mistake last time. Seeing the same 'friendly' person who had packed them last time, I told him that he had written 6 but I found only 5 inside. SO making a genial point of his generosity/openness - he said to me, Don't worry, I'll give you an extra samosa today, 'neither you nor I are going to benefit from $1.00, (loose translation)'. So he put them in & wrote 6 outside & reiterated that there were SEVEN inside. I came home & as it was tea time, my husband opened up the samosa bag to toast - Imagine our disbelief & feelings to see that he had only packed SIX. There were no 7 in there.   I am only a single customer, but I am feel I am a trouble free, good & loyal customer who goes back to the same business for ever. For me, I like the small local store connections & try to build it wherever I live. They just weren't/aren't interested or  ready for a repeat customer like myself. I wish them well - they have some good & some great stuff - & I had to think it over a couple of days. But I can't do business if I am not treated right. So here I am looking for another shop.....
I'm confused at how this place has any stars.  The food is not what we expected at all. It was dry tasteless and completely unappetizing. The I got two tacos, I cant even remember which ones, but one had this weird mayonnaise based sauce, the fish was hard, the cajun fries were very salty and came with some orange mayo like sauce,  the kids chicken tenders were hard as rocks and looked like the once you can get in the frozen section at Walmart, the shrimp appetizer was hard as rocks and swimming in some runny sauce, just completely unedible. I mean when our little ones don't want to eat the food, we know its bad... The place was just disgusting, the tables were dirty and the floors were sticky. Yuck. We will never come back to thus place. We spent about $60 and left hungry. NEVER AGAIN
I was looking forward to shopping at Sprouts.  It opened a few weeks ago and I finally got there today.  To say I was disappointed is an understatement.  The staff is not just passive, but unpleasant. More than once while I was shopping a staffer whisked by me without so much as an "excuse me".  They had carts of merchandise stacked up, waiting to be shelved, blocking shoppers. The cashier situation was the worst. A customer in front of me had a return/credit and it took FOREVER for the required manager to complete the transaction.  I brought my own bags and bagged myself (as I prefer) but when all my items were rung up, the cashier grabbed the remaining items and began to bag them in their bags instead of helping me finish with my bags.  But the topper of the whole visit was that the cashier said nothing. No "thank you", no "do you need a hand", not even the now common "there you go".    The place just opened! Haven't they trained the staff any customer service skills? I won't be going back.    And, the prices are not that great.  They have fake specials - 1 pound packages of strawberries @ 2 for $5 but a 2 pound package for $3.98. Similar with blueberries.  And many empty produce bag dispensers.  Management needs to wake up.
Wow....honestly this place sucked from the time we walked in...  The host greeted us, not by saying "welcome to BJs," but by asking if we had a rewards card. We said no so she told us to wait off to the side. After a very few uncomfortable moments of silence, another host motioned for us to follow him.   The place was nice inside. Whatever--looked like every other bar/restaurant that seems to be popular nowadays. Waitress showed up promptly, asked us what we wanted, so we got drinks and calamari appetizer. The picture on the menu (hah, I know, pictures on a menu) looked pretty good. The menu was huge. I'm not joking--the burgers were broken down into categories based on which piece of equipment you wanted it cooked on...not necessarily a bad thing...but strange. Everything served here is frozen food that could be prepared at home.  Well--when we got that calamari...it looked nothing like the photo. It was $10, but probably had three or four bites of calamari. It was a very, very small plate of food.   I never send back food. I work in a kitchen and I know how annoying that can be. But...this wasn't right. My wife asked if this was a normal portion, apparently it was. I told her we didn't want it. $10 is quite a bit of mula for a measly portion of food.   Instead, we just ordered some food to try and hurry this trip up. We were both pretty ready to get out of there, but we were also hungry. Sadly--I think our calamari (which say on our table for awhile) was served to another table. Gross.  Anyways--we get our food and it's not horrible. I had the jalapeño burger, which came with fried jalapeños. The burger had only a couple of jalapeños, but two different sauces...kinda weird but whatever. The Asian salad was alright as well. I guess the mandarin oranges and sesame seeds made it Asian.   Whatever--this place just didn't do it for me. The staff was bad, the food was alright and the best part of our experience was leaving the restaurant.
Two stars for friendly service and base for seating. However my experience with the meal was Far Beyond and satisfactory. So much so that I did not finish my meal. My husband had ordered the chicken sandwich and I ordered the hot chicken plate. He also ordered the fries with no pickle. After we had sat down they brought my husband the fries and said he could have them on the house because they accidentally put pickle but they would be bringing out a new order without the pickle. In my opinion that was a very good move however the new backs they brought out had a hair in it and we ended up not eating it nor did we bother to bring it to the front. Why? Because by this time we had also received our main meals and those were so unsatisfactory is that we had some get up as not a good food place so no point to ask for new ones. My chicken plate was nothing but mush. The chicken was so thin or had been pounded so much that it had tears in the middle so really it was only a mangled piece of chicken covered in so much breading and sauce that it tasted like mushy meat when eating it. My husband's chicken sandwich suffered the same but also lacked an incredible amount of flavor. It was so Bland!  I expected so much more from this place because of the reviews, however when we were there we could tell a lot of people had ordered the tofu sandwich. The few people that we saw eating the chicken sandwich had actually deconstructed it and ate it with fork and knife. I was incredibly unhappy with the quality of my meal I couldn't even finish it! I ended up leaving and going to chicken and gun and thoroughly enjoyed my meal there! I'm upset that we had to waste 30 plus dollars to find out that this place was just another fail of a good review location
My experience at the café was not what I expected. I had read and heard great reviews about the food and was disappointed when I tried the pork flatbread sandwich and the hand pulled flat noodles.  The flatbread sandwich was sub-par due to the fact that the pork was dry and bland while the bread was tasteless. The noodles were good, but I did not get as much flavor as expected from the dish. Having tasted other Chinese places in Chinatown, I cannot get myself to give this place more than 2 stars. Furthermore, the atmosphere was fine but I wish it was better as there was no A/C on a hot humid day, napkins were like tissues and the place only took cash.
The hotel is nice and comfortable, but the billing department is terrible. I needed an itemized receipt to be reimbursed by my job and I left the billing department 4 messages over the course of 2 weeks after they billed my card a week late for charges that I did not know that I would be billed for.  I had to involve Starwood AND call and speak with the general manager before the billing department would send me an itemized bill. It was so frustrating....if you stay here, get a copy of EVERYTHING before you leave because clearly they don't know.
We ordered a lot of food, and every single the we ordered was good. I know that it's a bar and caters to a nighttime crowd, but we were there at noon, and they were open, so I expected them to actually be prepared for a day time crowd. I was there with my mom and my 3 kids, and ordered sprites for the kids - the waitress brought 3 very full paper cups without lids, and said they didn't have lids. Okay, that's fine, but how about you fill them halfway up? Or ask me before you bring them? So my kids spilled Sprite all over themselves. Then it took her forever to come back to get our food order. We ordered, finally, and the food took forever. It seems like the wait-staff was way more excited about serving the patio than the folks inside, since that's where they seemed to spend most of their time. When the food finally came, it was delicious. I couldn't finish my sandwich, and waited and waited and WAITED for the waitress to come so I could ask for a togo box. We also wanted to order dessert donuts. She basically never came, so I got up and asked the bartender for the boxes and our check. That, too, took forever, and then once we had the check and pulled out credit cards to pay, it took the waitress forever to come back and take the card, then took her forever to swipe it and bring it back.   I would very much like to return in the evening and hope for a better experience but perhaps the management (who walked past our table repeatedly and ignored us) should spend some time training the waitstaff that flirting with hot guys at the bar isn't what they're paid for.
I can't knock the food, because it's pretty good albeit overpriced. The whole host/waiting/seating situation there is ridiculous! I get that you want the "entire party" to be there before seating would-be diners, but you don't need to be a complete a$$ about it.  I had a party of 3, waiting on 2 more people, we knew we would have to wait to be seated but the host seemed like he would seat our partial party if we came back in a few minutes once the table was cleared.  It was freezing and pouring that day and we didn't want to be one of the many annoying people that crowd the entry, so we hung out outside. About 10 minutes passed and our youngest diner (17) went into the door to see if we could possibly sit. As SOON as the kid went in through the door, the host freaked out and told him to go back outside.  I thought that this was an extremely inappropriate way to talk to anyone. We were bringing in a party of 5 to drop at least $100 on breakfast. We left and got breakfast at Acme Cafe, and banned Medina in the process.
Is there an option for no stars?  I am a university student (obviously) and I eat here quite often. I commute 1.5 hours and sometimes I forget to pack a lunch -- so Subway is always the best bet. Sometimes I get the footlong and eat half for lunch and the other half for dinner. It's actually quite perfect.  The reason why I wouldn't even give this place any stars is because of the customer service. Wow. I've had never been to a place with such terrible service. I mean, I'm not expecting full-fledged, strenuous service or anything, but I mean, can I get at least a smile!?  I would order my sandwich, and they would already be choosing my bread for me. I once asked for turkey and she scooped up tuna and smeared it on my bread (I wasn't paying attention because the other ladies were being terribly rude to a customer ahead of me and I couldn't help but watch in disgust). I corrected her and she looked at me, scoffed, rolled her eyes and tossed the tuna sandwich in the trash like it was bacteria infested. SO dramatic. Another occasion, I ordered a ham sandwich and I wanted it toasted -- but after her putting the ham, the cheese, she added lettuce without my saying. I told her I wanted it toasted and she said, "too late." I have umpteen many affairs with them, but the general point is the service is terrible. They are slow, rude and do NOT listen. It's awfully frustrating when the Subway is known for their "personalized sandwiches" and you get the complete opposite.  And they don't close the sandwich when they're done with it, instead, they just wrap it up. You know what that means, right? The sauce of your choice isn't in the sandwich, it's in the paper. Ayyyya.
Food was okay. Nothing to brag about. Small portions. Won't go back there anytime soon.
I've never taken to social media to review before now. The Salem, MA location has terrible customer service. I'm livid with my treatment. A few days ago, my order was over an hour late, arrived cold and the driver forgot the receipt. For my trouble,  I was told that my next order would be free. I just phoned to take them up on that, and I was told there was no credit in their system for me. I am too failed by this location. TAKE YOUR BUSINESS ELSEWHERE. Support a local mom and pop pizza place before getting mistreated by big business. SHAME ON YOU ASHLEY! Your mismanagement of my situation was deplorable. A free side order? Not good enough! I'm a disabled,  housebound woman and just lost a source of a meal today. I've never experienced such deplorable service from Domino's. I've been a loyal customer for over 20 years from Florida to North Carolina to New York to Massachusetts.  I'll never do business with you again. I'm writing corporate as well. I don't taken being mistreated well. It's unacceptable!
Don't waste your money or time with this place. I been a member since 2014,  at the Hillsboro location and had amazing Brenda work on my facials. I relocated to Portland and found  Nicole, despite all the horrible reviews about this place; I decided to open a new a membership.  I needed to relax and get a facial due to long hours working in a federal building 80 hours + so I scheduled an appointment and didn't get Nicole, I booked on the same day with a diff person - I went in excited, however this time not even minutes of my facial; the lady grabbed a hot towel and rubbed the make up off my skin so I stopped the facial and my face was burning , she was not gentle at all and my face turned red and she popped a zit with the towel while she was removing the cleansing solution. After I went and talked with two  receptionist about the incident , I was not given the number to their manager , while I was explaining the situation my face was burning and it felt like rug burn  all over my chin, cheeks , jaw line, upper lip, and forehead. Come on? Really, why would anyone use so much strength on a facial???? And these people are supposed to be TRAINED AND CERTIFIED. I've never had problems with Dermalogica products. I'm not coming back. As I'm writing this post my face is still burning - I went in at 8:30 pm and it's now 10:44 and I'm holding ice to my face because it feels like sun burn. Update: received a call from from the Lead she was helpful and left some items for me to pick up to fix the problem, I called the manager Darcy wanting to follow up with her as well and she had left me a voice message.  She was understanding at first and as soon as I told her I wanted to cancel my membership , instead of receiving CUSTOMER SERVICE, she had the audacity to remind me of a time I paid using my "boyfriends credit card", wow I'm so disgusted with this place - so irrelevant and uneducated response. DON'T WASTE YOUR MONEY here.
Food was pretty crappy and service was very very slow on a night that was ~75% capacity. I understand some nights are busy but you gotta come by my table more often than every 30 mins.
Will never go back to any toys r us. I'm not sure how this this location is still in business. Every time I shop here I leave wishing I never walked in. The store is a mess, cluttered, and I can never find what I am looking for. Today after an hour of shopping I finally found an item for my friends son's birthday. The item was labeled $26.99 on tje shelf. When I checked out my bill was $56.99. Money is not the option, however, when I told the cashier that the price was wrong she asked me if I would like to return the product. I said no, and walked her to the shelf, where 3 more of the same item sat. While she checked on the correct price the line became 8 customers long. Only one checker was helping customers. At a desk on the side of the store, sat the general manager. So I left the register and spoke with the gm Cornelius. I told him that the price was wrong and that every time I shopped here I left disappointed. He said that a customer probably moved the product on the shelf.  I told him that there was more of the same product in the same location. He did not want to help me nor did he care to ask about the past experiences that I had in the store. This place suxs the life out of you!
WTH ... I actually wanted to say 'F' instead of 'H' ... Service is decent and ya their menu is awful except for soups .....  It's overrated ...
Extremely unprofessional! I came in to upgrade my phone. They did not have the phone I wanted even though it is one of the most popular phones. They said they would have to get it from another store. The employees left me sitting there for over 30 minutes while they joked back and forth with each other. Supposedly they were doing something with my account but did not communicate with me at all. They could not locate my account even though I have a Fido number and online account. I finally left the store as parking was expiring. Go to a real Fido store as previous reviewer suggests.
Kinda a pretentious strange dive bar. Full of lots of office jocks, and scantly clad plastic looking, women, good beer selection, good happy hour, terrible terrible food.  Please do yourself a favor a skip eating here. Wings were just bones no meat at all. Seems like they were over fried and re fried. Slow cooked chicken was just Safeway roasted chicken with some day old bread toasted. In no way what so ever worth $16, a complete waste of money, no quality check.   Server was running around like a mad person, not really doing anything, then she would disappear for 20min at a time.  I'm not really sure what was going on with her. Then she was pissy when when we were ordering from the bar.  Decent live music a bit to loud for the time. Emptied pretty quick once the musician started. He was good just to loud.
Went there this morning expecting good things. Terrible under-cooked food(twice we sent it back)  not a good experience.  We ordered Ham and got some space age meat like substance. Never again.
Came by today and it was closed. Hope she goes out of business because she is bad for the other black businesses in the community. All she does is try and get other black businesses in the area closed instead of capitalizing off of it.  She is a low down evil miserable individual.
I went here some time back and did not find much 'resistance' to anything Establishment by the main guy here.   In fact, I found the views about the US made 'drug war' in Colombia seemed almost to parallel that of the US government.     It really was totally disappointing.     The place definitely is not the center of any sort of  rebellion/ political resistance that I could see.
My girlfriends and I didn't go back to this restaurant after they renovated.  I found negative comments more than positive on other sites review.  We made the rsvn at 12.30pm and waited for few mins then got seated.  I found they have quite a lot of dim sims but absolutely overpriced!!  S-3.68, M-4.38, L-5.38, SK-6.38, SLK-7.98, SKK-8.98.  You may only find 1-2 items are $3.68 and most of items are $5.38 even more.  Deep fried Chicken knees w/wasabi - it's so greasy and the wasabi looked like so artificial coz fluorescence color.  Steamed Black truffle mushroom dumpling - Only mixed mushroom dumplings, there is NO black truffle mushroom inside.  Steamed salted egg yolk custard bun- Buns were so big and egg yolk was bland.  Beef tripe and tender pot - It didn't look good but taste good.  Steamed beef balls - Very soft and probably marinated with baking power!!  Short ribs and pork liver rice roll pot - Super greasy!!!  I only had a rice roll and it's oily!  This is regular dim sum place, such quality of food and poor service.  I will not recommend this place at all.
The positive: large restaurant right in the Tuttle Crossing mall. Decor is very cool, and restaurant was clean. Food was delivered piping hot.  The negative: service was exceptionally slow. Our server left a lot to be desired. It took her over 5 minutes to greet us and take our drink and appetizer order. Drinks came, and we were all ready to order, and indicated that to her. She just smiled  and walked away. Appetizer was delivered and still no order was taken. We had to wait an additional 5 minutes to eat our appetizer because she never even brought us napkins or silverware. We had to flag down a different server and ask her to get our server so we could get utensils.  When she finally brought them she took our food order.  Then we waited...and waited.... and waited.... 45 minutes before our food arrived. The restaurant wasn't all that busy. Other tables that arrived after us actually finished eating before we even got our food! We ate very fast as we had to be somewhere at a certain time. Paid our bill via the ziosk. She came to clear our plates and we asked for a to go box. We waited another 10 minutes for her to bring a to go box. We wound up being late for our activity due to slow service. Advice: go there if you want got food and have a few hours to kill waiting for slow service
Awful service.. slow!.. couldn't get refills like asked.. feel we were ignored! Won't go back to this location.. Garlic butter fries were dry
This place was not worth it, the tortillas were paper like and hard to pull apart, the crispy taco shells were out of a box. There was no flavor, lots of reviews keep referring to price but if its not worth eating its not worth buying.
This is one of, I think, 4 full service bars in the Austin Airport. It used to have a wider draft beer selection but now it's just Bud Light and Miller Light (yikes).  For better draft beer go all the way across the airport down by United.  The sandwiches are also pretty bad, like the burger. Better off going to Thundercloud.  But I was there in late December and there were people with Airport contractor badges being shown around and being told "it's always packed" at such and such times. because it's right next to the Delta gates, which operate the largest planes to Austin (757).  So maybe it will be changing soon.
Waited over 30 minutes for my free birthday pizza on July 29th, 2016 in the afternoon after getting salad and soda. I saw a small cardboard box sitting on an inactive heating tray. I said it must be mine and got it. Angry that no one said my name at all while waiting all that time and left with my full bags.
We made reservations over a week ago for a special occasion, we had heard negative comments but wanted to give the restaurant the benefit of the doubt. We ordered lots of appies and dinner to follow. Dinner was very bland, no taste to the food and there was a lack of quality in the meat. After dinner we ordered desert and tea, while waiting for the desert a waitress told us to leave if we weren't ordering anything else (not knowing we had actually ordered desert). Completely rude and uncalled for specially because we had made reservations a week prior. They lack the skills to run a restaurant and were not prepared for more customers. Very disappointing, will most likely not return. At the end, we went to pay the bill, they had already added 15percent tip to the bill even though the service was extremely bad and they were trying to make us leave quickly so they can give the table to someone else. Be smart and read the reviews, this place is just not worth your time or money.
I went well out of my way to try the sushi here. Upon arriving, I quickly regretted it. The guy preparing sushi behind the counter was sniffing constantly. It was gross and made me concerned that someone sick was preparing my food.   Against my better judgement, I ordered the pineapple roll. I was sadly disappointed. It had an unappetizing crunch to it, and it was small for the price.  The girl behind the counter was friendly, but not enough to make up for the food or ambience of the place.
Went to Bosphorous 2 weeks ago with my sisters for lunch. I was actually looking forward to it because it used to be one of my favorite restaurants in park avenue. As usual, we ordered humus and bread. Since we were sharing, I wanted to scoop some humus and put it in my plate. As I was doing that I noticed hair, as it was inside the humus. I immediately put my fork down and waited for a waiter. He was new so his trainer deeply scrutinized the plate in front of us, not believing. He was liked away where it was sunny and looked through the humus again, then again. I was appalled that he had to comb through the dish so many times, when he cold have simply apologized and brought a new one. After 5 mins, the manager came to speak to us with all sorts of excuses. He started by saying that he berated all his staff in the kitchen, mentioned that no one in the it hen has long hair and that the brush they used to use would shed. He went on to elaborate that when a costumer found hair in the past, it was just brush hair and the costumer was being "extra". I didn't like the demeaning nature of this manager. I felt like he treated us like this because we were young because I'm pretty sure if we were older and looked different m, he wouldn't have all these excuses.  We ate our dinner, which was good and left. I doubt I'll be going back anytime soon, if ever.
I was super excited to finally find a place serving california burritos. This place unfortunately did not really deliver what I was seeking; in all the wrong places.  Instead of delicious carne asada it is way too greasy, instead of lots of crunchy fries it is soggy and greasy, way too little guac or pico.  I will have to wait until next time Im in SD for the real thing, oh well at least they tried.
If I could give this place a negative star rating, I would. After my girlfriend got patted down before walking in, we sat down to have a couple of drinks at the bar. Once we got our drinks, the bartender walked around to the outside of the bar and sat down, not getting up the whole time to check and see if we needed anything, etc. I had to signal her over from across the bar to ask for our check. From there, it went further downhill...My legal name is William, but I everyone usually knows that Bill is short for or a nickname for William...like Joe for Joseph, or Bob for Robert, Dick for Richard, etc. Well, they wouldn't accept my Visa card because my license shows William and my cc shows Bill. In all my years, I have never had an issue of my card getting rejected...and I mean never!! I asked to speak with the manager and offered to even call my credit card company...this guy didn't have a clue, nor did he care one bit. I then pulled out my AMEX, which did have William listed, but the bartender then stated they don't even take AMEX. After all that, I just ended up paying cash, but this was in my mind terrible customer service! The place inside leaves a lot to be desired as well....small, unclean bathroom, etc. I would not recommend this place to anyone...there are much better places to go in that same vicinity.
I realize this place has good reviews, but I was not at all impressed.  One Dr. there is nice and the other is not so nice.  I was hoping to have the nicer Dr. but kept getting the other one and it was highly frustrating.  It is weird to not have any privacy and be out in the open with other people staring at you.  It seemed that regardless of what the complaint was, the Dr. would do the same exact procedure on everyone.  That can't be right.  If I had a neck complaint, he would do the same song and dance as someone that had a lower-back complaint.  I noticed this and thought it was strange.   I found it unnerving to have to have adjustments done while other people stared at me, but that's the nature of this open environment.  Just not my cup of tea.
Over the years, I've had a burger here before and always thought it was good.  Recently, I set up a corporate outing here with over 100 people.  The appetizers were ok, but the entrees on the buffet were lousy.  Just before the dessert went out, someone pointed out a cockroach walking on the plates to me, DISGUSTING.  See picture.  They also "didn't receive" our first check, then they charged over $10k on our credit card without authorization.  We tried to sort this out, they told us to send another check and when they received it, they will credit our card.  Well, they cashed the check over a month ago and still no refund to us.  I will NEVER go here again and I will tell everyone I know not to as well.
Never again !!! Found a dead bug in a dish from the buffet!! When I showed it to the staff, the response was just a sheepish grin, no apology or anything. They just don't care for the quality or health of customers.
Super awkward experience at front counter. The female employee seemed to complain once asked to do dishes or something, saying "This will be the SIXTH time, SIXTH!" Then she made my drink.   I was sort of weirded out that she was having this conversation while I was standing paying for my drink, but blew it off. Then I got my americano and it's so bad! Disappointing on all fronts compared to previous experiences. Maybe this employee was having an off day, but I just wanted a delicious espresso.
We liked it when we went for dinner. So we went for buffet. Not much choice for vegetarians. Biryani has gone bad and not so good curries for naans. So we could not have biryaniz and breadz even though buffet was very expensive!
If you like overpriced furniture and pushy sales staff, this is the place to go!  I don't, so took my business elsewhere.   At least they did me a favor and let me know that they were scammers up front- among other things, every item I looked at was only going to be "on sale" for a few more days. Even the items that would be custom ordered.  If you're that awful before they take your money, just imagine what they're going to be like after the sale.
Super slow service...don't go here for lunch if you're on a timed break!
What a horrible experience coming by here all the way from dorchester! I made a appointment to come by here to check out a few honda accord sport sedan and 4x calling after back to back the vehicle has been SOLD and they called me last min everytime when i hop in my car to come and about to leave to come. So finally i visit and met the sale man name Victor and omG! I never met any one who got a grumpy face on him without a smile... not even tryna be greetful or nothing .. like dude ? Really im here to buy a car from YOU and ur not even happy as much ... and poor customer service! And Forgot to mention the sales manager look crZy too like ur not even happy or anything neither I just dont know... i mean if u have a bad day or something leave it behind and treat customer right u know... anyways showing me a vehicle that has dent back front side, paint chip off and all and tryna have me buy a car that i dont like like no!!! On top of that okay i come to check out a vehicle i havent seen in my life yes i admit its said black fabric seat but now im changing my mind to a leather seat what the F is the problem ?? After i said i kinda want leather seat cuz i want leather after test drive the accord with fabric i kinda dont like it so Salesman Victor goes " oh if u know u made the appointment to see the vehicle like whats wrong with this that this that like hello dude I got $$$$$$ imma get wtf I want the heck u meannnn ??? Base on all I dont think this dealership is worth to have my $ sorry!   0 star all da way!!
Unos is actually my favorite restaurant and yet it's come to this--a two star review.  This particular Unos I've been to more times than I can count and I've had at least 3 other bad customer service experiences, but the one I had tonight takes the cake.  The guy I had twice before was so negligent that I got his name from my check and memorized it so that when I returned I'd ask that they seat me anywhere but his area.  I came in today and asked for a one person booth for one and she says they don't have any so they had to seat me in the back where all the tables are.  Ok, no real problem, but I was there alone, and it wasn't peak hours just yet; it was obvious that I just wanted to eat and enjoy a meal with minimal disturbance or distraction.  And yet, she tried to seat me DIRECTLY next to another person at a table, even though the whole space where the tables were was empty.  I said no, I'd like to sit over there please (referring to a small table on the other side) and she obliged.  It just seemed like common sense and common courtesy to me.  Even in mall foodcourts, total strangers don't sit directly next to one another, let alone at an uncrowded sit-down restaurant.    Then, maybe 10 minutes later, they came back and seated a party of two DIRECTLY next to me.  It was extremely awkward because the rest of the area was just about empty and fairly quiet, and they were so close to me.  I was irritated; she easily could have sat them at any other of the 5 empty tables and the waitress assigned to that area wouldn't have been inconvenienced.  I was going to try to tough it out, but the woman at the table turned out to be particularly loud, borderline obnoxious in my opinion.  I put on my headphones (not earbuds, but headphones) to drown her out, even though I'd intended specifically to come there to read while I ate dinner.  Could still hear her loud and clear.  I tactfully asked the waitress if they had a table available up front, and she responds, "no, they're all taken.  I can serve you here" pointing to the table 4 inches to my right.  I responded "No, that would be the same thing", trying to maintain my tone of voice.  And though my request to be moved was clearly code for "get me out of here please! NOW.", she wouldn't oblige.  They lied.  There were tables available.  I discovered this when, only moments after they brought out my order, I quickly gathered all of my uneaten food and was walking out to leave with it.  They just didn't want to move me because of the inconvenience of either having to switch me to another waiter, or her having to serve me outside of her table area.   My whole issue really is that they don't seem customer service centered and reading some of the other reviews, they don't make common sense decisions with their customers.  3 distinct times I've walked out of there in a huff because of the treatment.  I also agree with some of the other reviewers, they tend to take a little too long, even when it's not crowded.  I wouldn't recommend this location at all just because the service is too much of a gamble, you never know what you're gonna get.  To be fair, the food is consistent and I have had some really good waiters here and there, but again, it's too much of a gamble.
These people are extremely cheap and didn't deliver what I ordered via Teleflora. Consider me an experienced buyer who only wants the best for the people I send flowers too & I will never order from here nor Teleflora again.
Cautionary tale: If you go to this establishment on a busy night, you may wait almost an hour and a half for your food--with no explanation, no contrition and no attempt at amelioration. That was our experience at Olivio.  The food/portions was very average and very expensive for the quality/portion size. The bread/olive oil was delicious, the bruschetta was passable (bread was delicious but the tomato topping was stone cold). Our main courses were barely hot, which was a big disappointment after waiting so long.  The waiter was overworked (having been a waiter, it is difficult work, and it wasn't his fault) but he made no attempt to communicate with us and was barely apologetic--and did not offer us a complimentary anything. I could see that the table next to us must have complained more vociferously, as they received a credit.  We understand that kitchens get backed up, but it's the responsibility of the restaurant to make it right. At the end of the evening, we attempted to talk with the manager, who made himself/herself scarce. To spend $60 (for 3 people, including a kid's meal) for such an experience is, to say the least, disappointing and frustrating.  I was here several years ago and now remember being underwhelmed at the food/value, now we have more reasons not to return.
After reading the reviews I have given this shop a try and after one visit I will not return. I have been a VW enthusiast for over 20 years, so after moving from California and having a lot of options of independent mechanics I thought Full Throttle was the perfect transition after moving to Orlando. What I found was a shop that failed to do simple work and give me bad advice. I took my Passat in there for a brake job, simple rotor and pad replacement, when I asked the service tech I can't recall his name but he's the only guy answering phones and giving "advice", told me when I break in the new pads/rotors I should accelerate as fast as I can like up to 60 mph and brake as hard as I can. Anyone who has common knowledge/sense of brakes knows this is the opposite of what you're suppose to do, I just acted like he was right, as I knew it was a bad sign, he also proceeded to give somewhat of a guilt trip for bringing in my own parts. The other thing they did was flush my transmission fluid, oddly, he said it was low when they checked it and said I should bring the car back in a week or two to recheck the fluid level. As soon as I got the car back the transmission started to jerk, which had never done before. Having owned this car for 8 years I knew they had either messed something up or did not put back enough AT fluid, which is why he said come back? I took it to another mechanic I trust but is further from my house, he checked the AT fluid level and said it was 2 quarts low, which was causing the jerking during gear shifts. He filled up the missing fluid and the problem was gone. I will never go back to Full Throttle. I can see how people would be fooled to think these guys are VW lovers and treat people who drive dubs with some type of special treatment or loyalty, and that may be the case for some, but for me, based on talking and going to many shops over two decades, these guys are just full of themselves and want to act like they are the only alternative when it comes to working on dubs. I am disappointed because I was hoping I could find a VW shop I trust, but all I got was weird attitude, bad workmanship, and bad advice. I am writing this review because I think most of the reviews on here are written by shop friends in order to drum business. And I want to give an objective review of a bad experience that i think was not an aberration, but rather more the norm. Lastly, when I brought the car to my other VW mechanic who is now worth going out of my way to see. He found a coolant leak at the rear flange where it was completely rotted away. He couldn't figure out how the guys at Full Throttle missed it, because FT also replaced a leaking valve cover gasket, so he told me they should have seen the leaking coolant.  That's it, rant done.
I had been meaning to write a bad review of this place for a couple of months now. Looks like I'm too late, since they are closing at the end of the month. I have never encountered a bike shop so bad that I truly wished they would cease to do business, but this place came pretty close. I came in a few times, and each time, the owner made it abundantly clear that he did not give a **** that I was in his shop. On top of that, he didn't have some items that any shop should have (irrelevant now, but had no 26" rim strip and had just 2 motley saddles). I've worked in a shop before, and customers are the lifeblood of the shop - bummer this guy didn't realize that and ran a lousy shop that went under.
This was a pretty big disappointment. We paid extra to essentially stay in the park (what would be normal hours any other month) but with Halloween decorations. All the attractions had hour and a half waits. "But you can purchase an express pass to bypass the lines!" Sorry, I don't like the idea of paying the theme park to get to the front of the line. Universal has good attractions, but it's like playing a freemium game once inside. They should take some cues from Disney on how to help guests see more attractions.  The scare zones did nothing for me. It was a bunch of high school kids and juggalos with crappy masks or makeup lunging at people. We couldn't tell who was part of the staff at times, because they barely had what you could consider a costume. Some of the scenes they had set up looked cool, though. It seemed most of the crowd was younger, too. We (30 year olds) felt a little too old for the event.  The best part of this was that Diagon Alley was EMPTY. We rode Escape from Gringott's twice in a row with no wait. All the shops which are normally shoulder-to-shoulder during the day had plenty of space to enjoy. We were able to ride almost every ride in the park twice with no wait before the crowds swarmed back in.  In short, worth it for the lack of crowds after 5 and before about 9, but lame Halloween gags targeted to teens and presented by teens.
Place seemed dingy and the food was meh at best.  The staff seemed friendly enough and the food came out in a decent amount if time.  I just couldn't shake an uneasy feeling like I was going to wind up with food poisoning (I did not get food poisoning) it just doesn't feel clean in there. I would not go again.
I went here for a birthday, had one of my worst experiences at a restaurant, and joined Yelp just to write this review. I went with my girlfriend for dinner during mid-week and found the place doing decent, though not busy, so we were at least seated promptly. Everything went downhill from there. We started with steamers and I had a large baked stuffed lobster. Both were tough and practically inedible, with the meat inside the lobster practically welded to the inside of the shell. With the waiter not showing up to deliver the food and not checking on us as my date finished her lobster roll (she approved of that at least) and I sat incredulous, I had to wait until he showed up with the check before I could get him to have the manager to come over. I explained the situation and showed the barely touched lobster to said manager, who tsked tsked sympathetically before offering to give us a free drink or desert! We went back and forth for at least 5 minutes before he agreed to take it off the bill. Still furious when I think about this now.  Do not waste your time at this location. The one in Boston proper may be better, but I'd say just go to Legal Seafood or, better yet, Atlantic Fish (both a block away from the Boston location).
I am not a customer here, but as a healthcare worker I come here frequently as part of my job.  I can say that this is one of the worst medical centers in the city. Their staff is overworked and it shows in how they interact with allied healthcare personnel and their patients. Walking into the ER feels more like walking into a room of juvenile high school students gossiping about one another and their patients.   The staff is extremely rude and I can say both from first hand experience and from discussing with other health care personnel that most of the staff cares more about getting patients out of the building as quickly as possible than educating or helping people.   This place is a product of profits over patients. They only want your money and want to make you a repeat customer. They run on a bare minimum staff (most of whom are, admittedly, underpaid- which may explain why they are all so unhappy) and are not able to meet the needs of Dekalb County. Several times a week the hospital is filled to capacity and they are unable to accept any more patients.   Do yourself and the staff at DMC a favor. Go somewhere else.
I was really disappointed to say the least. I saw some really great Yelp reviews with some not so great ones, I went in with an open mind hoping to find a new spot for date night.  My boyfriend and I had wanted to try here for a while and finally we had the chance to come here on a Saturday night around 7pm. The bar had some people, not too packed. We were seated in the dining room which was pretty empty for a Saturday night.  Our waitress was very slow and inattentive. She took over 10 minutes just to come over and ask us to order our drinks. This should have been a sign of things to come. I tried to give her the benefit of the doubt. We each ordered a drink from the bar and it took around 15 minutes for our server to deliver the drinks. As soon as the drinks were delivered, she quickly scurried away to another table without even offering to take our dinner order.   She later returned with a plate of bread and olives which were pretty good and had a nice flavor. We then ordered an appetizer of burrata pugliese and also a caesar salad. The appetizer was good, no complaints there. The caesar salad was nicely presented and was made with fresh romaine. The salad was the best part of the whole dinner, kind of sad.  Dinner took a really long time - we both ordered the same dish, bolognese. The dish was nothing to write home about and very lackluster. The pasta was fresh, but overall the dish was bland and a small portion size. Our server was nowhere to be found the entire meal which was extremely frustrating. She came over well after we had finished the meal and asked if we wanted anything else - we said no and requested the bill. There was never anyone asking how the meal was, something that really irks me. We waited again, well over twenty minutes only for the waitress to return and ask us again if we wanted anything else. I guess our first answer wasn't sufficient or we were suddenly on Who Wants to be a Millionaire and she wanted to be sure that was our final answer? We waited around some more before she finally delivered the check.   This place is a big let down. It's extremely overpriced for poor service, small portions of bland food and you spend way too long waiting for things.
So, line up outside the door, but plenty of clean and empty tables inside. Waltz up to the hostess to be ignored... Charming. Told 15 minute wait, sure thing, we'll head to a store nearby for a look and come back shortly. Again, empty tables everywhere, but still a line up out the front. Ordered food, said food was delivered to the table. Wait staff only barely able to muster up enough 'customer service' to scrape by...  I made the mistake of ordering the shrimp... Spent the rest of my Saturday in the bathroom throwing my insides up. Pleasant. Needless to say I will never be back, as I've since heard other horror stories from other patrons at various other Max & Erma's.  Lift your game. I don't like having a New Years long weekend destroyed by a third rate meal and then the after effects of what can only come down to poor kitchen practices. I should probably report this establishment to the appropriate authorities.
This place has so much potential for a family adventure.  Monster Trucks, Orange slushies, cheesy decorations galore.  But they don't live up to the $95 cost for 2 adults and 3 kids and 15 for slushies. It is our fault not grabbing the 10 coupons we later found in every guide.   Part one, the monster truck tour. We went on OX.  Critique one, get a good guide for the trucks,  The jungle cruise at Dw is scripted fun.  This is not. bits of interesting stuff,(like dw pays them to take waste from animal kingdom) but not enough.  Critique two, spend some upkeep money on the trucks.  They were quick to tell us each truck cost 100 k. What have they done since? Idea would be fix  the seats, (all were falling apart) add a speaker system for the driver, and maybe add a few fans for days its hot as the sun like it was this past Wednesday. Given it was a full tour, this could be done! Critique 3, when its this hot, why have the kids take turns driving the truck. Its cute but likely not the brightest thing to do anyway.  Part two in the store: friendly with samples, nice stuff to look at but my final critique is to clean up the place during the day.  We did try the Orange slushy and frozen berry lemonade.  Both were very good.  But when we sat outside to finish them, wrappers and cups were everywhere.  The slushy and the kids liking the trucks save a one star rating.  This could be a perennial 4 with an occasional 5 star as a repeat visit place  with some attention to detail.  I usually take a lot of pictures but did not post with this review.  That will keep this a half full review.
Not a fan. My husband and I went today for lunch, only 2 other tables occupied. I was really looking forward to eating here after reading all the great reviews on Yelp. So, while we were eating I wondered if we just got the wrong dishes since our experience was so different than the reviews on here.   First I wanted guacamole, but no way was I going to pay $9 for it. So we passed. The online menu shows it is $3.50, but on the menu we only saw it for either $9 (or $10 if you wanted it made at your table). I did not see the offering for $3.50 on the menu. The menu they show online is not the same one we got in the restaurant.   I had the enchiladas supreme, $9.75. It is 4 tiny enchiladas (one each of beef, chicken, bean and cheese), with a large pile of lettuce with a few tomatoes and a dollop of guacamole and a dollop of sour cream on top of them; this topping makes it look like a lot of food, when in reality it is not; no rice or beans come with this dish. I am very grateful that I asked for the mole sauce on the side as I did not like it at all.   The beef enchilada had beef with the consistency and taste of the beef from Taco Bell, only edible if you are starving. I have no idea what was up with the cheese enchilada, but whatever it was it didn't even look edible. It was a solid glob of yuck. The chicken enchilada and the bean enchilada were both okay, but nothing special.   My husband had the Enchiladas Verdes, two chicken enchiladas with rice and beans. Again, the chicken enchiladas were okay. His enchiladas were also piled high with lettuce and the tomatoes, guacamole and sour cream making it look like more food than there actually was. His rice was not good and the beans were okay.  The free chips were okay, but thicker than I like. One of the salsas that came with the chips was pretty good, the other not so much, it had a bar-b-que taste to it.   Our food came out in less than 5 minutes after we ordered it, which, to me, is an indication that it was not freshly made. More than likely it was already prepared, slapped on a plate and then microwaved for a couple of minutes. In hindsight, my husband thought the frozen chicken enchiladas from Amy's are better than the ones he had here.   Service was mediocre seeing how there was only 3 tables occupied. The guy was nice, chips and salsa arrive at the table practically before your tail hits the chair, which is great. The water took a long time to come and the check took a long time. After that our waiter disappeared and we ended up taking the check to some workers sitting at another table to ask to pay.  The food at Taqueria Del Sol and Bone Garden is much more to our liking and a lot different than the food at this place. So, maybe it is just not the style of Mexican food we like.   We will not be back.
Very Bad Service...... i have been using this car wash for couple years, only doing exterior and driving it my self, through out last year i have been noticing how rude people are there, but i never interacted with them, until recently when i decided it to use full service, so i gave them my car then i went to the other end waiting for, once it came out i notice it the person who is driving it can not open the door from inside, so i opened it from outside then i realized that they  broke then handler from inside, so i asked for a manager, and when he came i was trying to explain to him the situation but what shocked me is that from the beginning he was to aggressive with and he does not even want to listen to me, so i realized that this guy is no gooooood, by the way i am a regular customer so when i told him that, his answer was take your business, his argument was that things broke, and we are not responsible for them.  the sad thing i called there office which is located in Malden, guess what the woman who is responsible for taking complaints is never available.   i used to spent at least $200 every month there. Not Any More.  if i could i would rate it zero star.
Wow seriously Starbucks! Get with it!! Not only was the drive thru lady extremely rude on April 1st at 12:00pm but my coffee was not even full! If I wanted a half a cup of coffee do you think I would come to Starbucks!? I will NOT be coming back to this location. If this was an April Fools joke some future advice... don't mess with someone's coffee! :/
Not as expected  Room cleaning service not so good lots of dust.  children diving & swimming in hot tub.  Floats of all sizes allowed in pool, lots of kids splashing.  No TV when it rains.  Looked like free summer camp. Saw 2 women with 15 kids.  I counted them twice.  Loud disrespectful kids all over the place. Not a place to relax. The beds have the worst mattresses.  5 nights, room cleaned one time.  Maid service comes late while we were back in room.  Shuttle bus to Universal.  We had to take a cab.
Hate to say this but they leave the food on the warmer over heated and soggy. It's not like there's a lot of people by 1:45pm but Christ people will be eating what they paid for! Yup that's what I had, a soggy string beans and broccoli. Yuck! Do a better job please!!!
I've had ramen from Japan to New York and places in between. The ramen was way too oily. Pretty gross, actually.
Wanted to like it, just couldn't.  Seafood tasted frozen and freezer burnt - nothing was even edible.  We left hungry and ate elsewhere.
Service wasn't great. Very slow prepping, and the food tasted very bland. Overall pretty disappointing experience. I wish they would have the regular menu at lunch. Maybe their regular pasta would taste better but I won't be back to wait another an hour to try
Gave it a try... twice. Shame on me. Not very good BBQ. Unfortunate as I live across the street.  Will not be back.
There was only one flavor of bubble tea at that time so I guess I would get it sooner than I thought. The truth is the people who ordered after me got their drinks first, and one of them ordered the same drink. The cashier, who was in charge, I assumed, didn't feel sorry when I complained, and joked with the staffs who were making the tea in Mandarin. So I talked to her again in Mandarin, repeating what I said earlier in English, and she provoked me by telling her colleagues to ease and take their time to make my bubble tea.  The drink is ok. I could taste some taro in the milk tea so I could tell it wasn't just some flavored powder in it. But the service is the WORST.
Since this place is located near some decent hotels and in an okay looking strip mall, I thought I'd give it a chance despite other reviews.  I wouldn't expect the people I saw in here to stay in any motel other than one that rents by the hour.  The food was actually pretty good.  Hot and a decent selection despite the size.  Number one problem is the inside.  Run down, dirty carpets, a young girl sweeping right next to me as I ate.  Number two, and probably the biggest reason to avoid is the clientele.  The absolute dregs of humanity.  If the guy talking very loudly in his phone didn't bother you, you could have picked from the idiot playing Pokémon as he went around the buffet.  Oh wait, when he wasn't playing, he was definitely not disciplining his child.  The little boy was screaming and yelling and he nor his wife did a thing.  If you need a boost to your self esteem, come here and discover there are much more people not deserving to live on this planet.  Feel good about yourself and thank the stars you aren't in this classless class of morons.
Car tint was installed by Sunbusters.  Left a lot of junk dots and tint gaps (NOT air bubbles), shrink job poor on rear glass with spikes at defroster bars and dot matrix, and several large squeegee scratches and smudges in the tint from rushing the job.  To top it all off, a long scratch was mysteriously left on the exterior side of door glass, which is absolutely inexcusable and very infuriating.  I'm perplexed how this place can receive such a high rating considering the terrible crap job done for me.  I don't care if my review is an atypical anomaly of the business as the owner suggests because the poor service I received is what matters to me, not other bogus reviews.  I refuse to return to this place so that they can screw the tint up even more or cause more damage out of spite - believe me, this happens more than one would think.  Quality work is a lost art apparently, since it appears that a competent job can't even be achieved the first time.  If you purchase a new car, appreciate quality and don't want to be severely disappointed at the tint installation ruining the complexion of the vehicle, do yourself a favor in advance and avoid this place.
Went here because of the positive reviews - I hope my experience was an anomaly, but I won't be coming back.   Delightful waitress; rest of staff seemed like new hires that didn't quite understand customer service.  Omelette and hash browns were uninspired, flavorless, and burnt. Ordered iced coffee, black, which also tasted quite burnt (I drink black iced coffee all the time - it's supposed to taste bitter, but this was definitely burnt).   My candid opinion- I really do hope other people have a better experience here.
The service is terrible, overpriced hookah that wasn't worth it. The owner was very unprofessional. Never would go there again. Actually looking forward to see this place shut down.
Welp, I've now visited this place more than 20x in the last few years.   The plus is when one happens to magically choose the "freshest" items- they are actually pretty darn tasty, but then again the odds of getting this selection are always stacked against you with the myriad of choices that they offer daily.   I've had items ranging from an actual pie that when cut open on day one revealed a decidedly unpleasant blueish-purple mold, and another time a key lime pie slice had this particularly foul and perplexing  flavor(of perhaps a spoiled product) at the finish of each bite.   On the other hand, the lemon mousse cake, vibrant in decor is always amazingly good.  If one opts for the bakery case, pecan rolls, muffins,  and apple struedels always seem fresh and quite nicely prepared.   The growing selection of cupcakes well aesthetically pleasing, offer very little flavor that differs from say grabbing the yellow tub of sugar that is always waiting for you in your home pantry and diving in with a fav spoon.  Our consensus vote is because they offer so many options, picking the best and freshest choices are nearly impossible statistically and  the bad experiences have been quite offensive lowlights, thereby dropping our rating from 3 to 2 stars overall.  There are much better reasonably close local options from Konditor to French Memories.
Wish I could give zero stars, this review is for the food not the service. Over priced NOT authentic vietnamese food. $6.5 for a banh mi (vietnamese sandwich), seriously?? hoagie bread not the usual banh mi bread and they skimp on the meat and veggie toppings. The dipping fish sauce that came with the spring rolls were salty and lack sweetness. So disappointed...The Pho (beef noodle soup) was overly spiced, my parents couldn't even finished their meals. Will not be returning and would not recommend.
I recently took two of my D.C. buddies here to "experience" Austin. Why did I do this? Because up until my last visit there, which happened to be on a Friday morning, I have always enjoyed this restaurant. Their food is very good, and that is the only reason I have left them 2 stars. However, their hostess actually ignored me for a good 30 seconds when I walked in because she was playing 'read my lips' with someone across the room. As a customer, I found this to be disrespectful. Then she tried to seat us next to the kitchen- when I pointed to an available table on the other side of the room, she got pissy. At this point I was just embarrassed that this restaurant was going to be my guest's first impression of Austin. The drinks are overpriced and plain. I won't be going back, South Congress Cafe has become absurdly busy and pretentious...maybe South Congress in general has just lost its charm.
I don't know but the pizza has gone down hill the last 2 times I ordered.  It was so remarkably bad that I had to order chicken fingers as a back up just in case... Glad I did!  The crust is longer fluffy and buttery deliciousness with the perfect fluffy chewy/crispy texture.  Feels like chewing cardboard... Kind of tastes like it too.... What happened?  Is it frozen now?  I don't know...   But the plain chicken fingers with sauces on the side were good enough to mention... Pretty big, tender pieces of white meat, with crispy, flavorful batter.  So... If you want chicken fingers you have my permission to order them...   Hopefully by the time you go, they will not have changed that recipe.  If you want great, gourmet-like style pizza go around the corner to All Star Pizza Bar!    They have huge slices, and many different varieties and fantastic flavor combos!  My friend love the Redhead, I usually just try any slice that speaks to me that day whether it's cheese, a meat option or something funky... Yes... Funky is an option and it varies daily... Way to keep us on our pizza toes!  Want pizza?  Go to All Star now!!! Run, don't walk far away from here! Lol
Walked in and this place was beautiful staff was very  friendly, but we sat down  and in about 5 mins we saw a mouse crawl across the floor. The guy at the table next to us stepped on it and a waitress came over to sweeped it up. We read good reviews and we're looking forward to the place but had to leave .
The room was horrible and the customer service was worse.  To top it off, my car was burglarized overnight and no one even offered to assist with calling the police.  My advice would be to stay away from this hotel and area.
I called to get a toilet unclogged.     After 2 attempted the tech stated I would need a new toilet and he recommended the $1000 fix.   He said in 2-3 days it would be clogged again.    He charged us $227 and asked if he would get 5 stars for his service.    What????   I called to complain about not having value meet the mark of the amount paid.   Customer service called and said they would call back in 24 hrs.   No one has ever called me back.   Awful company!
The first time I had a sandwich there it was pretty good, just good though! My boss picked us up lunch as there isn't' alot of eateries in this area. Well, I decided to go in last week and I ordered a chicken wrap. The girl that was making it had her hair in her face (not working around food appropriote. style) I felt uncomfortable as her stringy red hair was swinging over my food. I shook it off and tried not to think of it. They only had two choices on their soda vending machine(ok, they are a small business) but I figured not to complain because I understand it's a small place. I paid and left. When I got back to work I opened my wrap only to find that the tortilla was extremely burnt on the edges. I had to peel off the entire edge of the tortilla, the wrap was sloppy with stringy lettuce...YUCK!! I felt so grossed out because the stringy lettuce reminded me of her hair as it was going down and I felt sick. I threw it away. I paid $7.50 for this crappy food. NEVER AGAIN WILL I EAT THERE!!   PS: Wish I didn't have to click on a star...NO STARS
Called a day before to go see a car , took the day off work to go see it , waited an hour for them to find the keys , to only tell me a while after the car was in the body shop getting fixed because bumper was hit. Talked to the manager and he was rude and arrogant, very unprofessional!!!!
Total dump that survived off the back of a crap promotions group for years.  The fat door guy is a rude asshole.  I get that working the door on dirty is a shitty job but you don't have to take it out on others.
As we are on a driving trip between Arizona and Texas, and with our dietary restrictions of no dairy, no sugars and no grains of any kind, we search for restaurants where we can have some good protein and veggies.  We picked the wrong one.  We had four in our party, and one of them picked the steak (all full of fat and gristle), one picked a salad, and the greens were wilty, another picked chicken, which was super dry, and then the service was soooo slow.  In this day in age, we recognize it's difficult to find good help, but when you tip 20%, and they make $25 per table, for example, you expect some decent level of service..not this time..we won't be back.
I found this kiosk in the food court at Natick Mall.  I thought I would give it a try.  Here's how the experience went:  There were 2 people at the counter when I arrived.  One person placed an order and said she would be back.  She walked away.  The other person was not making a purchase.  There were 2 young men working behind the counter.  The young man at the counter engaged a conversation with the remaining non-customer for about 4 minutes, never acknowledging I was standing in front of him.  Two more people lined up behind me.  I asked if I could place an order.  The "front man" moves to the back and the other guy comes and says "Sure.  Sorry, we're really busy."  I order cheeseburger fries.  The former "front man" puts a batch of already cooked fries in what appeared to be a convection or microwave/convection oven for about 40 seconds.  He takes the fries out and places them in a paper cone, shakes them up with dill flavored salt, covers them with cheese product sauce, 3 small squirts of ketchup and one small squirt of mustard.  He hands me the room temperature, hard and (previously) overcooked potatoes.  I was conflicted about what to do with the fries.  They were totally unappealing and tasteless, yet I paid $6 for them!  I gave up half way through and tossed them in the trash as I left the mall.  Please don't waste your money.
Had a terrible experience here tonight, so much so that I'm writing my first yelp review. It started out with the bartender being extremely rude to us for no reason. He made fun of my friend's drink choice and acted like it was a chore to serve us. It was incredibly uncomfortable and unsettling. When we got seated, the waitstaff was clearly overworked and had no interest in us as customers. We got the mussels and a quarter of the shells were empty. The rest were literally the smallest mussels I've ever eaten. Then it took 45 minutes for our entrees and that was only after speaking with the manager. Overall the customer experience was awful and I will never eat there or recommend there again. The food was even mediocre.
After my bad experience, the office manager called me and told me that they would not fix the carpet they messed up, despite saying they would on here and over the phone because of my yelp review. She actually said that. I'm no Yelp expert, but that seems like it should be against some guideline. If I hadn't been honest about my experience on here, my carpet would have been fixed by Peace Frog.   When I reminded her about the 200% guarantee prominently displayed on their website, she said I needed to make an appointment with another cleaner and someone from peace frog would discuss the damage with the new company. In other words, I needed to jump through a bunch of hoops and take more of my time to get them to honor their guarantee and fix the carpet that they made stink. Still, I wanted it fixed so made an appointment with a new company. And I tried calling peace frog back to tell them when the appointment with the new cleaner was, but they conveniently did not answer or return my calls.  Then, the owner showed up at my house with a refund check without any warning or prior notice. I was alone with two small kids asleep in the house and having this angry guy just appear at my door (He was also upset also about my yelp review) was startling. He seemed to think the refund, while genuinely appreciated, would finish things, but they don't just advertise a refund, they say 200%, and my carpet was still stinking, so I told him when my appointment with the new cleaner was. While standing on my doorstep, he refused to come in and look at (or more importantly smell) the damaged carpet just a few feet away.   When I asked if he would pay for someone else to fix it, as the office manager suggested, he told me no, adding that if I had a problem with that answer, I could write about it on Yelp. Very clever, very unprofessional. But a helpful suggestion none the less.   So now I am. My experience indicated that Peace Frog's "200% Peace of Mind Promise," if it actually exists, could use an Astrix by it saying something like *"only if you promise to not talk about how we screwed up on Yelp." In the end, I was left worse off than when I started, having to fix a problem that didn't exist before they came to my house. The only upside is that this experience led me to another carpet cleaner in town that does reasonably priced, quality work.
BAD SERVICE  The food was gross per usual. The potatoes tasted like they were cooked in dirty, rancid oil. Everything else was just bland. AND they gave me gluten-free bread (not all the bread is gluten-free) without warning me that it was gluten-free. I would have brought it up, but the server was too busy talking to her friend to ever come back to check in on us.  The server was talking to her friend/customer/acquaintance the entire time even so much that she took my plate of food and threw it away without even asking if I wanted a to-go box - which I wanted to take home with me. When confronted, she asked me why I didn't say anything - then apologized and offered me more eggs to take home with me. Cooking up more eggs for me to take home just didn't make sense to me. She then offered me potatoes with salsa, when I just would have preferred for them to have done the right thing and comped my meal.. (I had eaten only a 1/4 of my food.) ALL WHILE TALKING TO HER FRIEND at another table.  She was nice enough, though her behavior was extremely unprofessional.  This was my sixth visit and I will not eat here ever again. It was just a waste of money. I work in the service industry and wasting my money on a terrible experience is ridiculous.   Oh, the applesauce was good.
Zero Stars.  Just left a bag of quarters 5 minutes ago in the car with $15 in it, went back RIGHT away (within 5 minutes) and they said there's nothing in the car. They also nickel and dime you for every service and use scare tactics to sell their services. Thieves and crooks. Don't ever use their service. They're lucky we have a flight to catch.  Use other friendlier rental car services.
this is not real mexican food...watered down salsa with a buncha salt! Cheap but not good. I got tacos and they sucked. sorry but it's the truth.
This place has great service, but I won't be returning for the food. It looks like if you are going for sushi, this place is probably great, however my husband and I went for a simple general tso's chicken and a beef meal. The quality of the beef and the chicken were pretty awful in my opinion and severely disappointing for the price. I won't be returning, but the staff was great. I am sure their sushi is their strong suit.
The food was great the service was horrible.  Starts from the manager down.  Horrible manner and hostess was so rude!
They've changed their menu. They've taken A LOT of stuff off, added huge unnecessary pictures to hide the fact that they have about 15 items now,  and increased their prices.   new patio awesome! some of the decor is kinda strange, but nice improvement.  Unless you are really hot, sit in the lower part when the fans are going because they only have two options, strong or off.  When the fan is on, it cools the pita bread so fast it becomes chips. Which defeats the whole allure of having fresh, soft pita bread.  Which brings me to the most horrible change of them all, the dipping oil up-charge.    When you first get the bread, everyone goes crazy and can't get enough pita and the dipping oil with the spices! oh man! and for me personally, it was the thing I loved most about coming here.  Now, after you have polished off your first table serving of dipping oil (there were 5 adults so, it went relatively fast), they bring out the next pita and we ask for more dipping oil, it's going to be $1.50! I understand an up-charge, but $1.50 for oil, dry spices, and sesame seeds?! and the waitress then said, "so, if you want to pay for it..." like she knew it was bullshit. Figure out a better way of telling the customer it's bullshit without making them feel like suckers for saying yes.    A lot of menu items have been taken off the list, a lot of the lamb is gone except for one entree, which wasn't that good.  There is a lot of beef, few chicken and one, maybe two lamb options. I also think they re-worked the mezza plates.  The falafel was really good and I would get that if nothing else, oh and a date soda. It's about $15 ahead. I hate the new menu with all the blown up pictures behind the food items, it's distracting.  They are opening up a bar on the second level, probably to accommodate the new apartment complex that's going in right across the street. I understand updating a menu and accommodating increasing food prices, but I think they are being a little greedy. I think they are hoping their reputation will keep people coming back no matter what they do.  Hopefully with the increase focus on a bar they will get a happy hour menu going which might entice me to come back, but until then I'll be getting falafel and gyros elsewhere.
Ok I agree with the other yelper...This place is over hyped.. I had the Roast Beef with mashed potatoes and green beans...Don't get me wrong the food is good..The roast was tender , mashed potatoes were good but they were not anything out of the ordinary.. Lacked seasoned flavor.... it taste like cafeteria food .I also had 2 rolls which were hard .I got an unsweetened iced tea & peach cobbler.. All came to total $11.86 which was over priced for this food. I would think the people praising this place also enjoy Piccadilly & SS cafeteria too because this place falls right in line with those spots....I should have went to Donnies Country Cooking which would have been less & they got baked chicken not all this fried stuff like this place has...so overall I will not come back here just because it was closer to my gym
I just had my Closet installed and they did not finish the job the day of the installation like they said they would. I had told them in advance that i would be leaving the state in a few weeks so i needed them to have my closet installed before then. They said not to worry that it would be done by the time i left. Well i am about to leave on my trip and they still have not finished the job. I have been calling them almost everyday so they can send someone to finish it but no call back in return. They charged my card with the job not being done, yet they cant call me back or send someone to finish the job. I am so dissatisfy with the company and will NEVER hire them again. This company does not cater to its customers needs and wants at all. I hope you guys wont make the mistake i made in hiring this unethical company who only care about taking your money.
Why can't burgerville get food hot?? New location in Tigard.  This is like the one in Canby.  Same cold food and seems like smaller burgers?? Anyone else?    The place is clean and folks were nice.   Lots of competitors close by.
I am very disgusted by what I witnessed at Hooters.  Today I went to Hooters for lunch.  There were at least 15-20 people of Mexican decent that walked in to be seated.  I overheard a few of the waitresses talking saying they did not want to seat/serve them because they felt like they probably wouldn't get a good tip because they were Mexicans.  The group stood at the hostess stand for about 15 minutes before being seated.  They were seated and sat for another 15 minutes and no one still had not served them. Finally a manager went to their table and at that moment one of the young ladies from the group told him that they would just go somewhere else and get something to eat.  This was a blatant display of discrimination and what makes this even worse is that the waitresses that were discriminating against them were of African American decent and should be aware of the struggle and discrimination that we as black people have gone through in the past and is still going through today.  It hurt my heart to see this take place as you could see that half of the group did not understand what was going on.  This type of behavior should not be tolerated and Hooters need to do a better job at screening who they hire.  There needs to be diversity training held at this establishment,. I will be contacting corporate regarding this incident. No one should ever be treated that way no matter what color or nationality they are!!!
Quite a noisy establishment. Service is ok but certainly nothing beyond mediocre. There were hardly any vegan options which I found somewhat baffling since this restaurant is located in a very progressive area where many educated  and  health conscious individuals live. The waitress did try to accommodate me and they had 1 entree which is true vegan. But that's it, aside from salad and sorbet. Parking is fairly good. Staff is friendly but in a very robotic and scripted manner.  After reading the owner's reply to my comment, I felt I needed to reply. I appreciate the courteous response. I do not agree that 1/500 customers are vegan. That statistic is misguided. What source are you getting your information? Secondly , I was invited to your restaurant for dinner and had no choice.  Having said that I feel your establishment just was not the right fit for me . Thank you for being honest and best of luck.
I wish I had read the reviews of this place prior to spending my money here.  I couldn't even distinguish the difference in the rolls because it all looked the same!  Doesn't matter what we ordered, EVERYTHING we ordered tastes the same.  It was a flavorless, bland, pasty mixture that was rolled up in dry rice and topped with fish that could have been mistaken for jerky.  The avocado was more black with hints of green.   The tempura was so dry it was actually chewy.  This place is awful.  My stomach has reached up and grabbed my tongue so as to never be assaulted in such a way again.    In my opinion any positive review of this place has been purchased.  Save your money and your tastebuds and eat somewhere else.
I used to love this place. Just had the most tasteless meal ever.  You could not teal the chicken from the noodles in the low mien. The hot and sour soup was neither.  I don't expect the best meal ever from delivery shop but this sets a new low.   Last dollar spent here!  Go elsewhere.
Hmmm... I would have assigned a negative star, but the system doesn't allow you to...  This place plain sucks... Upper case SUCKS... The food is no more than the average hot dog you get on a street, which is actually more tasteful... And better service... Service...? hmmm, what service...? Much left to be desired... This place is not at all what I had I mind when I think German village... My advice...? Go some place else...!
This place used to be a decent Japanese sushi restaurant until the change of owner recently. The Japanese sushi chefs are all gone. The sushi is poorly rolled, standards at this restaurant has dropped. For long time customers like me, we taste the difference.  They think that getting some asian guys to wrap rice in seaweed is sushi. Some traditional japanese dishes are taken off the menu. It is going down the same way as Ginza. Time to find another japanese place.
Wonton soup was quite strange. Wontons were overcooked. Egg roll had no flavor. Will never order from again
I've been there multiple times, usually a man did my nails. This time it was the wife/owner, she kept saying "it looks good no". I told her it looked uneven & all she did was add another coat of polish. There are still large dents & waves in my polish, it looks terrible.
I ordered the chocolate delight cake and the ricotta pie for a work event.  Based on the name and how the lady described it, it sounded like a chocolate lovers dream. It looked beautiful. However it was not true to its name but mostly whipped cream with a caramel sticky center that made it impossible to cut neatly. Did not know about the weird caramel center until I cut into it. Would be nice if the website or employee provided a better description. It was a bit embarrassing trying to cut it in front of 30 people as it was a whipped creamy mess so it did not slice well and just flopped. It was not chocolaty at all.  If you love whipped cream this is the cake for you. The name of the cake is very deceiving.  The ricotta pie was pleasant, not great but not bad and not too sweet. No one commented good or bad but silent speaks louder than words. :/ Will not order this particular cake again. Overpriced at $52 for 12 inch.
Can you give a restaurant zero stars? Because this was by far the worst Chinese food we ever had. Granted we only split one dish and had egg rolls, so maybe we just ordered something that they do really badly, but it was terrible enough I will never give this place another chance.
Do not try to get a land loan from these people.  They are so slow and do not care about your needs.  They are very friendly, but take so long and use outdated processes.  Bank of America did a better job in half the time.  They should really thing lean not thing six sigma, you can see it their processes.  Weak.
This place did not have what I would call fresh fish. And thank god I know how to use chop sticks, because my silverware had dried up lettuce on it. Oh, and those fruit flies Yelpers keep referring to? No lie - they're totally there, dive-bombing your food and drinks. The rice was rubbery, which makes me wonder if the spicy tuna roll I ordered had been pre-made and just sitting out turning into an eraser. The Gari Gari roll was just a whole heck of a lotta cream cheese, and the Ninja roll was a disgrace to Ninjas everywhere.   Aside from all of this, I'm fairly certain I picked up a stomach bug here.  Sorry, Ma Soba. You're a hot mess. You made me a hot mess for days after. I won't be back. Ever.
I joined yelp just so I could comment on the Union Sq. Clinic.  I just came back from my appointment with my cat and I am pissed!  The vet recommended an invasive exploratory surgery for something other vets have said is not necessary.  My cat has already been through a major surgery ( a few years back for cancer), so I don't want to put her through one again unless it was absolutely necessary.  When I asked if there was a less invasive option to see if surgery even would help, she basically told me if my cat got cancer it would be my fault.   Wow!  I will never go back there again if she is still on staff.
These guys truly are the scum of the earth.  A neighbor of my friends called them on me and claimed that I was parked in her spot.  I was not-- my friends have two spots, and I was parked in one of them.  The driver essentially threatened my friend whose spot it was, and when I told him all I had to get the car down was $42, he told me to "dig deeper".  He told my friend, who is one of the most gentlemanly people I know, to step away from the car because he was being "a smart guy"...not true at all.  Then, he threatened to drive away, making me pay the whole $129.  Finally we came up with $50 total and he skeptically counted it and drove away.  These are the worst scum of the earth, they're crooked, and will do anything to make a quick buck.  Be very careful if you ever have the misfortune of dealing with these troglodytes.
Used to be great. But has gone downhill since their growth over the last year. We used to see Dr Katie but then she left. Then were supposed to be with Dr Schwab. Almost 2 years since being assigned to Dr Schwab and we have yet to meet her. I usually have had good experiences there but this last one was the last straw. We saw Laura Montag and she was horribly condescending. I don't accept that...doctor or not. We'll be looking for somewhere else to go.
Maybe it was because I was sick when I was there, but this place is just too damned loud. I even went to see a mostly acoustic folk band, and I thought my ears were gonna bleed. You also have to stand the entire time, and after a couple of hours, that can really be taxing on ones body. I felt that the venue, while it does pack a very interesting feel and vibe, is just too small, and too loud.
Hello fellow yelpers! I use yelp all the time and this is one of only two times when I think that a company's ratings were gained dishonestly. Austin Property Inspections did a terrible job inspecting the condo I just purchased. I had a friend who is also an inspector come look at the condo before the API official inspection. My friend's license is expired so he could not do the official report for me. My friend found several things that Samuel at API did not find, one of them requiring major electrical repair. At my friend's urging, I had an electrician come and access the house and it needed more than $800 worth of electrical work in repairs that API missed. Because API did not document the electrical problems, the seller refused to reimburse that cost. In addition, the refrigerator was not working properly and when I asked Gary at API about it, he told me they do not look at appliances like the refrigerator, that is not inluded in the inspection. I ended up having to buy a new refrigerator because of their neglect to let me know it did not work. So, the $400 I paid API  for the inspection was waste of money. When I asked Gary if he could at least refund me the cost of the inspection to help offset the many costs I incurred because of his company's neglect to find them, he ignored my request. Do not deal with these guys. I do not know how they have such high ratings in yelp but they are not a company to trust with such a large purchase.
It's an underground dive bar. It is what it is and their proud of it. I've only been here for parties and wrap parties for productions but not voluntarily. I had basic drinks but not really the spot to eat. Outside of private parties, this isn't the place on my high list to hang out.
There are two kinds of people in this world: those who wear white with complete confidence, and then there's the rest of us, who have to make an ACTIVE effort not to look like a an 7 year-old spattered with random shmutz by the end of the day. I, being a member of the latter team (read: clumsy), did not do well here. In my defense, it was my first time.   A little background first. Personal shortcoming- I suck at chopsticks. I can play piano, paint fine detail, french braid hair, write in fancy scripts, yet somehow I haven't mastered the ability to grasp rice with two sticks. Eating here at Kaze was like every embarrassing chopstick failure I've ever had, but amped up to the Nth degree. Basically, I found myself trying to skewer what appeared to me to be raw cold cuts, cooking it in boiling broth, losing the coldcut in the broth 3 or 4 times, overcooking it while frantically trying to fish it out, and quickly shoving it into my mouth, with broth gracefully running down my ladylike chin. Awesome. The payoff, in terms of tastiness, was not comparable to the effort it required, IMHO.  My dining companion, who was attempting to explain protocol, was appalled. He had to remind me several times not to use the same utensil that I originally picked the raw cold cut up with. Okay, so I suck. I suck at chopsticks, I suck at Shabu Shabu, and I suck at life.   Truth be told, I just wasn't into it. I don't see myself trying this again.  *If you like this style though, I am told that this is one of the best Shabu spots in all of Boston!
We went here on Halloween night.  I know, I am so cool for bowling on such a sweet holiday like Halloween but anyway...  I wasn't really impressed.  It looked nice and the servers were ok.  But it was super expensive!  I mean, I love the idea of drinking beers whilst bowling and making an idiot of myself, but I certainly do not want to pay $18 a game!  I even asked if they had some sort of package deal and all I got was a blank stare.  Ugh!  I probably will not be back, but I do still love bowling.  I wonder if there are any places in the 'burbs that serve beer and have bowling....????
A disappointment. The food was lackluster at best and the service was terribly slow.  I wouldn't go back even with a Groupon.
This chevron never has receipt paper in their machines.  I always have to go inside to get my receipt which is super annoying and a waste of my time.   Lazy workers who won't get off their butt to change the receipt rolls at the pump.   I am going to give my business to another gas station next time.
Here's the dirt:  Dropped in for lunch.  Ordered sushi roll combo C ($9.99).  You can choose 2 rolls from about 8 different rolls.  I chose spicy tuna and spicy salmon.  The combo comes with miso soup and a drink. The miso soup was standard, slightly more salty but these things vary day to day and I would rather have more salt than less.  The sushi arrived with 6 pieces of each roll on both sides of plate with an adequate amount of ginger and a not nearly enough amount of wasabi in the center.  The wasabi was decent.  I've had better, but I've had worse.  Of course I know it's not real wasabi blah blah blah.    The rolls were loose, contained more avocado than fish, and none were spicy.  At all.  They must have forgotten that part.  The tuna (usually red) and the salmon (usually orange) looked so much alike that even the waitress asked if I needed help telling them apart.   Service was friendly enough.  The dining room is clean and the music was some weird circus tunes. Nonetheless, I was pretty disappointed today. I should have gone to the HEB and bought their sushi to go.  You get fatter, more flavorful rolls for half the price.  Yeah, I said it.  I eat HEB sushi rolls.
I rarely go to this supermarket coz the parking lot is sucks!!  RBC Bank, Chapters, few restaurants and Starbucks all in this mall.  If you like to see how lucky for the day or test your patient, just try it out.  Coz I needed to meet my girlfriends for lunch at Neptune Seafood, therefore, I arrived 10 mins early and shopped around City Fresh Market.  It's a medium size supermarket, they have fresh vegetable, live seafood and fresh bakery shop.  I don't really like it personally coz I don't they are clean and foods are not fresh enough.
Maybe 2.5 stars, if I can do that.  For what it is, El Chilito's not too bad--if Mi Madre's is closed (it generally closes at 2pm), then El Chilito will suffice in a pinch.  Their cochinita pibil is pretty tasty, as is their tomatillo pork.  Their barbacoa, unfortunately, tastes nothing like authentic barbacoa.. it's dry and chewy and not even shredded, wtf?  Their breakfast tacos with chorizo are light on the chorizo and heavy on the eggs.  I believe they use El Milagro tortillas, which means they're very good tortillas, but I think El Chilito either lets them sit around too long or doesn't soften them up somehow before slapping the fillings in.  Probably both.  The last tortillas I got there had very dry, stale edges which is a pet peeve of mine.  That said, ordering a cochinita pibil, a tomatillo pork, and a glass of sangria is a cheap, tasty, and effective hangover-helper... so props to El Chilito for that.
Service is terrible We ordered little amount of foods and it took 45 minutes to come in. When we asked for water, she stared at us saying she doesn't have any water badly. We asked to give little more side dish like Kimchi because they gave like 3 pieces of Kimchi. But they said to buy it. In most Asian restaurants,they mostly refill any side dishes you want.
Horrible service, I had to repeat my order multiple times and the people I was with didn't get their order. The server left "early" so our table was left to no one. Taking my food to go next time.
Horrible service. I was with a corporate group, ties and jackets, and we were placed at a large round table. We saw our waiter three times - took our orders, brought our food, and when we requested the check. Some salad plates, including mine, were at the table when we were leaving. I did not get my water refilled.  I ordered the eggplant parmesan, and it was rather tasty, but it was a 3"x5" slab on a plate with a light red sauce. No side pasta, no nice mozzarella topping. It looked like it went from the freezer to the plate. It tasted average.  The decor was beautiful (+1 star). It feels like you're a cast member of the Godfather, minus the bullets.  Would not go here again, not even for a biz lunch. I would rather go to Vinny T's!  The manager (guy with the tie) even came over, and asked how everything was. I didn't have the heart to tell him he should fire whoever our waiter should have been. I'm polite when I go out, especially among coworkers.
Was let down on the quality. They didn't cut my nails even though they used the clippers. They didn't buff them at all even when asked nor did they cut back my cuticles. They aren't cheap either. Very friendly nevertheless.
Checked in about 11pm. I had room on first floor my other family in 3rd floor. Hair all over my sheets. Everything from long hair to straight hair to pubic hair. I was exhausted. Last thing I wanted to do at midnight was remake a bed. Went to front desk it literally took forever for her to find me "clean" sheets. Went back to room and "clean" sheets then had blood or feces on them. I was so disgusted I should have slept in my car. Instead I took the one clean top sheet and slept on top of that. All the hallways reek of cigarette smoke! The rooms were non smoking yet had ashtrays! The next morning I'm getting dressed and see blood or feces or something smeared on the wall by bathroom! Will never ever stay here again. The night front desk agent was nice but morning front desk was extremely rude! She was standing on her cell phone and completely ignored me until I asked her if she wanted the room keys. Her reply "I guess since you already walked them all the way here" SMDH
I have never gotten food poisoning from this location but the food has looked questionable on more than one visit. I no longer eat here.
Not happy with this location, I would recommend the Ashford Taco Mac location.  I had some bad experiences at Taco Mac on Main St. and last night was one of them.  A simple order of wings to go; ordered by phone.  I arrived at the location 10 to 15 minutes later and was presented with my bill.  I paid the bill and provided a small tip.  Waited, checked, waited, checked, and 40 minutes later still did not have my order.  The bar girl was rude and looked the other way when I asked her about it.  The bar man came over and asked what I needed, I stated I had already paid for a togo order which I had been waiting for and checking on with him??  He checked again and still no order.  Finally got a manager and asked for my money back. Nothing free.  Nothing extra.     Just wanted some wings, but choice of location was wrong.  Staff at this location is not the best.
Don't really get the hype. They call it handcrafted gelato on a stick, but it literally just taste like any other Popsicle for several times the price. I can't seem to appreciate this place, but maybe it's just me. I don't really have a sweet tooth to begin with.   One great thing is that the toppings can be customized, and the display fridge is pretty.
the pretzel tasted maybe a bit stale. the cheese sauce was cold. (is that even legal?)  no go.
Me and my boyfriend just left Gino's and had one of our worst dining experiences. The couple seated behind us were having a similar experience and at least provided us with some comic relief. It took about 15 min for our server to bring menus but when se did, she apologized. She took our order, didn't write anything down then came back and asked us what we ordered again. She brought 2 waters even though my boyfriend had asked for iced tea, about 15 minutes later brought our salads then came BACK and asked what we were waiting on so she could look out for it. Our 2 slices of pizza came another 15 minutes later like warm and not very flavorful. The couple behind us had to refill their own drinks and go searching for silver wear. After finishing our food and not being brought our check we went to the counter to pay, where the server had to wait for another woman to finish taking to-go orders and helping customers before she could get change for us. So much for grabbing a quick dinner. We were there for an hour.
I think their name gives away their review "LONE STAR CAB" DOESN'T DESERVE MORE THAN ONE STAR! I called at 1pm to be picked up, the cab didn't arrive until 3pm.  So why did I sit there like an idiot waiting to be picked up so I could go to work?????  Because when I called Lone Star Cab (about every 20 minutes) to check on my cab they said, every time I called "my cab was on it's way".  REALLY?  on your way to hell, I hope.    Now I've called the company to talk to a manager, yes, to complain about being extremely late to work today because I was waiting for an incompetent cab company to deliver, and the phone is answered by a child and/or two people laughing and talking incomprehensibly.   I can't think of a good way to describe this business except for the general sucks-so-bad-you-might-as-well-walk.
I booked a reservation for 5 for 8/3/2013 at 6:00PM.  I just got a call to confirm my plans for dinner with my wife and three kids.   The girl that called said that the patio was our only option as the Dining Room is for couples that are getting away for date nights and that you like to keep that area quiet.    I am puzzled...  Talk about first and last impressions...  She didn't even ask the ages of my kids?  Just cancelled that reservation via Open Table and found another option for tonight.  Maybe Bobs Steak House downtown will let my family dine in the main dining area.  Disappointed...
The smell of the meat being cooked was very good, so we turned in. It was a very busy evening for the restuarant. We were told the wait could be as long as 40 minutes, and when it was only 15 we were pleasantly surprised. The restuarant is incredibly loud. It is clean, and well lit. It has a nice view, with plenty of parking. The service was ok, though we had to remind our server to bring us 2 different items. My wife paid for filet mignon. What arrived at the table was not, or it was so poorly prepared it no longer tasted like, or resembled filet mignon. Not a good place for a romantic dinner. I don't know what they could do to lower the noise level. With a different cook staff it could be a nice place, but it is not that now. We will not come back. It is simply not worth the money or our time.
Like others have mentioned, there is a woman who follows you around to ask you to open a Kohl's charge card. My husband and I have a joint card there, and she tells us that we should open separate ones so we get more percentage off coupons. Why would we want more than one credit card? The percentages off that we do get are more than adequate since we don't actually live in the Kohl's store like this woman apparently does. As I'm sure most other people do, we end up lying and saying we each have our own separate cards just to get her off our backs. We have made a game out of seeing if we can avoid being asked by her while we're there, but it's gotten to the point that even doing that it's still so irritating. I've decided that even though this is the closest location to us, I won't be shopping here anymore.
My partner liked the food but it made me sick all night. Service was also odd- the server/owner was on his phone the whole time.
This Dunkin' Donuts is the most convenient for me on my way to work, which is the only positive thing about it. I try to stop quick, but even when I'm the only one in the driveway there is such a long wait.  Today I ordered a water and a toasted English muffin with butter. I didn't know toasted meant burnt. I didn't have time to go back and get a new one.
I tried this place the other day because sushi garden was packed. Everything looked good. But I would say the food isnt that good. I probably wouldnt ever go here again for thai food.
I never like posting poor reviews, but I had expected a much better experience from the other reviews I've read.  It probably didn't help that this came at the tale end of a quiet weekend spent along the coast...  the place is very lively and I wasn't in the mood.  But the real reason for the 2-star review was a combination of stale bread and my blackened cod that tasted mostly of chili powder.  I like chili powder as an ingredient, but when it is the main flavor I don't care for it nearly as much.  My salad was fine and my wife's Fishwife Seafood Combo was tasty, so I know they aren't a complete loss.  I also suspect that if I'd gone for something more like Fish & Chips that I'd be more happy.  We'll see.  I don't know that I'm going to make that much of an effort to revisit since I live clear on the other side of town.
Worst meal ever!!! An hour plus from ordering and I was served raw pasta. Pleeeese! The room looks nice, but no chef should have let my meal past the line, nor allow it to take so long.
They're not bad, but they're not good either. For what you're paying, I find their selections to be bland and uninspired. I also find the service to be slow and careless. Most all-you-can-eat places are careful with your orders to minimize waste, but they weren't too good with accuracy. There are better places to go, though I find this is an easy choice due to proximity to SkyTrain and seating.
Everyone in Portland seems to fawn over this restaurant, but I've had three scrambles in a row now that were sub-par. Today my lemon ginger sausage scramble was tepid and somehow...watery. The accompanying potatoes o'brien were fair but nothing to write home about.   I'll probably come back again because the service is great, drinks are fun, and, most of all, because all of my friends are hypnotized by whatever je ne sais quois the place exudes. But I think I'm giving up on the scrambles at Genie's altogether.
I am here for a conference, so I stayed in the same hotel. Consierge and receptionist were nice and answered questions kindly and promptly. Upon arrival to room: noisy room AC, dusty desk, very few toiletries for two guests. Room service: ordered salad which came with a sticker on the tomatoes. I called room service to let them know about it and first person  just "apologized", second person didn't even know why I was calling and offered to replace the salad, after I told the third person "you should offer me a reimbursement for that salad" then only she called the manager, and finally after 7 minutes between being on hold and getting too many "I apologize" followed by silence and "are you there?" she finally offered to remove the salad from the charge. Fitness center: you get charged to use it 15 dollars per stay, the fitness center is within the Spa which is on the first floor, to get there from the elevator you have to pass by a bar, a restaurant and gift stores, (imagine yourself on your gym outfit saying hello to colleagues attending the conference), which is very inconvenient as another fellow yelper mentioned. For me its too pricey for what you get, not worth it.
This business is NOT great because I purchased a used bike for my daughter and it does not meet her current needs exactly and they are refusing any kind of return. I paid the price they asked but before I did I asked what a similar bike sells for new and he said over $200 which made $120 sound like a deal. Turns out the bike I bought is only $135 new. My bad for relying on a small shop to be honest. They refused to deal in any way to take this bike back claiming they just can't do that. I will not take any more business there as I am so disappointed in the honesty and integrity of the shop. I dealt with Brett so I recommend steering clear of the place if you're looking for an honest business
I booked a 3:45 appointment for my friend's wedding nearby. I arrived at 3:30pm and asked if there was any way I could get my blowout early. Instead, I was (rather rudely) told that I was much more likely to get started 10-15 minutes late. No consideration at all for my timing. Then at 3:50 I was told I was up next. I let them know that I had to be out by 4:30 at the latest and they told me that would work. Finally at 4:07 I told them I didn't have any more time to wait and left. No apology, I just got an eye roll. Hopefully that allowed someone else to be a little closer to on time. Worst service and disappointment ever. Good thing I was able to borrow a curling iron from a friend otherwise it would've been a bigger disaster.
Let me first say I HATE teppanyaki restaurants with the flipping knifes (although there wasn't any sushi bombing antics going on that we saw.) But we like sushi so we ate at the 8-seat sushi bar. Ordered the chef's special roll, "made with the freshest ingredients" which they said included lump crab and avocado. Except it was actually krab, which by no definition is "fresh." It was late so the place had slowed down quite a bit from the early evening rush. So you'd think the wait staff had a little time to actually wait on you. Nope. Had to go find chop sticks. Had to wave down passing personnel to get drink refills.  Second restaurant we've eaten at during our 8-day stay here and again ... the wait staff. Maybe it was just our one wait person, who seemed angry to even be there. Because some of the others seemed cheery and capable from afar.  I know you're saying 'It's a hotel restaurant in a tourist trap town, what do you expect?' I expect not to be misled by the menu. And I expect that a person working for tips understands that tipping is not automatic and if you make we work harder to get my food than you get serving it then I'm prorating that on the tip.
Don't live here. Don't do. It's not worth it. Seriously, you would be better off finding a rando roommate of craigslist than you would living here.   I lucked out and got pretty good roommates - this has not been true for many other people I have spoken with at this apartment complex. It's luck of the draw and the odds are not in your favor. A guy I know in the complex had a roommate threaten his life and the life of his dog, he had to tell management he was going to pursue legal action before they would move the man into another room. The replacement roommate didn't clean to the point where his room should've been declared a bio-hazard. Like seriously, the guy threw up all over the wall and floor then covered it with a blanket and went out of town for a week.   The main issue is if these people aren't your roommates, it means they're your neighbors. Mine are all people who barely know how to take care of themselves, let alone another living creature, but for some reason have all adopted puppies they're too immature to actually take care of. There's constantly dog feces everywhere, even on the stairs and cement walkways leading to your apartment. Sometimes, they just leave the dog outside, completely unsupervised even though complex policy is that they're required to be on a leash. I'm amazed none of the dogs have gotten hit by cars.   There's constantly garbage everywhere - there's was a pizza box with spaghetti in it that sat on the ground outside for 5 days. There's a tree off our balcony my neighbors like to throw trash into - at one point they were up to 3 pizza boxes, a pillow and a vodka bottle all stuck in this tree. The complex has people that come around and pick up some of it, but it's like they do the bare minimum and ignore the rest.   Because the neighbors are dirty and leave trash everywhere, there are constantly roach problems. No matter how much you clean or how many times you put in a work order for pest control (which frequently gets ignored) you will still have roaches. Forever.   They advertise "gigabyte internet" in every room, but it cuts out almost every week, so good luck with that.   A significant problem is that the office only hires tenants so since the place is primarily occupied by idiot college students, the office is pretty much run by idiot college students. The few that actually try to do their job and aren't completely incompetent don't seem to have any power to actually accomplish anything and the rest are often either misinformed or flat out lying to you. My friend once had an issue with a staff member being incredibly rude to her so she tried to complain to someone - they told her to speak to the woman she needed to complain about.   All in all, this place in absolutely awful and you should not live here at all ever.
I really don't know what the hype is all about here. Sure, the ramen is a reasonable price. But it's not all that good. The noodles seem to be out of a package, and while the chicken broth is thick, it's not especially flavorful. The veggie broth is really, really thin and tasteless. The add-ins are a bit meager and the egg was completely hard boiled.  I also took half of mine to go (I have a tiny stomach), and the broth/meat/noodle mixture turned into this thoroughly solid gelatinous chunk overnight. It was so icky that I just threw it out.  The add-ins are really basic, the tables aren't especially clean, and you're under a lot of pressure to eat quickly and get out. Also - a big pet peeve is that it's cash only, but it's not posted ANYWHERE. Not on the website, not on the menu, not on the walls; really, I scoured the place. It seemed almost like a cash only when I walked in, but I didn't ask when I sat down, partly because there's one server and they were rushing around but also because usually, it's posted somewhere!  I really think that Boston could use a top notch ramen place that really takes the time to make their noodles right (or at least source them better). In the meantime, I'll stick with Totto.  fwiw - I am spoiled by Momi Ramen in Miami and various ramen places in NY.
I've seen shuttles from all the off airport rentals at least twice now (Sixth 3x) and still no Ace.  When I called their number, went through a tedious menu, and when I finally got to "speak someone at the Orlando office"  I was then promptly told "goodbye" and hung up on.   Not a cool way to start this business transaction.
I had takeout the food was disgusting!!! I got the Egusi Stew smelled bad I added the Fish  which was very dry I was told it was whiting and it wasn't .The price for very disappointing to spend $14.00 on lunch that went right to trash.
So like others have mentioned this place is hit or miss. What you can count on to be good is the ham and gruyere cheese croissant and the scone. An inconsistency is the plain croissant is dry, crumbly, and not good. Danishes also had dry pastry despite good filling. My latte was done right. I have not extended beyond breakfast here.   The ambiance of the shop is nice. Butcher block tables and modern decor. The pastries are self served on open selves with tong and bags near the register. I am not sure about this... it kinda grosses me out.   It will do in pinch I guess. I only went back because of Scout Mob.
This place is uppity hipster heaven. Go at your own eye-rolling risk. Everything in this place screams "I try too hard at life". I have given every location more than a fair amount of tries before I ultimately wrote it off as being too bourgeoisie (never has a word been more fitting) for the lights of someone like me. God forbid I don't walk in there with my moleskin notebook alongside my oak+fort jeans and blundstone boots.  From the ridiculous amount they charge for any drinks to the rude holier-than-thou attitude every location and its staff emanates, there is little to like about this instagrammer's paradise.  I told myself that the second I found a butter croissant to rival that of Paris, I'd never go back and I tell you I'm all the better for it. 1) A better butter croissant does in fact exist here in Van and 2) I will survive without the "uggh" that follows any request I make from Matchstick staff.
We were very excited. We made it date night. We are both in the hospitality industry and were really rooting for this to be a great place. Our spidey senses went off almost immediately, though -- this was not going to be a great dining experience.   Some of their failures are due to being new and can be fixed. The place was pretty empty, and the pointed choice by the owner (we asked) to not have any ambient music at all was disconcerting. Basically silence, punctuated by kitchen noise. I felt super sorry for the cooks, who apparently have to work in silence for their entire shifts, since otherwise that's all the guests would hear. Lose the attitude. Pipe in some sound, at least until business picks up.  The ambiance left a little to be desired. Nothing special about it, relatively  uncomfortable tables lined up along the walls, some standard-issue "New England fishing scheme" decor.  But we were there for the food, so we tucked in. Service was OK. I didn't love the fact that, although admittedly my date was more outgoing than I was, the waiter addressed all of his remarks/conversation/etc. exclusively to him (I'm female). And it didn't seem to be in a flirtatious way, more a completely-ignoring-that-I-existed way. A little weird. But, again: we're here for the food. So....  I love lobster, particularly lobster rolls, which any shitty bar in New England can do adequately for under $10 (or fantastically, if you're lucky). I'll certainly pay a premium since those little fellas have to be shipped across the country, but I did feel a little ridiculous eating $18 pub food. Nonetheless, we ordered a cup of each of the soups (Lobster Bisque and Salmon Chowder) to begin, and Lobster Newberg and a Lobster Roll entree to share.  The bisque was very decent. Good smoked paprika flavor, nice, well-cooked chunks of lobster - not rubbery and overdone at all, but fresh, juicy, and succulent. It wasn't fantastic, but gave us real hope for the lobster to follow. The salmon chowder was utterly forgettable - seriously, I've had more memorable from a food cart. Not bad - just not special, and up here in the northwest, you can get fantastic salmon chowder pretty much everywhere. The plating was problematic: we ordered cups, and were served large, full bowls. We could very well have been satisfied and left at that point, given the amount of soup. Not complaining, I suppose, but this isn't a good sign that they know what they're doing. It looked bad as a presentation, and it's wasteful on the food costs. (We didn't really have commentary on the much-debated rolls; they were fine.)  I love the Northwest, but dammit, vegetables do not need to be added to every single dish... the addition of what appeared to be succotash to the lobster newberg was... surprising... and not in a good way. Whole peapods, baby carrots, and a ton of corn made this more "lobster pot pie" than newberg. The sauce was gummy, and the puff pastry was stiff, overworked, and flavorless. The lobster itself was lovely - well-cooked and delicious. We picked it off of the dish and ate it alone.  As for my lobster roll, I know there are two traditions, one erring more towards just butter as a binder, the other to mayonnaise, but completely dry lobster is a fail in both camps. The bun was fine (butter toasted hot-dog style bread), the lobster was tasty and well-cooked, but the whole thing was very dry. (I craved a Cambridge-bar roll, or at least some aioli on the side to baste this one with.) Served with forgettable shoestring fries and a meh coleslaw.   With the bisque being "good," the salmon chowder being "meh," the newberg being "downright awful," and the roll being "meh," nothing about the silent and sterile ambiance being comfortable and inclining us to spend more time there/return/be romantic/eat more/etc., and the prices being relatively high, there is absolutely no chance we would return or recommend this place, particularly when you could go to dozens of better comparably-priced restaurants and have a marvelous dinner, presented beautifully, in a welcoming atmosphere. (Psssst -- just go to Le Pigeon. Right now.)
I've been to European wax center before and I've always loved it. This was my first time coming to this location and I will never go back. The woman at the front desk would not stop pushing me to buy a package. I understand you need to up-sell but it wasn't my first time there, she knew that, yet she continued to go through each and every package and explain them. I just wanted to pay and there was another client behind me waiting to pay as well but she would not stop talking.   I received a full Brazilian wax. When i went home i discovered that not only are there a few very noticeable missed patches of hair, but there was a lot of left over wax that was not properly removed. A lot.... I had to go in the shower and essentially re-wax myself. Most painful thing ever.   Needless to say I'm pretty upset and will be taking my business elsewhere.
Worst car wash I have ever experienced.  Interior was dirtier than when I brought it in.  They did a good job vacuuming.  That was the only positive.  After exterior and interior was done, the exit takes you through the line of cars entering the autowash, where some guy with a water blaster hose does a quick spray before car enters.....excellent place for him to be......basically sprayed my car on my side as I exited, so now half my car is covered in water spots.  Crappy crappy crappy place.  Maybe I should try a second time, and be more specific about what I expect in terms of "clean."  Oh yeah - I shouldn't have to do that when they are in the business of CLEANING cars.    If you want something done right, you have to do it yourself I guess.  Looks like I'm washing my own car from now on......
At first, I really liked WBOS...but after having it on in my office for a week was more than I could stand. They have staple songs that they seem to have to play at least once during *every* work day, and they were always accompanied with the same commentary from the DJs. By the end of the one week, I could called it all word-for-word.  Can't comment on the non-office-hours stuff, but I doubt I'll ever turn in for it.
Journeyman, I really wanted to like you. I tried so hard, considering the restaurant is literally 6 minutes from my house and thus my neighbor. I love Union Square and the refinement that Journeyman (purportedly) brings is definitely overdue. However... It just does not work. On paper, the restaurant is everything I love: local, modern, inventive, casual, but in reality, the restaurant seems to take itself too seriously. Despite the disappointing dining experience, I'm glad I went, I just won't be returning.   The hubs and I went to celebrate a wedding anniversary and opted for the five-course omnivore menu, added a serving of the foie gras, confit veal tongue and smoked beef heart. The five-course menu consisted of spring salad with favas, peas, spinach, carrots and had  "spring foam", that didn't seem to really serve a purpose; asparagus with soy and bonito; sous vide black cod with leek puree and potato; veal breast with sweetbreads and artichoke and a dessert of cane sugars, including macarons, shoofly pie and about twelve different things. As an amuse, we were offered a warm lentil salad, gruyere gougeres and house-cured ham. There was also a pre-dessert which was a flan with freshly grated nutmeg and post-dessert of poppyseed crackers with rhubarb jam and Florentines with house-made marshmallows. So all in all, we ended up having eleven different things to taste. If I were to order anything again, I'd ask for the cod and the sweetbreads, followed by the flan. Unfortunately, the rest just seemed discordant; the flavors weren't in harmony for me at all. Especially the asparagus dish was so bland, which was so surprising considering there were about 15 components on the plate! Each plate was pretty but the gels, foams and pearls can only get you so far when the flavors aren't up to  par.   The drinks were wonderful, albeit tiny. For a $14 cocktail, I'd like more than 4oz.   The atmosphere was awkward to say the least. We did arrive on the early side, with a six o'clock reservation, but we immediately felt like intruders. There is no music, which automatically made us feel like we should whisper to each other. Space is so spare that some music would definitely compliment the industrial, even slightly clinical vibe. I just wanted the restaurant to feel fun and it is about much as fun as a hospital recovery room.   The service was... adorable. In the way that there is so much good-willed effort and so little actual success. I seriously thought that our server might explode with awkwardness. The stilted service made me giggly, which in turn seemed to worsen the awkwardness. Ah well.  All in all, our tab came to $270, which is kind of absurd, despite the fact that we had quite a few drinks - for half that, we could have had a much more substantial and meal at e.g. Island Creek Oyster bar, or Coppa. Not to mention we could have had a laugh.
I went to the Coolidge Corner location last Saturday morning for my first Brazilian wax. I read online what to do to prepare and did such. When I went in the front desk staff were very friendly and the waiting room looked clean. I was called back a few minutes later by the waxer (I forget her name) I think Kelsey. Once we went into the room I got undressed and she started wiping. I thought she was going to go through the process with me as I told her this was my first wax. She abruptly stopped, explained to me she had other clients booked after me and then said rudely what are your questions. After asking she did the first strip of wax which hurt more than anything in life I have experienced! I said can you give me a minute before the next one? She stated again that she did not have time to give me a break because she had other clients. After the second strip I screamed and said I did not want to continue this it was far too painful. She said I've been doing this for over 10years, my response was I'm sure you have but this is not for me. She told me I could get dressed and as I pointed out the wax that was still left on my vagina and my skin was BLEEDING! She gave me a tissue and walked out of the room. I got dressed after placing tissue on my areas of skin that were still bleeding and left. Waxing is not for me I found it to be way too painful however this waxer was extremely unprofessional. She was blonde. She looked like she had been on an all night prior party bender with her makeup from the previous night still on. She had on scrubs that were completely wrinkled. Inside the exam room the floor was filthy, I know it is winter but clients are getting undressed the floor should be clean. Again had the experience been nice I could still say this wasn't for me but I'd refer a friend here, hell no. It was dirty, the waxer was dirty looking and her attitude was stank! Also there was NO one in the waiting room as I left!
Horrible! We went on a Saturday night and the bar was loud and busy. Our party of 4 each ordered an entree, the food was bland and my chicken mac and cheese was so tough and dry that I had problems cutting it. The waitress clearly did not know the menu and forgot that my entree and my sons came with a salad, which I never got. The food is nothing to rave about, most of it seemed precooked. The prices are ridiculous for the quality of food, we spent almost $60 on a horrible meal and I hope I can help others avoid doing the same.
I was in the area and decided to check this place out.   First, there are no real indicators on International to find this place....the address number isn't easily found nor the name of the business...it's about 500 feet back from the road.  The Yelp hours say they open at 12 noon.  Nope. 2pm. So I just wasted my time to come here.   Fail.
Worst hotel experience of my life.  In order to get the "Advance Purchase Rate" they make a big point of saying they will take the full amount of your stay when you make the reservation.  Except they didn't, they took it 3 weeks later which meant I had to monitor my account.    When I checked in they charged me a second time for the full amount.  I had to speak with 3 people before I got anyone who knew what they were doing.  The attitude of the staff was annoyance that I was bothering them.  They did not offer to cover any overdraft costs that I might incur due to their mistake but only agreed to do so after I spoke to them about it.  Because of their incompetence and lack of customer service I'll never stay here again and I'll tell all my friends to avoid the place too.
It says on yelp that the food truck opens at 12pm.  We arrived at 12:10 and the guys tells us it will be another 20 minutes.     So we left and went to Zenbu sushi 0.4 miles away.   The funky tuna roll was da bomb.  I highly recommend it.
Wouldn't let someone in with a green card because it wasn't an acceptable ID to their head bouncer. Unacceptable.
I had high hopes for this store but their selection is really weak.  The prices are really high. Their play area is decent but that's about it. They need a greater selection of average priced toys so you can actually buy something affordable.  We were looking for little toy animals to play with that they only had wooden toys.  Grasshopper has a much better selection for the similar price point. Expand your selection please and offer more affordable selections.
We usually frequent Menchies on Sawmill, but didn't have time today so thought we would try something a little different.  We were disappointed.  The flavor offerings were few, the taste of the yogurt wasn't nearly as good, machines were out of order and the restrooms were nasty.  We will make sure to leave enough time to head to Sawmill Menchies from now on....
THANKFULLY THIS PLACE IS NOW OUT OF BUSINESS!    *** However, please do not associate this Express location with the ACTUAL Athens Pizza Restaurant farther down Clairmont.  The restaurant is wonderful as always. From what I gather, this crappy express location was NOT owned by the same people as the actual restaurant (at least for the last several years it wasn't).
They claim delivery, but about twenty minutes after I placed an order with Eat24, they called to say that "they couldn't deliver" (never heard that from a pizza place before). Called back, placed on hold for quite a while, they called on the other line unaware that I was on hold with them already, and after having to repeat myself several times, was told she'd call to tell them I'd pick it up. So I'm anxious to see if the food is good - looks good - but really wasn't looking forward to leaving tonight. Hopefully it's worth it.  If you guys are going to offer delivery - offer delivery. There's got to be a way to NOT accept orders if delivery isn't available.
I've called at least 10 times in the past 3 days (to only receive voicemail) and left multiple messages to confirm my appointment. No response. Horrible customer service!
Friday Night we decided to go out to dinner and since we had heard good things about Fish Daddy's in Pflugerville, we thought we would go for an early dinner and then E could be home in time for football. We have had friends and my brother (who eats there when he is in town) tell us good reviews, however, our experience wasn't as great as theirs.  Strawberry Margarita -- a drizzle of strawberry does not turn a regular margarita into a strawberry one. It had an odd taste to it -- not horrible but not great. I didn't finish it and I am not someone that leaves before I finish my drink.  Seafood Fondue -- VERY CHEESY and the description didn't mention that it had tons of mushrooms in it. I am not a fan of mushrooms. The cheese on the top was good but the cheese that was mixed with the seafood (scallops, shrimp & crawfish) was very runny. Not like any other seafood fondue we have ever had before.  Kid's Cheeseburger -- the meat was very very dry. G said he preferred the school cafeteria's burger over what was on his plate. Frozen french fries were nothing special either.  Combo Plate w/Grilled Shrimp, Salmon & Stuffed Shrimp -- grilled shrimp was bland and took 3 lemon wedges to give it a touch of flavor; salmon was okay but nothing special; stuffed shrimp was good but had a touch too much Old Bay Seaoning on it.  Combo Plate w/Grilled Shrimp, Blackened Catfish & Stuffed Shrimp -- E says that his grilled shimp was like mine, he liked the stuffed shrimp and the catfish was okay.  Red Beans & Rice (side dish) -- this did have good flavor and I enjoyed it Steamed Brocoli -- nothing exciting  Jalapeno Hushpuppies -- I am pretty sure that someone forgot the jalapenos. These hushpuppies were bland. When I order something that has jalapeno in it, I expect a kick to it and these did not deliver at all.  We don't plan on going back again. Not sure if they were having a bad night in the kitchen or what but we weren't impressed and the customer service was okay but not enough to make us want to try it again.
Hah! They shut down!  SCORE: Jane: 7000000 Jasmine Sola: 0
Over priced mediocre food.  Poor slow service.  This is my third and last visit to this restaurant.  The food was cold.  One undercooked.  Total rip off.
So, myself and five friends decided to try the famous Wahlburgers. We were curious to see what all the rave was about. We were greeted at the door by a cordial young lady and she told us the name of our waitress and that she would be right over. She approached our table within a minute or so and introduced herself. She was very kind and a great waitress. I just wish I remember her name. We went in about 6:30 PM and at that time there were only a few other parties inside eating.   We ordered our burgers and I must admit that they were all cooked to perfection. They were on the bland side and nothing to brag about. I don't think they were flame broiled on a nice hot live flame...... too bad for us. We ordered tots and they were so-so. The onion rings were very good and sliced nice and thin and yes, they were crunchy. Five had sodas and one had tea.   As we tried to carry on a conversation, it was difficult to do so. The music was extra loud and we could not hear one another talking. Three times we asked for them to please turn it down. We had planned on having a dessert and coffee afterward but we just wanted to hurry up and get out of there because the atmosphere was not pleasant. This restaurant is definitely not geared for the over forty crowd. The music was not the type any of us would listen to. It made for a tense meal. Three finished their burgers and three did not. As for the tots and fries, most of those were left behind too. We quickly asked the waitress for the bill so we could leave. Trust me, none of our meals looked like the pictures do up above.   We went around the corner to another establishment and had dessert and coffee there. The ambiance was nice and the dinner music was soothing. Ahhhhh, so relaxing..... finally. We carried on great conversation with a lot of laughs. The place was half filled at this time.   Honestly, the Wahlburgers are way over their heads. They have opened up too many restaurants all over the country and out of the country. Paul and the family are not on site to see how things are being run by outsiders. Right from the beginning from watching the show, Paul was spot on when he made it known that he not happy with the expansion of Wahlburgers. He was afraid the quality would slide and go down.... it did.   Within a decade or less, I am sure you will see some of their franchises closing. When the owner is not around to watch the day to day operation, you lack the hands on approach as family is missing and that isn't good. More isn't always better and that rule applies to Wahlburgers.   If I need a burger, I am better off going to Five Guys in the next town... Peabody, Massachusetts. Better food and half the price.   Sorry guys, I didn't want to do this. Don't build anymore of these places as nobody from your family knows what is going on.
I just want to let everyone know that I was completely correct in that no one from Lucky Strike had contacted me to apologize for our terrible experience. We will not be visiting them again and will ensure that we let anyone know who asks how terrible their service is.
We were on a road trip and stopped in for breakfast. The wait wasn't too bad, and we were sat at our table. My coffee mug had lipstick on it and our server would not look at me as I was calling out, "ma'am, ma'am?" Trying to get a fresh cup. She finally acknowledged me and brought a fresh cup. I ordered a fit skillet meal that was topped with avocado... it came out with rotten avocado slices that were clearly not edible. Our server brought me more slices from the SAME AVOCADO!! I left it on the plate right at the edge of the table and she ignored it, never checking to see if it was ok. Our kids' meals were not as described, and my husband said his was edible but not great. By the end we asked to speak with the manager to let them know our experience. We are business owners and would like to be given the chance to improve as well... Anyway, she came out and could not have cared less. She tried to make an excuse about the avocado, and then tried to get the conversation over faster by offering us 10% off our ticket. We didn't want that, just an acknowledgement of the errors and maybe some assurance that they would correct them. No luck.
Oh my god, I can't believe people still get services here. I worked at this location years ago and left injured (which no one gave a shit about). I decided to write a review because today, almost 5 years after I left Dosha, I bumped in to an old client downtown who was told that I had left the country. She is one of many customers that they do not hesitate to lie to.  Make no mistake, there are much better salons within walking distance from nearly all Dosha locations. Do your community a favor and do a little research, then spend your hard earned money on a place that treats bit employees well.
So, I went to this Cabela's on Black Friday to purchase the Walther PPS.  They were out already (of course), but gave me a "Firearms Request Form" and said that would lock in the sale price once the Walther was back in stock.  A gentleman named Ted assured me I would be called back within two weeks.  Two weeks pass, and not a peep from Cabela's.  So I start a series of polite calls to the store.  And only after two or three calls with no one being able to help me, I learned I needed to speak with "Jay", who apparently only works from 9:00-12:00 and 1:-3:00.  After a few more phone calls I was never able to reach him during these times, but over a week-long period I did leave two voicemails (again, very polite) asking Jay to please return my message(s).    Needless to say, neither Jay nor anyone else ever bothered to return my phone call.  Apparently once I left the store with that "Firearms Request Form", my request was promptly tossed in the Cabela's trash can.  Or so I surmise, because Cabela's REALLY didn't seem to want my $370.  Asking them to take 30 seconds out of their day with a returned phone call to update me was too much to ask, I guess.  So I took my business to one of Cabela's local competitors, where I paid $20 more but didn't have to deal with the astounding lack of customer service I experienced at Cabela's.  I do hope someone at Cabela's sees this review, and finds out why a customer can't receive the simple courtesy of a return phone all.  Especially when THEY are the ones who initially said they would call me back.  Unfortunately this experience is stereotypical for big-box retailers like Cabela's, and serves as a good reminder as to why I should buy sporting products from local retailers who actually still care about providing good customer service.  Going forward I think I'll take a pass on Cabela's.  And for everyone else, be advised, if you ever need customer service from Cabela's you may or may not get it.  Decide for yourselves whether you want to deal with that potential headache.
I came to this Starbucks a few minutes before closing time. They had thrown out all the coffee and would not serve me. Instead, they sent me to another Starbucks at a Barnes and Noble down the street, claiming it was open late. I drove there and it was closed as well.
Second time in a row I've ordered pick up and the Pizza has been cold. If I'm paying $26 for a pizza I'd expect it to actually be hot when I pick it up. One of the times it wasn't even ready yet when I got there and it was still cold.
So this review is coming from a tourist who has never attended HHN previously, but was extremely excited to experience the Walking Dead and Silent Hill haunted houses as a bonus to our Disney vacation.  In short, our whole experience at HHN was disastrous. We waited in line (in the rain) for 1.5-2 hours for each haunted house, and each house takes about 3-4 minutes to walk through (not the greatest wait-time to ride-time ratio) . Everyone is herded into the houses in a continuous line, which really ruins the surprise element of the scares. We were always right behind the group that would be jumped at or surprised, so we weren't scared or surprised in the least.  Universal really needs to evaluate their capacity limit for HHN. Even on a stormy night, the lines were ridiculously long, and we only got to experience a fraction of the houses due to the wait times.  Unless you are a season pass holder with early access or fork over extra cash for the express pass, I wouldn't recommend attending. Don't waste a chunk of your night waiting in line for sub-par haunted houses.
Average family place! Like..super average. Did not smell like a diner...average customer service ..worst pancakes ever..my 90 yr old grandma can cook better than those in her sleep...totally uncooked. Anyway...  To the good part... It is cheaper and there is no wait or queue...now i know why.  We tried a club sandwich, pancakes, eggs Benny, and coffee.
Not impressed with the burgers at all. There was absolutely no flavor in the burger. The only reason I gave them 2 stars was for the quickness of the service. There also several option to add to a burger that has no flavor. I was so hopeful.
Found this place and decided to give it try as we usually go to Killer Pihrana sushi downtown. The sushi was okay, decent quality fish.   We also ordered some rolls which came out better than the nigiri sushi. Hey had also ran out of snapper when we arrived before dinner time.   I felt the service could be better. We were served water at room temperature which sucks cause Texas gets hot ya know? I felt like the only time the server came around was to take orders deliver the food and collect the bill. He was attentive yes but did not take initiative. I would not come back here cause Pirhana sushi is better overall.
Horrible horrible service. They made us wait for 10 min for them to clear off a table. Then they pulled a reserve sign off of a table and gave it to us. After another 10 min without even being offered a drink, it was time to leave. Never going again.
I've been here 3 times. Food quality is ok. Food quantity is impressive. Waiters are less than impressive . Building itself is cool. A happy hour drink might come half full. It's a chain..what can I say.
I came here with a bunch of ladies, post bar hopping for a bachelorette party.  Not sure what was wrong that night but the inside of the building was extremely hot.  It was more than just uncomfortable.  We shared a few doughnuts and everything was really sweet.  Too sweet for all of us.  The lines were long and slow.  Not worth waiting a long time for.
If you are Chinese, there is nothing worth coming for here. The dumplings are very americanized, their boba drinks are pitiful. At more than a dollar per dumpling, you can do better anywhere in Chinatown, or even buying a frozen bag at a grocery store for 1/4 of the cost.
Where do I start... I would give Zero stars for the apartment and management. First of all, there was no mention of any cleaning or insurance fees when we phoned to confirm our stay and specifically asked for the total amount the morning before we arrived. They added $90+ for cleaning and insurance when we got there and said that the extra fees are displayed somewhere in the fine print on the website where we booked.  The apartments are so darn old, dusty and has a depressing décor and inadequate lighting. The furniture looks and feel so cheap perhaps from the early 80s. I could not stop sneezing from the dust in the air and on the furniture. The cable did not work most of the time and there was no WiFi access because the phone line was actually down. The AC did not cool the apartment down and there is a warning on the thermostat not to put below 75F or it will freeze!  The bathrooms are so outdated with broken tiles in the showers and rust on the air vents.  I will upload some pictures which should speak for themselves.  I was so glad to leave this place after a couple of nights. Never again and certainly nothing magical about these memories!
(Updated 5/25/2013)   The audacity of that poster who thinks those of us who have been insulted by the rude staff are placing "worthless" reviews.  Who the hell is he to determine how we feel about the rude and ignorant way we have been served and treated?  His "great" service does not make ours any less authentic or real.   The nerve of him  to even suggest otherwise. Even have the audacity to think that someone is insecure and have personal issues because the wait staff was extremely disrespectful. No, it's not their fault it's everyone else's. Yeah right!   Not everyone is going to have the same experience and the staff should treat all its patrons with respect, courtesy, and kindness. I have been in a LOT of places of all walks of life and I very rarely experience this kind of ignorance!  Your experience is yours and our experience is ours and we rate honestly and accordingly!!  Point, Blank, and Period.  If Costello's do not want bad reviews then they NEED TO HAVE A TALK with their staff.  That is what good business people do!! I guess we should suck up the disrespectful treatment because the waitstaff is having a bad day?  Are you fkn kidding me?  When you are in the "hospitality" business you be hospitable regardless of what you have to deal with and what kind of day you are having.  Unbelievable!!     If you want to be treated well by staff and have GREAT food and quality service  and drinks then I strongly suggest you walk ACROSS THE STREET TO THE GALWAY HOUSE!   They also make an excellent dirty martini!  Bartenders and staff are super friendly.    Now on to the original review:  I haven't been to this place in years.  So I decide to check it out last night because they had a live band. I am giving this place one star due to the horrible attitude of the female bartender.  I am talking MAJOR attitude.  If you don't like your job  dealing with the public then find another line of work.  Her disrespectful tone and pinched up face was extremely disturbing to Me.  I won't ever go into that place again because of her for if she talked to Me and treated Me like that again she would see My ugly side.  The male bartender was much more friendlier!   If I ever go in there again it will not be on a day when she's working.  Very disrespectful.  You don't disrespect and give attitude to the f**&n customers and expect tips!!   I ended up leaving there and going to Coco's Lounge. The hospitality shown at CoCo's lounge by the owner was exceptional.  Very friendly.  The waitresses had a smile, spoke to you with respect, and the service was fast!  The patrons were nice and the latin music was good.  Much better experience  I must say.  When I go somewhere and I am spending My money I expect to be treated with respect by the staff persons and not spoken to with attitude!   Period!!  If anyone knows the owner/s of Costello's PLEASE let Me know via email.  I am pretty offended by this bartender and I hope she isn't a relation.  They need better staff.  Hell I'll work there and give the patrons service with a f**^n smile!!!
Went for the first time on a rainy Friday night, so kinda empty. I ordered an appetizer and the Saag Paneer... Oh and a Kingfisher. I like my Indian food on fire and it was! However I finished my beer and water and was just left there to suffer in pain! I then dropped my serving spoon the waiter standing across the room glanced and did nothing!   I had enough, marched over to him and said, seriously? I've been sitting there for 20 min with my mouth on fire! He waved his hand at me as to say go back to you table! He then sent another waiter over???   Ugh, I'm sorry but there is way to many  choices in Indian food to have to put up with these buffoons.... Never again!
Way to overpriced for a goodwill, i like a good bargain!  However they did have nice stuff!
The ABSOLUTE worst!!! I've never had a rental company ask for insurance cards but what's worst is that even when you come with your insurance cards they ask for your insurance summary to prove your coverages! The inspection stickers on the car was expired. They said if you get a ticket mail it to them and they will pay it..... yeah right! Ask for a refund and they give you a 1800 number in which they may or may not give you a refund!!!!  The customer service is non-existent The worst rental car company EVER!! If your thinking about using them.....DONT!!!
Was in town so a local friend and I went in 3/2 Friday night around 730. It was busy so hostess suggested seats at the bar.  Drinks came pretty quickly, but ordering took a while for a waiter to come back.  The food came aok, but then things went downhill.  It took forever to get a check as we couldn't get any of the bartenders' attention (and my friend had to get home to her child)  We finally got a check and it was 120 - umm, not our check. So then we had to wait to try to get someone's attention. Then we got our check.  But no one coming back to take payment. I finally got up, walked to the other side of the  bar, and got a bartender's attention to take my payment. I explained all these delays and he apologized and said he would review with staff (we told hostess too), but no offer of comping bill, or credit for future or anything and now the parking cost more in the lot because it took forever to get out of there - I think it was after 10p at this point!  My friend and I were exhausted and annoyed.  If you are going to seat people at the bar, you need to have normal service, and bring the right check, and collect payment so people can get out.  And then when we tell you it's a disaster, you should try to make good in some fashion.  Sorry really isn't enough when you've ruined our evening.  Getting more and more disappointed in this chain.
The management is super rude. The manager acts like it is your privilege to be eating his food and any changes to the menu are beneath his kingdom. He also treats DoorDash customers very very poorly and is rude to the delivery person. All three doordash orders I've made from here came with a major error to the order. The food is good if you can get them to actually give you what you ordered.
This is a dichotomized review. There's the food (4 stars), and the service (1 star).  The food was fine. It was good - nothing special, that is, it's the stuff you find at many other places (burgers, fries, etc.). This was good and for that I'd consider this place again. Then comes the service. The orders for the table were incorrectly brought out: from the drinks, to the food, to finally the bill. The wrong beer was brought out - they apologized but instead of only bringing out the correct order, they brought out the correct order and charged for their mistake. The food was fine, and the drink refills were fine. Then when the bill came, we were all charged for a portion of 3 beers, even though their mistake included 2 beers. After bringing it up, they gave us grief and took over 20 minutes to try to fix it. it was so awful considering two of those beers two people offered to pay for and the other one no one knows why they added it to the bill. For service, I'm not coming back - for food...meh, only if other places are full.
I echo many of the previous reviews.  First, be very careful to review the "professional design" they put together for you.  We had 24" sections that the salesperson filled with 21" cabinets and a 3" spacer which look VERY odd.  In addition, the design shifted cabinets to leave odd spaces that don't look quite right.  instead of bringing any of this to our attention in the store, we were left to figure it out after the fact.  And we could have come up with some pretty simple, probably no cost -difference solutions.  The sales staff are friendly, but looking to finish your order to move on to the next as quickly as possible.  Second, they do not call back.  If they say they will call you, or schedule a delivery, be prepared to call them daily to ensure they do what they say they will.  It will be a one-way street of communication.  Guaranteed.  I have emails of promised delivery on a Friday, but a Friday follow up call discovers the warehouse person is gone and no one knows what is happening.  Follow up call on Monday, and promises that someone will bring it to me on their way home from work.  Follow up call on Tuesday, same promise.  Follow up call on Wednesday, and the delivery person is bringing it.  Delivery person shows up Thursday, saying he never knew anything about delivery until that morning.   You are paying for cabinets in a flat-packed box.  You get no information, no customer service, no call-backs, etc.  Plan on NOT getting the shipment on time when promised, and you should expect that it will be missing items with no idea when those items will arrive (a week?  6?). If schedule and customer service are important to you (and they should be!), this is probably not your first choice.  And I agree with other reviews.  The cabinets are nice, but the price is not lower than other options.  Cabinets to Go is an option when shopping around, not a cheaper option.  We are happy with our kitchen, but it was painful.
Check your receipt very carefully if you shop here. Things are often rung up differently (usually more) than they are priced.  Produce is not very fresh. Why is the quality at this store so inferior to other Star Markets? I'd rather drive a mile and a half further to the one on route 9 just to get produce that isn't rotten by the time you get home.
There was a huge pile of puke outside their store that no one cleaned up, a homeless man begging for money right behind the puke, another homeless man using their phone at the photo center for over ten minutes, and the quality of my photos were so bad I had to return them. The current manager on site did not apologize for the poor quality and seemed to care less for that matter.
WIll not be going here ever again.  Went out with friends for dinner here and were super excited to try it out.  We put our names in and were told it would be about 20 minutes.  After waiting for about 40 minutes we asked the host what was going on?  He explained to us people were not leaving etc.....he finally got us a couch to sit at while we proceeded to wait another 30 minutes for a table of 4. The service was so so poor.  Finally the host told us how sorry he was and he would give us complimentary dessert.  We felt better that as least they understood we had waited forever.  We sat and our server again apologized to us about how long we had to wait and reminded us about our free dessert more than once.  The food was sub-par to say the least.  The restaurant was SUPER loud because of the wedding going on next door and the bridal party kept running in and out of the restaurant getting drinks at the bar.  After we finished dinner we decided we would just order 2 desserts to spit between both couples.  When we ordered the two $6.00 desserts the waitress proceeded to tell us that we would only be getting one dessert free!  Needless to say, horrible customer service and not very bright wait staff, the least she could have done was go ask if they could comp our $12.00 worth of dessert that they had reminded is 4 time that we would be getting. Very upsetting and disappointing night.
Decor is kitschy but clean and layout is nice. Staff are friendly and prompt.   Their tacos try a bit too hard to be creative, I feel. Stick with the classics and do them well unless you have a really unique combo. Tortillas for my tacos were limp and greasy. This def ain't California!
Coffee and sandwich place. I had a turkey sandwich, which was pretty good. Went to over a Latte after lunch at 2:52pm (they close at 3pm) and they told me no, because they already cleaned the machine :/ one star for poor customer service.
Grimy - seedy - unappetizing in every possible manner.  This past Saturday, 80s dance night consisted of the overwhelming stench of human body odor, a sorry absence of fun hair metal rock, and an overabundance of emo new wave - dislike.  That, and a 7$ cover to experience the high school Rocky Horror brand of alternative, replete with many persons in possession of ripped clothing and crazy eyes.  My heart swept to the nearby ZuZu and Middle East. Next time.
First of I'm very very disappointed.... this place is suppose to be Italian and they are far far from that. The pizza taste like old old cheese that was left out. I ordered a steak tip salad which I order a lot of from different places and this one is the worst by far, first of the tips where frozen cold which is disgusting. Second I got cooked peppers in a salad with no cucumbers, I went home and added cucumbers .... then the Italian Calzone had nothing but cheese inside, and it tasted horrible. The French fries and the fried chicken tasted like a fried Egg.... Hi hello clean the oil it's old. It was a waste of my money and if I could give it no stars I would.  Lastly they wanted to over charge me and when I questioned it I got an attitude for it... we walked into all burning smoke air and it took another 10mins to get my order that they told me would be ready in 20mins. Kind you it took me 30mins to get there, I would never ever recommend this place to anyone.....  it's disgusting
Horrible experience, the car was late picking us up(1 hour late). The driver did not help with baggage. We waited an additional 2 hours when arriving to the service at 1:30am just to pick up our car. They are extremely understaffed, not the worker's fault, but there was only one guy on staff. He had to do 3 people's job: rent out cars, pick up cars from airport parking and even drive the cars back. So ridiculous! Would never use them again.
I was in Decatur and wanted Pizza. I go to Mellow Mushroom all the time but wanted something different and thought of Mojos- having been once last year.  I remembered this as pretty good pizza, much better than Fellinis, so I visited again.  I ordered a couple of slices, each with a topping.  Because I don't really like cheese that well I asked for a little extra sauce on top to cover it up.  I routinely do this at all pizza joints.  After finishing the slices, that were really large, I received the bill and noticed that I had been charged an additional 50 cents per slice for the sauce. There wasn't that much sauce there, even with the extra sauce.  This, on top of the other charges for the toppings I ordered.  The bill came to 10.97 plus tip for 2 slices and a glass of tea.   I complained about the sauce charge and the waitress, a really cute young lady, apologized and said that it was what the button added automatically.  Well, Mojo, you need to reprogram your button or just handle the sauce by spoken word instead of punching that button.  These are the little things that cause me not to return to a place. This is the only time I have ever been charged for this- anywhere!
I called to get a broken cable on my garage door fixed. They were pleasant on the phone and came out quickly, but I was surprised that they charge a "standard" $146 just to come out (even if under an hour). I wish they were more up front about that it seems like a ridiculous charge for something that took less than an hour. They were at my house no more than 15-20 minutes to fix the cable and I live nearby Burlington.
The food is amazing, the cookies are fantastic. I'd give full stars but every time I go there (mainly for cookies for either work or home, I work in the mall) the customer service is terrible. They are short and very rude. The last time I went I asked why kind of tomato soup the soup was, and got an "I don't know. It's soup with tomato and cheese" that was it. Nothing else. I went ahead a got it but she didn't take a second to ask any of the other employees. I've also witnessed them talk to one another about a customer who was still in front of them saying "ugh I can tell today is going to be a long day". I would recommend this place for the food but the service, is terrible. And I'd say that as well.
An open letter to TCV: Recently I missed an appointment. I understood the policy of charging a fee for a missed appointment and completely accept that as fair and reasonable. However I received a letter in the mail today regarding my missed appointment that was completely offensive and unprofessional. The letter stated that if I missed 3 appointments in a 12 month rolling period "for reasons that we do not find acceptable" I will no longer be permitted to receive care from any TCV location. I'm going to tell a couple things: It is not MY privilege to be your customer, it is your privilege to have ME as a customer. Your customers can choose to be with a company that values their business, you however can not exist without customers. Secondly, who are you to determine what is an acceptable reason for missing an appointment? Have you elected a "Missed appointenet czar" who will determine my fate based on their arbitrary judgement? Why I missed an appointment in frankly none of your business. I and I alone will determine whether I have something more important or not. Your arrogance in this statement only highlights your obtuse regard for customer service.  At this point, I will most likely search for a new privider whom I believe values me as customer. Considering that you view my business as a annoying obligation, you probably won't care much about my departure. But maybe you will realize that you have lost site of the basics of growing a business which is that every customer should feel appreciated and serviced with respect, and you will redirect your policies to reflect those values.
Would have given La Taq 5 stars after it first opened. We had great service, food and drinks. But the last few times we've been the service has been awful and the bartender (with the Australian accent) only looks your way if you're one of the beautiful people. Really disappointing! Not going back, at least until the service is better.
Swank has been one our most favorite restaurants in downtown and we've never had a bad meal. Except this last one, and it doesn't appear to have been an "off" night.  Swank has a new chef that kept the menu basically the same but the preparation was far from what we had anticipated and was very disappointing.  All of our favorites, including the tartar, the 1/2 chicken, pork chop and duck, were more than lacking under this new chef (the duck was inedible even after a second try). It is upsetting because what "was" was perfect.  Now, not so much, which saddens me greatly.  I think we'll stick with the bar Swine as their menu has not been changed.  BTW: the service on this disappointing night was amazing as always.
Customer service: they rush you to make decisions on food. Staff pressured us to order dimsum item we didn't want. Later found out it's left over food which they wanted to get rid of. Food: quality is poor. Whether rice or noodles, bland, little meats or veggies in them. Not fresh ingredients. Price: overpriced for the lack of quality. Do not recommend.
Won't be coming back here. I usually disregard reviews that only talk about service and not food but now I get it. The service here ruined our meal. We came in for happy hour -food and drinks took forever and our server only seemed nice when she brought the check. If this place had stellar food it would offset the bad service but unfortunately it doesn't. Food was decent but nothing to brag about. Some of our oysters were literally the size of a quarter and I'm talking about the shell.
Small but not busy in morning. Staff do say hi and bye which is better than most of their gyms.  Equipment needs to fixed better. They have only 2 bikes and one doesn't work. Overall not bad because so slow. When I go anyways.
I've been to this location a couple of times, the service has never been great but I've come back for the good food. This time both the service and the food were absolutely horrible. My husband and I were starving and came in for a late dinner after a day of work and events. After I was seated first and waited for him to arrive, I ordered a cocktail that took about 15 minutes to arrive and it also took me asking (literally) 5 times to receive a glass of water. I'm pretty sure this was our server's first night on the job as he was incredibly awkward and forgetful and did absolutely no bussing unless we asked him to clear things. We ordered 2 appetizers, the firecracker shrimp and the trout dip. The trout dip was tolerable, but had an overwhelming mustard taste that drowned out any other flavor. The firecracker shrimp tasted like something from a cheap Chinese restaurant and was served with jarred chili sauce and a sickly sweet mayonnaise. Then came the entrees... which took us having to flag down our server long after we had finished our appetizers to order. His turkey meatloaf was decent though nothing spectacular. My barramuni was inedible. I don't know how a piece of fish can be simultaneously oily and dry. Not only that, it was completely unseasoned, but I still found it bland after adding salt and pepper. The fish was supposed to come with quinoa, squash and green beans. Underneath my disappointing piece of fish was maybe 2 tablespoons of quinoa and some mushy squash. This wouldn't have been a big deal if it hadn't taken so long for our server to check on our dishes, and then if a manager had come by in a timely manner. Instead we had to yet again flag down our server, and then when he seemed confused about what to do, we had to ask him to send over the manager. Even after taking my entree off the bill I was furious to have spent $50 on such a disappointing experience.
I can't tell you how disappointed we were in a late brunch here.  After weeks of wanting to try this place out we finally picked a Saturday that the whole family could gather and meet for brunch.  There were six of us celebrating a birthday.    It started with a less than friendly greeting at the front door.  Our waitress was unfriendly, lacked warmth and it felt like we were bothering her when we asked if we could order drinks and sticky buns which we saw when we came in.  That's right, we had to ask for her if she could take our drink order.  She didn't offer up any suggestions about the drinks or menu and every time we asked her opinion it was like pulling teeth to get her to answer.  When our drinks finally arrived she neglegeted to ask our last guest who came in after we ordered drinks if she would like anything.  We also reminded her that we would love the sticky buns now before we put in our order.  She looked up and said, "oh, yeah, you wanted sticky buns.  I'm looking at the counter from here and I can see we are out."   I said, "well, that's unfortunate, because you had them when we came in.  Do you think you can check?"  She said, "I'll see if we might have one In the back.  Are you ready to order?"  We all looked at each other and thought, oh my god...are we being punked?  We ordered and she came back with one sticky bun that we all split.  Although it was delicious it was lost in the attitude and lack of creating a wonderful customer experience.  We ordered our food and it came out quickly.  We ordered the prawns and polenta.  The prawns were okay but we're not deviened and really lacked a depth of flavor. The polenta could have used some salt, cheese anything because it was a bland blob of goop.  The corn beef hash was over spiced (it tasted like a bottle of Mrs. Dash fell into the pan).  The corned beef was tasty picked out by itself but it was over salted and spiced.  The crispy chicken and waffles was a paper then chicken finger that used panko crumbs which made it taste like coconut shrimp.  The waffle was crisp and delicious but it was ruined by what was suppose to be a sweet potato soufflé (it was more like a thick whipped cream concoction sprinkled with toasted coconut). It barely had any of the rum syrup drizzled on top, less than a teaspoon.  The salmon cakes were mostly bread crumbs and poorly seasoned.   When the waitress finally came over to check in on us, our drinks empty, she rattled off quickly, "everything good, everybody love everything? I looked at her like are you kidding me, "No.  Can you tell me what's on top of this waffle?  Is it some kind of whipped cream?" Her response was, "It's a sweet potato soufflé, I can get you whipped cream."  I looked at her and said no thank you.  She walked away, didn't ask if she could get me anything else and didn't ask if we would like anything else to drink.  The food can be improved upon, bad service and the lack of creating an amazing customer experience can not.  Taste your food before going out and dedicate some time to training your people to give an experience.  I for one would rather drive downtown for better food, great service and an experience I'm willing to tell my friends about.   This unfortunately, will not be a place I would recommend.
This dark, non-smoking bar, is tucked away from the stuff on 28th. I enjoyed it enough, kinda typical NYC or SF urban style. The music wasn't constant and there were dead silences (weird) but on the plus side they were playing Team America which is super funny. A few friends came in with a bottle of wine that we were going to imbibe at home and the bartender told us to take it out of the bar or cork it. Random, rude and uncalled for.
We went for a birthday celebration and because the birthday boys girlfriend was interested in potentially working in the kitchen when she graduates from culinary school. It was all of our first time. The restaurant was a huge vast empty room at 7 o clock on a Sunday. There were 2 tables sitting outside on this beautiful Sunday evening. We were tempted to sit outside or just in the bar area but since we made reservations, decided to sit at a table. Every step of the way was extremely and painfully awkward and full of missteps. The server was extremely uninformed of the house wine types. We asked if we could get items off the 'cafe' menu and he didn't know and then informed us the kitchen said no. He didn't write any of our orders down and messed up on our drinks, forgot an appetizer (and when we asked about it, was dumbfounded and asked if we still wanted it????) and got one of the main courses wrong. And that was after he blamed the computer for malfunctioning and so he had to ask again to confirm our dinner orders. Twice I had to get up to ask for more water. And this is an empty restaurant! I personally have been a server for the last 15 years and can not believe the service and lack of care from the guy. For the kind of money you're charging, the food better be damn good and even better service. The food was alright but it definitely left a bad taste in my mouth. No wonder the place was empty.
Decided to try this out on New Years with my boyfriend. We were SO DISAPPOINTED! We sat down at our table and knew we wanted to get a flight of beers. Our waitress who I found out later is the manager, says it's on the board at the bar. So we go up and try to right down our selections and they don't know where markers are. We go back to sit down and they were seating another family at our table! For the inconvenience our waitress aka manager says to get a 6 pick flight instead of 4 and she will charge us for 4 pick. This is when she says she can do that cause she's the manager. Umm okay thanks for saving me $2! We should have left I know!!! My salmon tacos were salmon mush tacos. Not a single chunk of salmon!!! My boyfriends prawns were just okay. He said the fries were gross.  We definitely went to the wrong place! I left and got a cheese pizza and beer and went home!
They were just OK but I would not use them again or recommend them personally. We used them twice for one move. First to put some of our stuff in storage while staging our home and then for the final move a couple months later. The move went relatively smoothly but there were definitely some issues. First, they sent someone out ahead of the move so they could give us an estimate and make sure they had enough truck space. Even with that, they underestimated and there was stuff we had to put in our own vehicles and friends vehicles to transport ourselves AND we had to come all the way back to pick up even more stuff that didn't fit on the trucks. Second, we called ahead of time to discuss moving our Yamaha upright piano. They assured me they could do it, they do it ALL the time. There would be an additional charge of $200. $100 for each set of stairs. It took 4 of them over 30 mins to get it down the first set of stairs, it was so hard to watch I left the room. Then when we got to the new home, they got trapped on the first set of stairs, losing control of it and it ended up falling into the wall and putting a big dent and hole in it. We were calm and cool about it, even though this was a brand new home, and asked if THEY were all okay. Telling them, their safety and well being was our first concern, it's just a wall, etc. They were all white as ghosts and did not look confident at all about getting it up the stairs the rest of the way. We then we told them to just bring it down and move on to emptying the rest of the truck, they look relieved. We haven't even had the piano checked yet, so who knows what that adventure did to the piano. Third, when trying to navigate the treadmill to the second floor, they again got trapped at the first landing. The treadmill had to be lifted over a railing and turned but they had their shortest guy at the front and he just couldn't lift it high enough. On the last attempt, they lost control again and my husband had to help. He ended up having his end of the treadmill fall on his shoulder b/c he was trying to stop it from hitting the head of the smaller crew member. Once the move was finally over, the damage that was done to the house during the move was written on the receipt by the crew boss and this is where our experience turned from okay to crap. When we called first thing Monday morning, we were told that we had to send a certified letter explaining the damages. We asked why would we have to send something in writing explaining it when you're looking at what your crew boss wrote on the receipt. They told us they would have their drywall guy call us, he's the best and he does this kind of repair all the time. That never happened. We called back and have emailed several times but to no avail. A lot of, "well, let me reach out to him and have him touch base with you." They're great at lip service. We ultimately sent that certified letter, got a return receipt and still, it's been 8 weeks since the move and we haven't heard from anyone. So, while they can move heavy items, SOME heavy items, from point A to point B, God forbid there is a problem. They do not make solving the problem as much of a priority as getting the business.
If I could give kanes a zero I would. I purchased a 1200 dollar sofa set from them in 2011. The leather peeled off on both the sofa and the love seat. They would not fix it, they would not contact me when they said they would. They have the worst customer service and they have a recording that says your furniture is guaranteed for life. That is a lie.  I have purchased a dining set, a bedroom set and a 2000 dollar mattress from Kanes.  After the sofa set and the way they treated me I would never buy from them again.  I strongly urge you to purchase your furniture from any other company. If not you will reqret dealing with Kanes if you have a problem.
My experience in the store today was so bad that I decided it needed to be noted. I needed a black sweater for work and I live right down the street from this location so i made a quick trip there to get one. I walk in the store and after a few minutes I was greeted by a male employee that was very friendly. I find a sweater I liked and go back to the fitting rooms to try it on. No one was back there so after a minute or two I let myself in one of the rooms. Once I am ready to check out, I go to registers up front. No one was up there either so I wait. A redhead girl walks up after a few minutes and says nothing to me, just grabs the sweater from the counter and starts ringing it up. I mention to her that I had an email for a free nail polish with purchase. She asks to see it so I pull it up on my phone to show her. She looked at it and then says "i'll be right back". I wait longer for her to come back up to the front and finish ringing me up. She finally comes back up and hands me a sheet up paper with nail polish names on it and says those are the ones I could get. I pick about 10 up to see if the names on the bottom match the names on the list while she stands there and watches me. After I found none that actually were on the list I asked if they even had any of the ones that were offered in the promotion. She said, "I think we have the space blue". (After I had looked at all of them!!!) I give up on the nail polish and say never mind. No apology or anything from her. She just continues to ring up my sweater and after that whole ordeal and her rude attitude, I decide that there is no way in hell I am about to pay $70 for a generic black sweater I could get anywhere else. I told her I no longer wanted it and I walked out. I was willing to pay the price for convince just because I wanted it immediately, but she completely pissed me off and ruined my experience. I won't be going back any time soon.
Quality of food is good but a rip off, just be beware if you order food to go, your California rolls will hardly have any crab in it. They stuffed in too much cucumber and avocado in it.  Also, the tuna rolls were not fresh. SMH.
Terrible. Made an appointment the day before to have a car towed from one location to another. It was the beginning of a holiday weekend, so timing was urgent to get there before they closed.   After not hearing from them, I called them in the afternoon. He supposedly had trouble with his truck and was going to send someone else. Just got a call from the backup driver...he knew absolutely nothing and had just gotten an urgent call for a tow. He (the second driver) thought I was stranded somewhere.   So now, after a no show, no call, it is too late for the car to be towed in time for anything to get done.   Will never call them again...
Let me begin by saying that Chili's has to be one of my favorite to go spots. I've been to 5+ different locations including locations in New York but this specific location? It is unbelievably horrible, the service is terrible, the food was a waste.  My sister order was mistakenly mixed up and when we went ahead and told our server her response was "Well that was what I understood" I kindly asked if she can correct it and her response was "It'll take a while before the food comes out sooo..?"  Our chips tasted old and the guacamole was not fresh. We asked to change it and she practically brought out the same batter with the remark of "This was freshly made today and it's all that we have"   I should've spoken to the manager, but once our meal was done we all just wanted to get out of there.  I would not recommend this place not even to my worse enemy.
Avocado sauce? What in hell is that? Sweet mother of Jesus, I bet they were serving avocados and guacamole during the inflation crisis of the Seventies. Even the sour cream was runny. The al pastor in my enchiladas tasted like charred bark dust after it had been shoveled from a closed down elementary school on a dreary and drizzly November day. Oh, and enchilada sauce? Must have been an afterthought, or was that it wasn't there because you burnt it all to hell and had a hard time scraping it off the bottom of the pot with a knife? Seriously, to hell with this place, and I'm talking at least Dante's third level.
If I could give 0, I would. HORRIBLE service. Took over an hour just standing on line nd another hour to get the car. Made a reservation for a van. The van was not available when we reached there. Then a van pulls up with a family in it nd had to wait for the company to then clean the van out. It was terrible.
Review is for food only. Last year I was in town and me and a friend were really wasted and ate here. We remember going on and on about how  (surprisingly) amazing the food was. So this year, we're back in town and we're all, we HAVE to order from here for dinner - our drunk taste buds can't be that far off...oh, but they were. We threw most of our food away - even, *gasp* egg rolls. I eat my way through a lot of cheap Chinese places, but this is definitely closer to terrible than good food. I don't doubt it's a fun place to end up at night and by all means, get your drunk food on, but never eat here sober.
I regret not checking the Yelp reviews first before trying this place, but it was the best I could find in the Davis Square area past midnight, when the 10pm movie we watched at the Sville Theater finished.  It does stay open until 2am, which seems to be the main redeeming quality, and the food was made impressively fast.    But then, the food itself.  I got fried udon beef noodles, which were a nice huge portion that could've easily fed 2 people, but they really were greasy as hell and yet strangely flavorless unless you drench them in soy sauce and siracha.  My friend's pork lo mein was strangely NOT greasy at all, but even more flavorless.  Schizhoid!  Haha, it makes me appreciate the Union Square "Red House" late night Chinese fast food place that a lot of people complain about, their noodles are way better.  Not sure if I'll be brave enough to chance the rest of this place's menu, after batting 0-2.
I was diagnosed with epilepsy over 10 years ago I have sat in a lot of lobby's lol  I rather have a intelligent doctor who knows what he or she is doing instead of a doctor who doesn't care about me!  This man flat out told me that he was going to give me a shot of a medication and it would do 1 of 2 things either stop the seizures or make me go into multiple convulsions, and let me walk out of his office into my vehicle! Who does that! Whom? I really wish I could remember what the name of that shot was, because down the street I went into grand mal after I woke up 3 days later.. I changed doctors.  Now I have found the best neurologist in Austin Texas  if anyone would like to find real doctor not this JOKE check them out: http://www.austinepilepsy.com
About a week ago, my friend and I spotted this place on our way home from dinner and decided that next week we give it a try.  We opted out of dessert over at Flemings to try the crepes here instead. Sorry to say, we were both VERY disappointed in this place and won't be coming back.  I hate leaving a review like this, but I'd rather be honest about MY experience. First of all, I'm German and I know good crepes. When I walked in, we weren't even greeted with a friendly hello by the gentleman that worked there. He didn't have much of a personality and frankly, I thought he was a bit rude.  I asked him if they served Cafe con leche and the guy actually had NO idea what that was. They have a huge cappuccino maker and other coffees to choose from, and he didn't even know what cafe con leche was???  We both ordered the Nutella and Banana crepe. When I watched him make it, he literally "drizzled" a small amount of Nutella on the huge crepe and used an entire banana. Overkill on the banana and not enough Nutella at all! The crepes were WAY too thick also and since most of it was all just dough...it didn't have much of a taste to it either.  There is a picture on their menu with an ice cream topped crepe, but guess what...they don't have ice cream. False advertising! If your going to have a picture of something on your menu, you better darn well serve it!  We both wished we had our dessert at dinner after the experience we had, but we are glad we came here too. Now we know we will not be coming back here unless they make changes. Add more of the spreadable ingredients...and SPREAD it ALL over the crepe so that the flavor is throughout!! They have it decorated nicely and it's very clean. The lady that made my cappuccino was friendly. I don't like giving reviews like this, but...that's what Yelp is for and maybe someone else will have a better experience than we did.
This was a bit disappointing as I am a big fan of Samuel Adams beer. The tour is free, but the guides seem a bit bored and so is the tour itself. There's a private lot, which gets filled up pretty quickly.  Visitors may be able to find street parking.  The biggest disappointment was that they only allow you to taste three types of beer, which is selected in advance by them. If you want to try some of your own choosing, you have to go to some restaurant off-site. But they do make sure that the last leg of the tour is their store of merchandise. Has Samuel Adams gotten too commercial and big that it's lost its passion for what is truly important??
The food was good. The seating was very minimal 10 chairs max at 3 tables. The wait was pretty considerable to with small portions. Good for light to go food or a gluten free option.
This Starbucks is terrible. Staff is not friendly. My coffee tasted nothing like it should of and tasted more of water then coffee. I'm afraid to even have them correct it with their poor service they gave me to start with. I'll just drink it or toss it. This one is also slow considering it's dragon con and it's packed
This was a sad day as to are family only went to red robbin because they have good mud pies. But we met by an unfriendly hostess we were sat fairly quickly. After ordering are tiny donuts and mud pies we had to wait over 20 minutes to get are donuts. But to are dismay they was no mud pie and the server told us that they had to give it to another party. Over all the food was bad, the donuts that we got tasted like fish because it was made in the same grease that the fish is made in. The visit was vary unpleasant and left us upset
The food tasted good. The waitress who took the orders were trying too hard to sell their products (i don't like this). They rushed us when we were deciding what to order. The price of the food was not cheap at all.
Very average customer service.  Employees aren't too friendly. Went in this morning and asked for 6 bagels sliced and toasted and was given the eat $*** and die look since there was a short line behind me. If you aren't ready to simply toast a few bagels maybe you should have a few more people working in the morning to help with the rush.
This DD is the absolute worst. Every single time I come here they are always out of normal things, and when they actually have things in stock, it takes forever to get it after you order.
I called Alliance 4 days ago based on good Yelp reviews.  The owner answered and I started to describe the issue with the garage and I was requesting an estimate. He cut me off and said "Just text me the address and I'll let you know when I can go by and look at it." I wanted to explain some more details about what I was looking for and that I would need to arrange a time to meet him there.  Again, he cut me off and said "Just text me the address and I'll let you know when I can go by and look at it."  I haven't run into someone being so rude on the phone in a long time - and I deal with people and businesses all the time.  I needed the work done, so I texted my address and he responded that he would text or call when we could meet.  Well, that was now 4 days ago.  I guess he didn't want my business. ...  UPDATE: 2 days after I wrote this review, I got a text that he could meet me later that day.  I told him I had already hired another company to do the work.  Other reviews of this company say the response and service was quick. I don't know what happened in my case - there is no way I'm going to wait 6 days to get a response for an estimate.
Let me start by saying that I love red Robin, but this particular one has horrible service, first they forgot my BF's drink, then they forgot my burger, and they also neglected to refill anyone at my table's drink without being asked. I will probably never come to this location again.
We went there on Sunday at 3pm the place was still packed. I orders the shrimp and grits which were tasty. It was not something that knocked me off my feet. My friend order the ultimate pancakes with sausage and eggs. It was good but he should have gotten bacon instead of sausage. Overall the place is cool but little pricey with all the other cool brunch spots Atlanta has to offer.
This store is the closest to my house, so I have gone here a few times, although I've been disappointed each time.  If you are heading out to do some grocery shopping, I suggest to pass this one up.  There are too many HEBs in the area to spend time here.  This one is dirty, as the other reviews suggest, and do not have better prices to make going here worth it.  The fruit and veggie selection is limited and not very fresh.  There are some shady characters who hang around the lot sometimes.  The staff is not particularly helpful (although some are nice enough).  And typically when I go here, I have to go to another store to get a few more items to complete my list.  I am choosing to drive an extra mile from now on to avoid this disappointing store.
Ordered food here today, got it mixed up with the other dosa place next door that I usually go to. I haven't been here in a while and I was not happy with the food. The portion for the chicken 65 was so little and salty, as was the biryani my family had ordered. No spice at all and I asked for it to be spicy. Also what they advertise as biryani was not actual biryani, it looked like they just mixed curry gravy into rice, which isn't what biryani is. It was not favourful and the meat portion was so small. On top of that the lamb was tough and chewy. The raita was super thick and had a paste like texture, and the gravy was also salty. I don't think I will return back, the food is nowhere near what it used to be like a few years ago. Highly disappointed.
Had a truly terrible experience at your establishment (413 Main Street Reading MA) last night (October 22 2015 at 5PM).  Crew was incredibly unprofessional.  Yelling, screaming and swearing at one another (especially the large woman in the purple shirt who I assume is the manager)  It was intimidating and horrible as the woman even yelled out the "F-word" right in front of us and I had two children with me that are ages 3 and 6.  In addition, the crew was super rude right tin front of the customers.  Chatting about inappropriate things among themselves, talking on the phone, eating in the front end register area, etc... All the while the restaurant and restrooms are filthy dirty and customers are literally being ignored.  This is not the first bad experience I had here.  Last time, it was the same scenario with the total lack of professionalism AND a young employee had gone outside to smoke a cigarette right in front of ht front door of the restaurant resting alongside the fence to the kid's playground where my children were playing!  I know it's McDonald's and not meant to be fine-dining in a 5 start restaurant or anything like that... but this level of disgusting behavior can not be tolerated.  Whomever owns this franchise needs to get it under control. Fire the entire crew and start over!
This place is awesome for drinking outdoors during the summertime. But every time I eat there, I get a little more disappointed with their food. The atmosphere is great, which is probably why I find it enjoyable to drink there, but the seafood is never good. There is something that could be very cool about paying very little for dicey seafood once in awhile, but this crap food is just as expensive as it would be at a normal/decent restaurant. I love seafood, and love cheap food, but I just don't like leaving a place feeling like I was robbed, which I always feel here. I will stick to beer only from now on!
Do NOT stay here! My husband, I, and our younger kids stayed here this last Saturday for a basketball tournament to wake up to a note on the door with $100 charge on our card for accusing us of smoking in our room. We don't smoke and it was not our room!  After multiple times telling them it was not us, my husband even telling the front desk to come to our room to see for themselves they refused. Absolutely ridiculous and not only will we nor the program we are with ever stay here again. Which is 20-50 rooms each year. I will also be reporting them to the BBB as well as putting it out there on any review I can to warn anyone how our experience was. I am disputing this charge with my credit card company but the fact I have to take extra time out to get this fixed is ridiculous. I have left two msgs with a manager with no response.
I wish I could give this "0" stars. Our couch was delivered with two giant rips in the front that had been awfully stitched together in some sort of effort to hide the obvious from us. They then tried to convince us that we knew it was there when we bought it. This could not be further from the truth. I would never spend that much money on a ripped couch with an awful amateur repair job. It was also missing the throw pillows. When we refused to sign for this couch the movers started becoming aggressive and harassing almost that we sign. Once they removed the couch and left I called customer service who offered us an "in-store credit" as opposed to a refund. Not okay. To top it off, after the movers left I noticed a giant chunk of my door frame had been taken out  by the delivery guys! When I emailed customer service about this with a photo attached, I specifically noted in the email " call MY cell phone number, as my boyfriend is not able to answer his personal phone at work like I can" and gave them my number. Who did they call about this issue? My boyfriend. And then when he told them how aggressive and disrespectful the movers were the "supervisor" began chuckling. Not sure why rude disrespectful behavior ir your employees, or employees you subcontract out is funny, but I will be leaving negative reviews now on every outlet possible. Do. Not. Shop. Here!
I have to agree with Steve, seeing as how I was the lunch buddy.  The restaurant was dead, there were only two tables and two servers, one of whom was the manager.  She brought us our drinks, took our orders, and never came back... not even to check on the tastiness of our food.  We expected much better service with the deadness of the place.  I had nachos with chicken.  The chicken was shredded, so there were tiny bones in it... I'm glad I didn't aspirate any of them.  That would've been a quick trip to work on my day off, that's for sure.  It was also G-R-E-A-S-Y, oil dripping off of the saturated tortilla chips when I tried to pick them up.  The chips and salsa brought to the table before we ordered our drinks were very generic tasting... like Pace Picante sauce (or, something all tomato) and Tostitos.  Perhaps we would have been better off at Wally's Burger Express next door.
Caliga often ties up dogs while gardening and yells at them like misbehaved children. She does not appear to rigorously exercise the dogs and generally has several dogs in tow.
The check in and out was easy.  The rooms were clean and comfortable.  I do think the air conditioning was cranked up way to high and very hard to make that comfortable.  The location is Jewry close to the airport.  So if you are just using this location for sleeping I would say do it.  The charter driver was hesitant about helping me with my bags. We were told we could get a ride to near by restaurants which were only 2 options but because he had another pick up he dropped us off at his closest convince and not the one that was discussed.  Where he just walked over to the train station going somewhere else.  The staff at the desk was great.  My review is based on the shuttle driver and the air conditioning of the room.
I don't think I have ever been to this location without my order being incorrect. The most recent time that I went, I ordered a full size Roasted Turkey & Avocado BLT sandwich with no tomato. When I arrived home, I realized that I was given only half of my sandwich with tomato on it. It is not a very close location from my home, so I called and the manager said that she would mail me a voucher since I was unable to drive back to have it corrected. I gave her my mailing address and never received anything. I then had to contact corporate twice to have the issue resolved. I do not see myself going back to this location any time soon, if at all. Save your money and go elsewhere.
Brought my car here for some basic service based upon a recommendation from my autobody shop. They never open at their advertised time so dont anticipate dropping off before work. No apology after coming in late and having me wait outside in the cold rain for 20 minutes. About 30 minutes late the second time. Not super pleasant, Javier was condescending and never put the oil change sticker on my windshield even though he cut me off to state that the settings would be reset and sticker placed. Was asked to pay in full before service was all completed. Not sure about the quality of work but not low prices (price should reflect work and service). There are too many shop options in the area. No reason to return to a shop where customer service is not a focus and there's lack of attention to detail in their work.
Rating solely on dancing aspect.  No cover, easy parking and lots of bartenders.  Place was so packed it was very hard to dance. If you like to dance with a group of friends or don't mind being restrained then dj will do. Only heard one bachata song and the rest regueton and hip hop in a span of 35 minutes.  For those that truly like Latin dancing like salsa and bachata and want to dance, this is not the place. It's not possible to dance with a partner at all or do turns.
Our group ordered the food at least fifteen minutes before the end of happy hour, but when our server came with the bill, it was full priced. When we asked him about it, he was insistent that we ordered after seven, even though our bills had the correct time. For 18% automatic gratuity, would have expected better. Also, for a group of seven, they put us in a booth, which was incredibly tight. The rest of the place was completely empty when we got there, no idea why they didn't put us at a larger table.   Food here was alright, wings were right amount of crispy and flavoured. Two stars because food quality okay, and in the end they corrected the bills.
I was looking forward to this foodie experience and left very disappointed. First course salad-Fabulous second course Fish-OVERCOOKED  Thirdcourse Waygu beef-OVERCOOKED LEATHER, there were people on both sides of me who attempted to cut and eat and could NOT. I was not the only one who sent my dish back untouched. the foie gras topping  was good, but not enough to help make the beef edible. We didn't even have the option to comment or send it back. The Table should be imbarrassed and ashamed!!!!!' Fourth course-cheese plate,minimal but enjoyable. Fifth-Dessert was a home run. Blueberry buckle and flan over duck egg pavlova (like meringue ) and a side of extra mini treats. Wine pairings were enjoyable. atmosphere was fantastic Customer service-SUCKED!! I watched them clear FOUR Waygu beef plates that were UNTOUCHED because they were SO OVERCOOKED and not edible. NOT ONE CHEF/ SERVER ASKED OR APOLOGIZED FIR THE DISGUSTING BEEF!!! When a chef sees numerous plates of UNEATEN food returned to kitchen and doesn't find out why... They clearly DO NOT CARE!!! They are "trained chefs" and plated  over cooked fish and beef and served it to us!! INSULTING! DISGUSTING!OBNOXIOUS!!  TAKE YOUR MONEY AND SPEND IT SOMEWHERE ELSE!!!!!! THE TABLE does NOT deserve patrons with the overcooked food they intentionally served us...  Not to mention when we finally commented on the over cooked beef, they could have cared less.  I am so disappointed because I like to support local restaraunts ,especially who use local products. BUT I WILL NOT BE SUPPORTING The Table!!!!  SIDENOTE- I went with friends who were repeat customers and said their first experience was AMAZING! However the experience this time was disappointing to our friends as well! A restaraunt  that isn't consistent at that level of "cooking/dining" experience is NOT acceptable. Especially since the owners/chefs could care less that they served their paying guests OVERCOOKED meat and fish!!! No excuse!!!!
Worst hair cut ever, not only myself but my husband just needed a trim around his neck , she trimmed around ears etc , all uneven husband told her about it so she trimmed more still uneven ,,,will not return I have given them three times , and don,t say you get what you pay for  the point is we pay for services but are rushed in and out , America take pride no matter what you do do it well.
The beef was the consistency of rubber. The lo mien noodles weren't lo mien noodles. The service was so bad I was amazed my girlfriend tipped at all.
Food has been going downhill. I ordered a jerk chicken wrap and they out chicken fat and cartilage in my wrap. CARELESS. Also there was sign in the front by the juices it stated something regarding giving out free food "we do not give out free food #keepyourGHETTOquestions...."etc. You fucking coon ass . Wtf do u classify as ghetto. As a black owned business how dare you!!!!!humble yourself. Disgusting and offensive. Won't be returning
For some reason, I despise this place.  Whether it's a poetry reading or a throbbing Friday night, it's overrated, overcrowded and I end up leaving within an hour.
First, let me say this. This is a place that I really, really want to love.  The people who work here are pretty awesome, and the place feels warm whenever you walk in. Also, they have their slices (cut into squares) openly displayed and a whole gelato section that lulls a visitor into taking a seat, and wanting to sample their offerings.  Over the past year, I've had food from here on four occasions. The first was a catered lunch at our company and the food was very solid (especially the "Bocce Balls").  Now let's break it down further. On my subsequent trips, I've tried three different slices, and on my final trip, ordered some "homemade" pasta to go. Sad to say, the food has been maddeningly inconsistent. The pizza has never been bad, but then again, it is nothing to get excited over either. The "homemade" pasta? I couldn't really judge it, because the sauce that came with it was, and hate to say this, just plain lazy. I'm no culinary expert, but I've made better sauce on my own, and that's what's so frustrating about this place. It SHOULD be good and COULD be good, but after four trips, it is what it is.
Nice rooms but for a big weekend (SEC championship and Falcons game) under staffed and and room service keeps extending the wait time for food. We just cancelled humus and chips because it take so long to cook.
I've been disappointed the last two times I came here. They're always out of black beans, that's what upsets me most! The first of my last two experiences I had a bowl, the black bean was running low but they just decided to scrape up all the goop of the beans and put it in my bowl anyway! Made me so sick I actually could not keep it down, that should have been my final time but I gave it another go. Again, they had zero black beans, and I can't blame them for that entirely, but still frustrating. I was having another bowl but they were out so I then decided I was not going to get anything, no big deal, but then the manager or owner (I'm not sure) became very flustered. I told him over and over that it was okay and he didn't need to worry but he continued to push and then got me a free burrito card (not complaining) however the young girl at the register was very catty at me, and asked right in front of me "why does she deserve that?" I was blown away, very unprofessional, she also had a hicky on her neck, classy. Won't be going back, thanks for the free burrito though!
I would love to leave it at all the nice things I said below but, unfortunately, one of their employees left a very bad taste in my mouth and I hadn't even eaten there today. I was attempting to pull in to the alley behind Taco Deli that I take to get to my parking lot at work and her giant red SUV was parked right in the middle of the one lane alley ( for her convenience of course. Never mind other people that could potentially need that alley clear to get to their place of business.) Since it's not advised to back up in to on coming, rush hour traffic, I was forced to wait for the sassy employee to come out and give me attitude for being inconvenienced by her. Not only did she sit in her car for a minute, she then drive as slow as possible for the 50 yards or so of alley. I then walked in to speak to a manager, who while clearly mortified, had no interest in making sure a very upset regular patron of Taco Deli's left feeling a little better about the business she was entrusted to manage. Not a shining day for this location at all.      I officially work with in walking distance of my favorite taco joint. Breakfast? Yes! Lunch? Yes! Dinner? Nope. The only bummer is the early closing time and  the fact that it is always packed. What else can I expect from a place that serves up deliciousness on the regular. This new job of mine came with the standard benefits and one seriously lucky location bonus. I'm a very happy girl these days.
LAME LAME LAME LAME LAME LAME!   There is nothing original about this show. This Bobby Bones character uses Howard Stern bits (the gossip game and win bobby's money) to entertain his listeners. What really irks me is that he takes credit for other people's ideas. Not only that but he acts like he's some sort of Austin celebrity. He's a nobody. Amy, his close minded female sidekick, offers absolutely nothing to the show other than utter frustration. She can't even get the gossip news right. LAME. "Lunchbox" is THE douche of the show.   My ears start bleeding if I listen to them in the morning.   For the love of GOD, BUY SIRIUS and listen to some quality radio.
We never got served. So we left. No chocolate. No tour.  There was 2 people working, 6-7 customer and myself and my daughter. No one looked at us, greeted us or acknowledged us at all. We stood, we paced and we walked out. We were in there at 2:30 today...didn't even get to buy any chocolate. What a disappointment. This place is nothing to spend your money on. Trust me!
So my colleagues and I gave this place another shot- 3rd time's the charm, right?  I'm finding it difficult to find the words to express just how repugnant the "food" is that this establishment has to offer.  All of our orders were wrong once again. Weighing my options I figured its better than starving.  As it turns out perhaps I was incorrect as this meal was so low quality I actually felt toxic eating this garbage.  And the cost!  Almost $50 for three entrees that would honestly be collectively priced at $15, tops. PLEASE do yourself a favor and avoid this poor excuse of an eatery.
Their prime rib sandwich is easily the best prime rib in the Denver area. Tastes awesome, melts in your mouth, no gristle. Just perfect. 5 stars.  Decent beer selection. 4 stars  Flatbread pizza is ok. The pretzels are super good. But nothing can touch the prime rib.  The service is sometimes great, sometimes mediocre, sometimes awful. 1 star for the awful times (most recently after 42 minutes still didn't have our food).
This is around the corner from my house so it's often a go-to.   I would say if you are craving run of the mill Tex-Mex, this is it. The waitstaff are less than excited and don't hide it. I try not to sit in booths, for whatever reason the service declines along the walls?? Needless to say, it's an easy place to go where you will never encounter a wait and the food will always be consistent.   I believe on Mondays there is an all night happy hour of drinks and food. Always a plus.
I realize this goes against the majority of reviews for this restaurant, but my experience left me underwhelmed.  The Kenpachi was sold to us like a salesman sells a car, "This is the only place in FL" and similar statements. It was a $46 dish that tasted like a salty, squashed and seared frozen fish fillet. The veggies were stated as, "from The Land" in Epcot. Who knows if that's true, but they were under cooked. I like them with a bit of crunch but they were more hard than anything. The New York Strip was ordered medium rare and it came well done. Our waiter said it was good that we sent it back because it was a viened piece of meat. This brings me to a different complaint. Why are the people that help us make our order not the ones that bring it to us? As a customer we are left wondering what to do until the waiter has time to check on us.   The lobster tails were not the melt in your mouth that these Nova Scotians expected. Lesson learned, eat lobster where lobster is freshly caught. Now for the good - my husband LOVED the Chilean Sea Bass. The appetizer of Cheese Evolution was fun to try and share. So 2  stars for those dishes. Two dishes were sent back with no apology. They just gave us the opportunity to order something else. It seems like the the expensive restaurant doesn't have to work hard to keep customers.
I recently moved to the area so I have the unfortunate task of trying to find a quality nail salon. I found This place and because of the many positive reviews I gave it a chance. I called 20 minutes before to see if they accepted walk ins and was told by the gentleman who answered the phones they did so I took the drive to the salon. Upon entering it was very dark, maybe because they call themselves a spa it was part of the ambiance. It was not very clean and many of the stations seemed to be crowded with junk. I wanted just a gel polish change but they would only let me do it with a manicure. I had to take it upon myself to find the board that had the gel polish nail colors. And most of them seemed old, definitely not a color selection that's impressing. The guy doing my nails seemed to be in a rush and was not paying attention to what he was doing. My nails were not filed straight and when I pointed it out he got annoyed. Then when buffing my nailed he cut the skin on my fingers. Don't even get me started on my cuticles that are worse now than when he started. I will not be back, and maybe it was just my experience but it was not work the $30 they charge for a crappy "manicure". Look at the other options in the area.
$15 lunch and we are always hungry an hour later!  Good fresh food but PORTIONS ARE SMALL AND IT'S $$$...  Dont' get me wrong....I like cafe at pharr.  I've been to most of the locations around town.  The food is always consistent and fresh but my friends never want to go there because we walk out after a $15 lunch and we are hungry an hour later.  This happens EVERY time.  All the buckhead bettys at the Peachtree Rd location obviously are on a diet and don't care about this....but everyone else does!  I know they do a lot of business at that location but I think the owners would do a lot better at all locations if they either brought the price down a couple bucks or at least gave you 25% more food.  Personally I would be OK with a $15 lunch but I want to feel full afterwards!
Absolutely the best vegan tacos, or any tacos, in town for sure. Huge problem though is the service recently. We've been going here for a long time and always encountered super friendly people, but recently it's been terrible. Really pretty girl with shaved head seems to always be in a bad mood. It's so incredibly off putting. Last time she seemed annoyed that we asked about our order (we were waiting almost an hour and just wanted to check in), and then annoyed that we asked if they would mind refilling the hot sauce because both were empty. Now today, at 11:30am on a Sunday, she was deterring us from ordering saying "it's going to be a long wait, you're better off ordering at Bon vistro". I said that's ok, we'll wait, and she rolled her eyes and seemed annoyed that I still wanted to order tacos. I was so taken back because I don't ever expect someone to act so annoyed with a customer for no reason and especially don't expect them to deter me from ordering. I'm uncomfortable ordering when I see she's working. Huge bummer for such a good food truck. 5 stars for the food but the 2 stars is to alert the owner this is a huge problem. We heard her be rude to multiple people and we saw peoples faces shocked and confused by it as well.
....So, you know when you read Yelp reviews that are terrible, and you say to yourself, "Okay, angry human.  Write your yelp review and take some deep breaths. It's not a big deal." WELL, I've never written a yelp review until this place. Not only haven I physically gone to this place a few times, but I've lazy-lunch ordered with friends through Uber eats from here. Intercom apparently broken in drive-thru. (sat there for about 5 minutes before I reversed and went to the other one, so that review was true) Immediately I noticed the fries had the oddest rotten taste, and chicken CLEARLY wasn't cooked through (and that's saying something for McDonald's). The icing on this cake was when I ordered through uber eats. I ordered three meals with friends, multiple drinks, desserts, and even breakfast for the next morning (to make the uber delivery fee "worth while") When the delivery arrived, the driver said, sorry, this is all they had... and handed be a 10 piece of chicken nuggets. TELL ME THEY DIDNT HAVE FRIES, SODA AND BURGERS LIKE WE ORDERED? bdjsudyisnsjwukdhsjsj
Not upset just disappointed. We waited over an hour for rolls and a few apps. The fish and soy sauce had little flavor and the rolls were very very small. Left hungry and sad :(
Don't waste your time stopping.  They don't have what they advertise, and don't answer the call button.
Trendy atmosphere, and if this was just a cocktail bar I'd give it five stars. Unfortunately the food menu sounds amazing but was just so so dull. We'll definitely come back for drinks but that's it.  Drinks: Juniper - Delicious. Strawberry Fields - Super interesting and addictive!  Appetizers: Patatas - Pretty tasty.  Entrees: Duck - The duck was well prepared, and each ingredient tasted delicious but somehow they never actually combined into a proper flavourful meal.  Bison - It was heartbreaking how bland it was. Absolutely nothing wrong with it, but it was literally just meat and corn. Maybe if they had enough puree to use as a dipping sauce it would have been better.
Went last night at 5:30 with 2 friends. We each ordered separately and we're lucky to find a table.  My order arrived at 5:50, barely warm. The next order was delivered around 6:00, after inquiring with a server at 6:15, the order was delivered at 6:25.  There were also numerous tables also waiting for food, some went to the counter and asked for refunds.  Even though the store has only been open fora week, corporate should have at least some experienced staff from other locations to ensure a successful opening week.  Not related to the bad service, one of the windows was boarded up,.  Never again.
I'd like to update you all on my situation below with my "rebate".  I went back into the store and spoke to yet another store associate, Kevin, who informed me that the sales associate I had originally dealt with was no longer with the company.  From there he called some sort of manager who told me, sorry you have to keep the gift cards we gave you.  UNACCEPTABLE.  I was told it was a rebate. Actual money not gift cards to home depot.  From there Kevin called a regional manager who finally agreed to refund my credit card the $300.  Sound great right?  WRONG!  That was almost two weeks ago. No refund. and now I can't even find Kevin - isn't that convenient.  Sorry Sleepy's but I am NOT giving up. You owe me $300.  I am now filing a complaint with the Better Business Bureau. Hopefully that will get me a response...or maybe I can find Kevin...anyone know Kevin???
Ummm.... Awful all around!  Please save your money and go somewhere else.  Service is the worst.  And you will be waiting forever.  Seriously,  plenty of other places around Disney that will take your money!
Overpriced and too much frufru... Very noisy and not a good selection for lunch. Too expensive and over spiced. Tried four tomes nut still disappointed. Seasons 52 much better!!
I rented a car for 2 weeks while my car was being repaired. The driver picked me up at the mechanic and on our way back to get the rental car he drove over a curb! The car they gave me had a caution light on. I needed to return it in 4 days because the windshield wipers didn't work and it was raining out. They gave me another car with a caution light warning that something needed to be done with the car. Three days later another caution light went on and I needed to return the car. The newest car was filthy inside. I would need to clean the entire inside since it was covered in pollen. I immediately returned it to get another car that smelled like smoke. Wow!! Take care of your cars and have respect for your customers. Give them a CLEAN CAR! Take the time to clean the windshield as if you were going to be driving it!!!
Like everyone else, I went to The Eye Studio because of all of the wonderful Yelp reviews.  Plus, it was close to work, and I'm a sucker for convenience.  I went to Dr. Tsai for about 18 months for a dry eye situation that I notice the most when I wake up around 3 a.m.  She had me wear my contacts less and less, go on steroid drops, Omega 3 pills, twice daily eyelid washes, warm eye compresses and what I felt were rather regular appointments.  None of it helped.  I still wake up in the middle of the night with eyes that feel like sandpaper.    It was the same every appointment.  I'd explain what I was experiencing to Dr. Tsai.  She'd tell me that my dry eyes were related to wearing contacts.  I'd share the fact that I first noticed the dry eye problem when I wore contacts once or twice a year - usually for weddings.  She'd recommend that I wear my contacts less.  This happened three or four times until I realized that Dr. Tsai wasn't actually listening to me.  She had committed to a specific course of treatment, and there was nothing I could say to change it.  Two weeks later I went in for my annual eye exam.  After the exam, Dr. Tsai launched into a lecture all about the long-term ramifications of dry eye, and how I needed to address my condition - soon.  I had to stop her midsentence and ask if the issue was really that much worse than two weeks earlier when she told me that it was manageable.  That's when I realized something.  She hadn't bothered to read my patient file before the exam.   I get it.  She sees lots of other patients.  I could have been any one of the hundreds, which is why I have a patient file that holds the details specific to me and my desert like eyes.  To add insult to injury, I continued to work with Dr. Tsai and her staff while trying to find a new contact lense brand.  On the surface they give the impression that they want to help, but it resulted in a snarky e-mail from a patient care coordinator and the longest two months of my life.    That's right - option one was a bust and not even the brand I had requested.  It took them over a week to even order option two.  Then Dr. Tsai tried to feed me a line about how it could take my eyes over two weeks to adjust to a new prescription.   It turned out that I didn't need to work through the headaches while my eyes adjusted.  The contacts had been ordered with the wrong prescription - specifically the wrong axis.    Dr. Tsai gave me a song and dance about how each contact brand is different from the last.  She told me not to worry. We'd keep at it until we found the right pair.  By my next appointment, she had ordered the right axis for option two and ordered a third brand.  Neither of which worked for me.  Then she told me that we could continue to work on this, but I'd need to pay another contact fitting fee of close to $100.  Yes, I'm demanding.  If I'm wearing corrective lenses, I'd like to see clearly.  Yes, she ordered four pairs of contacts for me - three different brands.  I had specifically asked for one brand, but it wasn't ordered until option two.  At that point, someone ordered the wrong prescription.    I will only take responsibility for two pairs of contacts.  The other two are squarely on Dr. Tsai and her staff.   After all of this, I still don't have a current contact prescription.  And, I'm officially done with The Eye Studio.
I found this place to be a little pompous. The food is pretty good, but the attitude is not. The crowd seems to be the type that aren't really interested in anything other than themselves. If your looking for a nice place to have a cocktail with a few friends, then this place is fine. A very gay friendly venue.
I was really disappointed with this place. I had expected better! The karaoke is extremely loud and wasn't enjoyable. You basically pay the cover to hear crappy music. If you want to go upstairs you have to pay another cover. The music upstairs had a throwback kind of feel. The drinks were cheap but there wasn't anything special about them. I ordered a scorpion bowl to share as everyone else did and it was alright. The highlight of the night was the  $1 chicken skewers brought by the "chicken man". If you're drunk, they taste great but now that I am sober I don't think I would eat those again considering he walks around with a bowl of chicken and walks around the place.
Really disappointed here when I dropped by for lunch. Looking back I don't think there is one positive thing I can say about this place based upon my experience.  It went south right away when we found ourselves waiting five minutes at the hostess stand to be seated. When she finally did appear, there was no apology or explanation offered. The place looked to be about half full but perhaps they were short staffed?  We did get our drinks ordered and delivered quickly (ok one good thing) but from there it took 50 minutes for us to get our food ordered and out from the kitchen. I went with the sliders and my table mates both got the grouper sandwich.   My sliders arrived luke warm at best, had stale buns, were overcooked and lack any flavor. As a side, I picked homemade chips that were cold, not crispy and again not really tasty. At this point, we were late to get back from lunch or I would have sent everything back.   Service was spotty throughout with my water glass going empty on two occasions and no real feedback on why things were so slow.  Sorry to say you can do much better than here and this will be a land soon forgotten.
Has this place deteriorated? I've gone twice in the last few weeks and both times they have been out of the Scali bread for the sandwiches and a few weeks ago they had run out of ketchup (yes ketchup). Seriously, have an employee run over to Shaws and grab some ketchup. The pizza has also been undercooked lately though it's good if you ask for it well-done. However my husband and I have been so disappointed the last few times we've gone (we actually cancelled our order tonight because again they were out of the bread), that I'm dropping a star.
Terrible customer service. We ordered 18 wings on a Tuesday night. After waiting an hour and a half we called the store and the manager said that the delivery was almost to our house and that he'd give us a $5 off coupon for THE NEXT ORDER. After another 20 minutes, we got a call from the delivery guy asking for directions to our house because he couldn't find it on GPS. We've ordered wings multiple times from local restaurants and have never had trouble like this. I called to find out where our driver was again...then was hung up on. We're at the 2 hour mark and we still haven't gotten a delivery- I'll never order from this company again.  The fact that a "$5 off next order" coupon was offered was a joke. There's no way they're getting my business again.
Calamari was over cooked.  The pizza for $11 was a disappointment to say the least.
Drinks are expensive, not worth the free ticket for the country concert my gf and I went to.  I also left my fitbit there, called their messaging service two different times and never received a call back as I was told I would receive.  very poor customer service.
I had been to Finz this summer with my brothers and had the most amazing salmon dish. I'm talking drool worthy best-meal-I've-ever-had dish. So when it came time for my 30th birthday dinner that's obviously what I wanted. I'd literally been dreaming about this salmon! If I were to base this review on that experience it'd be a 5 star, hands down.  The restaurant wasn't very busy so we were seated right away. Our waitress was very attentive but things came out horribly slow. We got apps and drinks and were done with our appetizers and waited at least 10-15 more minutes before our meals came out. Slow to the point where I thought maybe our meals had been forgotten about. I ordered another drink and by the time I got it I didn't want it anymore slow.  The food came out and it didn't look quite as I remembered. It didn't taste quite as I remembered. In fact, it was pretty disappointing.   Maybe it was because they had a rehearsal dinner going on, but I was not satisfied at all.  The service was slow, the food was disappointing, the overall experience just left a bad taste in my mouth (no pun intended). It was really too bad because I had talked this place up to everyone and I left crestfallen.
My best friend was in town and we decided to try this cafe because there are great reviews. It wasn't busy when I arrived with my friend, and when we walked in, there was no one at the hostess stand. We stood there for a few minutes before the hostess walked up, and just looked at us until we spoke up that we needed a table for two. She told us that if we sit at the bar, the food is 20% off and when we nodded, she said "seat yourself" in a rude and unwelcoming manner. She failed to smile at us or make us feel welcome throughout this exchange.   We found seats at the bar, and the bartender was nice to us, although she took a while to acknowledge us and bring us hot sauce when we asked for it. I ordered the steak and Migas Benedict and my friend ordered the crab cake Benedict. Our food was cold for the most part. When we finished eating, we sat for over 20 minutes waiting to be acknowledged.  The bartender failed to even glance at us and she made herself busy acknowledging everyone else who came up to the bar and completed drink orders. If anything, it felt like she was avoiding us. I understand that it may be understaffed but it takes two seconds to ask how everything is going.   After waiting, she finally said "I'll be right with you."  It took her another 5 minutes to be "right with us." She then proceeded to print the check without asking us if we wanted anything else, which to us made it seem like we were being kicked out, feeling even more unwelcome than before.   The food was mediocre for the price that we paid. For a nice and pricey cafe, the staff was very rude. I could have very well spent my money elsewhere that is even busier but still receive superb service.   Would I recommend this place to anyone? Not at all.   *** my friend is also a waitress, so we were being generous with our expectations and even with our tip.***
Just called to get a price quote and talk about unfriendly. I'm sorry am I bothering you by asking questions? I told her no thank you I could tell by her unfriendly and put out attitude that I wanted nothing to do with them.
Expensive pizza that's not very good. Better options nearby.  One large pizza was almost $18. The dough they use is very airy, maybe it's just personal preference but it's way too light, so not only is it expensive but it doesn't even fill you up. My BBQ chic pizza was also light on the toppings. For $14 you can get a way better pizza down the street at Johnnie's.
Super noisy in the afternoon, all the inconsiderate kids come in after school and scream and yell and horse around.  I feel bad for the employees because there is nothing they can do to stop it.  That's when all the adults that actually spend money there get up and leave.   There are better local coffee shops in Marblehead without the chaos.
This has never been my ideal spot to get ice cream but it's most confident due to where I work. Anyways, every time I go in I get attitude from the workers. However the most recent trip in proved it could get worse. We were served by a worker who started about a month or so ago, I have seen her a few times but never been helped by her. She would always run to the back as soon as customers came in. But this time when the other workers were busy and she had to step forward and actually do customer service like her job describes, she did a very poor job of it. She said her name is Hannah. She has blue hair, a lip ring, and gauged ears if that helps describe her. She was rather soft spoken and when I asked her to speak up a bit so I could hear better she suddenly gave me attitude at my request. So the whole process of dishing up my ice cream was far from pleasant. I then proceeded to ask a question regarding other workers and she snapped at me to "JUST HAVE A GOOD DAY" and stormed off to the back. Extremely rude. Apparently she has done something similar to a friend's friend of mine. She seems to have the lack of decent people skills, and lack of work effort. I am sorry but people who act like this should not be working in a place that caters to customers directly. Personally I do not see how she got this job as she is rude and unprofessional.
Waitress wonderful personality, but service was slow. Ordered blackened mahi sandwich which had absolutely no taste the fries had more taste than fish. The other guests with me were also unhappy with their food. Nice atmosphere, but expensive for quality of food. Will not return
Over priced pretentious food....waiter actually stood at our table and read the menu to us.....uh, ok...thanks but we can read. Waste of time and money.
What has happened here?   ARROGANT, almost dismissive owner and hostess.   Service was matter of fact.   Food was much better on previous 5 or 6 visits but acceptable.    I think its time to hyper-freshen or just  retire this no-longer-Nuevo factory.     Not going to wait for an attitude adjustment in this restaurant buzzing city.    No longer on my recommendation list.
If I could give 0 stars, i would. The only IPA they have is nitro only. This would be great if I liked flat beer. We keep trying to like this place, but had to walk out before we could even think about ordering food because the beer is so pathetic. Please, Westerville, realize that people like IPA.
So loud! Nice staff. Mediocre food. Overpriced. Won't go back. So much better food in the Easton area.
Sitting at the table as I writing this. It is Disney not known for there food but I'm just disgusted that they would charge the prices they do an not make an attempt to serve better food. It was frozen no taste  garbage.
Walked in with my boyfriend and waited to be seated. The restaurant was small enough that every server saw us walk in and ignored us. One server walked by us to bus a table and said nothing about whether or not someone would be able to help us. The bartender walked by and said nothing. Then all of the workers held a pow wow and glanced over at us and kept talking. In the corner, we saw a couple who had been sat ,with empty glasses and menus in front of them, looking around for their waiter. They had similar looks of frustration. Figured if we had this much trouble getting a table, we'd probably have as much trouble actually getting our order taken. Disappointed that I couldn't get my ramen fix in but luckily, Rain was a couple feet away and more than willing to seat and serve us in a reasonable amount of time.
The great thing about this place is that there is a high def TV at nearly every table.  That about covers the highlights though.  The food is average to slightly below average.  It is just very bland.  Nothing remotely stands out about it.  The service is lacking.  And you can't blame it on crowds b/c when I did go there were only a few other tables being serviced, yet the wait staff was still terrible.  For having all the televisions and a promising atmosphere this place is just like it's food; VERY BLAND.  Not good, not bad.  If all the other sports bars are to crowded and you really want to see a game out somewhere than consider going here.  Otherwise there are to many better alternatives in town to be wasting your time at Daddy's Grill & Bar.
What we loved about Hopdoddy: - Alex, our server. She was extremely attentive and friendly. - Atmosphere. It was hip enough for SoCo or any large urban city. - Beer Selection. A refined selection of micro brews. - Chipolte Catsup. Home made goodness, not too sweet just the right amount of heat. - Chile Cheese. We used it for a dipping sauce for our burgers... YUM. - Camaraderie of our fellow diners waiting in the "40 min" queue. It was fun to strike up a conversation about how this dining experience was starting to feel like an "E" ticket ride at Disney - there is something GREAT at the of this line and we will be reward for our patiences.  We really wanted to like our whole dining experience at Hopdoddy but the burgers unfortunately were dry and the accompanying veggies did not maintain their expected crispness. The queuing concept a la "Fuddruckers" could have been more effective if there were more than 2 smiling faces waiting to take your order. When we arrived this past Saturday night, we told the wait just order our food would be 40 mins, we were steps from the front door (.... and I "know"..... what was I expecting, it is SATURDAY night  for god's sake). Luckily, the queue flows past the bar where you are able pick up drink while waiting.  And so like any good troopers, we made the best of our experience  focusing on the all of the things we enjoy about our evening - chatting it up with the people in the queue, marveling at the creative way an 8 top table could be transformed to accommodate a combination of various sized dining parties by merely moving a panel that resembled a large chalk board establishing a new line of demarcation, the amazing Chile Cheese sauce, and the fact we did try someplace new for dinner.
Took forever to get our bubble tea made and then it was meh at best.  I'm going to guess the froyo experience is better as we were the only ones there getting the bubble tea.
Damn, I dont know what happened here but the waffle style has totally changed. I walked over to Saus from my work in the financial district Saturday night, I had my heart set on the waffle and they have the best sauces. However, what I got wasn't the liege waffle with the crunchy pearl sugar that I'm used to getting but ratjher a thicker smaller version of just a regular waffle. What happened, was it just an off night that one of the workers just threw together a regular waffle or has the style of the waffle totally changed? The sauces were still very good.   Hopefull its just an off night and I can go back and update my review.
Jerk in the grey ponytail tried to tell me I had to accept his offer for all items I wanted to sell as a lump, and he would not give me a separate price for each. So what if I brought in each piece separately ... I couldn't be bothered to argue with the idiot, so he got to see my back...leaving the store with their lost business. I'm giving the books and records away for free to the thrift stores, rather than deal with those jerks.
I had a horrible experience staying at a doubletree several months ago and was given a certificate for one night to give them another try. My experience was worse than the last time! Doubletree apparently has really gone down hill...I will never stay at another Doubletree again.  This particular location is a good walk to downtown where north market and the restaurants are so just be aware when making reservations.  We arrived and the parking situation is not that great, you share a public parking garage and it costs $22 per night with no valet. It's hard to get your luggage to and from the car due to the location of parking. You have to go up to the lobby and then another elevator to the main floors. I could live with that ..the issue was the cleanliness and the service.  The king room was a very nice size but very dated and our room was not clean. Stains on the walls, bathroom was not clean , shower still had hair in it!  The bar in the restaurant is fine, if you are lucky enough to get the good bartender otherwise you have someone that doesn't know the first thing about making a drink. Which leads me to the free breakfast from the restaurant. I was not expecting 5 star dining but again cleanliness and service horrible! The breakfast buffet was laid out with over cooked sausage and bacon, stale bread and bagels, eggs were never brought out. We sat down, lay  our napkins out and were appalled to have hair all over our napkins! As if that wasn't enough that evening our neighbors decided to have a party until 6 AM . We awoke to very loud yelling and laughing, etc. about 3 AM. We called down to the front desk continuously but no one ever did anything about it. These walls must be paper thin because it was as if they were in the same room with us! Sorry, will not be staying here again. I love Hilton properties but I am done with this one!
Service was terrible and the kitchen "forgot" my order, everybody from my table Finnish all the food but my food doesn't come . We won't be back.
We were supposed to have reservations for 4 tonight, having made the reservations days ago.  We received a message this afternoon that there was a problem with their reservations and we no longer had one.  No apology, no accomodation for what plans we had made days ago because something messed up in house.  This is on top of having my brother's birthday there a couple months ago, which my sister-in-law planned with a lot of effort and they screwed up those reservations as well making everyone wait two hours and comping 3 appetizers for the inconvenience.  I had been there when it was Tavern on the Water and clearly the new management is running around with its head cut off not knowing which way is up.  Although a great location, I cannot anticipate trying to go back to this place again.
Picked up a to go order. Literally the worst food we have had in a long time. My pasta was not cooked, they forgot my husbands beans. Just a joke. I called and the manager did refund our money but was so cold on the phone like I was inconveniencing her. We will not be going back to this location ever again.
I go nearly everyday as it is across from where I live. The gates are always left open by non- dog owner visitors and there is always trash everywhere. I'm constantly prying discarded human food (lots of chicken bones) from my pups mouth. It's also very muddy. Please clean this park up and limit the non- dog owner visitors....
This cafe is in a dept store in the park royale. Food is pre-made and heated up. The ambiance is nothing special. They were out of half the menu items listed, and offered no compensation for the fact that we had to order the most expensive thing on the menu because they were out of everything else.
I have never written a review before. But this  place was so horrible that I had to warn others.  We went with a party of 15 people. We had made a reservation. We  got to the restaurant at 6:20. No one came to offer us even menus or water  until  we Had been sitting  for about 35 min.  They had a large party on the other side of the restaurant. They were only paying attention to that side.  There were only two tables with patrons on this side of the restaurant.   There were people / staff standing around doing nothing initially and still did not come to ask us anything.  The music was so terribly loud from the party side  we could not  hear each other nor even converse with the waitress when she finally did come. Most of us developed headaches .We finally ordered and it took over an hour for the kids pasta to even come out. Close to the end we could not wait anymore. The kids were asleep on the bed/seating area. We had to get up and leave Before our dinner even arrived.  The waitress told me to go get some fresh air from outside.  And that the food should be ready soon.  it was 28° and raining, by the way.  Was she out of her mind!  1/2 of us left while the others waited for the food to come still...   My husband  stated that this is the most horrible dining experience has ever had
I purchased 2 hrs of moving services from Move Drs on Jan. 24.  I called Move Drs on March 26 or 27 to schedule my move date of April 6, which was ultimately scheduled for 10:00 am. Move Drs called at 10:20 on April 6 to cancel. Their reason was that they had a fire in their office and when I asked, they reported that they did, in fact, have mover crews and trucks available, but the manager decided to bring the crews in to clean up the office instead of taking care of the appointments that they had already committed to. I certainly hope there were other extenuating circumstances.  It seems like a better choice would have been to hire a cleaning crew and kept the moving crews and trucks working to take care of the customers.      Move Drs also told me twice they would find another company to move me later that same day but I never received either a call from a new mover, nor a follow-up call from Move Drs. All of this was last minute and ended up costing me substantially more in surcharges since I did not have a prior scheduled appointment. . To me, Move Drs views their business as a one-time customer exposure with little attention to any repeat business and cares nothing about service
The same reaction after my third visit: small portion, overpriced, and most significantly, a meh experience.  Today it was the Hash: ground uninspired pork, a few potato cubes, some creme fresh type concoction topped with a fried egg.  It was good, but I expected so much more from such a renowned venue.  My server was very friendly and gave a generous sample of a so-so soup.  ...six spots in a very difficult area for parking.  No more.
I have been going for years the people here are always kind and nice but today there was a colored lady and man behind the counter who were extremely rude and got the order wrong! Further as I walked to get straws leaving my card at the counter the man accused me on not paying before I left ! DD needs to hire better staff or I am never going there again
I would not recommend this place if you are looking for delicious lobster.  The lobsters were chewy like eating rubber.  Over cooked. I spoke with the manager and he was very cordial to me. I asked about how long they were cooking the lobsters.  He advised they were pre cooked.  Then later reheated.  My whole family was disappointed  The manager offered to bring us fresher lobsters but it was all the same.  Very disappointing.  I paid the hefty bill and didn't complain. Our server was very nice and attentive and I tipped her very well.  It's not her fault lobsters are cooked twice!  The rest of the food on the buffet was just ok.   Never again.  Red lobster was fantastic the next night tho!
NEVER AGAIN.  I have lived in Newton for 25 years and every five years or so I get soft and give this place another try.  This will be the last time unless my family decides to hold my wake there as some cruel joke.  They treat the chips and salsa like they are caviar and their customers like they are a worthless commodity.  A friendly waitress could have provided some solace, but alas, we were sorely disappointed there too; can you say "attitude on steroids"?.  The last thing Newton Centre needs is another coffee shop or bank, but someone needs to pave this place over and put the rest of us out of our misery...
I ordered delivery from City Thai through GrubHub.  I was given an estimate of 1-2 hours, which was understandable given that the weather was crappy.  After 2.5 hours I contacted GrubHub to find out where my food was.  If the restaurant needed to cancel because of weather or some other reason, that is one thing, but I heard nothing from them.  GrubHub reached out to the restaurant who said they were starting my order and promised it would be delivered in 25-30 ADDITIONAL minutes.  The restaurant had confirmed this, and I was told they were offering the delivery service directly.  OK, fine, at least I will get to eat dinner, and at this point it's too late to order delivery or pickup anywhere else.  At 3.5 hours, I contacted them again and subsequently received an email saying the order was cancelled because it was after 9:00, and the restaurant was closed.  I realize the GrubHub shares the blame here, but this is abysmal customer service from City Thai.  It is honestly inexcusable.  It is one thing to need to cancel an order because of weather, or driver issues, etc, but to provide (sparse) updates confirming that the order will be delivered and then simply close is un-freaking-believable.  There are plenty of other decent Thai places in Portland, please don't waste your time with this one.
I was not happy with my service. I got a pedicure and a shellac manicure.   First off, I hate that you ask them a question and they have people who don't know English. I get it, most nail salons are like that but it makes me question if they are even licensed to be doing my nails. The language barrier leaves a lot of room for misunderstandings.  Secondly, they were in a rush to leave so they did my manicure and pedicure simultaneously which was uncomfortable because they were trying to twist my body in uncomfortable ways. The lady doing my manicure was skipping steps (. I'm a licensed cosmetologist so I know how manicures are supposed to be done) she also couldn't understand my English when I politely corrected her. She was standing I front of the tv the whole time so I had no choice but to stare off into space. At one point the staff we're arguing with each other which made me very uneasy as I'm trying to relax. The straw that broke the camels back was when the manicurist was trying to rinse my hands in the water my feet had been soaking in. She didn't speak or give me direction, she just pulled my hands rather aggressively down towards my feet and cause me to accidentally kick my legs forward. My left fiit, which was submerged in the water, banged against the tub. My right root was getting worked on by the guy doing my pedicure and caused me to kick him. It was very awkward and embarrassing. I even passed gas. The other clients were staring because of the yelp I made when my toe got banged. Two days later, my toe has finally stopped throbbing.  It was not pleasant and it took them way too long to finish everything since they wasted so much time being in each other's way and arguing.  In the end I must say the older gentleman who did my pedicure was very polite and did an excellent job manicuring my feet from start to finish. I just wish his English was better.  The lady manicurist was horrible, impatient, messy and clearly didn't go to nail school.  What a waste of $50.
Today was my first and last time here, this places sucked! They offer "complimentary mimosas" which we never got to see or taste. After numerous reminder about our drinks they kept telling us glasses were been cleaned up, then we asked again and she forgot. Then nada, we asked again then she tells us they ran out of mimosas after we waited over 30-45 mins. Next time we noticed that people that just got there were been served mimosas, wtf? Then she said I was told we were out let me check again, at that point we did not care as we were leaving. Wait time awful, service not all that great and the food wasn't all that to like make up for it. Then we asked for a manager, we were told there wasn't one... We asked who the owner was, she said she didn't know his name since she was knew... Speechless! Save your time and $ and don't go there.
WHERE DO I START? We brought the kids here for their first time, got there around 9:30 for a 10:00 opening and was glad when they opened early. However, it quickly went downhill from there. Once we were in the park, we got in line for Manta and were disappointed when the ride shut down for "technical difficulties." That lasted for about 25 minutes or so and many people left. Once operational, the ride itself was okay, but actually too slow for my liking. We then proceeded to try some other rides (they only have four roller coasters) and when I say that EVERY SINGLE ONE had an issue, I am not exaggerating! Kraken and Journey to Atlantis were both also experiencing technical difficulties, and Mako was temporarily shut down (when we were next in line) for an unexplained weather event as it was not raining, thundering, or lightning!!! Dark clouds should not shut down rides! Anyway....  At Journey, we'd just gotten our locker that the attendant told us we needed and when we came back he rudely told us and others that the ride had shut down and to go see guest services if you have an issue with getting money back for your locker as someone inquired. The bright side here is that we basically walked right up to everything as it was not crowded at all, which I may now understand why not. We left Journey to ride Kraken which was the best ride they have so we were able to ride it back to back as NO ONE was there! By the time we got back to Journey, it was fixed. One thing we didn't like about it was all the signage warning you that something was about to happen. No surprises here like it used to be! It kinda took the fun out of the ride.  On a positive note, we saw the Dolphin and Sea Lion shows which were pretty good and all of the aquariums and animal encounter exhibits were well done. I personally loved Antarctica and the penguins and how they let us ride into their habitat. That was really cool.   Lastly, the park closed at 6 PM but they started shutting stuff down (stores, carts, etc) at 5 PM to try to usher you out of the park. An employee told us this when we asked why it was already such a ghost town. I have been to many, many, theme parks and have never seen anything like it. To sum it all up, my teenager described it as a broken down Six Flags, but way worse. Save your money and go somewhere else!
This is just a bar now with sports TV, so do not expect any tapas: they need to change their name! The Malbec is still wonderful, but all they have are Olives or Carmelized Walnuts to go with it. Nice area of the terminal to sit in but nothing to recommend this place in particular...
Pros: Shoutout to the receptionists and shampoo lad--they were super friendly and great.  Cons: Yvonne had cut my bangs for me before, but this was my first full cut with her. Given her experience, I expected her to have stronger instincts about cutting/what would be flattering for my face and hair type (thick, wavy). Even after a recut a few days later, she just didn't get the whole weight/angles/shape thing right for me.  I also didn't feel very valued or respected. On top of the unflattering cuts, Yvonne didn't even ask my name until the shampoo lad came over to watch, and then, at my recut appointment, I learned that she thought I was unemployed (after we'd talked of my full-time job... twice).
Over priced and over rated, just like VooDoo.  If you're trendy and have more dollars than sense, this is your kind of place.
This hotel was dirty, the pool had zero chlorine, the pools had a lot of hair, the rooms are dated, the sending machines had warm drinks, and the vacation rental program borders on hostile bullying.
I'm not a fan of reviews that just rant unhappily... But this experience must be shared.  Yesterday a fellow yelper and I went to Hyde Park for a early afternoon margarita. (We're grad students and it's the end of the semester. It's a necessary thing.) Anyway, the first glaring if not unforgivable slip up was when the waiter reversed our mango and lime margaritas, even after insisting that he was giving them to us the right way around. (It took us the entire time we were their to figure this out. We both just thought ours tasted funny. Grad school has rotted our brains.)  The unforgivable part of the experience came next. A couple of young college students were seated next to us. They ordered fries and were brought waters. My friend was in the middle of venting about a particularly frustrating experience but I was suddenly somewhat distracted by the way the couple next to us was acting about their waters.   "Is that a shrimp?" I heard them ask.  The waiter came by, apologized briefly and took the waters away. We talked to our mortified fellow diners and found out there was a cockroach in one of their waters! A big one at that-- We could see the shadow of it from our table!  But it wasn't only the presence of the cockroach or the fact that the waiter somehow didn't notice it. Ultimately, I was horrified and repulsed by the way the waiter handled the situation. There were no massive apologies or offers to comp the meal. No manager swooped in and said he'd make it right.  Instead, the waiter went back and got the couple new waters. Directly from the ice bin this time, he said. He apologized briefly again and that was it.   The couple, thoroughly mortified, left. We quickly finished our margaritas and went on to Julio's down the street for our second...
TERRIBLE service. Cranky bartenders. Mediocre food, at best. So many better sushi options in Quincy. I wouldn't waste your money or time. Fried apps were super oily and bland and sushi was not fresh.
Very underwhelming. I ordered the quinoa bowl with tofu and had a hard time swallowing it down. Worst vegetarian food I've had in a very long time ( if ever).  The "marinated tofu" was not marinated -it clearly was firm tofu chopped up and maybe microwaved (super gross) the beets had to have been grated days ago because they were super dry and unpalatable and the sauce that was dumped all over everything in the weird mix of food tasted like some generic dressing from a bottle. This quinoa bowl would scare anyone away from being vegetarian if it was the first vegetarian dish that they ever had.   Additionally, the dish was a pretty small portion for 11 dollars worth of stale vegetables and plain chopped up tofu cubes (yuck).  The weird textures and unpleasant flavours make me wonder about the other dishes on the menu.  In Vancouver you generally expect way more than that monstrosity. Obviously I won't be going back here ever. The best thing (the only good thing) about my experience at this café was the server on staff who was very nice and professional. This review definitely doesn't reflect the lady that helped me.
The wings were soggy, as repeated in countless previous reviews. They did however fix my order quickly.  I got the Thai chili 8 piece... The wings are a good size but not steroid injected!
Is this business, still in business? I've called and left a message twice and they don't call back.
Very mediocre. The Yumm sauce was whatever and the prices were not that great. I ordered the "Original" and there was nothing original about it...Just a bunch of salty rice in a bowl with avocado, tomato and beans. Meh. Next time in in a pinch for lunch I'll walk to one of the better, cheaper food carts up or down a few blocks.
Breakfast cook was coughing into his hand & rubbing his nose, then handling customer's food.  WTF?!  We couldn't get out of here fast enough... too bad we had already ordered by the time we noticed.  Our waitress was pleasant and attentive, so we didn't want to cause a scene, but we felt like chumps for actually paying for this meal which we were far too disgusted to eat.  Needless to say we won't be going back. Ever.   Other reviews rave over this place, they must have low standards or they were oblivious to the nasty things going on here.  Do yourself a favor and find another place to eat.
Run by a bunch of bigots. Go to pollo tropical ... Or hell go to KFC. Anybody that sells white meat will have better food to digest than what this joint serves up with their discriminatory marinade.
This probably the worst car rental place to get a car. I booked my car through Expedia and got this car company be careful they have a policy that states that there are no early returns. So if you book for 7 days and you only say stay for 4 days they will still charge for the full 7 days. Also make sure to hold on to your card before I agreed to anything the lady charged my card before I had agreed to anything when I said I didn't want the car she said it was to late and that they would still charge me the full amount. So I was stuck with a car I didn't want and there was no manger on site to sort the matter out. Whatever you do do not use this company they also go by NU car rentals
Awful lunch special. I ordered the Orange chicken and the sauce was a scary, artificial color and the chicken was so heavily breaded that I couldn't taste the chicken plus the fried rice tasted like the oil was bad or super old. Even my 75 year old father who thrives on "bad" Chinese food said it tasted bad. LOL!
I know they aren't trying to be Texas de Brazil, but that is the standard.  The service was GREAT!!!  However, the meats were dry and sometimes inedible.  Dinner may be better, but we went for lunch.
Decent food, horrible service.  I picked up some takeout from Aloha Grill tonight. Among all of my family's dinner was a few orders of "Chicken Katsu", a breaded and fried chicken cutlet with tonkatsu sauce. Upon getting home, I was astonished to find that our chicken katsu orders were merely chicken; no sauce had been included.   Frustrated, I drove back to the restaurant to get the rest of my dinner. After waiting awkwardly for a number of minutes, I asked for the containers of sauce to accompany the rest of our dinner. Instead of receiving an apology for the omission of the katsu sauce, it was explained that "some customers don't like it", so it wasn't included, even as a side.  How a Hawaiian restaurant comes to the conclusion that Chicken Katsu is best served sans-katsu is beyond me. Needless to say, I won't be back.
The one star is not for their food. I ordered a laffa shawarma and it's solid. The one star is for their horribly rude service.   I was picking up my boyfriend from KSM last night (Mar 17), walked in close to 8:30p not expecting any of the food stalls to be opened. The lights were still on at Yalla, three behind the counter, with two prepping food for a customer and one woman  standing behind the cashier. There was no sign of closing down/wrapping up/adding up receipts, etc. I asked if they were still open and she said yes. When ordering, I asked her if the shawarma has lamb as it's not specified on the menu, she was curt and said chicken. I told her i want hummus in the wrap and she rudely told me I needed to move down the line and to tell that to the second server when there's no one waiting behind me. The second server (woman) gave me a blank look and proceeded to ask me whether I want each of the ingredients in front of her one by one (now I get why the service is so painfully slow per other reviewers). There's no list of those items on the menu or anywhere visible to the customer when ordering (that I can see). It was my first time at Yalla so I wasn't familiar with what they have. KSM is an open space so when it's not packed, there's echo. The girl was very soft-spoken so i had to ask her to repeat and speak louder when she asked me those questions. She got more annoyed and rude to a point that I just want to walk away. I actually wasn't the last customer, they took orders from two other after me.  Point of the story is, I understand that it's end of the day and you were supposed to close at 8:30p, that was why I asked if you guys were still open. The second you said yes, you had committed to deliver. If you were going to be rude and act annoyed (i'm actually making a generous assumption here that the two women were rude because it's end of day and it's not because of their personalities), then don't say yes; apologize and said you were closing, I would have come back next time I am at KSM. BUT, with this experience I will NEVER buy from Yalla again.
i removed a previously written review in light of the fact that i recieved an email from a rouge employee apologizing for my experience which was nice and very proffesional.   However i still do not suggest rouge as a place to go if you are fair skinned and are looking for a natural look. 50 dollars to get your makeup applied when the girl doesnt even listen to what you really want is unfair. It seems like alot of the people on here have had a good experience however i dont know what type of makeup they wear. Most people that go to get their makeup done want to look very done up. otherwise why not just do it at home. I guess if u are doing wedding makeup (although id really like to see an example of nautural makeup done for a wedding...maybe you guys could post some pics on your websites of a few different skin types.) then its an ok place to go. ALL i was saying is when i ask for no foundation and just coverup on any redness and undereye circles and just blush and mascara...DONT insist and then without my permission draw on pinup like eyebrows and a cateye as thick as my pinky finger. I just felt like i had no say in what i wanted and for 50 dollars i should be able to get whatever i want. Maybe the girl who did my makeup doesnt work there anymore as it seems the owners take their trade very seriously. In no way was i saying anyone was mean or unproffesional but being in the nursing field i know that the patient/customer is always right so if i am paying for you to do my makeup and u have every color and everytype of palate to work with why not take the time to make sure your customers are happy. I was completley rushed through my appointment. i am a very nice patient person but i left there soooo dissapointed in a place that had me sooo excited to go to.Its very pretty and clean in there. Just saying be careful if u are a light makeup person and just make sure u speak up and say what u want and hopefully youl have a better experience than i did.
It's Walmart.  What do you think happens here?  It starts out looking like a decent store and then deteriorates into trash.  This is how it worked in my hometown.  Then there's the fact they won't pay their employees well or offer decent benefits.  Or punish them for voting the 'wrong way'.  Why would anyone spend their money here?
This was my first and likely my last visit. I have always heard good things. The pizza was ok. I ordered pepperoni and mushroom. I never found a mushroom. My grand daughter ordered the chicken parm sub it was awful! The chicken tasted like smoke. Pizza was hot that is why it isn't one star.
I was really looking forward to dine at this pub, but was greeted by a cold waitress who passed my guest an I three times without sitting us. It seems like all the staff there was rude and didn't place importance in good service to the clients.
Terrible.  The Oreo Cheesecake LOOKED amazing and it was my fiancées dessert of choice unfortunately.  The cheesecake tasted so much like lemon it was absolutely pitiful.  I went back and asked the girl at the counter if our $5+ piece of cheesecake was supposed to be lemon and she said that it was supposed to taste as such.  I promptly let her know they should let folks know their cheesecake is lemon flavored before they waste over $5 on it and toss it in the trash.  Worst cheesecake I've ever had.  Horrible customer service.  DO NOT TRY THEIR CHEESECAKE!
We've gone to this location a number of times, and our experience has been similar to that of other reviewers: we keep going back because of the usual quality of the Bojangle's product and because this location is right around the corner. But the service, as others have noted, is consistently disappointing.   Last Sunday was a new low. We ordered chicken and sides at the drive-thru window. We were told they were out of chicken, and it would be a 15-min wait while they fried some more. A fried chicken place out of fried chicken? Really? How does this happen? The woman at the drive-thru window got snippy when I expressed the view that 15 minutes wasn't very fast for "fast food." "We fry chicken every 15 minutes," we were told. So, when someone sees that you're running low on your primary product, rather than getting ready to replenish the stock, you wait until the clock says it's time?   I can tolerate a degree of rudeness. I can tolerate some level of incompetence. But the combination of rudeness and incompetence not even the promise of quality product (when available) can make up for.
Ambiance and decor - excellent.  4 TV's above the bar.  Great for beers and bar atmosphere.  Sandwiches - good, but limited selection.  Soft pretzel was terrific.  Prosciutto di Parma - prosciutto was chewy, and balsamic was nonexistent.  Soups are fair.  Service needed quite a bit of training to be quality.  Granted they've been open two weeks, but you want to inspire return customers and word of mouth early.  Other suggestion - coat hooks.   Lots of coats on open chairs where you you'd like paying customers to be.  I'd be back for a beer, but value is lacking on the food side.  Either price comes down 20% or quality increases substantially - both on the menu and service.  I'll pay a lot for great food, and unfortunately the value proposition was mismatched.  Lots of potential, and good idea for the location, but needs work on food and service quality to be great.
This place used to be one of the best deals and burger places in Vancouver: the burgers are piled with delicious toppings, with great tasting meat and nice bread, for $11-14. We used to go here as a group almost every week and have tried most of their burgers on the menu, but the last three visits the burger toppings have tasted, well, greasy and we've left feeling gross. I don't think we'll be going back anymore.  (This review has been edited from 5 stars that I gave it last year... shows you just how bad it's gotten!)
Saturday before noon counters were clean and only one flavor donut left. The maple bacon. Grabbed from the tray under the counter. Nothing special and over priced. A swarm of people walked in after me and walked right back out or bought coffee. Disappointment
Worst service ever!!! She has u waiting for 3+ hours.. have you thinking you're next, then waits til the  LAST minute to tell you, "oh somebody in front of you" & YOU COULDNT FUCKING TELL ME THAT SHIT WHILE I WAS WAITING FOR GOT DAMN 4 hours??? ! DONT GO HERE!!!
My friend and I  just left a horrifying meal at this restaurant. When they cleared our plates there was maggot that was on the table that must have been on the bottom of the plate. The manager laughed when we told him about it and said it maybe came on the lettuce for the burger.  When I asked for contact information for the owner the manager told me to leave the restaurant and not to return. I recommend avoiding this unclean restaurant at all costs. I am  notifying the board of health for the area.
I'm not really sure why this place was so crowded on the Tuesday night we were there.   I got there earlier than my brother and sister-in-law and decided to try a mix drink since the other yelpers had mixed experiences about them. I spent that $10 for you, readers. And didn't finish my watery dark and stormy (was there actually alcohol in it? I couldn't really tell). I was seated at a corner table downstairs, underneath an overhang. My brother only bumped his head on the ceiling once or twice, and the protruding corner after one beer. The beer list was decent (saving grace?).  We split the fries with truffle oil for the appetizer, I had the tuna salad, sister-in-law had another salad, and Bro had the much hyped lobster mac n'cheese. Hm.   The fries were hot, that's always nice. I could *kind of* taste the truffle oil, I guess it was a nice little addition to the fairly run-of-the mill fries, but that's pretty much all I can say about it. This might be a nice thing to get if you're just there for a drink or two (get beer or wine for yourself, seriously, avoid the mix drinks) and want something greasy to go along with it.   The salads were decent but overdressed--the lettuce on mine was good lettuce but I couldn't taste it because of all of the oil! The tuna was done really well, though, by really well I mean almost completely rare, which is how I roll with tuna steak. Maybe a straight up tuna steak would be good at this place, I'll never know.   Ok, on to the Mac N'Cheese. Seriously guys? All those people who raved about this stuff--do you really like the cheese to pool at the bottom of the bowl rather than being thick enough to be included in each bite of the food?? The taste was decent (I mean, cheesy lobster is really tough to eff up) but I thought the consistency was pretty nasty. The thin creamy cheese didn't make sense in a signature dish, and my brother started to wonder if he even likes mac n'cheese at all after how bummed he was about his meal. Trust me Bro, let's go to Zaftigs and get some real mac n'cheese before you make up your mind on that one.  I don't plan to go back to this place. I liked the art, but there were so many older people there, it was a little weird to chill out with a bunch of septuagenarians in front of photos of half naked women.
The pizza was mediocre and the service was awful. Our drinks were never refilled and we were waiting a solid 15 minutes for the check and another 10 to cash out. Thanks but no thanks.
I went last night with a very large group (20+) and we were seated at a long high top table. It was my first time there and it was a cool looking venue with a lot of activities, large parking lot, well lit, and we planned to make a night of it but the dinner went so badly we didn't bother. After ordering at 6:30, the food came out in very separate waves starting at 7:30 so no one ate at the same time. My pizza never came out despite following up with the waitress each time we saw her (which was only about 4 times in the 3 hours). We finally chased down a manager to find our checks and she said she would do me a favor and remove the pizza. I pointed out I had never received a pizza and she told me I had. The entire interaction was baffling. It took about another half an hour to get a check for the one drink I had, which the manager then decided to comp. They did also offer a free play card, which I declined as I needed to leave and eat, and didn't care to ever return. I really wanted my 3 hours back more than the free drink or arcade time. I was utterly starving at that point so I left and went to the Chipotle up the street, 3 hours after I had sat down to eat at Main Event. The people who did receive their food enjoyed it despite the wait, and I do appreciate that they comped my drink (and, I guess, my pizza I forgot to remember eating).
Came upon this place and decided to try it out while waiting for take out at the restaurant next door. Inside was pretty grungy. The staff weren't too welcoming - I actually felt out of place. They charge $2 extra for a to go jar. Ordered the red smoothie, which had a strong cinnamon taste and was quite watery. The wait seemed pretty long considering we were the only ones ordering. Nothing special and don't have a desire to return. As much as I admire the idea of zero waste, the menu was overpriced and my first impression was not good.
We ordered after seeing it on grub hub and the food was very disappointing and made with low quality meats similar to low grade pre packaged deli style. They got here quickly though, so that's one good thing.
I ordered Primetime which cost around $13 with the hope to eat something great. The burger was very small and the meat did not have any special taste. I think it is fine but Not Worth the money that you pay
The food is very bland tasting. Had oxtail and it had no seasoning. Ask for a fruit punch and they looked at me like I had 2 heads...What Jamaican restaurant doesn't have fruit punch.
I came here twice for lunch and the food here sucks!  I ordered this beef stew and it was cold, the beef was dry as if it was out of one of those Campbell soup cans  This place is more of a bar than a restaurant.
I am really mad at this place.  I printed out the coupon for 25% their new Friday lunch and got there around 1:20 pm.  The hostess told me the wait was going to be 2 hours.  "Okay, what time do you close?" I asked her.  She replied that they close at 3pm.  "Wait a second.  You're telling me that I have to wait for 2 hours to get a chance to be seated and then you're going to close the restaurant before the 2 hours is over?"  She didn't really have a response to that except to repeat that it was a 2 hour wait.  SO ridiculous!  We went across the street to Fuddruckers where we were munching on burgers and fries within 15 minutes.
This has to be one of the worst franchises in the chain. Nine out of ten times they mess up the order like today, charging me for an item that never made it into the bag. Surprise!
Worst service ever. After having an order messed up they would not fix it. After reordering and repaying it took 25 minutes for 1 blizzard. The red head manager was so rude. 2 other employees apologized to me for her behavior behind her back. Do not go to this dq. After reading other reviews they have had many bad experiences I wish I could give 0 stars.
We went there for dinner. Food took very long and waitress was a bit impolite. The service is slow! The couscous and tagine were a bit different from other good Moroccan restaurants. I love Moroccan food but I will never go back to this place.
THEY DONT HAVE YUM YUM SAUCE! That's reason enough to not go. Food doesn't taste very good and they messed up our order. NEVER going back.
I'm not usually a person to mark down for service. So long as I am fed and hydrated, I won't gripe too much. Sushi Land, however, was absolutely ruined for me because of its service (or lack thereof). We were ignored for the first twenty minutes we were there. This would be fine if they had a self-serve water station or something, but they did not. When we finally did get the waitstaff's attention, they were incredibly rude and exasperated. The restaurant was not busy, and we did nothing to incite their annoyance. I just think, perhaps, the people acting as servers would be better suited behind the scenes. They were dismally unpleasant and unresponsive.   The food was just eh and couldn't save it from the restaurant's other flaws.
Food was decent. Service was very poor. Ordered egg rolls that never came out but they appears on the bill. Benefit of doubt, they were "busy." Will not be returning anytime soon.
This was our first time eating at a Chipotle. We were not impressed at all. We ordered steak burritos but the steak was full of tendons and the meat itself was tough and hard to chew. We ate our burritos in the dining room which was filthy and uncomfortable with a long line of people waiting to order just standing there staring at us. I'm not sure what all the hype about Chipotle is, what I do know is we spent over 40 bucks on mediocre burritos. Such a bummer.  I don't want to sound like a total debbie downer so the ice tea was good and the people making the food were very nice.
I come here often. There is one thing that's consistent. The weekend staff always fails to provide prompt or adequate service. They are more concerned with drive-thru. Must be the timer above the service window judges their success. Maybe they need one for walk in service. Please don't ask for warm Bo-rounds after your food has sat behind the counter for more than 7 minutes. The shift leader will reply back with a bad attitude. Wait, is it not me who's paying their salary? I'm almost sure the RM/DM's don't work on weekends, but corporate needs to monitor this location to improve customer service.
If I could put zero stars I would. Not only was our waiter rude, our bread was cold and tasted uncooked, we had to ask for refills on our drinks, my dinner was wrong and had no taste but worst of all THERE WAS A MOUSE UNDER OUR TABLE AND WENT RUNNING WHEN WE GOT UP. We told the manager and his response was "oh I'm so sorry." Never again will I dine at a Joes.
In general I'm a HUGE Winners fan. I would however have to say that of all the locations here in Vancouver, this one is by far the worst (oh wait just saw a review for Metrotown Winners...perhaps I stand corrected). Either way, this location is surely no prize. Unfortunately this location is a block from my office so I rolled in last week with one thing on the brain 'Travel Coffee Mug', which I found about a half hour later after a few failed attempts. I was just disgusted by the state of the store. I mean I get that the traffic there must be ridiculous but the place was honestly in shambles, if you're getting the traffic, then you're getting the sales and should be able to employ enough people to keep your store from looking like a flop house. I dodged the crowds and headed to the teeny tiny home section at the back of the store and tried not to touch anything. Seriously I'm in no way a germophobe but this place was just a mess. I thought I might find something on the clearance rack but that just seemed to be a haven for broken merchandise. I didn't actually find anything I liked in the home section and dejectedly was making my way to the front to escape when low and behold I found my current travel mug on a display by the cash. Soooo... I ended up finding my mug and saving the $4 extra I would have paid for an alternative at Starbucks but seriously if I had a 'do-over' I would have happily paid said savings to have that half hour of my life back.... yuck.
Frequently understaffed and always overpriced. The TV's and awesome location are hard to beat, though, but their "bat cave" of a downstairs is a bit disorienting, and the staff can be standoffish. Love the decor, some food is pretty tasty, but there are better in the area.
I've been here in the past and love the place's unique fusion. So it saddens me that I waited on a Sunday afternoon at 1:30 with staff running around looking busy but not actually taking my order. I tried to be patient but after 10 minutes I got up and left. I don't even remember when I last got up and left a restaurant.
Friends told me to come here if the line at voodoo was too long, so we did. I am not a fan of donuts but of course we had to try it out.  It was a bit mediocre and expensive for donuts. At least I can say I tried it here..  Not sure what the hype was about.
Worst service ever!!!!! Payed my bill and now my service is cut off and nobody can help me till Monday? What kind of security company is that? Seriously thinking of saying screw it and disconnecting. Will not resign contract and will not recommend to anyone.
It was fast to get in. They have plenty of seating but the food was just okay and not hot. Also the music was so loud that the waitress couldn't here a word we were saying. We had to yell to talk to each other!
So the bar staff was cool and the band played some great songs. Problem is, the overanxious bouncer crew messed up our entire evening. They were unnecessarily rude and obnoxious, and we will never go back there. Avoid.
I like Burger King but this location always has really slow and really rude service.  This last time I went, I wanted to add something at the window but they said I had to pull around. This was at 11 pm with no cars behind me. When I pulled around, I had to wait 10 min before I went up to the locked doors and knocked hard. Again, no other customers besides us. It was just sitting there cuz they forgot.  Rant over. 2 stars because I like Burger King in general and they've never messed up my order. But always horrible slow and rude service.
So very disappointed in the food recently and went June 8,2014 with my daughter and grandchild and had the worst dining experience of the year. This used to be so good but it was horrible salty no sauce rubbery cheese and very little of it. Macaroni and cheese tasted like glue and if no cheese taste. My suggestion is that the owners should visit the Village Kitchen in Cambridge to see how this simple small place makes their crust and taste their different pizzas to see what they do. LOIS FROM BELMONT
Very disappointed in the food at vagabond. We live in the neighborhood and stopped in for Sunday brunch. The menu sounded appealing, but did not deliver on taste, portion size, or overall appeal. The thought of the food actually makes me a little nauseated. The bacon was severely undercooked, honestly it was hardly recognizable as bacon. It was a big pile of curled up, soggy, fatty meat. The coffee was the worst coffee I've ever had. I'm not a picky coffee drinker, but I was only able to choke down one sip. My cousin ordered the soft scrambled eggs with mushrooms. He took one bite and left the rest because it was such an unappealing pile of snotty looking eggs. He is a 20 something year old guy who will eat literally anything, so the rest of us at the table had to take a bite to see what was so terrible about it. The truffle flavor was over the top and the texture of the scrambled eggs was gross. One positive note was that our server was very kind.
If you were waiting in line at Dillon's Friday night around 12:30 am, I was the girl who rolled up with her friends and walked right in.  Sorry!  That being said, I'm not sure why people were waiting in line to get into this bar... After a long night of drinking, I was FOR SURE sporting the beer goggles and this place still seemed blah.  Thinking back, nothing about this place really stands out.  Then again, it might have been all the gin...
Bathrooms were disgusting. Order was wrong. Food was burnt. Over charged for the Monday special.
I really wanted to give it better reviews but I can't on this particular visit. We got there around 8pm, I guess they were so popular that day that they had ran out of most of the main dishes.. so ok.. we accommodated and ordered from what they said was available. First, we ordered the potato balls filled with ground beef. We waited about 30mins to get them, so OK. No big deal... to our surprise the balls were frozen on the inside.. Ok..that is not acceptable.. bad start.. we also ordered chicken soup. It was all brought, had about 1 inch (literally) of chicken and nothing else. We also have a churrasco ( I think), it was just ok. The only thing I really liked were the red beans (well seasoned) with white rice, which was everything I ate. Not sure if I will be back.  I did complain to the manager and pointed out the problems and he kept asking me what do you want? For Pete's sakes, you manage this restaurant. Apologize for the problems and offer a solution. For example, discount, free drink, voucher to come back and try the potato balls.. something. The guy is not a manager, the servers had more management potential that him.
Unless you like bloody eggs, don't get the steak and egg breakfast. I asked to put on a separate plate for that reason. Even then if they would have let the steak sit longer before serving it wouldn't be so bloody. To boot, the steak was tough and horrible and covered in a horrible herb butter but at least it Was cooked correctly, just a cheap piece of meat. Had the eggs not had blood in them they would have been edible. The small fries on the side were pretty good. Toast was over toasted.   Restaurant inside looked great, though very loud. A bottle of wine at every table? There are recovering alcoholics out there. I'm sure they don't want to sit at a table and stare at a wine bottle the whole time.   I had such high expectations since I have eaten at Mimi's in California 15 years ago and loved it. Quite the opposite this time.   Server was friendly*
I placed an order via delivery.com, then waited...and waited. After an hour and a half, I tried calling--no answer, and a full voice mail box. I've been trying to get through now for more than 2 hours, and still no food or even anyone picking up the phone.   Ridiculous.
Sooo disappointed!   After all the glowing reviews about the good and the service, we were really excited to eat there.  We went in between 4 and 4:30 and there were no other diners there.  The server took our order and then she and the cook just hung around the front counter---he on his phone most of the time.  There seemed to be no action going on in the kitchen at all.  We ordered the dolmades for an appetizer and they were very good but tiny and overpriced at 5 for $6.95.  Then we waited and waited---still no action in the kitchen.  The server never checked on us.  Finally, the meal appeared (we are still the only diners In the place ). My daughters chicken kabob was so dry that she had to ask for some yogurt to dip it in and my little meat patties were so hard that I could hardly cut them.  Right before we were served we heard a timer go off, so considering the lack of action in the kitchen and the condition of the meat and chicken, I think they must have just reheated the entree.  The rest of the plate consisted of plain white rice and some garden salad greens with a basic vinaigrette dressing.  The server never came back after we were served.  When She brought the checkmentioned to her how dry the chicken was, she said--"oh, really?"  This was around $40.00 with tip and we left extremely unsatisfied.  Not worth the calories or the money.  It's hard to believe that we were in the same place with all the rave reviews about the food and service.    Thank you for your reply.  Evidently our experience was not the average because the reason we visited Troy was because of the good reviews.  That's why we were so surprised and disappointed by the unappetizing food and poor service.  I accept your explanation that the meat and chicken were cooked to order but, still, the chicken was extremely dry and the little meat patties were hard and tough. There were no other diners in the place except us, so the service should have been excellent.  Sorry, but that's just the way it was.
Given this place 3 chances and each time it gets worse. Service is horrendous because they are always understaffed during busy times, food is mediocre or will make you sick, and unless you are standing at the bar good luck getting a beer in less than 10 minutes
Eh, good but not great. Location is slamming but this place needs two things, mini-bars and room service. Whoever is running the on site pizza joint (Cordovanas?) needs to never run a pizza restaurant again. Also the bar restaurant near the main pool is so over priced it's not funny; $40 for chicken tenders and a burger, that wasn't even made correctly.  Overall I'd stay here again but Id go to the grocery and save the money because the food here is below par, plus if you mention it to the staff, they don't really care.  This property is a time share place so it's clean, well kept and is super close to Universal, Sea World and Disney, but other than a clean place to sleep...might want to think about a cheaper option.
We used to go here once a month always for breakfast. Lunch last Saturday was disappointing. Lipstick on the water glass & moldy mushy tomato in the salad. My potato was so over cooked, I just not want to complain about one thing. To be honest for hotel prices, I would rather get less, but better quality. We won't be back. For those of you all about portion size, they will feed you there!!
Horrible scam. To be clear, you will be ripped off here. Peter the owner of several locations in the Portland metro area is a con artist and tells the people who work for him how to trick people into handing over their credit cards and then he keeps charging your account after contract has ended. Slimy dude. Stay away, you've been warned.
Came here for The Hateful Eight in 70mm during the holidays. Sat in GG 18 and 19 next to the isle. There was an issue with the projection so they gave us free Movie vouchers for any Cineplex movie. Thoughtful customer service but I doubt I'll go back. I found their seating too far from the screen and the sound system wasn't the greatest.
Was not seated for 30 minutes when we had reservations.  Food is underwhelming and overpriced.  The female manager was not helpful and downright rude.  Clearly not up to the standard of prato and luma.  Don't waste your money here folks.
The food was good but Worst service I ever had!   When I say bad I mean bad!!!!  I had to get our menus, silverware,and remind them we ordered drinks.  We were there for like two hours. The waitress kept apologizing it's just a crazy night. There were only maybe three tables. We would watch the waitress just stand there.  It was so bad I almost wanted to ask her if she liked her job?   She looks just miserable. she was very rude and very lazy!   When I finally just ask somebody else for a side of ranch that person just looked at me like they didn't know English!   I finally just said you know what never mind paid for everything and just left!  There's a big difference between being busy and being pure lazy!
Terrible food. I am Korean and this place does not serve authentic Korean food. I had spicy dakdoritang and the chicken was too gamey (what kind of meat do they use?!) so I only had potatoes. I never write reviews but had to leave one because it was so gross.
Pretty sure my boyfriend got roofied here. Yep. Seriously. 2 stars for the 33-tini though; that thing's yummy.
My Rating is due to the service or lack there of at this particular Taco Mac In general I like the other locations i have been to I have been to this location many times. I finally have stopped going. There always seems to be a lack of attention to service. Manager never comes to ask how things are.  Manager is usually doing other work, for staff that has maybe called out I guess.  Waits for food are long.  Runners are non existent.  We had a party of 5, ordered drinks and food the crowd was average size.  Food came out for 4, the other order came out 20 min later. Had to ask the server to call the manager over.
I used to be a fan of 888. I loved their food and I always thought they were the one of the best asian restaurants in Austin until 2 years ago.  2 years ago, I went there with my friend for lunch, and as usual, we got pepper and salt chicken& beef hot pot. When foods came out, it looked very delicious, and hot pot tasted good. BUT the problem broke out when I tasted pepper and salt chicken. it wasn't chicken. it was like a squash, but not really squash. This thing happened before like twice, so I talked to the server but her attitude made me freaking mad. she eventually got me a new place with chicken, but the way she spoke to me was very impolite..I think she thought I told her to get an extra free food or something. ( so I didn't eat that new chicken one)  I stopped to go there for awhile..about year and half.. I went back last time and was satisfied..  HOWEVER, I went there last night and ordered pepper and salt chicken (I know, again) and green curry for to go. I am leaving austin this weekend so I wanted to try good places before I leave. so I drove down from arboretum area.  I waited for like 40min. I knew my foods are out, but the server only took care of dining-in customers.  anyways, when I got home, bite the pepper and salt chicken, there was no chicken inside. NO FREAKING CHICKEN was there.   what a disappointment.  I will not ever go back to that place. I will miss their beef hot pot though. gosh. freaking salt and pepper chicken.. (pepper and salt? whatever)
Everytime I make a move and don't check Yelp first I regret it.  This time was no different.  I chose this spot from Grub Hub delivery.  My delivery options are quite limited in the new neighborhood so I couldn't believe my luck as I read the menu for this place.  I thought I must be dreaming as I read all of the delicious sounding items, and I triple checked to make sure they delivered.  Reasonably priced, and they were open. Great!    I place my order.  2 hours later, no food.  I call, and a young lady says that it's coming up now. Wth??! After I protest, she offers me a lemonade. Blank stare. Go figure.  Finally, about 20 minutes later, food arrives.  Here's the kicker- the food was actually GOOD.  The breakfast potatoes I got were downright DELICIOUSLY spicy and tasty, with the bell peppers and onions perfectly grilled.  I had ordered a turkey and cheese with EXTRA mayo, lettuce, tomato, and ONION, CUT in HALF. They sent a sandwich with NO mayo and not cut.  I am very picky, hence the reason I take the time to very carefully specify how I would like my food prepared.  When it is nothing like I ordered, it signifies to me that I am not important enough for you to even care about TRYING to prepare my meal the way I asked (and paid) you to do it. FAIL.  Turns out, the sandwich was very good, the bread was perfectly soft, but the lack of care in preparation means I'll NEVER have another one.  Plus, had I not had Hellman's in the fridge, we would have had a REAL problem, as I don't do sandwiches with no mayo. Period.  The owner called me when Grub Hub called her, and explained that she is a "full service" restaurant, and she does the delivery orders "when she can fit them in". Had this been my establishment, I would have comped this entire meal for goodwill, and offered to try and get it right on a different day, thus ensuring a second visit from a first time patron/new neighbor/potential regular (I eat out 6 of 7 days a week, most unfortunately).  Oh well.  Not my business.  I will offer this:  if you don't have the capacity to do delivery service, then you should not try to do delivery service.  Good luck to you.
Horrible.  Came in for dry cleaning, got back shrunken pants and lost items of clothing.  I didn't pay attention to the price.  Dry cleaning isn't supposed to cause any shrinkage if performed correctly (I know, I used to work at a dry cleaners in college).  Obviously they washed, not dry cleaned, my pants hence why they went from loose fitting pants to un-wearable.  I went back to find out what happened to my pants that they didn't return with my clothes and they were completely unwilling to ATTEMPT to help find them in any way.  Never will I EVER go back to this business.    Avoid.
We came here for my friends birthday - on a Saturday night.   Service- good, not great. We had to ask for water multiple times. Once our appetizers were finished, we waited about 30 minutes for our meals.  Food - good, not great. 2 of the girls got the bolognese, another the seafood special and I got the gnocchi. Each of the girls had huge portions - I had maybe 8 gnocchi. I was finished with my meal as they were just starting in on theirs. I hadn't had an app since I didn't want to overdo it - however I did leave the restaurant hungry. For $60 a person I expected more.
It's a buffet! Do not expect quality food!  Becareful what you pick. They give you huge portion for cheap item food and small portion for the expensive items.  I like the veggie noodles, so order that over other noodles if you are that kind of person.  It's 19.95/person and not too bad for going in small groups.
TOTALLY UNPROFESSIONAL. Rebecca Decharme left me a message, then i called to leave a message and never heard back. So why bother to call me in the first place. Management must allow these rude individuals to continue working
The two stars are for the staff, each staff deserves a star. Unfortunately, they have a limited selection on their menu available daily and it was below average. Their specialty chicken tasted mediocre.
Waiter was fantastic. However, undercooked and very cold food. Unacceptable. Waited over an hour for our food as well. Disapponiting all 3 tries at this "could be" great restaurant.
Went there on our last vacation day, thought it would be interesting. Some parts were informative but the rest, not so much. One of the rooms was displayed in the time period the guide was talking about, but who cares. I was expecting to see more of the process of how chocolate was made and not the whole tour of the history of chocolate. All that and the tour was $15 a person, hardly worth it.  Save your money unless you get a Groupon deal, and even that's pushing it.
Manager looked like he was 15 years old and was a huge d-bag. Would never go back to this ABC, how about you hire people that have a tiny clue about the products they sell or how to be nice in general.
Punjab Palace was my absolute goto Indian restaurant. Now it might not entirely be their fault because I ordered delivery through grub hub but after the hour we were told it would take, I called and was told the order was in the kitchen and it would be another 20 minutes. After another 30 minutes I called again and was told it was still in the kitchen. After pressing whomever answered the call, I came to learn that they hadn't even started the order. There's a huge difference between expecting to get the food in an hour and waiting two hours before they even start making it. Never again using grub hub, and I'm trying a new Indian place tonight so maybe never again at Punjab.
My wife and I went to Habana on New Years Eve (6:00 pm, early, no crowds). We've eaten there several times before and really like the food.    The problem this time was cleanliness. We ordered drinks and our entrees and didn't really pay much attention to our silverware until our food arrived.  All of our silverware was covered with grease (a lot of grease, not just a little sheen). My wife's fork and spoon was covered with tiny food particles.    We told the manager, offered to pay for our drinks (he wouldn't let us pay) and left. The manager said he was sorry, but didn't seem particularly bothered.     I would never judge a restaurant on what could be a one time occurrence, but this spoiled the evening for us, we went elsewhere.    We'll probably try Habana again. The food IS GOOD. We'll just be very watchful of cleanliness.
Horrible experience! First off, no parking avail, had to park 5 blocks away in another lot. The keys were deactivated twice and would have to go get new ones. Had a friend who was staying at a neighboring hotel and came back with us during "non-visiting" hours. At check out we got charged for another guest and were informed that "there is video surveillance monitoring".... Really?!? It ended up costing $250 plus the cost of having to pay to park at an off site lot, for a one star hotel.
Hmmm... Not the best but not the worst. Average at best. I'm not sure what to say other than it felt like just another knock-off with OK yogurt. Props for the great location.
As a recent convert from the world of vegetarianism, places like Mod market should be my first choice. I continue to support local & ethically produced foods. I just wish their beef was much better. This week I've tried their steak sandwitch and the 'make your own' salad w/steak. Both times I very nearly picked off the steak and enjoyed the rest of the meal. Very tough & unseasoned meat. However, the presentation has been decent & I had my food quickly despite it being busy both times. I will try Boulders other 'Green' restaurants before returning here. Also, I'm not sure they deserve one $, as both times I walked away spending more than I planned & still feeling hungry.
I guess growing up on the West Coast I am used to very traditional Dim Sum.  The Dim Sum here included something that looked similar to a hotdog in a bun as well ribs and other very "American" Style food.  In addition, we were sitting in a bad area of restaurant, which meant most of the dishes on the carts did not come by our table.   On a good note, the service is very good, the hot tea nice and hot and everyone was very friendly.
Note this phone number shows up for other removal companies . . . At least under a different name and addresses - Sam's - who say they move single items between Squamish and Vancouver and to contact them, they never bothered getting back to my message.  I had a friend do it for me instead. Thanks for nothing.
Came here a few times for an industry party, a wrap party and a showcase and I feel gross in here. Basic dance floor, not even that large, slim pickings bar, average layout. You get the idea.....not the best place on Granville when you want a night out. Staff have always been less than pleasant.
Worst service ever. Been sitting here for 15 minutes so far. That's right I'm reviewing as I wait. Can't eat my dinner without a beverage. Fries gone quite some time ago. Won't be back. Place is a joke and so was our server. Stay clear people. Didn't get to eat my dinner. It's cold now. Wondering if they will top this horrid experience off by making me pay for food I couldn't eat and drinks I didn't get......waiter is here and yep. He has our bill for us. Insult to injury! Such rubbish.
Have been going here for some time.... but as always I find everyone very slow. I had one person in front of me,  3 stylist and I waited 1 hour before I left. Some of the stylist are very slow,  I have even heard other stylist comment that they have done two cuts to some of the others one cut and need to step up.
Rating take-out. We ordered a chocolate cheese cake and a chocolate cannoli. We received the cannoli and a chocolate cake, didn't feel the need to check that the order was correct since it was two items. The chocolate cake was dry and hard, and tasted like it was not made fresh. The cannoli shell was delicious, but the ricotta was sour (menu did not describe it as such) and ruined the cannoli.
1) See review of conor larkin's by Billie S.     2) Apply said review to Our House East.    She said it all, really, so there's not much for me to add (except to explain my generous gift of the second star: the bar itself gets lots of sunlight during the day ... I like that in a bar).
PDX used cars omg,what a shady business shame on the owner a friend of mine buy a car with this people they signed a paper saying they will make sure the car will pass, so after several times never pass the deq they transfer a license plate from a Cherokee car, for 6 dollars fee instead of doing the right thing please stay a way from this people if you love you family shame on this untreated people.
Blue star donuts is very hyped up in the Portland food community, but personally I hate it. When I went there to get donuts for my family I was greeted by impolite staff who didn't seem like they actually wanted to be there. The donuts were very small for the price that I paid. Plus they were not very good. I do not recommend blue star donuts to anyone.
I've been to the Newton and Downtown locations and I think I rather travel out there than in my own backyard.  I asked for the Cajun sauce but it wasn't either spicy or flavorful like the previous locations.   I have a gripe about some things.  First the seating I hate sitting so close to people you can't have a conversation without people being in your business.  Second for the money your spending throw in some free rice.  All the sides are extra... I mean like a piece of corn. Also, let me taste the different sauces before I have to fork up $24+ on your menu.   Lastly don't rush me and don't take the drink menu right away without having a chance to look at it.
How does this place even stay in business!  We live close by and went in because we promised the kids we'd check it out. It is a disgusting store, and the candies look like they have been sitting there for ever. And the truth may not be too far from it - I go past the store several times a day and never see anyone going in or out.  It has been about 4 years since we visited, and my kids have never asked to go back.
I'd like to preface this review by saying that my fiance and I used to come to the Beantown Diner all the time.  Almost once every weekend for awhile.  We loved it here.  The Beantown Diner lost a lot of respect in our book the last time we went.  We stepped in and waited for a seat (the entire restaurant was full, there were no open tables).  At least three waitresses told us "take a seat wherever you'd like."  There were no seats.  When the third waitress told us to take a seat yet again, my fiance simply said "I don't see any that are open" to which we both got a "ugh, whatever" pissed off look before waitress number three stormed off.  That was enough for us.  No place should treat their customers like that.  Great food, but after being treated like a piece of trash I don't know if we'll be returning anytime soon.
I don't know who these sales tactics work on but I guess they wouldn't be employed if they didn't. We narrowed our choice on a specific car. We got an offer from a different dealership but decided to go to HC, since they were closer, and to offer them to sell the same car to us for a comparable price.   We call them and ask them if they have this car on the lot. They say: yes, several of them. We go there. The guy we talk to (Keith?) has the sleaziest demeanor. His entire desk is full of pictures of his family (and by full I mean like 20) and awards saying "master of excellence". I'm sure he has a Ph.D. in Awesomeness, too, but he doesn't have physical space to display that.  He tells us we want a good car, which everybody wants , but the trouble is (wait for it!) no dealer in New England has it. He is able to check that. No, really. Since we had an offer we told him we would check that other place first... unless he wants to give us an offer. He says that other dealer is lying to us that he has a car and that he needs to go and check if they will be able to get that very rare car for us and THEN we'll talk price.  Let's pause for a minute. Suppose you're a Honda dealer and you honestly don't have a relatively popular car. Wouldn't you start your day by calling whomever and find out when the next arrivals will be? I mean, you do expect customers inquiring, don't you? Of course, you would. Either he didn't have a car or he knew he didn't want to sell it to us at the price that we wanted. Either way he was lying to us.  So he left the desk, and we checked our emails for a while and then we simply got up and left. I know they think if they waste enough of our time we will feel like we owe them for the big trouble that they went through on our behalf. Like I said... I guess it's working on some people. Why else would they try it on us? As we were walking to the door the receptionist tipped the salesman that we were leaving and he ran after us but we didn't stop. He called me like 8 times and I didn't answer.  We went to that other place the same day and bought the car.   In summary: do research online, BID ONLINE. Don't ever go to the dealership without a firm price promised and a VIN of the vehicle that they say they have. Never trust a car dealer to tell the truth. Doesn't mean you should fight them. But if the only way you know something is through them telling you then you simply don't know it. Always, ALWAYS, be prepared to walk out at any stage. Some people say, signing should take hours. FALSE! Tell them you will walk out if they do one wrong move AND MEAN IT. They will do ALL paperwork in less than an hour. Most of us want cars that are in abundance. Understand that and you will immediately understand that you should be the one in charge during the whole process.  Here's a more detailed account of our buying process: http://www.yelp.com/biz/silko-honda-raynham#hrid:k-v7aipcorfBAbBVzwWKcw
Banh mi was pretty weak.
The band was very good and played an amazing set.  My girlfriend and I had a few drinks (Mojito and Long Island) as well as the Memphis Style Cheese and Sausage Platter.  The portions were good, but I was a little disappointed that the crackers it was served with were Saltines.  Meh.  No big deal.  She had the fresh grilled red snapper, which I had a few nibbles of and we both agreed that it was good, but not "holy shit, this is the best I have ever had!"  My ribeye was good, but was an extremely fatty cut, and the dog got most of the leftovers, because he is a spoiled brat.  The most disappointing was the beignets, which was basically fried dough with a crystal sugar on them, and we all know the best beignets is made with powdered sugar.  And to add insult to a great and long loved dessert dish, they served it with this kind of white icing for dipping.  Seriously, the same crap you get with cinnamon sticks at Pizza Hut.  Not a good look, BB Kings, not good at all.  And to pay a cover at a tourist trap on I-Drive?  That is just sad.  You pay a cover to a blues club so the starving artists can be paid, since the ownership can make their overhead and eat themselves.  Not in a place that is two steps from being owned by Disney.  I would not go back, but it was an okay experience.
~ CUSTOMER DISSERVICE ~  It's readily apparent that the owner, Celine, treats her Catering Customers very well, and gives them preferential treatment.  However, if you're a Walk-in Customer, then it's also very evident that Celine gives you very short shrift.  That's right, even though her electric door chime automatically signals your entry, she still takes a few minutes to come and wait on you even when you're her only Customer.  The reason for this tardiness is that she busies herself fulfilling her Catering Customers' orders first.  And then, just when you think your order will soon be at hand, she adds insult to injury by taking several minutes more than necessary to finally hand you your order. Please understand that I'm talking about a very simple, 1-item order which would have normally taken only a couple of minutes to prepare.  Indeed, what should have been a quick in/out experience ends up lasting 10-15 minutes. And, when you're the only customer in her store, you're acutely aware that you just don't rate.  To make matters worse, when you ask Celine to put a little extra mayonnaise on your sandwich, she instead hands you a small To Go container of mayonnaise so that you have to inconveniently add it yourself. I don't know whether to call these transgressions poor business practices, or just plain rudeness.  Lest you think I'm being too harsh on Celine, this same sad event has happened to me twice only weeks apart.  Below is a list of my individual star ratings by category. The mathematical average if all categories were evenly weighted is ~2.3.  However, I strongly feel that Celine's rude Customer Disservice is so beyond the pale that only 1 star is what she so richly deserves.  A. FOOD QUALITY = 3.5 B. FOOD QUANTITY = 3.5 C. PRICING = 3.5 D. VENUE = 2 E. AMBIENCE = 2 F. LOCATION = 2 G. PARKING = 2 H. SERVICE = 1 I. CELINE'S PERSONALITY = 1
THIS IS THE WORST PLACE TO SPEND YOUR MONEY!!!  They are not clean, cooks handling food without gloves or hairnets.  Bugs and hair were found in the food. Food is under cooked. Owner, is racist and rude and it is reflected in the lack of diversity at this sub-par fast food dump.  And the person managing lacks customer service skills. Don't waist your hard earned money and time at this place.
I called them to order delivery and this rude girl Ariel answered; she seemed like I was bothering her. She put me on hold then after 2 min waiting, I got hung up on.   I called back 4 times and no one answered! It made zero sense. I waited 5 min then called back just to see if someone would answer. Ariel answered again. I was like "you hung up on me". She said it was the phone...   Then asked if I "wanted to order something or..." But couldn't hear me because an employee around her was loud. So after correcting my address like 6 or 7 times, I finally got my order in and she said okay it'll be this much then said and 30-45 min then hung up.   I have a coupon. She didn't even give me a chance to let her know.   I would try and fight it but at this point I just don't even want to deal with all that.  And they wonder why Raggazzis and dominos does so well...
Warning!! Rant to follow. I apologize for length.   I am dropping Potbelly a  couple stars based on our experience Monday. 2.5  I really wanted to go to Whole Foods for a burger. ( different review but their burgers are solid: Sustainable, organic, delicious. )  Mom, said Princess, I really want broccoli soup and a milkshake.   Ok. Potbelly I guess. ( not excited about forfeiting the burger but she wants broccoli after days of only wanting pho. And I mean days). I couldn't promise broccoli soup at Whole Foods. They rotate their soups.   Its 2pm. The parking lot is pretty empty. Its Veteran's Day.Usually this lot is nuts.  Theres a handful of people outside at tables and just a couple inside. .We stumble in to give our order to the girl at the counter. I order the chocolate shake first ( because it takes the longest ), then the bowl of soup, then a chicken salad sandwich on wheat( "multigrain" she says) then pick up some pop chips and head to the register.   Ma'am? What sandwich did you order again?  Chicken salad.   Oh ok. She says.   At the register my sandwich is sitting on the counter next to a tray (?) And I say " is this mine ? And he nods so I pick it up and put it on the tray while he rings it up, then he notes the pop chips, reminds milkshake maker to get the shake and  says  " a bowl of soup" and as he rings it up says " we are out of broccoli soup" and "you can have garden veggie or southwest chicken." He asks my daughter, "do you want to taste them? "  Um no, says Princesses' facial expression, there are ONIONS in those. ONIONS are from Satan. Lets be real, neither of those choices is particularly kid friendly unless a parent has made them knowing what the kid will tolerate or if the kid had no food issues whatsoever. I don't have that kid. Mutely, pretty sad really, she shakes her head. She whispers to me "I don't have to eat."  Grrrrr.Really?! Then he goes and erases broccoli cheese  soup from their board.   If,  when I had ordered broccoli cheese soup, the girl had said " we are out" ...I would have said ok thanks and left. Or even better if I hadn't seen it on the board, I wouldn't have even had to talk to them! ( I do this at Fresh Thyme soup quite a bit. Go in, see what's left on their board...they're good at updating...and leave if nothing left will work).   I couldn't do that now because I had a sandwich. Not a burger. Sigh.   The helpful register man gave us a free cookie to make up for being out of soup at 2pm. So my child had a milkshake ( which she ended up not drinking btw), a cookie we gave her dad later, and my chips that have less nutrition than dirt. I had a sandwich I didn't enjoy. This was not a successful lunch.   Afterwards I took her to Java Mama's for a bagel. I needed coffee.   Will we go back?   Hmm.   Maybe not for soup.   What a wasted trip to Potbelly. It is cheap. But...they need to tighten up their ship a bit.   *Disclaimer: The Princess, by royal edict, is not eating sandwiches currently unless its grilled cheese.
I was an All-Brite townie and Model Regular from 2002 - 2005. It's refreshing to join a group of friends here after an evening of shoveling snow or trotting down the street in a mild snowfall. Pabst Blue Ribbon and laughter can fully coat the otherwise grimy and foreboding room.  The turf is a tad unsettling for the loner -- with its tough guy cadence --but with a shard of luck one can find a scruffy punk rock hookup on a lonely tuesday night. And if you're one of those lazy shy guys, be sure to wear the clothes you slept in and lean against the bar looking aloof and thoughtless -- she'll come to you. But be careful who you follow home. Remember the saying "you've slept with every person that he or she has slept with?" -- this is were all of those persons hang out on a busy saturday night.   On the plus: if you are in your early twenties, hell -- late thirties -- forties and you want to let your impulses run amok, than head here. I have ruined what would be considered a reputation in real life time and time again at the model and have returned unwittingly unscathed. Sure there might be plenty of gossip, but nobody cares.
Standard thai food prices but subpar thai food quality. It is in a food court so I guess expectations can't be too high but the food was bland and my noodles were really rubbery as if they had been sitting out for awhile. My friend also got a curry dish that came with eggplant that they forgot, when he mentioned it, they just gave him 2 pieces of uncooked eggplant....Definitely can get better thai food for the same price elsewhere
Terrible service today.  I waited fifty minutes before my ride arrived!  The dispatcher sent my cab elsewhere and did not get me a backup.  Never using this service again!
We are regulars at Marinepolis--one of the places that every member of the family enjoys, so it wins whenever it comes to a vote.  However, our last several visits have shown a sharp falling off of quality in ways that even my youngest child notices, and we're at the point of looking for another sushi restaurant.  This has caused a great disturbance in the force!  Hard to imagine we'll find another place as reasonably priced and high quality as this one used to be.  Our visit last night is a good illustration of how things have gone very badly wrong with the restaurant in general:  We arrived at a time when a dozen seats at the sushi bar were open, and one table was also vacant.  However, dirty dishes and food littered all the spaces, so no seating was available.  We sat on the waiting bench for 15 minutes (!) watching the help talk to each other and move around the restaurant without attending to the customers who tried to get their attention.  Finally, one of the waitresses brought a tub and cleaned off the dishes, and another dragged a grey and filthy looking rag across the counter.    When we sat down, my kids noticed that our shoes were on food that other guests had dropped, and a lot of it.  The bits of rice were especially sticky, so it was hard to overlook, and once we glanced down, our appetites diminished.  It appeared that food had been accumulating all day, as it was a dirty mess underneath the table.  The supplies at the table itself were all out, aside from ginger and wasabi. The soy sauce was empty, no sauce dishes, and none at any adjacent places, either.  To her credit, one waitress responded quickly to our request and brought the needed implements.    That was the one bright spot, though:  Our orders to the sushi chefs came very slowly, and we had to ask where they were before they showed up.  The waitresses seemed to feel we were intruding on their day, at least judging by their manner, and the whole place appeared dirty and shabby--not what you want in a restaurant that serves raw fish!  When we paid, the waitress at the register didn't say a word, no smile or thank you, no word at all, and I felt bad about having left a tip.  We feel that servers should be treated generously, but our experience last night made me think these young staff members should be fired!  On the whole, this was really not a good experience, and in keeping with each of our recent visits.  I don't know if ownership has changed, or someone just stopped caring, but the place seems run by kids who don't know or care about cleanliness and customer service.  So sad to see our favorite restaurant come to this end.
If you order a cheeseburger well done with lettuce, tomato, onions, and pickles, you'll get exactly that. However, if you order a cheeseburger medium rare with lettuce and tomato only, too bad; you'll still get a cheeseburger well done with lettuce, tomato, onions, and pickles. I've been going to Murphy's almost every Tuesday for the past four months and my food order has yet to be correct.  The waitresses refuse to use a notepad, and I get it. It's supposed to be more efficient just memorizing the order and it's better to make eye contact with the customer blah blah blah. The down side is this plan all falls apart when you can't memorize the order.  All I want for Christmas is a waitress who can bring me a medium rare cheeseburger with no pickles on my plate.
I asked for a balayage and I got a full foil highlights. I have  short aline bob hair and the women who did my hair started off with a balayage but perhaps she didn't realize how short my hair was and gave me highlights. I have never written a bad review before, but this was a horrible experience because first it was not what I asked for and second, when I was checking out, the women who rang me up said "I know it's not a balayage but it's almost like one and less expensive." Ended up paying $120 because I didn't fight it because I didn't want them touching my hair again. First and last time.
Todd Jefferies is a dumbfuck.  Conservative rhetoric regurgitated from the asshole of Rush Limbaugh.  Poison audio.
Check your balloons before leaving! The wind blew my daughter's $10 birthday balloon right off the string the second it was out of the car. I called the manager to let them know what happened and when we were there so he could maybe let the employee know. He did apoligize, but then just said: "thanks for letting me know".  I didn't really expect a refund or anything else from him, but it would have been nice for him to be a little more apologetic.
This place feels rapey. Creepy atmosphere. Way to dark. Way too loud. Way to claustrophobic. The ceilings are literary less then 10 inch's above your head.  Dirty old men sitting in the shadows watching you dance. DJ plays nothing but top 40 crap poorly remixed. $12 dollar cover. Drinks were average price. Feels like you're in a dank basement.  This is definitively a place that I will not be returning to.
Me and my boyfriend have been wanting to try this place so we went last night. The second we walked in we were greeted by an annoyed glare. I immediately wanted to leave as the girl working wasnt even slightly trying to hide her annoyance with us. My boyfriend on the other hand, was over the top nice to her, seeing that she probably had a bad day. He basically apologized for our presence, and she still couldn't muster up a fake pleasant attitude.  As we had never been, we wanted to try some flavors, but she was so visibly annoyed, that we both just picked flavors to buy and left. Which was a bummer when we were looking forward to trying some of the fun flavors. My boyfriend then tipped her a wad of dollar bills and still nothing. Also, while we were taking a moment to decide what to buy, two other people came in and stood behind us. The girl leaned to look past us  and said "Do you guys know what you want?" Still very visibly annoyed.  Overall, I'm disappointed and pretty upset. We could go to ANY other ice cream shop, but we chose to drive across town to try this one, just to get treated like crap.  My boyfriend and I both work in the service industry so we are very understanding in situations like these, but this was absolutely unacceptable. We will not be returning.
Don't let the new building fool you, the employees inside are rotten as ever. The food was sub-par and the service was ridiculous! It felt like I was in downtown Mexico City, no offense there was no one speaking English except the lady taking my order. The drink machines were out of whatever the hell it is they take to make the drinks, and the napkins were completely out, it took close to 15 minutes for me to get a napkin. When I was finally helped (there was no line) the lady told me I will stick them up. I had to improvise and go to the restroom for a napkin, I barely stepped into the restroom when I turned around and walked out. It smelled absolutely disgusting. Not coming here again, I hope your experience is better, there's a chickfila right across the highway, or a bill millers just on with this frontage road. Check those places out if you'd like some guaranteed good service and experience.
I'm from Connecticut... the Chili's at this location is definitely not up to Connecticut standards... The food was atrocious the service was nonexistent the table sticky and I still left a 15% tip avoid this place at all cost!
Was excited to take my family here while we were visiting from WA in June for my sons 9th bday and it was the worst customer service ever! I was really excited to try Blue Star donuts in Portland bc it got such great yelp reviews. Pretty much the only nice thing that happened was when we walked in the hipster guy with the beard said a convincing welcoming 'Hi there!' And then after I asked if there were any other donut options( bc there were only 6! What kind of donut shop only has 6 options??!) available? Which I think was a valid question, right? I wasn't being rude at all! Just shocked at the very less than impressive display. And the fact that they are open until midnight I would think they would be making more. Well, apparently they got butt hurt that I would even ask a question! Excuse me for thinking they would happily explain how things are done to new customers! We ordered and ate our overly priced $3 per donut while the rude unfriendly Hipster douches gave me cold stares! It was seriously like a skit from the show Portlandia! So, if you want expensive and not very friendly Hipster service then go here! Thanks for ruining the first part of my sons 9th bday with your elitist hipster attitude!
What a train wreck. I almost got run over by a driver who was driving on the sidewalk as they were rushing to get to the valet. Sucky food.
Terrible. I ordered a pretzel and Saurbraten.   The pretzel was dry And the mustard they served with mixed with Apple sauce. Terribly sweet. Terribly sweet. Then  It took 45 minutes to get the Saurbraten.  Then when I got it it was so sickeningly sweet that I couldn't eat it. Sugar in the gravy with excessive as well as the sugar in the red cabbage. Spetzel could have been good if it had not had the gravy and theFlavor of the red cabbage mergingWith the spetzel.  Great concept but  Don't ever order the pretzel or Saurbraten!  Complete waste of time and money
Went Saturday 8/10/2013 at approx 3:15 pm......  Horrible service.  We arrived there and had no direction.  Some lady asked if she could assist(So we did not knowing was takeout only).  When we asked about sitting the waitress said NO! Emphatically.  This is for sit down customers only. We explained no one was there to guide us and she still didn't care.  We were the first ones in lime mind you.  The manager finally listened but at this point we demanded our $$$ back do to the rudeness of this tall waitress.  We got our $$$ back plus a gift card but I doubt we will go back. I am also writing the owner.  Basically we were talked down to in public.
This place was horrible. In addition to taking information 2 weeks prior to my visit, no one verified the insurance information. Then after my visit was complete and insurance information was verified, it turns out I wasn't covered. All of this should have been done and corrected in advance.
Yesterday at 1:17pm ·  Curra's Grill i am a regular about 4-6 tomes a month however i will not stand any eatery that treats folks much less the disabled as poorly as I was by what i believe to one its owners there were clean open tables that he not would seat me or the other disabled person we were told to wait out side with Everyone else which is not a solution i do not write this for me but any disabled person they have done wrongly they said thet were short staffed that does not mean tho seats were not empty and it was gonna be our turn any way not matter how ggod the coffee was so i wonder did this person have a stroke and not know better or were the true colors of his Biz finally coming to light if any one know the true owner i am willing not to escalate until i hear from them however if i am not contacted one way other the other i will have no option but to seek justice thru newspapers TV etc leading to a possible boycott willing to listen to reason if they have a good one until that time i am ashamed of every $ i have given them
Went in for a consultation in October 2016. It'd been 3 years since seeing a dentist and I wanted to start getting back on track. Staff was nice, but very busy. Got x-rays, had an exam with a hygienist, all was fine. The dentist then came in, looked at my x-rays and my permanent retainers (top and bottom) and said that he wanted to take the retainers out. Okay, that was fine, I was interested. The only problem, he said, was that due to shorter roots on one of my lower incisors, I was likely to lose a tooth. This apparently didn't faze him.  He started talking about bridges and implants, then asked if I knew what a veneer was. I said no, and he directed the nurse to show me a video on it, then left. With no further explanation, I was forced to watch a video of a veneer being installed, in extreme close-up. If you don't know what a veneer is, it's when your teeth are all ground down and they install 3/4 crowns on all of your teeth. Watching teeth being ground down is basically a scene from a horror movie. I was pretty appalled. Following that, they showed me an estimate for the removal of the permanent retainers (fairly inexpensive), a bridge (very expensive), and a night guard (very expensive), totaling nearly $4k. I left, shaken and convinced that I was going to lose a tooth and a LOT of money.  I ended up getting a second opinion at Conway Dental Care (to which I have now transferred). The dentist there asked if I had any pain (something the dentist at Bright Now didn't bother asking), and I said no. "If it's not broken, don't fix it" he said, after inspecting the retainers to make sure they actually weren't broken. He said that I just need to come in for a regular cleaning and they'll be fine. This was an immense relief that my new dentist didn't pressure me into getting a needless procedure that risks losing my teeth!  TLDR: Be careful with Bright Now - while the people who work there are plenty nice, the dentist will likely recommend unnecessary procedures without regard to your comfort, just to make a buck. Beware of large clinics. Get second opinions when you can.  Also: I can't speak to the quality of their work, as I have not had any work done here, just got scared off by their consultation.
Dear manager(s), what have you done to this place? It's the first time in my life I ate less than half of what I ordered, including the refried beans. How can you mess up refried beans? Just ask Los Loros. The burrito was covered in a red sauce that looked like something not from Mexico but from Mars; it was spicy in a burned-horseradish kind of way. Awful. Tried to eat the enchilada but all I could stomach were the chips and salsa. Oh, and the water. Won't be back. Sad... I just wanted some standard Mexican fare, nothing fancy. It was way sub-standard. How does that even happen?
This was a really disappointing experience. After reading all the great reviews I thought I would give this place a shot. first of all ,this place is like being in a small basement crammed with people with almost no space to walk around. I don't understand how people find this romantic i couldn't even have a conversation with my fiance it was that loud. The waiter sat us in a corner table that was so dark we couldn't even see what we were eating, actually the entire place is dark like a dungeon.The food was bland , for 10$ you get a salad that contains a few leaves of spinach with some beets cut and filled with cheese. The chicken was dry and pasta was like chewing plastic, but for the 38$ fixed price we had to scarf it down. The dessert was decent though I enjoyed it and that's the only reason I'm giving this place one star.
Don't go here unless you have plenty if time, they are slow!! Food is usually good but today (Saturday) got runny spinach dip and over cooked chicken strips :(  Update: I returned the runny spinach dip but still got charged for it. I frequent this location, usually during weekday flights and never had a problem with the food, guess Saturday should be avoided.
Cashier did not rung up all my purchase but charged me an arbitrary $8   Register showed $3 and change.    Happened quickly.   I didn't call him on it which I realize would have  Protected the store  Probably saved myself money    I feel ripped off!   Also noticed cashier eating behind counter   Barista was talking in the phone pacing back and forth.     Looked very very wired.    Big personnel issues!
The salmon po-boy was good, and the battered fish was ok. The fries that came with both were so over cooked and hard we couldn't eat them.
A basic venue for American food done (just) okay.  The beer was cold and the service was okay (thanks, Stephen!)--even with a trainee in tow.  Nothing really impressive here.  If you want a basic burger and overcooked veggies, go here.  If you have a choice, maybe Einstein's would be a better choice next door ...
Food cost $53 to feed our family of 7.  Employee made very rude comments to my Mother with head manager right there.  Salad was nasty and food cold.  Used to love Wendy's but this one is awful.  Won't go back.
Went to this panda location last week and couldn't believe it. Everything I touched was nasty. There was some kind of sauce on almost every tray. The floor and tables were not wiped off and were sticky. The manager was sitting at a table talking to someone and not running the shop. I won't go back to this location.
Its ok.  Big weirdly configured room, nice service.  Full service restaurant/bar.  Its ok.  Close to the airport, and won't break your wallet
I just left store after going all the way through it without one person asking if I needed help. Of course there was an attractive lady who followed after me who received service right away. This is a customer no service store.
This is a protest one star review, BRING BACK THE CURRY RIB SOUP! Or at least something with that curry broth, it was the best, sometimes I'd see a table of 4 order 4 bowls of curry soup. How they can take this off the menu is beyond me. The other dishes are OK, but I won't be back until the curry is back.
Don't go here for the food...  I've been here three times and each time I am disappointed. Maybe I need to lower my expectations. Today there were no avocados on my salad. I told the waitress, she asked if I wanted her to bring some out... I was already done with my salad so that was a no. My BBQ chicken Flatbread was dry and bland... To top it off the ice cream in his sundae was freezer burnt. Sigh. At least they have the decor going for it.
This place has the potential to be an awesome place...but really needs a quality control check. The bathrooms are gross. Door locks rusted and stained toilet seats along with some sort of spit wads all over the ceilings?? The people working behind the concession were really nice, but the girls behind the skate counter were rude and annoyed with us for even bothering them to ask for skates, and the guy behind the ticket counter ignored the kids needing their help while entering codes for a new item, until we had to get up and ask (as adults) for ten to help my child. Really needs to over view checking! Great place...just needs fine tuning.
This place is a complete wreck. I wait for 30 minutes to get my 4 for 4. Multiple people who ordered after me got there food first. The manager put my sandwich on the tray and it sat on the tray waiting for my other food for another 20 minutes. So my sandwich was cold. Then my fries were way way way over cooked. When I finally got my food the manager proceeded to SCREAM have a nice day at me because I didn't acknowledge her the first time she said it I just nodded. On top of all that the manger had 3 buttons undone on her shirt in the middle and she didn't have gloves on and she put her hands all over my fries. NOT SANITARY AT ALL!
Went here for mother's day brunch. It was pretty empty, granted we were one of the later seatings of the day. They had a buffet set up, which was OK. The food was decent, but the service was awful. Understandably the service for a buffet lunch doesn't need to be over the top, but we weren't even offered drink menus (at all). When I asked for a menu, the waitress just asked me what I wanted and tried to improvise it seems. I ordered a glass of Prosecco while my mother ordered a Bellini. When she brought the drinks, my Prosecco was pink (appeared to be a rose Prosecco, which is new to me) and my mother's Bellini looked like a Mimosa (with an orange in it). She didn't provide much explanation as to why my Prosecco was pink (fine) but then she proceeded to take it away from me before I was finished - my ultimate pet peeve. The rest of the experience felt rushed, I think all in were were there for under an hour.   For the amount we spent each ($45 for the buffet, $10+ each for the drinks) it was not worth it. Will plan better next time and avoid this place.
A poorly maintained course that, while perhaps considered cheap for 18 holes, is still over priced for what you get. The front 9 consists of wide open, straight ahead fairways, while the back 9 amps up the difficulty slightly and adds some woods to lose your ball in. However, crabgrass dominates the fairways and burns cover at least 50% of some greens. There is a good chance that your ball will end up on a dead spot of hardened dirt anytime you tee off. The course wrecks havoc on your score.  That said, the range is usually open and there is plenty of parking. I just can't justify spending $30 when you can travel west a few more miles and pay the same amount for a much higher quality course.
The place looked great and customer service was great as well. The French toast was horrible; tasteless, flavorless etc . The eggs, sausage, and grits were nasty as well. The pictures definitely look way better than what the food taste like .
Waited almost 20 minutes to print out 3 pieces of paper. I told the Store manager that the person at the print and copy needed help and that there was 8 people in line and he said that is normal. That is unacceptable and if a customer is brining  a concern to a store manager he should help out or provide assistance if possible.  I just left. Won't give these people my business anymore!
Coffee is always burned and order is often wrong. Walk down to the Porter DD instead.
Was visiting from out of town and waited for about 45 minutes then was told the kitchen was closed because the boiler caught fire!!!  I didn't believe it because the staff seemed overwhelmed and understaffed.
I stayed here with a small group (5 rooms) over a weekend.  Granted, we paid employee discount rate because one of our group works for Holiday Inn.  I am reviewing this based on what the going standard rate was for that weekend. Hell, who am I kidding?  Even at the discount rate it was an awful experience.  We were supposed to all be together, and while we were mostly on the same floor (but not all of us), we were scattered about on that floor.  But that's fine, I understand...even though the request was made and confirmed months in advance.  Part of this was because they thought everyone in the party had arrived, even after admitting that they had JUST been told two of couples were half an hour away, they had given our rooms to someone else!  When I checked in I was enthusiastically told I was "upgraded" from a double room to a King room (which is what I had booked anyway), and it was one of the newly renovated rooms!  How exciting, right?  Except it was right on the atrium, which is heavily under construction.  I get it, hotels need to remodel on occasion, but they just did not handle this well.  We were told what hours work was scheduled and that the evenings/night/mornings were quiet time.  HA!  Construction started over an hour early each day and went well into the evenings.  Being woken up at 6:30AM on a Saturday by loud yelling and heavy equipment was not fun.  It was even less fun on Sunday.  The TV has annoying settings to force you to see ads and such - took multiple clicks to actually watch the damn thing.  The WiFi was really bad.  I was able to surf the net, and pictures on Facebook and the like took only a tad bit to load, but could not even attempt to stream from my home server or use a VPN for work.  Parking was inconvenient at best - a lot of the parking lot is taken up by construction equipment and such.  Their lot is very strangely laid out.  This made getting to the hotel or onto the two highways extremely difficult and annoying.  You look at the location and think it's great, because it's at a major intersection, but it is a pain in the ass to get on the highways.
Service was good food was incredibly bland and over priced. I wouldn't recommend this place.
We waited for almost one hour and everyone came later than us has finished eating. So we eventually did not get food at all and we were in a rush. It is really disappointing.
Stoked when I started working downtown so I could snag my favorite bowls for lunch. This place has been a constant disappointment and most recently sent me back to work with a bowl of half rotten vegetables with a bug in it. They are out of condiments half the time and this whole place is disgusting in general. Overpriced trash compared to their other locations. No one in the entire Standard Insurance building office eats there.
The food at Hyde Park Bar & Grill is always just okay, with the exception of their fries.  I love their french fries!  The service leaves something to be desired.  On a recent trip there for lunch our waitress got really grumpy and moody when my friend wanted to change her order.  She kept up the attitude, for no apparent reason, for the rest of our meal.  I have probably been to Hyde Park Bar & Grill more times in my life than most any other restaurant in Austin, due to sheer proximity, but bad service is unexcusable, particularly for a restaurant with solidly mediocre food.  Sorry, HPB&G - I want to like you, but sometimes you make it difficult.
I have basically 2 options when it comes to getting marginally reasonably priced lunch delivered to me when I'm at work. Jimmy John's is one of those options and at almost $11 before the tip for a sandwich and a cookie, I use the phrase "reasonably priced" very loosely. This location definitely has consistency down pat. They consistently never include a single napkin in my delivery bag, consistently forget to put avocado on my sandwich when I pay extra for it, consistently either drown my sandwich in dressing when it calls for "regular" or only put it on half of the sandwich when I ask for "EZ" (thinking that maybe I'll get a regular amount if I ask for less), and consistently give me a soggy, loosely wrapped bundle of lettuce and lunch meat when I order an Unwich. Jimmy John's in general is NEVER my first choice. I'd rather pay the same price, if not less, and get a sub from Publix that uses meats and cheeses that are worth the ridiculous markup. Sadly, Publix does not deliver, so I am stuck with this Jimmy John's.
I don't know why we can't give them zero stars. The lady at the desk is very very rude. She has no people skills. She won't let people speak and don't inform you of nothing. This place is a rip off and should be shut down. They need to get someone else to work the desk.
Don't like to do a Yelp that's less than 3 stars normally. But in this instance, I feel that the excellent customer service etiquette was sorely missing here at this transit Starbucks.  In a hurry to catch a delayed plane and needing a quick caffeine fix! Thought I could satisfy the urge here but it was a cumbersome process. The cashier was S-L-O-W! Finally at the head of the line and I order a Green Tea Latte-cold!  Watch in awe as the Indonesian barista fouls up every order. The lady in front of me wanted a NON-FAT drink and reacts in horror as this barista uses full fat milk to pour!  My turn comes and I cringe as this poor, non-English speaker grabs LEMONADE and turns my drink into a Green Tea Lemonade concoction!   But I know my Starbucks "rights" and ask nicely if-for my trouble and understanding of the situation-that I may have the full-fat drink that the barista previously screwed up?  My wish is granted and I am off to the boarding gate races-2 drinks of my beloved java in hand!  There are so many out-of-work AMERICANS that, though illiterate and unintelligent-would LOVE to have a Starbucks job at the airport! Surely, HM Hosts could hire an unemployed person for this important public relations Starbucks position at Logan Airport!  In the meantime, I would advise the cashier to consume MORE CAFFEINE to speed up his service lines and the barista to review all Starbucks drink names so she can get it right the next time!
Average at best. Been twice second time definitely shame on me the second time.
We moved to Austin this past summer and kept hearing that we had to come check this place out. It was definitely over-hyped. We woke up early on a Saturday morning and were hoping to catch the sunrise. We were very disappointed. After, what I would consider a very short "hike" to the top, we arrived at the pavilion only to find that the vegetation was so tall that you could barely see anything. We wandered around, hoping that we had missed some trails that had better views, but we only found some spots where the views were slightly better than the view at the top. Unless you're looking for time to kill, I would not waste my time here.
The service was great and fast but the quality of the food is terrible. I ordered an 18" pizza with broccoli, spinach, mushrooms and chicken and a greek salad. The salad was most iceberg lettuce, barely any veges, like 3 olives, 2 pieces of tomato and drowning in feta cheese. The dressing comes in a packet which has high fructose corn syrup. The pizza: the crust was terrible quality, like thin, weak tasting stale white bread. The sauce was tasteless and the vegetables were overcooked and the chicken was totally dried out. As the pizza cooled it got worse. If you like QUALITY food and really enjoy a good slice, this is NOT the place for you. If you are more into substantial quantity then this is the place for you. Large portions, great service, HORRIBLE quality food.
Someone should have told me it's 60$ per a person for a dinner buffet because we have these two characters walking around..OUCHHHHHHH. If they had the seafood like they do on friday's i wouldnt be as pissed. I felt sooo embarrassed bringing my friends here...not knowing what we were in for since we were staying at the hotel. Having to cough up the bill for 4 people sucked majorly...
One star because most of the staff were very nice. Stayed here on a whim because the description looked so promising. So many pools, so much to do, so many activities. This is a time share resort where they want very much to sell you ownership, and these places and their high pressure sales techniques always leave me uncomfortable.   The place is so huge that it ought to have its own zip code. The streets are narrow, so there appears to be even more cars and bodies around. Check in time is at 4pm. Then you get taken to the overly friendly time share salesperson, who invites you to breakfast and won't take no for an answer. They extract $20 from you to make sure you show up. (After seeing the place, I sacrificed my $20.)  Finally, a bellman has you follow his golf cart in your car to find your room. By that time, it's 5pm.   We were excited to bring the kids to play on the 18 hole putt putt course right on property. Sounds much better than it is. However, when we got to the club rental place, they told us all equipment had to be back by 5:15pm. We had 6 minutes if we cared to use them. Of course, checkout time is 10am. Which us fine if you want to get to the parks, but means you have to get up at the crack of dawn to use the other facilities. The golf stand didn't open till 9. Ok, one "resort fee" not put to good use. At least the pool we swam in was well heated.   The room was disgusting, including countless hairs belonging to past visitors (owners, perhaps??) on the sheets, blankets and tub. The towels were threadbare and had rust stains that looked like streaks from somebody's butt (nice), and the shower had a crusty dried booger on the wall. We were in the "deluxe 1 BR suite", but I can't imagine it was any different than the cheaper studio. Scammed again.   I would rather spend a night in my car than stay here again, and I would no sooner buy than repeatedly poke myself in the eye. But, they've called 3 times a day since to see why I didn't show up for the sales breakfast! Must've been mighty tasty.
Terrible. Sit for an hour, then when your shuttle does come ride around for 2 hours to get to hotel ten minutes away. Straight junk, avoid.
Too many smokers on the porch. Supposed to be 15 feet from restaurant entrance and this is not enforced here :( yuck.
A place to avoid by any means!!!!  Waited 40 minutes to pick up a To Go Order that I placed on the phone 15min prior to my arrival on the spot.   37 minutes after eating the wings I got, here I am desperately looking for a bathroom...   I'll let you imagine the rest.
The worst experience I have ever had with any kind of eye care.      The  doctor who gave the eye exam was slipshod, disorganized. and distracted. Every prescription he did for me was wrong, and every prescription was wrong because he did not test properly in the first place.   He rushed through the exam  - failed to ask about dilation,  failed to use a reading card etc - and shuttled  me in and out of the exam room at 2 min increments  (he was also "examining" several other patients during the same 15 min stint.).  On top of that, he engaged in aggressive sales practices - my understanding was the doctor was supposed to have no interest or financial stake in the sales of glasses/lenses.  But here, in front of me, he set the price of a very $$$$ glasses I did not need  - luckliy I was wary by that point and did not make the purchase.  He also spent more time explaining different payment options than he'd spent  actually  examining my eyes.   The  prescription he gave me was a disaster - it made me naseous and dizzy .  I had to go back and have the part-time doctor make things right - which she did. But none of these problems should have happened in the first place.    And there  was a run-around about whether I would be "allowed" to get a refund for  the pair of glasses I did get there -- based on the faulty prescription the doctor there had provided!!!  (They were also unable to locate one of my prescriptions, because it was never written up. Looks like the  doctor had, literally, phoned it in.)  I had to get very pushy to get basic good business  practice, and simple fairness, out of this shop.   I never dreamed getting an eye exam would lead to a situation so tense and adversarial, but there you are.   You go to these places in good faith - expecting a competent eye exam by a competent practioner.   In my experience, the main doctor here operates in bad faith -- and is backed by a sales team that is aggressive and incompetent too.
11/8/2010 rvsd Never again will I go there! Customer Service- seems like if there a conflict w your order its your fault! Me in tears the Mgr says no faxes really?  That's why I was given one and confirmed. The Mgr walked away & seemed to careless. Nice!!!!!  They did my daughters 18th cake & royally messed up on it & it looked horrible. Even with a fax, called in & went over the order they didnt do it!!! Scrapped part of the top & messy looking. They offered make another one/deliver but there was really no time & actaully they were going to scrap the whole cake. REALLY not thanks, I'll go elsewhere for EVERYTHING!!! SO embarrassed, I asked for just a case out of the case but was handed the horrible one and said dont worry about the price. Kidding me!!!  Enjoy the archini's & the orzo salad.  Check your receipt for pricing since sometimes items ring up more. The only conflict is visiting in the pm is limited items (deli & bakery) gone. It's ok for me but NOT a regular basis anymore. Sometimes, it seems to ask a question(s) is bothering the staff.
Here is my suggestion for the owners. Go to Press Club wine bar in San Fran. Try to duplicate by the glass quality and value, and then you'll be able to call your establishment a wine bar. Mediocre wine at premium prices.
Been here before, and love the beer. But disappointed tonight to find that when they say "Open until 10p" that means last call is actually at 9:15p. Rosinlade is not convenient, and we drove out of our way for no reason. If you stop serving at 915p and you don't have anything else like food, you are closed at 915 and not 10p. I'll be sticking with their Canton location.
Went the other night, all 6 of us. Had several issues with the food. Two of us ordered the molcajete and lucky us, we had our food sitting in front of us for 10 minutes while we waited for the rest of the family's food to be brought out. The molcajetes were both missing the "zesty avocado salsa". The flank steak was very tough and the molcajete (yes, it's literally served in a molcajete) is about 8" high and bowl-shaped. It was challenging to cut through the meat, what with the butter knives we had.   Three of our party ordered fajitas, and, again they were missing the guac and also the salsa they were supposed to come with. They were also just round iron skillets with onions, peppers and the meat. I'm not sure if they're trying to make a minimalist statement by withholding beans, rice, cheese, pico de gallo, etc, but what the hay? Fajitas are kind of a diy meal. You get a bunch of stuff and you mix it up the way you like, right?  One of the fajita-orderers asked for salsa and it was crazy hot. I realize that heat is a subjective thing. Suffice it to say that my tongue can take some heat but this was habanero'ed. I could eat it but it was painful. I'm not saying I didn't eat it. I did. I can't NOT eat salsa if it's in front of my face. But I would have preferred more flavor, less heat.  In a nutshell:  The service was great. The food was palatable. The timing was horrible. And missing elements of dishes is kind of lame.   Won't be going back.
Generally clean, nice staff, but there was an intense musty smell that lingered in the room and hallways. Probably would not be staying here again. The damp carpet was especially worrying, but the beds were comfortable and clean.
Bad Food and even though its an all u can eat buffet is way over priced. Employees are OK but not exactly friendly enough.   Food Quality- (out of 5 stars) 1 Atmosphere ( out of 5 stars) 2 Service ( out of 5 stars) 1
High-end American. High prices but unimpressive service and taste. There is better in Harvard Square (try Upstairs on the Square instead).
This place is convenient but over the last month, I have decided not to eat there any more.  Here's why:  1) the enclosed pastry cases and the seating area were full of fruit flies, visible to everyone, and nobody seemed concerned; 2) they made a hot sandwich and left the deli paper on the meat so I bit into a mouthful of paper; 3) there was a creepy bug that crawled out of a grape cluster that was inside a fruit/cheese/cracker packaged snack.  Just too many disgusting things to warrant going back.  Too much trouble to go return to the cafe for 2) and 3).
More and more of Carey's cars are having air fresheners in them. I hate that smell. Makes me nauseous. And their reservation app has poor usability. The service is otherwise fine. Those problems are a major nonstarter for me. I'll update my review if they fix the smell problem.
This place needs a reality check.  "Our pastas are homemade so it fills you up faster."  Oh, really?  Is that how you explain $20 for a tiny portion of spaghetti & meatballs that you can finish off in 3.5 bites?  This is an f'n "nook" not a fine dining establishment.  If it were, the bar would be made of real marble (or at least granite) and not that cheap stuff that doesn't even feel like corian; and the waitress wouldn't be serving up her attitude dressed up in jeans and a tank.  The $16 pizza was decent though.  Almost as good as some of the $2 slices I can get at home.
this is really more or less based on their happy hour chicken wings. you get 5 wings (drummets) for 6 bucks. a couple of carrot and celery sticks and sauce. My question is, if you only get 5 of these (1.25 each) and if full price (not happy hour) is 9 bucks, then you get the same amount of only 5 wings? If so then it's a total rip. even the happy hour wings is a total rip. the 50 cent Tuesday deal seems more like it, but if the 'happy hour wings' are 6 bucks and you only get 5 then what gives? If the 'regular priced' wings 'if' (and I say if becuase I have no idea) you get more for 9 bucks, then the happy hour price really isnt a happy hour deal then is it? If the regular 9 dollar deal is say 10 wings, then if you get 5 for 6 bucks at happy hour, all they are doing is shorting you the wings! Happy hour means, you get the same amount as full price not a half portion! And what's up with the rest of the wing? The other part of the wing has more meat than some of these drummets do.
Not sure what all the hype was all about - but definitely will NOT be back.  Atmosphere was alright. Food was definitely not up to par.  ordered: - REGULAR BURGER - it was definitely "regular".  The "bakery" bread was sweet and the burger was way TOO small for the bread. - SALMON BURGER - same smallness or thinness.  Very fishy smelling. - ONION STRINGS - very oniony. - FRIES - nothing special - could've used a bit more salt. - TATER TOTS - The best - very crunchy.  WARNING:  Don't waste your $$$$ here - Go to WILD WILY'S instead.  More burger, fries and rings for your buck and a lot tastier.
Not impressed. Don't get the mussels (sauce terrible and a few were undercooked) and the ribeye steak was full of fat. The entertainment was the best part of the night. They give the kids only 2 overcooked chicken tenders with fries for $9.  Very overpriced. My husband left hungry and I left with an upset stomach.  Service was good. Service and entertainment allowed me to give it 2 stars.
I called in an order to pickup ahead of time and was told it would be a 30 minutes. When I arrived 30 minutes later, I had to wait an additional 30 minutes. When the food was finally brought there was no apology or explanation. It was not busy. I used to cook and understand the "weeds" and there were none to be found, yet the service was exceptionally slow and unfriendly. So disappointing.  The rolls and edamame were not good enough to help me forget about the experience.  During the wait, there was a family who had wanted to order some spring rolls when they realized their kiddos were still hungry after they had finished their meal. When the dad went to order, the lady behind the register said it would be about 1/2 an hour for the spring rolls. That's insane!  Especially with 3 small hungry kiddos!  Not cool Banzai. Not cool.   I'd suggest passing this place by.
Nice atmosphere but expect to wait if there are more people than you. We got ignored for quite a while, and our dessert (which were all premade) took forever to come out. I ordered a pot of tea and they put WAY too much tea in the ball, so it was super over steeped and bitter. I had the mocha almond torte which was very nice but everyone else at my table was disappointed by their desserts.   Haha oh yeah, when I asked out waitress what kind of Chai they had on the menu she looked at me like I had asked the most obscure question in the world, "uumm.... CAFFEINATED?" I could only blink and respond, "Um, no, I mean which brand?" it was awkward. Probably wont be back.
NOT RECOMMENDED FOR BIG GROUPS Not happy about the manager .   The food is 4star, We Have come here before with big groups before and never told to sit in 2 different tables. So much for celebrating my bday and not even be able to sit with my family. It was Tuesday 7/28 morning and they said there is not enough room to fit 3 tables together.  There was 3 tables around us that were empty when we sat down. There was room to put 3 tables together, but instead he thought it was smarter to put 2 tables together for  6 of us and another 2tables together for only 4 people. Right there money lost for the restaurant, cause they could of sat another 4 people on that unnecessary table.  We got there at 11am & waited 40min to get drinks. Thank goodness I brought my own drinks for the kids. 40min for Orange juice!!! I ordered the kid meals with the drink and they still had to wait 1 hour for their food. While the adults waited 1hour & 30mim. We got out of the restaurant at 1:10. It was breakfast at lunch time. They had to be understaffed, because I could tell our waiter was struggling, he was nice but feel bad for him for who he has to work with.   The manager came and "apologized", comped part of our meal. But it was not good enough. I still believe he didn't want to help to sit us together and used poor judgement setting up the tables. There was no need to put 2 tables together for only 4 people. They were acting like trendy snobby hipsters, I feel they would of being more accommodating at an ihop. I regret my decision of not going to kerbey lane instead.   Plus the kitchen must of set a plastic container on and the entire restaurant was filled with the burn plastic smell. One of my family members had to go outside. NO ONE apologized for that, people on other tables were asking what happened kimberly is the greatest no one said sorry.  If you are waiting for a table right now or are planing on going here and you get there and there is a long wait. It is because the front of the house is not functioning right. It takes a long time to get your drinks after u sit down, and will take at least 1 hour to get your food.  Breakfast was good. My 6 year old had the traditional Benedict, he ate the entire thing. My 3 year old had the carrot french toast. It was good huge serving, very very sweet. Me and my sister had the migas steak Benedict. It was good, just felt short on hollandaise, dish was a lil dry. My husband had the goat cheese omelet with caramelized onions and artichoke, it was my favorite dish. My mother in law got the traditional Benedict, she enjoyed them My dad ordered the crab Benedict. The eggs were shaped like a poached egg but it was more like egg whites with spinach and bacon that were put on a mold. He was expecting a poached with a layer of spinach and bacon but he said it was still good. As of the other part of my party. Couldn't tell what they had ordered.
It makes me sad to write this but I can't hold back. Uchiko has always been a favorite of mine. Last night I went there and it was just nowhere near the experience I am accustomed to. We got the tasting menu, and the courses came out so slowly that I had to order more side dishes in between two of them so we wouldn't starve. I have to eat gluten free and by the time I got home I had a huge rash all over my throat. I am not that sensitive so it had to have been a LOT of soy sauce or something in the food. I mentioned needing gluten free everything at least 4 times to the waiter. I realize it is annoying to prepare food according to dietary restrictions but for $500 I kind of expect them to put in the effort if they assure me it is being taken care of.  In the future when I want to have a superb dinner I will be going somewhere else.
My one experience here was scary....total used car salesmen.  Since I was a first time buyer, they offered to cut the price in half.  The catch was I had to buy right then....no time to think about it, no return....just hand over my hard earned cash.  Go to Shane Co.
It's hard not to love PF Changs. The food is always good, the drinks too (especially the Asian Pear Mojito). The service at this location was pretty bad; the servers were slow and forgot a part of our order. We had to wait for 20 minutes to be seated although the restaurant was only half full. I'm happy to give them another try, but not if I'm in a hurry.   Update: I decided to them another try. After being seated (within 3 minutes of getting there - with no reservation) we waited 20 minutes for a server to take our drink order. We gave up, got up and left. The restaurant wasn't even half full, and there was enough staff on hand to help. Very disappointed yet again.
The last three times we've gone here our food has been soggy with oil.  I understand we're having fried food, but I think the issue is they've gotten so popular (which is great) that the constant use of the friers aren't allowing the oil to heat up properly and so fried food is more like soggy oil food rather than a nice crisp fried texture that it's supposed to be.  The first time things were south we thought it was a fluke.  The second time, we were like, what's happening to this place.  The third time we decided we can't go back.  The cost is too high to leave dissatisfied.
The soup there is basic, nothing special about it.  They give you pop chips with a sandwich, but don't ask which kind you would like. (Who like potato cheddar, honestly.) The salad bar is nice since you pay by the container ,not the weight. Good for fruit salad. But regular salad gets gritty wilted lettuce. Not so super, eh?
I am completely appalled that the owner is harassing dissatisfied customers. You have the right to own a business and suck at it, and we have the right to review it. One more issue of harassment and I WILL be contacting the Better Business Bureau, as well as the city inspector to review your business practices. Your poor treatment to animals and humans should honestly land you behind bars.
Mediocre coffee at best. Never coming here again. I ordered a coffee and it came hot instead of iced and I politely asked if I can have it iced. The rude  barista tells me that it costs $5 and he won't make it again... Yes I know it costs $5 because I already paid for it asshole! Then he paid a big deal when I asked him to give me a cup with ice after he refuses to make me another drink. Such a simple request in my part didn't deserve such attitude. Please learn about good customer service especially when one is paying so much for a watered down drink at best. I will rather go to any Starbucks in the area ( there are two) than ever go to this place again as there is friendly staff and cheaper drink options.
Service poor , music loud . Not the place it use to be. We were sitting at bar long time before being spoken to and longer yet to get service .
I feel bad about giving this place a bad review but, hey, it's my job to give heads-up to Yelpers.  Thank me at your leisure.  The guilt I feel comes from the fact that the service was nice and the place was clean.  Please note:  +1 star for hygienic environment and basic human decency.  Now for everything else.  The prices were outrageous.  Overpriced by about 50% would be my guess.  They have a weird per-person pricing system that seems to function to make things more expensive.  The food was too bland.  What was especially noticeable was that the spicy vegetables were not spicy enough.  There were two types of injera (the spongy bread) and only the one underneat the food (the "plate") was good.  They offer you the option of dining on a western-style table or a more traditional place-setting that resembles a basket.  It's a neat trick; it makes you feel like you're making choices from the get-go.  Ethiopian food is unique, flavorful, and not frou-frou; the fact that Asmara turned it into something bland and unremarkable is just heart-breaking to me.    Here's the most useful piece of advice in this review:  The best ethiopian food in the world outside of Ethiopia is, for my money, in Washington DC.  There's a HUGE East African population (e.g., Somalis, Eritreans, etc. etc.)  They demand good Ethiopian food--and they get it.    I know that a lot of Yelpers travel a good bit.  You may find yourself in DC sometime soon.  Save your  Ethiopian adventure for when you're in our nation's capital.  (Make sure to visit "the U St. corrider" the neighborhood U between 12th and 9th.)  If you get Ethiopian food in DC, you're in for a treat.  If you get Ethiopian food at Asmara, you're destined for disappointment.
Don't ever do business with State Farm! Horrible service! They will do everything in their power to screw you and not pay your claim. Don't ever do business with McCollum auto body either. This is a state farm preferred body shop and they do horrible work. Very unprofessional.
Please go elsewhere! Run down.  Upon arriving front desk were just rude. They charge an extra $34 "resort fee" but this is no resort. They take a $50 room key deposit, actually have never seen this before.  Parked a football field away because that is all that was available.  Rooms are dated.  TV was broken, after trying to fix ourselves we called maintenance who had to move furniture and plug in all cables correctly.  Grill on a/c busted out, paint flaking off ceilings, floors look dirty, dated bathrooms. I have stayed in better hotels for $50 a night. Paid $172 a night plus the $34 resort fee. I gave a second star because the maintenance person was helpful but otherwise it would have been 1.
Saturday night on Valentines Day weekend. The call ahead told of new changes that there was no reservations or call ahead seating. Our wait at 7PM was 35min. The bar staff was friendly and accomodating considering that they would rather fill their chairs with dinner and drink checks. We noticed patrons leaving 35 cents for a $10 tab because their table was ready. Please tip all staff accordingly. They are taxed on 15% of their total sales for the evening. We are not big fans of the hi-top tables, but their largest dining area had been converted to these. You could not turn your head without seeing at least 4 TV's in front of you. The music was acceptable, but really neede to be lowered. Good greif, I've grown into the old person that says "It's to loud". Many restaurants do not play TV volume, and compensate with their choice in music. Remember when this place had channel selector box's on the table to let you choose what you wanted to hear? She had the Baby back ribs, and I the St. Louis style. They used to come to your table, open a bag for rib bones, explain the sauces, and ask if you were in need of anything extra. This was a drop and run. We opened our own bag and asked another server what the different sauces were. My corn side dish went back right away because it was barely warm. So did my replacement corn. I switched to cole slaw. Next my ribs went back because they were not succulent at all. They were over-smoked to dry. I switched to pulled pork, because I knew it only needed to be plated from a steam table. I wanted to eat with my wife, not watch her while they cooked something else. The mark of a customer service retaurant is one that apolagizes and compensates to make it right. 2 cold sides, and a bad entree resulted in the check being changed to remove the item and add the new. It was dropped on our table with out an offer of dessert. This was all going on while staff huddled nearby dragging together tables, discussing it, and dragging them apart. They did this twice. Trying to decide if it would be too crowded to sit that many people around that small of a table. TWICE. My wife said the bathroom was well used and OK clean, but a staff member was tiding up as she was leaving. We navigated our way out through the loitering staff as well as the patrons. I wish we hadn't cacelled our reservations at La Scala.
Bluehour used to be among my favorite restaurants in Portland, but after brunch on Mother's Day I don't think we will be going back.  We were seated and waited for quite a long time to put our order in, which would be fine, the company was good and we were visiting.  The problem occurred after we had been sitting for 1 hour and 20 minutes and still had no food in front of us.  Luckily we did not have small children with us.    It was 1 hour and 30 minutes from the time we sat down until our food arrived.  In that time we had to ask for water and coffee every time, our server came by voluntarily one time and when I asked for some bread for our son we were brought biscuits that were "on the house". I understand that it was a special occasion, but the restaurant was only half full and of those tables I would guess that most had reservations, so they knew what they were getting in to for the day.  When our food finally did arrive half of it came  a full 5 minutes after the first half.  The one order of steak and egg was both cold and missing the egg.  We sent it back, after 5 minutes it returned not re-fired but simply re-heated with an egg thrown on top, so that the steak was then over cooked.  I am so sad to have to remove bluehour from our list of favorites, or in fact choices, I'm afraid the other restaurants in the chain will likely fall off the list as well.
At a friends house watching the NFL playoffs and he asks Round Table or Belagios. I say Round Table... big mistake! They not only took forever to answer the phone. The delivery took over an hour (which is fine). But hr asked for Cheese & Peppers (because I like to eat my pizza the way I want)! And still nothing. So we call back real quick to catch the driver to see if he has any in his car. BUT.... NOBODY WILL ANSWER THE DAMN PHONE! It's now 10pm at night on a Saturday and they still haven't answered the phone. So now myself and my friend will get delivery elsewhere and spread the word that this location can't take simple orders and they certainly don't know how to answer the damn phone .
I feel it is my civic duty to deter you from eating here. How serious am I? I made an account just to write this review, so.....  I went to Chedds last night on a whim because it sounded like a novel concept: grilled cheese. How can you mess up a grilled cheese sandwich? Imagine all the cheeses they can squish between bread! Delightful.  We walked in and it was apparent that this was not the type of place I needed to be. There were all these crayon-scribbled pictures of cheese from kids lining the counter, so automatically I'm like, oh, this is one of THOSE places. Aesthetic judgment aside, I went for a BCT -- bacon, tomato, spinach, mayo and smoked cheddar on wheat. Simple enough. I asked for a cup to get some of their unsweetened iced tea from the fountain. This is where the real trouble begins.   As I was getting my tea, I noticed the strange, vague smell of bad eggs. I thought this was due to the fountain station's proximity to the trash can. I was incorrect. I sat down and took a sip of my iced tea and it tasted sort of foul. I couldn't quite place the actual flavor, but something was clearly not okay about this tea. I opened the lid to smell it (because of course I did), and it smelled like rotten eggs, sort of like sulfur. How does this even happen to iced tea? I had my companion smell the tea, and he agreed that it smelled awful.   I went to the counter to point out this atrocity to the greasy-haired slacker employee. I told him he should smell my drink. He said, "No, I'm good. I'll check on it, though." He gave me a new cup. I hesitantly got myself a Dr. Pepper. In all fairness, he did change out the iced tea immediately, but a smell of that caliber makes me think maybe some heavy duty irrigation of the iced tea machine is in order. Look, I'd be pretty disaffected if I worked at a grilled cheese shop, too, but this was unacceptable.  The sandwiches themselves are not actual grilled cheese sandwiches. They're more like panini sandwiches, made in a big flat press. They're greasy, the bread doesn't adhere to the cheese, and they're mediocre in flavor at best. You could make a better sandwich at home for much less.
Ehh, I can't think of any reason to return here.   Lunch service is slow. Perhaps hire more servers?  I had a cocktail which was pretty good and an ok burger.   I asked for some blue cheese dressing for my fries (yes weird I know). First time ever I've been charged for it. It came in one of those thimble cups no less.  On my bill it read "dressing side $1.00"
This past Saturday 7/14, I called around noon to check if a pre-owned A4 was on the lot since I was going to be driving all the way from Tampa to ensure I didn't waste my time. I talked to a woman who said the vehicle was still available and that she would even call me if the vehicle sold in the meantime.   I ended up arriving around 4pm or so only to sit down and find out the car sold the previous night!! Thank you for making me waste 4 hours of my Saturday and gas money to get over there. To top it all off, apparently there was a big bolt or screw in the parking space where I parked. As soon as I left the lot and started heading down the road I heard a clicking noise, pulled over and sure enough a big bolt/screw in my tire. Thanks for nothing.
Service was no good and food was not what we ordered. We were on our way to catch our bus home when we visited in April '12 and saw this place as soon as we got off the T so we thought we'd try it out.   The place is small and there is no order to the line. So people get antsy, especially since the service is slow. The girl who "helped" us was not very nice, didn't let us finish ANY of our orders (she'd make incorrect assumptions and try to finish our sentences, only to have to fix it later). When she repeated our order (after I asked her to) two of our five items were wrong and one was not even there. So we repeated our order. We ordered a bagel with ham, cheese and egg and another with cream cheese and egg. We never got our brownie (because even though we repeated it three times she didn't ring it up) and so we had to ask for it in the front of a line of disgruntled people who'd been waiting for awhile. And when I opened my sandwich on the bus I got a ham, egg and cream cheese bagel and my boyfriend got a bagel with cream cheese. Nothing like what we ordered... AND WE REPEATED IT! Twice!  We'll be sure to avoid this place when we visit Boston again.
THEY HAVE MICE! I was having a great dinner with friends, celebrating my friends birthday party.  A mouse was standing at our table while we were eating.  When we startled it,  it ran across the dining room table.  My friend's birthday party was ruined and others left. I feel like I shouldn't have to pay for this. The manager did nothing to accommodate me. When I came into this establishment, I did not expect a rodent fest in the kitchen.  I am outraged. Do not eat at Joe's bar and grill.  Legacy place is across the street.  Find some where else unless you want mice feces in your food.  Eat here at your own risk!
Came here for the first time and the store had a huge selection. The vibe was really weird and I felt like I was being watched and rushed. Not like most smoke shops were people are chill and helpful.
I had a very poor experience at this nail salon. I came here for years because I love the work two of their employees did. However, my last experience wasn't as great the women who did my nails left gel all over my fingers Andy toes looked like I did them at home. I also told her that the color on my toes didn't math my fingers and she insisted it did. Once I got outside and seen it didn't and the mess left on my skin, I immediately went back and spoke to the owner. He became rude and told me he would fix two finger nails (at minimum five were a mess). He also said he didn't care about my toes. I made an appointment to come back the next morning. When I got there the first woman had an attitude and told me my toes were not her problem. Then she got up and told me she would not do anything. Then the women who initially messed up sat down to do my nails... Unacceptable! I had to argue with the owner to get my toes and fingers done correctly. I was not mad at the initially employee, I just didn't want her to mess up again and I would've continued to go if I was handled appropriately. Although the two former women that did my nails kept me coming back, I refuse to give them anymore of my money ($65 biweekly) due to their customer service. They had no concern for a customer who went to them faithfully and referred friends/family to them.
Met my expectations for a dealership- extremely overpriced. Charged me $720 to replace an axle boot I had done elsewhere for $180. Shame on me for not getting a second opinion at that time.
A while back, I gave this place a great review.  Lisa is an amazing nail technician. Today I made an appointment for 2 PM. I was 12 minutes late. When I walked in the door the RUDE lady sitting up front let everyone know I was 12 minutes late. She did not give me enough time to apologize she only said you'll now have to wait.  I asked would be 30 minutes she said again, you were late. I thanked her and left. Customer service will make or break a business. No matter how great you are there's a way to treat people.
This used to be a great store. It lasted for many years until the corporate f&ckwits at Sprouts decided to buy it and they probably knew at that time they would close it. And indeed they will as of Dec. 18.  AFTER installing signage, changing over the registers, and improving the overall appearance and stock.  This is disgusting and unacceptable. Is it not possible to keep a single decent neighborhood store in this town?   I'd like to announce my one-person boycott of all Sprouts stores. If I'm going to go to some soulless yuppified money trap why not go to Whole Foods? At least the old Sun Harvest had its narrow lanes and personality.
Disappointed. Normally I don't write a bad review the first time I go somewhere new but this place bugged me.  I ordered two things a bacon poutine and a chicken club sandwich both were underwhelming and the service was poor.  Where to start..  False advertising, it is personal now!  When I order something that clearly states what it is like a BLT, I don't expect to get a roast beef on rye.  So when I order a BACON poutine, don't give me diced ham, bacon is a cured meat, ham is roasted, both can be smoked but they have very different flavours.  Gravy should not be thinner then water..  Fries should not be undercooked.  Sad that such a simple thing can go so wrong.  On to the chicken club sandwich, to make this sandwich look bigger they use a dinner role as a bun. The chicken nice and crispy but there was more breaking then chicken. Oh and did I mention the liberal sweet sweet mustard sauce that was all over this thing!  I picked up the sandwich and the bun was soaking in it, inside and out, I could not taste anything else but the sauce.  No where on the menu did it say anything about that sauce, and the server never asked me what I wanted or did not want on my sandwich.  And the final slap on the face, the two guys running the kitchen never even bothered to come out of the kitchen, it was too much for one of them to take my order at the front counter.  The same guy who made my food also passed my the debit terminal without cleaning his hands or wearing any gloves.  Someone needs to learn some food safe and customer service.
I must be missing something. I just spent $112 for flowers sent for the birth of my granddaughter.  I asked if that was enough to get a real "special" arrangement. I was so embarrassed when I saw it and it looked like a $45 arrangement.  To make matters worse it was dwarfed by a $75 arrangement sitting next to it from a different florist. I do not recommend this florist and will not be doing business with them again.  Very disappointed .  One star is actually too high.
I need the kind of service provided by a "CO-OP" car outlet and, after doing my homework on the 3 players in Vancouver, decided MODO fit my needs best.  An email with a couple of basic questions netted a vague, curt response 2 days later. Not impressed.  A phone call about the same basics and to enquire about the paperwork needed from ICBC resulted in the same snarky response from a woman who couldn't answer some of the questions and was vague on others. Lot's of "um, ah" and "I guess" replies. Not impressed  Perhaps I just got a temp in both instances but really, I didn't feel very welcome.  I will likely still join and try it for a month. The relatively low cost should negate any abuse, as long as they apply quality service when really needed.  I will report back once I have had a chance to really test the system.
If you wanted to go for Vietnamese food and you were on a date, then I would suggest this place. Other than that....go elsewhere.  The interior is nice. The place definitely looks the best out of the Vietnamese restaurants in Chinatown. They have a ton of seats as well.  The pho I had there was very basic. The broth was pretty flavorless. The meat was fully cooked when it got to my table, and the toppings were skimpy and not that fresh. Very average. The pho at Xinh Xinh is much better.  Service was ok. Not friendly, but not rude either.
Meh. Quote from the menu, "two guys from Brooklyn say "it's betta than good". #ThatNeverHappened  Ordered cheese pizza, and like all places exploiting the NY reference, it only served to disappoint. Flavorless.   The place is large with a good size patio and they serve beer and wine so in the summer it might b a place to unwind with some friends. Inside could use some maintenance and updating but decent enough for a casual weeknight 'Italian' RN in the neighborhood. But if you're actually craving pizza, keep looking.
Worst pizza experience I've had in a long time. Two pizzas showed up, not one slice was cut through and there was practically no sauce on the pizza. Also the crust was shaped like they were going to make a stuffed crust pizza (which I hate). I should've called papa Johns
I only give this a two star because it used to be a 5 and now it's a 0! They changed their quality of meats and the food is disgusting, my favorite was their general tso chicken, last 2 times I have gone no joke I swear it's not chicken... and I really don't wish for anyone to find out what it really is!
I was shocked at how terrible their customer service was. The woman I talked to was very condescending and even told me to go somewhere else when I was just hoping to have a vehicle inspection before driving across country. I am definitely taking my business somewhere else.
I came to this place out of good recommendations to watch the Colombia vs. Peru game and I have never been more disappointed. I paid a 5 dollar cover to watch the game and was completely disappointed to walk in and see them streaming the game on various websites and Facebook. The streams have fallen and the quality is horrible. They could have easily prepared and actually payed for a quality stream, for example the dedicated Bein Sports 3 stream that was showing the game, rather than trying to cut corners with free but bad internet streams. The management was not prepared at all for this event and there were not enough seats as well. I had to sit on the floor. If I could give 0 stars, I would. I would not recommend coming to an establishment that would cut corners in-spite of obvious profits, which hurts its own clientele, and that would so sloppily prepare for such a big event that could further its name and business. From a bar manager that would love to fix the situation at this establishment.
Unbelievably rude encounter - phoned regarding a specific item and was told by Chris would hold it for me, called back to double check and let them know I would be coming in to pick up and Rob assured me he would be in the entire day and it was a-ok. When I arrived to get the item later, was told they couldn't find it. Employee phoned Chris who then said it was on a first-come first-serve basis - blatant misrepresentation either in person or later on in the day - either way incongruent and bad business.
I went to Sahara to see whether there was any validity to the reviews I've seen online. I went in with the benefit of the doubt that it would be an enjoyable experience. Unfortunately it was not.  The venue is rather small. Two rooms separated by an archway. I went on a Saturday night around midnight, paying the $10 cover charge at the door. The ambience is very urban. Rap music floods the venue from the small DJ booth in the corner by the bar. After waiting nearly five minutes at the bar, I paid for 2 Heineken's at $6 a piece, before walking around to find a seat. But there wasn't any. Packed with well over 50 people, seating was only enough to hold about 20 and was primarily for hookah users. The booths which lined the wall costs $350, which to be honest is about $275 too much. I left after only spending 20 minutes inside.  For a club the size of my apartment, I'd rather stay at home, listen to Future on Pandora and crack open a 6-pack from the local package store. Just disgraceful. I will NOT be coming back.
Extremely long delivery times consistently and incomplete orders and lack of concern ! Not planning to order again
I have never left a one star review for a business before. I am fully aware and appreciative of the hard work it requires to run a business and be in the service industry, but the experience we had at Trattoria di Monica was truly inexcusable. They made us feel unwelcome and discriminated against as non-white Americans.  My family and I had made in person reservations midday for an 8 pm dinner for a party of 3, where we left our name and contact number. We arrived at the restaurant for our dinner at 7:55 pm - where we were told it would be 15 min before we could be seated. So we ambled around the neighborhood and returned at 7:10, proceeded to wait in front of the restaurant and at 7:15 went in again to ask about our table. We were brusquely told by the hostess it would be another 5 min at least. So we walked down the block and returned again at 7:20 and went in to check on our table again. This time the waitress simply said she had given our table to another party because we had missed our reservation! They had JUST been seated. She was rude and unapologetic, blaming us for not being at the entrance when the table was ready. When asked if they tried calling our number given we had checked in with her 2x, she simply made us feel like we did not understand how things worked. Her demeanor was disrespectful, righteous, and truly disheartening. There was no attempt to accommodate or have us as patrons.
AWFUL. Was trying to support local business so did not read reviews. Livid with how ruined my clothes turned out. Was visiting from out of town so can't even go back to get shunned away by the grouchy old woman. TAKE YOUR CLOTHES ELSEWHERE!
Had a pretty lousy experience here.   I wouldn't say it was busy but the person ahead of me took forever. The workers were really slow. I ordered a simple iced coffee.. nothing special, just an iced coffee. I patiently waited and the person behind me got their order first and they ordered numerous items. The girl who took my order looked at me and realized they'd forgotten to make my order but didn't even really care to do it and just took her sweet ass time. Gave me my order like nothing happened. Tool
Right now, my car is sitting in their garage having been towed because it ran out of oil on me on my way to Natick due to improper instillation of the oil filter. Yesterday.  I got my oil changed yesterday and now oil has leaked out and along side the motor. My seven year old daughter and I were stranded in Natick!  We have been customers of this location for nearly seven years.  SEVEN YEARS. THREE CARS. We were there when Gordon was the manger and now Fitz. For the most part, we've been happy,  loyal faithful customers.  But today, oh, today when I promised to take my daughter on a special outing in Natick, the car wouldn't accelerate and the engine began knocking right as we pulled into the parking lot of the Natick mall. I had to take my car to a Sears auto repair shop to confirm that yes, my motor does not have any oil, and yes, the knocking and lack of acceleration was due to the lack of oil, and oh yes there is serious damage to my engine.  Damage that WAS NOT there prior to taking my car into the Monro. Our car has only 81341 miles on it--damage of this magnitude is ridiculous.  Absolutely ridiculous.  As a loyal customer I expect  my car to be repaired in a timely manner, completely and without additional cost to us.  I will say this, that after several phone calls this evening to the shop close to the end business, Rick, the manager on duty, finally got a hold of Fitz on his cell phone and Fitz authorized payment of a tow truck from Natick to Watertown to get our car back the the shop. This good faith gesture communicates culpability and interest in making us whole. Therefore, I have faith that they will make this right.  Monro was are "go-to" place for several years and now we've lost faith in their abilities.   Expect an update review.  They need to prove they are still worthy of our trust and confidence.
Went here with my friend last week for Naengmyun (Korean icy noodle) and some deepfried chicken. First off service was very slow. I had to remind the waitress for water, banchan (Korean side dish) and condiments (vinegar and mustard).  When the food came Mool Naengmyun (cold noodle with soup) tasted alright. The soup was sour and sweet which I didn't mind. Meat slice topping was so dry it wasn't good. And the waitress helped cutting noodle twice that I ended up scooping the noodles. She did it in the rush I think. As for boneless chicken it was lukewarm. Should've been hot and crispy at first bite. It didn't impress me.  As for price Naengmyun costed too much which is $9.99 and $4.99 for boneless chicken. It wasn't worth the price. Rather go elsewhere.
Terrible delivery experience. We ordered a hot and sour soup, egg drop soup, chicken with eggplant in supposedly spicy garlic sauce, and beef with broccoli. We ordered at 8pm and were told they'd deliver by 8:45pm. Three phone calls later, the food finally got here at 9:30pm. Absolutely unacceptable, especially since we kept being told lies as to how much longer it would take. Now to the food... the egg drop soup and the beef were just okay; the eggplant chicken was not spicy but sweet - it actually tasted good anyway, so that was fine, but it was not as described. The worst part was the hot and sour soup though, it was inedible!  It was neither hot nor sour, but instead tasted like pure oil. Disgusting. Definitely will not be repeat customers and cannot recommend this place to anyone.
Okay place, Terrible wait time.  Good atmosphere, decent food.  I don't understand a Saturday brunch menu until 3pm.  I won't be back
I've been here 3 times and have never had a good experience. Over-rated expensive cocktails and awful service. I've never had a ruder welcome (if you can call it that) to an establishment. When I complained to the manager he told me it wasn't his problem. Actually it kind of is. Hit up keefer bar or the diamond if you want real cocktails.   Smell ya later juniper!
We live in the suburbs and used to frequent the Newbury Street location whenever we'd visit the city, and sometimes drive down just to have a cup of coffee and one of the homemade Lebanese cookies the owner used to make. Well now that the cookies are gone and the Newbury place closed down we thought we'd give the West Newton location a try.   When my wife presented her L'Aroma loyalty card we were surprised to hear the person running the shop saying they don't honor "cards with round punches, since anybody can make a round punch," essentially insinuating we might be cheating -- for a cup of coffee???   Bad taste, no matter how good the coffee is. We will never be back.
After driving down from Boston, we found out that it would be a hour and a half wait- we figured since it was a Saturday night that it was okay. About 30 minutes later we received a text to get our table, but since we were estimated longer we had already gotten drinks somewhere else nearby and they had to cancel and resubmit our reservation after we returned to Wahlburgers. Another half hour later, we had finally gotten a table, but could not leave like they had mentioned the first time around since we were nervous our table would be given up again. Once seated, I ordered the thanksgiving burger, and my friend ordered the monthly burger. The thanksgiving burger was a good idea on paper, but not in actuality, however it was manageable to eat. On the other hand. The monthly burger tasted just like fish, after taking a second look at the menu we saw that there was a salmon burger on the menu and that was the culprit. The burger was cross contaminated and tasted AWFUL. I am giving them two stars because of the sweet potato tots and the three dollar beers.
This sounds kinda bad, but I almost burst out laughing when I stepped inside this museum.  It's a LOT smaller than what I remember as a kid.  Also, you know you're not in Houston or Cape Canaveral for sure.  Pay parking is available in the giant lot out front, but why throw money away when you can park for free a block away?  Admission here is pretty steep for what you get  ($15 for an adult), and several of the exhibits are pretty dated.  CRT screens still?  Really?  Fortunately, the few kids running around were oblivious to this fact.  To give them credit, the models of the various satellites sent up over the years are pretty interesting to look at.  And of course, there's that famous moon rock that you can actually touch - 1 of 5 touchable specimens in the world.  I didn't know the moon was dark brown.  If you've never been to a space museum, then this could whet your appetite, but if you've been to any of the NASA ones, then don't bother with this one.
I moved to Boston from Abu Dhabi and was excited when I saw Caffe Nero.  I work around the corner from Nero and have been there a few times.  It's a nice atmosphere and I love their chai lattes but the coffee and pastries are mediocre.  The service also leaves much to be desired.  This morning no one fixed my order and I wish that I had just walked out and gone to Boston Common but I was next up at the register and watching people behind me get their orders before me.  When the guy at the register yelled to have someone fix my coffee the guy brings me the wrong size but I was so disgusted I just came on to work.  I normally opt for Boston Common or trek to Thinking Cup when I have time.  I prefer both of those to Nero and after this morning's service it will be quite some time before I return.
Do I really need to told how good everything is and great it is going to taste? Well OK, then it really should be good. But it isn't! My overpriced burger came extremely undercooked. One bite and I see blood red meat. Yuck! I can't imagine why people stand in line for this place.
they are not open until 11 on mondays. fyi, you wont get a smoothie. go to danes dessert cafe, they are open.
We as a family of 5 decided to go biking in Portland. Just opposite of the appartment building at Yamhill and Park ave there was a Biketown station. We decided to try that, registered online and went down to get the bikes.  It took us nearly half an hour to get 5 bikes out, because the keypads were not functioning at all. There were about 15 bikes available and we tried them all several times and one by one got the bikes out.  After a 2 hor ride we delivered the bikes back at the same station, locked them all and double checked and discovered that 4 of the bikes showed duration and costs on the display and one bike had a dead display. At around 6.30pm I received an email saying I didn't deliver my bike back yet. I called the indicated helpline and spent an expensive phonecall (using a Dutch cellphone) to try to explain to a kind lady where the bike was and what had happened.  Finally she decided that a technician was going to check whether the bike was at the station and would reset the bikes computer. I am now waiting for that confirmation. If the bike is not there it will cost me $ 1500! But what can you do when the display stops functioning and you can't check whether it has been correctly delivered? DON'T USE THIS SERVICE GO TO A COMMERCIAL RENTAL SHOP, SAVES TIME AND POTENTIALLY MONEY!
I was excited to go to BB Kings as it was my first time but needless to say I wouldn't go back. I went with my coworkers for our holiday luncheon. we each paid $20.50 for our meal which wasn't much to choose from... I had the Po boy sandwich and the strawberry shortcake. The Po boy was more bread than anything, the fish.. Well lack of fish wasn't great, it was more breading than fish... The ONLY thing I enjoyed was the fries. The dessert "strawberry shortcake" was a very tiny piece more like the end of a pound cake, was hard and did not taste good at all. I tried my co workers chocolate fudge cake which was also yucky and hard, tasted like old cake. My co worker had the cheese burger and she was very unhappy with her meal. She said it didn't have any flavor so she ask for BBQ sauce it made it taste a little better. To top this off they didn't even cover the parking! And did I mention that it was super dark? You could barely see in there... Yup never again!
This place definitely has a chain feel. It's so very average. The food is pretty bland but the portions are gargantuan! Oh my gosh! I have 3 meals from my pasta dish. I'll come home and throw some spices on it to help it out a bit.  Great beer selection but it doesn't make up for the poor food.
The only reason this place is getting two stars (instead of one) is b/c it's fair/decent mexican food for BOSTON.  If this restaurant were anywhere else, I'd give it 0-1 stars. Chips were cold, salsa had no kick and was runny (as in, no chunks of tomatoes or onions). I had sangria, which I realize is not really authentic mex, but it was NOT GOOD. No fruit, entirely too sweet, and you couldn't see through it (sangria should be translucent, not opaque).   The last and biggest offense... the $$$. For fair to middlin' mexican food, this place has some pretty steep prices (many entrees were between $15-20).  In all honesty, if given the choice between taco bell and this place, I'd probably choose Taco Bell. The good? Outdoor seating, nice enough service, location, and friendly for larger groups.  I suggest trying Taqueria Mexico in Waltham instead.
DO NOT ORDER CURBSIDE HERE.   First, there are cars PARKED in the curbside spots. No one in their car waiting to grab their order.  Second, waited 20 minutes for food. We ordered nachos and by the time we got them the guacamole was brown. Also the nachos were super skimpy with barely any toppings.  Do yourself a favor and walk over to Chick fil a. Better service and you get better food for your money.  Red Robin used to be good, for a chain restaurant. What happened?
I had to wait 38 minutes for a margarita. It was frustrating to watch so many people who arrived well after me walk away from the bar with their drinks before me. When I brought this to the attention of the blonde female bartender that I placed my order with she told me that she had already given me my drink. After telling her that wasn't the case(she had given a margarita to the group of African American ladies 5-10ft to my right but not to me) she decided I had at some point walked away from the bar which was also not true(the people waiting on me thought I had left during this interlude). At this point she tried to ignore me and assist other customers. It's one thing to be given bad service but it's infuriating to be blamed for the bad service and ignored. It seemed like a nice place but the customer service was irredeemable. I could not in good conscience recommend this establishment to anyone else with this experience in mind.
I came here with a Groupon. Will not return because I want a little pampering and a different atmosphere when I'm giving myself the luxury of a massage. I should have guessed I'd receive different service when I was abruptly asked at the front desk if I had a Groupon.  Advice: Arrive early. By the time I filled out the intake form and was on the table, it was 10 minutes past my appointment time. The lady giving me my 60 minute massage did not adjust for this, and after 50 minutes a kitchen timer went off and that was it.  I asked for a deep tissue massage, and the deep tissue part was delivered without regard for finesse. That in and of itself wouldn't stop me from recommending the business; I have a high pain tolerance, and each masseuse has their own style. I did feel uncomfortable, however, being called "m'lady" repeatedly by my masseuse. Also, the last couple of minutes of my massage consisted of my masseuse grabbing handfuls of my upper traps and grinding. Painful. It could have been fine if she'd taken the time to transition into a less stressful type of massage before finishing, but she really stuck with her timer, which again was not set for the 60 minutes for which I'd paid.  I'm not writing this review to be contacted by the company. Please do not ask me to change my opinion.
We went on a whim becuase there was a Groupon Now deal.  What a waste of a meal! The dishes were flavorless and not very original. My Veggie pizza was dry and bland. Roast beef sandwich was uninspiring. Would not go back, especially with the plethora of great restuarants in this area.
The food here was mediocre at best. The service was good, however we were the only patrons there at the time. The water, lemonade and Pepsi had a strange taste. Not sure if it was the ice or the cups but all the drinks were awful. The pizza (Margherita) was made with canned crushed tomatoes and was very bland..probably the worst pizza we've had (and we love most pizza). The breadsticks were swimming in butter and very salty and doughy. Overall, the food and drinks were terrible. Will not be back and would not recommend.
Went in to get a fill. I had to wait for the woman at her station, since she hadnt arrived yet.  I waited for like 10 minutes.  Then she came in and seemed a bit frustrated.  She was also pregnant.  Anyway, she started to do my nails and I decided on one color, when she got to the painting nails part, I changed my mind before she even started on the second nail, which I didnt think was a big deal because its not like she did the whole hand!  Anyway, she was like so irritated.  I just let her finish with the new polish and was sad the rest of the time.  Tina the owner had no idea.  Anyway, its really messy in there and just dirty.  Go somewhere else.
This is a terrible company.  It took a week for me to receive my roses and they were dead.  They over night another arrangement and it look almost as bad.  They were brown all on the edges and they looked like I had them for weeks.  Called customer service, and they stated they could not do anything about it.  DO NOT USE THIS COMPANY.
My family and I walked in Friday night (11/3/17). Friday nights are typically pretty busy at pizza parlors. I get it. The thing is, there was no line at the counter, and several tables were open. It wasn't that busy. I go up to the counter to order and the girl asked "Have you already ordered?" I told her no. She said "Our kitchen is really backed up with orders and it's going to be at least an hour wait." A guy behind her back in the kitchen chimed in "At least an hour." I told her, "Ok, we'll probably just skip it." Her demeanor quickly went from unhappy and stressed to relieved and smiling when she heard this. If I was the owner or the manager of this place, I would be pretty angry and concerned that my staff was persuading patrons not to order at the counter. They lost out on my $60.
Ehhh....knocking my review down, and I'm not really sorry about it.  First of all, the ceiling...crawling with dust bunnies. Seriously, when  you walk in, look up. That grey stuff you see off the brown ceiling paint is dust. And that fan circulating it around? Yep, covered in dust. Which is strange that it is only the section of the ceiling  located right at the entrance. The other sections of the ceiling are fine.  Secondly, $1 grilled cheese Mondays - overrated. While I raved before, having gone back and had and/or attempted to enjoy the special, it's nothing to waste your time for. The grilled cheese has become bready and bland. Yes, it's only a dollar and you get chips, but I'd rather just make my own bomb-ass grilled cheese at home -without the hour (or sometimes two) wait.  Thirdly, the noise level. Loud as fuck, any time of the day. Music blasts, people have to scream over each other. Downright annoys me because my friends are constantly saying, "huh? what?" And I hate repeating myself.  Lastly, the space/size. TINY. It wouldn't be so bad if there was a "constant" flow of patrons, as in they go in, order their bar, and then can chill off to the side or on a patio. Nope, as soon as you enter Bodega, you pretty much have to stay cramped in the same spot.  Draft/beer list is still superb - especially during happy hour.  I really wish they would expand the patio - perhaps open one out back the way Rumba Cafe is.
When I came in it looked like a really nice place but one I night when I was going to bed I found a cockroach crawl across the room
So I went to Random Order last night after a failed excursion to the Mississippi St Fresh Pot, which was closed. My main goal was free wi-fi, but on a hot evening, a cool chai sounded nice as well.   Random Order did have free wi-fi, but thats about it. They had two outlets in the store that I could find, neither of which were situated near tables. Why have wi-fi if people can't plug in their laptops?  When I ordered my chai, I was encouraged because they asked me if I wanted spicy or sweet. I chose the spicy chai, but what I got tasted like skim milk with vanilla and a dash of nutmeg. Apparently the Stumptown they serve didn't taste great either.  But my biggest complaint was the little care they took to make customers comfortable. I counted three fans in the store, all pointed to the counter and prep areas, rather than out to the customers. To make up for this, I guess, they had the front door wide open. Unfortunately, that just drew in the mosquitoes. I left the place after 30 minutes with 6 or 7 bites.
American Airlines lost our luggage on the flight out of Boston and back to Boston.  In the interest of full disclosure, our luggage was lost from an international flight with a layover in Miami.  The people in Miami were unhelpful and I waited for approximately 2 hours for my luggage that never showed.  It would have been nice had someone told me that it was lost when I asked them about the status of my bag in MIA.    My complaints could go on, but I'll spare you the details.  What you should know is that the website aa.com/bagstatus is useless.  I entered my info and it told me that I had incorrect info.  Then I called the hotline and dealt with the automated prompt, and I was informed that the airline had still not located my luggage, but at least they didn't tell me my info was wrong.  Finally, I spoke to a real person who told me it was on a flight headed to Boston.  So, the take away from all this is the website is useless, the phone prompt is useless, and the only way to actually know wtf is going on with your bag is to talk to a person directly.
I called in A PIZZA for pick up well over an hour ago. It is all kinds of crazy that my fiancé is still sitting outside the establishment (because despite serving food, the place is filled with cigarette smoke) waiting for a pizza.
Fried. Cheap tasting. Very disappointed for the price. Sorry, Koy.
Wish I could agree with the fellow yelpers on this one but there door and yelp page have them open till 4:30 but they had an employee standing guard at the door telling people they are closed at 3:45
I have never eaten anything from Rosie's, and I never will.  This complaint is for their customer service.  I ordered online delivery of a cake, but then tried to immediately  cancel the order once I saw that shipping (within Cambridge, to an address only several blocks away!) was 43 dollars.  I tried to call to cancel, but they were closed, and I filled out the online customer service request immediately to cancel.  They never cancelled my order.  However, they still charged me for the cake and the delivery, which was a day LATE anyway.  I called today to get some of the delivery fees refunded, and the employee told me they "did get my email message, but it was too late to cancel the order."  Why did they not contact me?  I don't know.  The employee then told me I would have to call the store directly to get a refund for delivery fees.  She said she would call them for me, and that I would get a call back right away.  Nobody called me back.  What horrible customer service.  UPDATE (5/23): I forgot to mention that when the cake was going to be delivered, I got a call from an unidentified person saying I was going to receive a packaged surprise that morning.  Since it was Mother's Day I was all excited, thinking I was going to get a gift.  But no, it was Rosie's Bakery calling me, the buyer, rather than the recipent, to notify of an upcoming delivery.  So that really sucked, staying home, waiting for a  Mother's Day present that never came.  Bummer.  But today I actually managed to get someone on the phone who would refund the delivery fees to me, since the cake did get delivered to my recipent, even though it was woefully late.  But it did take three days of calling Rosie's to accomplish this feat.  So this review remains a ONE STAR.
Had to try this place.  Loved the name, and the location, thought it would be cool inside.  Not a great experience.  The place was packed, which I didn't understand.  On the plus side, my haircut and dye job was very good.  On the negative, it took forever. The place was FREEZING, i was almost shaking from being so cold. The stylists walked around forever and talked while I seemed to sit there forever FREEZING. The decor- alright, very mod. Bathroom access- outside, and dirty.  What can I say, I won't be back. The bad, cold atmosphere and lack of promptness left a lot to be desired.
I need immediate physical therapy.  I can no longer walk my legs are so sore.  They LIED to me and told me they take my insurance.  My insurance pays for transportation but only to doctors that take my insurance.  After 3 weeks of trying to get transportation approved I finally found out THEY LIED TO ME.  They don't take my insurance.  I've wasted 3 weeks!!!  I hurt so bad I've been taking morphine for pain.  I thinking about sueing them for the pain and aggrevations of putting off my physical therapy for 3 weeks all because of their lies.  DONT USE THEM.  NO NO NO NO NO!!!!!
Poor and slow service. They were out of several items on the menu. They overcharged us for an item by 50%! Food quality not great. My last time in the restaurant!
Terrible teenage chefs over cook not-so-fresh seafood. Service was lackluster at best. Pain to get to as you will be frisked by homeland security. I had better food at a Red Lobster - now that's just sad isn't it
We may have gotten sick after eating here. The only thing we shared all night was dinner at this place. After eating, came right home, and the two of us fell sick in a few hours.  The owner asked us to remove this review and also offered a refund, but we felt it was more important to leave an honest review.
I had about 6 cleanings with 2 different professionals. Overall, it was nice to have a cleaning service, but I never full felt satisfied with the experience. The Handy Pros were usually late, sometimes came unprepared with supplies and used mine instead,and one walked off with some of my cleaning supplies. One Pro brought her daughter to my apartment with her and while it wasn't a big deal, it was definitely awkward -- her mom even had her help clean at one point. I understand things come up, babysitters cancel at the last minute, but don't bring your daughter to work and force her to do your job either. It's not right.  I gave feedback to the company and did receive a $29 credit, so I gave the service one last shot but experienced the same issues. 'Professional' showed up late, came unprepared, and used my supplies without asking.   The company makes it difficult to cancel your services entirely. You can only cancel each appointment at a time on the site, and the next is automatically scheduled and billed. If you need to cancel entirely, you need to call their customer service line and deep in the options you can get a hold of someone to actually talk to.  Bottom line, great concept but not worth it.
Gross. They charge over $9 for a taco meal (2 shitty tacos and refried beans with rice) and a large drink and the annoyed employee working the counter said she "couldn't give me a refill" i should have just gone to a different chain in the airport. Sorry i spent money at this pathetic establishment
This place is a so-so. The service is ok. We got a vegetarian pho bowl and got a bowl with just noodles. This was the second time we went. The first time we went, we got the same thing and it came with a few veggies. Keep in mind that that's literally the price as a bowl of pho with beef. Also, we ordered a cup of iced tea, and got a cup of lemon flavoured water. There was not much flavour, and it definitely didn't taste like iced tea. So I guess it depends when you go.
The fries here are okay. I wasn't a huge fan of Pommes Frites or Belgian style fries, I didn't think there was much difference between them or regular french fries. The 'saus'es are cleverly named but the Vampire slayer was okay and I didn't much get much of anything besides just the creamy texture. It seems like they're trying really hard to be this dive-ish, hipster-y kind of place but the fries are kind of forgettable.
Unprofessional, not service oriented, low class, over-priced for low quality service, and their business model is very bad.   I rarely rate businesses however I have to share my experience with the public about Evene Day Spa. First of all, their receptionist Jordan is very rude and disrespectful. The owner, not sure her name, doesn't understand anything about business and customer service.   First of all, they didn't have me in their system and know that I was just there 2 months ago, then after I booked the appointment, they called back to say they needed to reschedule because they got it confused with a different day, so they are very unorganized. This was a big inconvenience considering I'm very busy making appointments with my job and had to reschedule with an important client.   After they called back to reschedule, before we got off the phone, I was asked for my groupon voucher number which I said I couldn't view at the time but said I will bring it to my appointment. They said no, they have to have it before I get there, and they wanted my credit card number to pay for the services I already paid for with my groupon? I gave them the option to do the right thing or they will lose a loyal and local customer and they didn't care.  I cancelled the appointment and got my groupon refund, but wanted to share with world that this place is not worth your time and money.   Also, when I was there the first time in January, it was the worst massage I've ever gotten...so shame on me for coming back, but I learned my lesson.
Good beer selection, relaxed atmosphere, outdoor seating - there's no reason our visit couldn't have been the reason for a five-star review.  Except for one:  a bartender who barely acknowledges customers and just generally seems to hate the job.  Here's a hint:  if you don't like interacting with people, don't go into a service job.  We won't be back unless we see someone more welcoming behind the bar.
Out of Business in Oregon due to franchise going bankrupt.
I really wanted to like this place after reading the reviews. I got the combination plate to taste a bit of everything, but it failed miserably.   Forget what you heard, definitely pass on this.
Tried 3 nights in a row to order a pizza to our hotel. First night it was too late. Our fault. 2nd night they didn't have enough drivers. 3rd night at 8 o clock we try to place an order from the store 2.4 miles away. they told us they wouldn't deliver to us because there was a closer store. That store had a 2 hour wait on delivery. So they made up that they couldn't deliver  outside a 6 mile radius lie and then when we called them out on us being only 2 miles away they told us the manager just decided to refuse us service and didn't want to deliver to us. Id highly suggest never ordering from this store because they seem to have enough business to where they can choose who they want to deliver to and treat potential business like garbage on the telephone. Thanks for nothing.
Went in to check for vegan options. No crepes available for me. All have eggs and dairy in them. But they do gluten free.
I tried twice to get the correct replacement for some bulbs at this store. I even provided the dead bulb for them to match. I was given bulbs that were not exactly like the one I had but they said it was the one even though the contacts were shorter.The first ones did not fit and the second ones blew out immediately when I replaced them. I asked for a refund and it was not honored because "they couldn't resell the bulbs. " I was out $15.  Very sad that that Batteries Plus Bulbs would not take responsibility for incorrectly servicing me. I went to a real lighting store and they provided me with the correct bulbs that work!! This is my first negative review ever on a store. I will not be back to it and I do not recommend it.
Why all the buzz? I am really not sure!!  It's really a takeout restaurant, so if you want to sit down and eat, don't go here.  It's expensive considering it's takeout. The pad thai is pretty bland. The curry is OK. The soups are substandard.  I was a bit blown away with all the great reviews but alas, Vancouver has set the bar very low for comparison when it comes to Thai food.  I used to live a block away and went here often. I would get takeout and then doctor up the food at home with fresh limes and extra spices. It's OK, but not great. Since I left the neighbourhood, I have never gone back. I am amazed this place has the staying power it does.
Lucky Plus is a Hong Kong-style cafe restaurant.  I think they recently opened as there were still many bouquet signs in front when I visited with my family.    The menu seems to have a wide variety of foods from the simple rice and noodle dishes to the more elaborate like braise lamb hot pot.  The ambience seem nice with the tasteful decor, with good comfortable seating that is not too crowded.    But that's where the good side ends.  Our server seemed very rushed to take our order after we sat down (at 11am just when they opened).  She came to our table 3 times in a short span of 5 minutes.  We did not realize why until we placed our order for a couple of appetizer dishes (Hand shredded chicken and 7-flavor deep fried squid) and a couple of entree dishes (Fried noodles with chicken, Mapo tofu rice, Sauteed shrimp).  It took almost 35 minutes until our first dish showed up which seem an eternity when one is hungry for brunch.    When the food dishes showed up at last, we were very disappointed at every dish.  The hand shredded chicken was more of cut-up pieces of chicken with little taste and too many pieces of skin thrown in.  The 7-flavour deep-fried squid tasted bland -- I tasted salty which is just one flavour as I tried to find more flavour.  The fried noodles looked good but lacked anything special (including taste!).  The sauteed shrimps were not well de-veined so tasted bitter.  We all thought what could possibly go wrong with mapo tofu rice?  Well, the mapo sauce was definitely from a jar so that was pretty hard to mess up, but the rice was too hard (tasted like rice left in a refrigerator overnight).  Very disappointed at the food at Lucky Plus!    To add to the poor service and bad quality food, we were presented with the same dishes we had already eaten 3 times over!  If the food quality was better we might have taken up their offer!  But we were honestly not interested in more of the same bad dishes.    We hope that Lucky Plus is just testing their kitchen process to make improvements and honing their waiting service to provide a more enjoyable experience for their customers.  But they will need to do this quickly as many traditional Chinese clients like myself would not likely go back after the one bad experience.
I called to order a pizza for delivery and they just said no.  They were backed up.   Good for them but I had the time to wait and they wouldn't do it.  Bummer.
Place looked/smelled great.  I'm certain the food is delicious.   Unfortunately, despite the open tables, they wanted to sit me at the communal table, squeezed in the middle  tightly amongst 5 other people. This doesn't work for me.  I would have understood if there were not so many tables open.  I declined/departed and am now having a delightful lunch elsewhere.  Plenty of place from which to choose fortunately.
Chicken was raw. Brisket was dry and tough. Staff had no remedy. With so many food choices in richmond.  Don't waste your time.
We, two people,  had $30 worth of appes and drinks in the lounge section because of the beautiful ambiance.  Service was slow, and the appies (the food) was  not worth it.  Really overpriced, imo. Food portions were tiny, to us. Had to buy more appies, as we were hungry.  Got the impression that the servers were pushing us to buy alcohol.  One of us were a non-alco person.
Gables Rock Springs does a lot of false advertising.  They have 2BR apartments listed for $1200/mo - an awesome deal.   I visited this property and there are 3 phases of apartment buildings.  The price listed was for phase 1, which has not been updated since 1986.  It is old and disgusting and smells like mold.  Phases 2 and 3 (shown in all the photos) are triple the price.  VERY MISLEADING.
If you like Greek food, this is not the place to get it.  I'm sorry, Al.  It won't happen again.
If you're a bakery, and I show up to your shop 30 minutes after you open and you have zero baked good...ZERO BAKED GOODS AT A BAKERY!! FOH!!
Absolutely horrible service from the hostess and we'll never come back.  After waiting for a while for a table, the hostess asked if we'd be willing to give our table to a group with a wheel chair.  Absolutely!  Who wouldn't?  Then we asked for a table by the window and were told that while there's nobody sitting there, they were saving that for groups of 6 (who wasn't there...and they didn't know would come).  Really?!?  Hire a hostess who's not a freaking idiot.
Gave them another shot and I regret it. Sns manicure was mediocre. The polish on my toes is why I will not return. The lady didn't paint my entire nail. When I said something she said I'm the professional I know what I'm doing. Obviously not if you let someone walk out with a pedicure looking like that. Horrible job on nails and even worse customer service. I will not return. This place is over priced for horrible work.
What happened El Chilito?  It used to be a pretty good spot, and I used to go for the pescado burrito (even if there were often bones in it), but recently the quality has gone down and I'm not sure but it seems like the price as gone up.  I just had the barbacoa burrito and it tasted more like brisket, cost 650 and was all of about 10 oz of food.  Most local Mexican markets in Austin charge about 4 bucks for a pound burrito that actually tastes flavorful.  Even the sangria has lost its flavor - which was really the only other reason to go there.    With all the competition moving in around them, you think they would try harder.. Not go lax.
Attended a show last night, did the dinner table reservation thing in advance since The Missus and I would need to eat anyway, figured why not have a table to the show as well?  Just beware that the menu is limited, fairly basic pub fare, but about 50% more expensive that your normal pub fare. I ordered the $18 burger figuring that it couldn't be that bad. On a side note: why do servers ask how you want your burger cooked if that's just going to be ignored anyway? Medium rare came out well done. I have a personal preference to never return a meal unless it's inedible because I assume the worst in people and don't like saliva.  So while I didn't point it out at the time, and I know that's a bit unfair, I will say that in general it's not great food, it's okay food, at a high price point. But you're there for a show anyway, right?
I didn't like the parking at night it was scary walking out alone no security or anything!! Also it smelled like urine out there the service could have been better two bartenders and 6 ppl up by the hostess stand and the manager was over there as well was not the worse experience but it needed work
I was so offended by the staff here. Is it not your job to help people pick out make-up? I tried asking someone about a product, she took me over to them and then just walked off like I was wasting her time. Seriously walk down the mall to the sephora counter in the department store. The girl there was friendly, helpful, and seemed like she genuinely wants to help customers find what they need. Don't waste your time in this store.
Where do I start?    I was excited about this place because there were so many amenities offered.  Before I booked, I called to ask if there were any amenities that were not offered to guests because they were owner specific, I was told no.  I arrived after a 7 hour drive.  The front desk staff was professional and engaging and the check-in was short.  There were a few rooms to choose from.  I stated that I wanted to be close to the pool.  Went to the room to settle in.  Walked in... ummmm wait a minute.  The room wasn't cleaned.  Walked into the master bedroom to find the bed unmade and the receipts from the last person on the bed and dry cleaner tags.  As a germaphobe, I was completed freaked out.  I walked back to the front because when I called, I was placed on hold.  Staff was apologetic but it pretty much set the mood and what I was to expect moving forward.  A new room was assigned.  It was clean.  However, during my stay we called for extra towels for the pool at 10a.  I looked up and realized an hour had gone by and still no towels.  Called again.  Another hour.  No towels.  Another call... 30 more minutes.  I finally decided to call and ask for a manager because at this point, I am livid.  Within 15 minutes, the towels came.  However, I was perplexed as to why we had to ask 4 times and why it took almost 3 hours.  At this point, I was ready to go home and didn't even want to stay for the last night.  This place was just so so in my opinion.  I will NOT return.
While staying at Lone Star Court, we decided to eat at the Water Trough.  Food was just ok.  Took way too looking to receive our food, then it was brought out bit by bit.  It took a good 30 minutes for our party to completely  receive our food.  Only 6 of us.   Ended up getting a refund on the last meal. No apologies,  like we should have expected the poor service.  Food was average at best.  Cold buns and fries on the burgers. Slight amounts of chicken on the quesadillas.  Bbq sandwich had a strange taste.  Go across the street and eat at the food court at the shopping centerfor a better meal.
Service was ho hum... It lacked any personal touch, kindness or suggestive selling. She even dropped off our check before I could order another drink and we were sitting in the bar/lounge area...
My husband and I popped by Argo for lunch today and lucky me, my seat had a direct view into the kitchen. I watched as the guy working back there used his bare hands to manhandle a whole chicken (it was cooked, thank god), wipe his hands on his dirty pants multiple times, pick up a skanky looking rag to wipe counters down, and then proceed to make my grilled cheese sandwich without washing his hands. This is in addition to the fact that this whole place is filthy.   This is my own fault. I ate here awhile ago and found what looked like pubes in my pasta, but were more likely beard or moustache hairs. I told myself I would not be back but I work around the corner, today was gross out, and we just needed somewhere close and fast. I went in against my better judgement and left hungry. I've now learned my lesson!   Be warned, haha!
Not bad place to grab a bite to eat. I tried the Egg sandwich Lyonnaise, which was decent (I just wanted something with eggs) on top of potato salad, and my friend got a chicken sandwich. The place was packed on a Saturday at 2PM, and seating at the bar is first come, first serve, so you literally have to look around with a hawk's eye to see who is leaving. The wait for a table for 2 was about 30 minutes. All in all, it was OK, except for the fact that one woman sat down next to us 5 minutes after us, received and finished her meal BEFORE we even got ours. I don't understand that discrepancy in service because our sandwiches were NOT hard to make........... I don't think this place is worth any type of wait.
Mears sucks. I just spent over a half an hour trying to book on-line. Nothing but problems. I can imaginge what their car serivce is like.
Had the spicy tonkotsu...Lunch time was packed and had to get back to work so I got the to-go.   Ramen itself was one of the better ones I've had in Austin but...-3 stars for dishonesty on the waitress's part.  Noticed on my credit card bill that they felt like sneaking on a tip from themselves on my take out order...not cool! Not even worth trying to get it back...  If you do eat here watch your credit card bill!
Horrible.  The new menu is limited with many of best items gone.  No longer sourcing their meats from reputable local vendors.  Prices went up, portions down.  Had we gone any later the chicken i had would have been jerky. Never again.
We stayed at the Hotel for one night. Very nice room, tap room, restaurant. The problem is they double charged me for the room. Even though I had the confirmation number and receipt. I had to go to my bank to get it taken care of.
Go to Starbucks if you want a "decent" expresso, notice the quotes for decent, went inside thinking I could get a good expresso reminiscing Italy, but was served an awful expresso. Save yourself from the trouble and go somewhere else.
Don't bother with this place if you're a vegetarian. The only vegetarian  thing they have that could be an entree is spaghetti in tomato sauce. And forget about being able to share appetizers, those are also overwhelmingly vegetarian unfriendly.
Insofar as this is a terrible bar, I furthermore assert that my friend shan't not have been exiled from their premises.
I don't understand how you answer a business phone with "hulloh" then proceed to sound completely bored as the caller speaks to you.  I also don't understand how your hours state you're open until 9pm but you don't take late appointments.  I have a groupon that I'm honestly considering letting expire just for the unprofessionalism i encountered.
My adopted nephew, his mother and I decided to eat here while we were in Salem to check out Halloween festivities yesterday Oct. 25. After standing on line for nearly an hour to get in, I was advised that the fish of the day, haddock, was only available in a fish taco, which I had no desire to eat, and told her so. At which point the waitress leaned into my face and said, "you want my day?", with a very surly attitude, at which point I looked at her and said in just as surly a manner, " I dont like chipotle." At this point, another member of our group said she'd try it, and I asked for something else and a black cherry soda. She came back after 15 mins and said they were out of black cherry, at which point I asked for a coke, getting just a bit exasperated by now, and off she went, only to come back with...the black cherry soda. The member of my party who had accepted the fish taco said it wasn't very good, and ended up eating about half of it. This place needs to improve its food and get rid of that waitress.
Food: 3 stars. Three of us split the big dumpling platter and most of it was fine. Nothing was dramatically flavorful. The dumplings with beef were particularly bland, but beef dumplings always are and I don't know why anyone makes them.  Service: 3 stars. The host and our server were both extremely nice, but not terribly adept at dealing with anything beyond seating people and bringing them menus and food.  Allergen information: -4 stars.  "I'm allergic to a lot of flowers. Is the mint tea just mint or is it a blend?" "It's just plain mint." *drinks some* "Hm, I'm getting a mild allergic reaction. Can you confirm that this really just is plain mint?" "I'll check." *goes to the kitchen, comes back with an unlabeled plastic box* "Here it is. It's from Chinatown."  There were pretty clearly other things mixed in with the mint. What were they? Who knows?  "I'm allergic to star anise. Can you check whether the dumplings are made with five spice powder, and whether star anise is used in the broth for the soup dumplings?" "I'll ask the cook." *goes into the kitchen, comes back* "Sorry, the cook doesn't know because the only people with the recipes are the owner and her mother, and no one else knows exactly what's in anything. To be on the safe side, you should avoid all the dumplings."   Given that I was at a DUMPLING RESTAURANT, I felt this was not really an acceptable solution. I settled for skipping the soup dumplings and anything that had five spice powder listed as an ingredient on the menu, and taking preventative Claritin.  I'm sure that if someone's allergic to, say, shellfish, they'd be perfectly able to say "these things have shrimp, all others are fine". But not all allergies are to common allergens, and this is why it's crucial to have ingredient lists on hand and not just in the owner's head.  If you don't have major food allergies, go ahead and enjoy the passable dumplings. If you do, the dumplings aren't good enough to be worth the anxiety about whether something's going to trigger a reaction.
Tldr: Perfect solution for your constipation problems.  This is the first time my Mom and I had bubble tea from this place and boy is it a disaster.  The tragedy began when my mom who drank the bubble tea an hour before me complained about stomach pain and having to visit the washroom several times. I was skeptical when she first told me and dismissed it as just her having a sensitive stomach. However after a few minutes I realized I should take some precautions as I did not want to risk it. At that point I had only drank less than half of what was in my cup. Fifteen minutes or so passes by when I felt my stomach churning and at that moment I realized it wasn't just my old lady's sensitive stomach that was the problem: it was this cup of laxativ- I mean bubble tea. Thank goodness I stopped drinking it before WWIII happened in my bathroom. Not to mention, my Mom who rarely treats herself to take out/drinks ended up suffering due to your "bubble tea". On the bright side, if I ever have constipation problems, I can now purchase a cup-o-laxatives from your store instead of having to spend $14.99 from London Drugs. Talk about value for your money !
Jackasses. DO NOT USE GL.  I should not have given these guys a second chance. My previous oil change here, the guy drove over a curb while pulling my car around and broke my plastic hubcap (which came off and I had to go find).  This time around things went fast and all seemed well. When I got home I had a strange thought and wanted to be sure they replaced all the screws on the "Skid Plate" under the engine. Guess what - THE SKID PLATE WASN'T THERE!  The jackass tech forgot to put it back on.  After driving back across town to have them put it back on, it took them about 15 minutes to get it replaced. (which should only take about 2-3 minutes). And on top of that they lost some of the plastic screws that hold the skid plate in place. These screws cost $4 each at the dealer!   Fool me twice shame on me I guess. DO NOT GIVE THESE PEOPLE YOUR BUSINESS.
There is a 20% discount if you put down your order by 11am- which we promptly missed by 7 minutes. Nevertheless, I had high hopes for this place and was looking forward to the food. The shrimp dumpling was huge- big piece of shrimp with lots of flavor. Beef ball was only ok, very bland. Chicken feet was very good- big portion and cooked so tender. The egg white scallop fried rice was a little on the dry side but still very good. Service was less than stellar to at the least. No one was available when we wanted some sauce to dip in, since nothing was provided at all in the first place. Took another ten min to flag someone down to pay.  Dim sum places are normally very attentive with super fast service. Really have no desire to come back again based on this.
This place is a cool spot for drinking beers with your buddies and looking over the river at Boston, but it's definitely not a place to go for a good meal or for cocktails. We thought the food was not good unfortunately (we wanted to love it), and the bill for three people was $144 - not worth it. The scallops were overcooked and rubbery, and the fries were below average. The lobster roll was not good, the crab dip was tasteless, and the drinks were not strong.   The positives were the atmosphere (fun place on the water), the music was awesome and our waitress was super cool and friendly. Like I said, if you get a table outside and are drinking with a bunch of friends, you will enjoy yourself. Just don't order an entree!
I have gone here for 3 years for my service maintenance. They charged me over $850 to get my service maintenance and the breaks replaced... labor itself was over $500... talk about ripping off customers. I will NEVER go back here again, and will tell people not to go here. Too bad they lost a loyal customer, don't screw over your customers!!!! I feel so ripped off, I should have said no from the beginning. The worst part, the breaks still felt the same after...   The only reason I am giving it a 2 star and not 1 (or 0) is because i've gone here for so long and they have serviced it. Other than that... no loyalty here anymore
HORRIBLE HORRIBLE HORRIBLE!!  Do not come here!!  The employees do not care about customer service AT ALL. I came in to upgrade my phone and the woman helping me told me the only option was to spend $850 and buy it out right. I wanted the phone so I went ahead and purchased it - they did not have any so it was ordered. Once I left, I spoke with friends and found out that they were running a promotion if you turn in your 6 you get a free 7. Or at the very least they will give you a credit on your old phone. So I came back in and asked about it and they were completely unhelpful. They wouldn't give me the promotion and they wouldn't even help me with a phone credit. They told me the promotion was over even though the woman who walked in in front of me was literally getting the exact promotion I was asking about. WTH???? They told me she "preordered" but that's a bit hard to believe bc I heard her ask for the promotion when she walked in. Appalling!!!!!!! I very rarely write bad reviews but this place is HORRIBLE!!!! They do not care about their customers.  I asked why no one offered me options when I was in earlier and the new guy helping me said, that would just be a courtesy, not something we have to do. Seriously?!?!?? Do you not know what customer service is?!?!?? DO NOT COME HERE. FIND ANOTHER STORE! Trust me you will thank me later.
LIPSTICK on the PIG - Don't waste your $$!!  The most horrible experience I have ever had at any resort. We stayed with two boys (10 and 6) and were impressed with the pictures on their website. Below is the experience:   (a) Switch and Bate: The room we got was much older and dated than the one in the pictures. And the check in process was 45mins.    (b) We found ants in the kitchen and bathroom, they sent pest control, we get back and the ants were still there. The room was directly from the 80's, the worst decorated room I have ever paid $200 per night.    (c) They moved us to a different room the exchange process took 3 hours. At one point we were waiting on the street for 45mins for the bellman who was getting new keys. He came back informing us that 3-4 kids were stuck in their room because another guest locked an common door (maybe take the lock off?)   (d) When checking out they miscalculated our discount and we had another 20mins wait till the manager finally resolved the issue.   Honestly for 200 per night, you can do much better. I am going to call their corporate offices on Tuesday (5/27/14) let's see what they say! The four/five stars are fake or paid stooges!
After my car died requiring me to leave it stranded in a parking lot over night, I managed to get it started and brought it here simply because it was the easiest place to get to.   I came in and requested an oil change and to have my starter tested, as I was 99% sure that was the issue. After being told that it more than likely wasn't, and my battery was likely the problem (not likely, it's a year old). They go back to do the oil change and test. An hour and a half later, they forgot to run the test on the starter, but surprise! The battery is fine. I'm given a list of other things wrong with my car but told the starter is just "chaotic". After authorizing the repair on the cracked radiator hose, I wait for another hour for that to be repaired only for them to come out and tell me that my car won't start yet again and the starter needs to be replaced.   This entire ordeal felt like a bait and switch. I'm not mad about having to have repairs done on the car, seeing as my car is 9 years old and hasn't needed much work other than to replace the ignition and the locking mechanism in the drivers door. Repairs are expected and I knew this would happen at some point. I'm mad because I told the employees that it was my starter, I was told I was wrong, the test was conveniently forgotten, and what should have taken maybe two hours at the most (which is what my normal mechanic at home said) it took more than 3.   I will never bring my car back into this place for even so much as an oil change, because this was ridiculous.
While I would love to give this place five stars, and would do so in a heartbeat because their coffee is incredible, and their store is beautiful- if not for the two following reasons.   1) a "house" size ie, a for- here order costs just as much as a large/ medium to-go order and is half the size. That is neither helpful to the environment or the regulars- if you're ordering for here it should AT LEAST be the same size as the to-go, if not bigger!! (That may be my personal opinion, but $5.00 for a shot glass of iced chai really pissed me off)  2) the baristas here are the grumpiest I've ever seen, they act like they're doing me a HUGE personal favor just by taking my debit card, and most of the time they are on their phones doing nothing (I don't come in during rush). I think that politeness should be met with politeness, and the least they could do is acknowledge a thank you.   Again, that's just my two cents, the coffee here really is phenomenal.
I thought this was one of the worst pizzas I've ever had. Too bready and saucy with very little cheese. The Caesar salad was fresh. For $14 I think the entire thing is overpriced. We pretty much all left our pizzas. I also noticed others who left most of their pizza. I could only eat one slice. So disappointed! :( I say eat elsewhere.
They've cancelled two appointments an hour before the scheduled time, refunded 1/3 of my payment and offered a credit for the remainder. I guess that would be acceptable if I was planning in using them in the future, but at this rate I don't know that they'll ever actually show up.
So this burger was the second meal I had when I moved back to Atlanta.  I didn't know anything about the hype around this burger when I ate it, but wow oh wow was it disappointingly bad after I heard people praising.  For starters, the fries that came with it, nothing special, but the 'ketchup sauce' that came with it was ridiculous.  It tasted exactly like the tomato sauce you would get out of a Spaghetti-Os can...super gross.  I was actually taken aback by it because it took me so long to place the flavor.  The burger itself was overdone and just a mess.  My friends all tell me I have to go back because it must have been an off day, but I'm in no rush.
My husband and I have been pleased with hooters wings and had pretty decent service at the last hooters we went to. This one I must say was pretty bad. We had a craving for some crab legs and knew that Hooters had a very good price on them. This one is close to our new apartment so we drove down there and it was pretty crowded as the NBA all star game had started.   Our server brought us out our drinks fairly quickly for the amount of people there at the time. Too bad we found out after she brought the drinks out that they were out of crab legs. I was pretty disappointed but I do understand that it happens, especially in a restaurant that does not specialize in seafood.  After we ordered our meal, it came out tasting great and and while it took a bit of time to cook, I could understand. People were clearing out by this time so there were a lot of tables to clean up. We finished our meal within 15 minutes and never heard from our server again.  After waiting for the check for about 15 minutes, I figured she might have thought we were still eating...I'm not sure. So I took both of our empty trays and put them on the end of the table. We were seated in a high traffic area so I figured that next time she walked by she would see we were finished and ask us if we wanted to order anything else or just get the check. This never happened.   After another 15 minutes, I began to get up and stand next to my bar stool because my butt was going numb and my husband was just kinda looking around. The waitress was cleaning the table next to ours who had cleared about probably about 10 minutes earlier and by this time it was us and only a few other customers in the restaurant so I assumed she would get to our plates next. This never happened.  Within the NEXT 15 minutes she cleaned up the table next to ours, then started very casually wiping down a table directly diagonal from us, there was a guy sitting there with a drink at a table that was pulled together with this one to support a large party and she began getting flirty with him: Bending over real far to wipe the table, sitting on the stool and playing with her hair while talking to him, and making small talk while my husband and I are sitting here 10 feet away looking at her do this with empty drinks and dishes on the table for 45 minutes now. After this fiasco I had enough and went up to the front counter where another waitress asked me if I needed something and I told her i had been waiting for almost an hour just for my check and then walked out of the restaurant while my husband waited at the table to pay.  She ended up getting a dollar from us for the tip and an assurance we will never be back. I can understand at hooters the girls work there and try to get large tips out of single guys. I have no problem with this if they men and boys want to be suckers and throw their money at them. What i DO have a problem with is ignoring your other paying customers for ages and making us wait there all night while you are sitting at the table with a customer and acting like you are off the clock. Not acceptable. I've never given any server under 10% for service even if it was pretty bad until now. If I do decide to go back to Hooters it will not be for a very long time.
This used to be a nice hookah lounge. However, I recently went and it was super GHETTO! The service was terrible also. I won't be back!
I find Jillians to be tiresome.  Only go there if you appreciate the combination of the following things: A) Pool B) Bowling C) Arcade Games D) High School Age-Looking Waitresses wearing handkerchief sized skirts and tall black boots E) Bad food service F) Gigantic, cavernous, casino decor G) No windows H) Getting lost
They are getting worse and worse every time we go .the service is almost nonexistent, the food was so bad I could not even eat it .how do u ruin soup? It took 15 mins. To get a water and a Pepsi, then when they brought my husband's food out they told me they ran out of soup ( that was all I was having was soup ) and that it would be 20 mins while they make more. My husband was finished eating and ready to go when they finaly brought my soup ,it was not even eatable .it tasted horrible ,like burnt milk with uncooked dough balls . the server was slower then anything .we had even placed a to go order at the same time we ordered our meal when we first got there.and we asked him more then twice when we were ready to leave if it was ready ,we complained to the manager and she gave me one sliver of cheese cake free .not good enough olive garden.!!! The server was not even decently presentable.the greeter or hostess could not even speek English. And don't even get me started on the bathroom. Every olive garden we have went to in the last year ( we have tried several) to find better service .has a major bathroom problems that are health violation s .( no working sinks ,broken ,pluged up toilets ,flooding ,and smell .everyone one of them .what is with that? And I have complained to head office .the service,and food ,and conditions just get worse ,no matter what olive garden u go to . 3 hours to get one bowl of endless soup and salad ,bread sticks.that is UN eatable is ridiculous. And they are telling u that u can have only two breadsticks !! What the crap??????
There is something about a warm fresh baked cookie that just tickles me (not literally of course).  And well, I didn't necessarily get it here. I got the M&M cookie (I know this may be slightly childish, but hey I know they are good and they looked pretty big and tasty). The cookie was just OK. It was chilled, which they must do to make sure they stay fresh, but then that makes me wonder if they aren't freshly baked. This also comes down to personal preference, I love warm, gooey cookies and these were cold and hard.   My friend ordered the 7-layer bar and a chocolate chip cookie. The chocolate chip was the same as mine and the bar was just "meh." It had all the right ingredients, but there was nothing special or different about it. The bar tasted too generic and store bought, not homemade.   I know this place is known for their cupcakes and the cakes. They only had a couple cupcakes available (maybe 6?) and they didn't have any cake although they had plenty of signs saying that they are famous for it. So maybe I will give it another shot when I am down here and try this cake! But for now, not a favorite cookie place for me.
I went in on a Sunday with Friends for drinks.  Unfortunately, the tall muscular bartender ignored me and my older friends for at least 10 minutes at the bar as we waived $20's in the air.  He wouldn't even acknowledge us as we watched young guys get free cups of water and ice.  Not a good way to run a business.  An older bartender at the end of the bar finally was nice enough to serve us.  My money will go elsewhere and I do have money unlike the 18 year olds which are drinking water for free.
I've been here before and they did an amazing job but today I went with a friend which called at the beginning of the week and they said they did walk ins on Saturday and Sunday cool right. We got there right at noon the guy at the desk told us to take a seat for a few minutes so we did come to find out they only had time 6 hrs later I don't think so :(  if your gonna do walk ins they should have an xtra person on to do that !!!!!
An overpriced poor excuse for a sandwich shop. I ate here once with a friend and it was ok, but nothing I would go out of my way for again. Bread was dry and burnt, there wasn't much cheese at all.   If you sign up for the newsletters to get "deals" you will be spammed with hateful, bigotry emails.
It was apparent as soon as I walked in the door that this place is new. The staff seems a little unsure but extremely friendly nonetheless. The atmosphere is pleasant. It's dimly lit and trendy. We sat in the bar for drinks and appetizers. I will say it is extremely overpriced and agree with some other reviews that it is trying to be what it's not. I find it bothersome that for an $11 martini they use well vodka they don't even use Smirnoff or a lower grade vodka. A "fancy" restaurant shouldn't even stock that kind of vodka and knows no one wants it in a martini. The price for a regular martini with an upgrade to a better vodka was $15 and the blue cheese in the blue cheese olives was dried out and seemed to have been stuffed in days before. My boyfriend got a double jack and coke. She asked if he wanted a bigger glass or the single glass. He said single... Which ended up being equivalent to the size of a double shot glass. Smaller than any drinking glass I've ever seen. Both cocktails weren't so hot.   The food was overpriced for the quality and size of what you get. The escargot was not as good as I would expect it to be. I've had way better at some of the restaurants they are imitating. Spinach dip was pretty good but not worth the price. Overall two small average appetizers and two decent drinks rang us up at nearly $60 before tip. If the prices were lower I would've given a better rating but the value is terrible. An overpriced Applebee's with the facade of an upscale steakhouse.
Great location Terrible service Waited 30+ min to give order Food avg. nothing special Chilaquiles were good though Would not return :(
I went to the Round Rock store and selected a couple of carpets that I was interested in purchasing.  I was told that Ibrahim would call me to make appointment to come out and measure and would bring the two samples for me to compare to my walls.  He did call as I was told and made an appointment to come Friday, June 5th at 3:30 pm for a measurement.  He not only DID NOT SHOW UP, but haven't heard from anyone associated with Arbor Floors.  No phone call--NOTHING.  I would not recommend this company to anyone, as I don't appreciate being stood up!
I arrived 15 minutes early for my appointment.  I waited 45 minutes in the waiting room and then 45 minutes in the exam room.  I wish I was joking, I thought by the time they took my blood pressure it would be off the charts.  When someone finally came to talk to me (I just had some questions, not even there for an exam) it wasn't even the person I scheduled with and was told they should have made the appointment with the doctor because she would have to consult with them on my question anyways.    Again, the PA was super nice but 2 hours of waiting shows me that you don't really care about me or my time and that's just not the kind of doctor I want.
I have taken my last ride with Checker Cab. In the past I've tolerated the stinky, dirty, disgusting, worn out cars to get to the airport. On our trip this time to the airport which usually costs between $32-$34 the driver charged us $38. When we questioned him about the higher price he adjusted the price to $34. I can only think that was an intentional attempt to over charge us. They should be offering discounts because their cars are so disgusting. In the future I will take Uber or Lyft.  When we travel to other cities in the US the cabs are clean and decent.  Atlanta Airport is an international hub to the rest of the world. What a horrible impression we make when one of our guests have to take a cab.
DON'T GO HERE !!!!  YOU WILL WAIT 2 HOURS FOR FOOD....... Went to Cala bar with my husband,the service was slow(only about 10 customers inside at the time ), the manager was rude when I spoke to her about my food being raw. So after waiting 45 min for wings (wings were okay) they served me raw salmon and then told me only the chef can determine if it's raw ... no ma'am I am eating it , if I say it's raw then it's raw. Mind you it took about an hour to get my meal and to send it out raw .. I was so annoyed .. then they microwave it and bought it back out ... no thank you ..... I would not recommend anyone going here. They need new management or train the one that's there. Just save your money and go else where .. you will thank me later.
The two star is for the pizza is really good there. But the low score is for the rest of the menu it is horrible please dont have dinner there. My food was horrible i had a bite never touched again. I believe they could do so much bettet the restaurant has potential but they need  a bettet chef. Nicr waitress was nice but would not be coming back unless i want pizza.
Really great food. I've been here several times during non peak hours with great experiences. That being said,  I had a bad experience with the staff not seating fairly on a Friday night recently. After waiting quite a while, a table opened up that was clearly going to be ours (we were next on the list). A man, who had just arrived with his family, points to it with the hostess and says we'll take that one. The hostess, being young and flustered, decides to seat them there. After waiting another 15 minutes, we decided to leave. That was the last time I was there.
Very unhappy with the experience.  Would not recommend.  I felt deceived and cheated.  Stylist fresh out of school, unqualified.  For a $40 haircut, I expect competence, and on this day I didn't get it.
Please dont give your money to this establishment......its the most racist establishment in the city of Boston. Went there last weekend and they turned away someone that was going to pay for 20 of us because well lets say he looked different..yeah i know..this is atrue story...they told him that he wouldnt get in..... infront all of us ...it was such a very awkward embarrasing moment ......none of us said a word...the bouncers didnt realise that we had come with him....no human being should be disgraced like that on his birthday...and they had the nerve to say.."...dude go to another bar...you ladies in the back can come right in...like seriously..?? we wouldnt believeit...he was in the right attire..again this was a prepared night...it was so awkward and embarrasing we left in tears... i will do whatever i can to bring this bar/ club down for the rest of my life i dont care how much it costs me .
This is the worst store ever. The customer service sucks...  The services and the network are great but the people there have no respect what so ever.  This guy called Robert was in-charge of me when I walked in yesterday. I had a simple problem which would have to take a max of 15 mins, but guess what it took freaking 5 hours.  When I told him what the issue was he responded with some vague answer, so I repeated myself thinking he didn't get it, so his exact response was " Ma'am let me repeat myself, like I said...." This is no way to talk to anyone.  I just ignored that comment and gave him my phone to work on it... half an later I go back to talk to him and he does not even acknowledge the fact that I was waiting for him, he walked by me 4 times... finally I said "excuse me how much longer is it going to take.." His response "it's hard to say, it might take anywhere between 10 mins to 4 days." I was so shocked at what he said, I just told him I will be back later to pick it up, so he said "come back at your convince"  So I go back at 5 PM and its still not ready... as soon as he saw me he said " I have been waiting for you from the afternoon, but the thing is I just shut your phone so it will take another 10 mins..." at this time I lost it. I didn't know what to say to him anymore...  Finally after an hour I got my phone back, and when he gave it to me he says, "now that you have your phone back, I don't think you will need my services anymore" and walked just away.  Don't ever go there if you have a choice, But if you do have to try to stay away from Robert. He is rude.
I order a drink and could not finish it and I ask the server to pack my drink for to go, 5 mins later that server hand me a styrofoam box.
First the waitress was nice.  We ordered wings and the waitress they rain out of ranch dressing, how do you run out of ranch!  After we waited 40 minutes for our food, the manager told us we the kitchen is behind about 1.5 hours. Also, he did know if they may not fully our order They should have told us how behind they truly was!   The food came out cool and not completely done.  My stomach hurts and I'm on their toilet, you tell me.  Do not visit Never eat here, food is horrible
Handy is an absolutely terrible service. While I have had some wonderful cleaners, this service is not EVER worth signing up to clean your home. I have had multiple professionals damage kitchen equipment or show up without the appropriate cleaning equipment -- and one recently dumped trash on the street that I receive a citation for --- rather than in the dumpster. Unbelieveable. On top of which, I have moved out of the country and am UNABLE to cancel my service. Both the website and the Handy app tell you to call customer service to cancel --- and NO ONE ANSWERS the customer service line. It directs you right back to the online center. I have spent hours trying to google this and figure it out on their website. Even the numbers previously listed on yelp loop you to the same message that hangs up the phone after it tells you to go to the website. Save yourself and steer clear of this terrible company. Cleaning your own apartment is far less painful than dealing with this company.
Food is generally very good.  When the owner is there the service especially from the owner is attentive.  I have frequented the tavern quite often and find the bartenders can appear cold and not really engaging,  but they are efficient enough.    This last visit I was told we could not sit outside if we were not going to order an entree.  I insisted we would order more than our share of drinks, oysters and salads but was informed that local zoning laws did not allow for seating outside of patrons who did not order an entree.  So that would mean that someone who preferred 2 dozen oysters and a salad would be breaking the law if they sat ouside.  I could have easily said we were going to order an entree as I noted most outdoor patrons seemed to have "claimed" but I always prefer to be up front.  No matter how I tried to explain how illogical that this appeared to be, the hostess was not listening and continually repeated the management's rules as explained to her. She kept insisting that the restaurant would be breaking "zoning laws" and the restaurant would suffer from seating us outdoors.   In any case we sat inside and the waitress inside was wonderful.   I guess salads, soups, and other appetizers don't count.  You definitely can't eat out side if you are a vegetarian...  But the inconsistency and the arrogance of many, not all, of the servers will probably keep me away.  Its a shame because the location and the food is great.
This place is a train wreck, only benefitting from the fact that it's the only Dunkin' in the area. I just waited 25 minutes for a bacon egg and cheese on a bagel. Nothing else on the order, it wasn't even a meal. Just the breakfast sandwich. Previously I had family in town and went here to get breakfast sandwiches for everyone. When I got home all the sandwiches had no bacon on them. We had to drive all the way back to have them rectify it. Avoid here unless you're desperate for Dunkin'.
Im sitting here writing this from the resturant  it has the worst service i have Ever experienced a the server took our order and only returned after  The manager had to tell her about our drink order never made it to our Table then the server gave us a condecending apology this place Has aqlot of work on staffing there is no reason anybody should be cleaning The floor while you are eating during a dinner rush when there hasnt  Been a spill what a joke im letting corprate know
Went last night during an event. I'll give the pizza 2 stars. The crust itself taste like something that I could have made at home in a rush.   Now the bar...I would give 5 stars. The bartender was on point and the drinks were NICE.   I'd go back for the drinks but not the pizza
I will never use E-Z / Advantage car rental again.....    The clerk at the counter was very pleasant.  He even talked me into an $84 upgrade.  On the last day, I was caught in traffic, I called and they said no problem. I arrived in about 62 minutes.  I gave the clerk a case of water that was left over, before I got into the airport.  He also said there wasn't any additional charges.    I then received my credit card bill for an extra $35.66.  I called several times and was transferred all over the place.  They said they would call me back, never did, etc.   I disputed through my credit card company, and then was given an additional receipt showing an addition hour and an additional day of "upgrade" charge and random fees.  Ridiculous!!!!
First of all, the person handling your food (raw meat, bread, cheese, etc.) is the SAME person handling money and WIPING HIS NOSE WITHOUT washing his hands or wearing gloves! You have got to be kidding me. That should have been my first sign to walk out.  Their service is incredibly slow yet 4 customers got their sandwich orders before my order was ready. The mushroom cheese steak was edible at best however I kept praying that the heat from the grill killed anything that was on his bacteria-filled hands. Fries were clearly deep fried from frozen with no flavor.  Probably would have given them a rating of 3 IF HE WASHED HIS HANDS or, at least, wore gloves - DISGUSTING. Never eating here again.
One star because I had to, and because pretty tile. I paid extra for express delivery. Not only was not delivered express, delivery deadline was postponed twice. Tile setter is waiting for two weeks, entire job deadline getting pushed back. NOT HAPPY. Someone dropped the ball in a big way and only my rep at Great Floors seems interested in making it right. Suggest them only if you don't need special order or anything shipped.
The chopped salad isn't chopped! And it was all lettuce. Place is pretentious for a tiny pizza too. Need to bring up their game! We had the lamb sausage pie. Otherwise tolerable. But I can't get over the salad.
I was so apprehensive about going to this place. I LOVED the Avalon... although when I used to go there for shows, I was too young to drink and thus could not be discouraged by expensive drink prices, and during most of the time I spent on Lansdowne I was attending gay night at either Avalon, Axis or Embassy (mostly Embassy). Now that the mainstream gay scene in Boston is mostly defunct, I was anxious to see what kind of monster replaced my beloved crappy-ass clubs.  My first thought was... holy security. They have at LEAST 15 dudes who get paid to stand down the street and point people toward the door. The entrance procedure is pretty... stupid. I don't see why you have a line of people using metal detecting wands, and no one scanning tickets. The scanners are right outside the door of the ballroom, and if you want to leave the ballroom and go out into the hallway, where the snacks are, two security people have to chase you down and put an X on your hand to grant you re-entry. You should have absolutely free reign to go between the hallway and the ballroom.  The coat check is FIVE DOLLARS (groan). I don't even think they charge five dollars for the coat check at expensive clubs like Rumor. I left really early so I had no problem getting my coat, but I'm sure it's a nightmare if you stay until the end of the show.  Also, if you're a smoker, prepare for hours upon hours without a cigarette. It made me fondly miss the strange fenced-in areas on the side of Avalon & Axis where you could smoke without technically leaving the building, and the smoker's balcony at Embassy.   The decor is strange, to say the least. I guess it's supposed to celebrate "Unity in Diversity," but really, I don't understand what Buddhism has to do with Tom Jones or Lady GaGa. Drinks are kind of expensive, but what do you expect from a franchise venue like that? The second floor balcony is where you wanna be, in my opinion. It almost matches the Roxy balconies in viewing awesomeness. And, I have to say, the sound really is phenomenal in there. I will go again, I'm already planning on seeing The Faint/Ladytron in April, but I'm only going for bands I really love. Otherwise, it's just so expensive and really not worth it. The Paradise and Middle East are just so superior in character.
Pretty awful. It was great when it first opened, but I was in there on Sunday for brunch and the food was awful and the waitress was completely out to lunch and wreaked of weed. She didn't put my order completely in, never refilled my coffee and was chatting at the bar station for the entire hour we were there.  Great for drinks, but I'll never eat there again.
I'll start this post by saying my hair stylist was very nice and my hair looks pretty good. But the salon itself was so gross. So dirty leaves all in the salon. Everything was dusty with spider webs all over the place. It look FOREVER because my stylist was doing my hair snd someone else's the entire time. She was also rushing the entire time. Not worth the Groupon wouldn't go back
I came to Boston looking forward to good seafood and lobster roll. Based on favorable reviews I came to fin point. What a disappointment. The lobster had no flavor and was Heavy with mayonnaise. I get better lobster rolls in California for a far better price. Expensive and low-quality is a shorter recipe for disappointment. Similarly the wine was mediocre but premium-priced. Not worth a return visit.
This visit has been awful. I've visited Boogalou many times before. We had a party of 8, sitting in a booth close to the DJ. Service was terrible, slow, and very nonchalant. We ordered happy hour drinks to get them AFTER our meal and a hour later. Bartender went "missing" yet our table got no update until a manager was called. Our waitress was very lack luster and nonchalant about getting us supplies we needed for our meals; such as utensils and napkins. By the time I got sauce, utensils and napkins my food was cold. Our water jug was never filled after the first serving. This was an awful experience and I will not be inviting my friends back here.  The music and greeting staff were awesome!   Hookah was also on point.
I was so happy when I found that this chipotle was opening in my neighborhood. I mean after the ecoli bacteria fiasco I felt really good. Lightning never strikes twice right? Wrong all the symptoms of e-coli poisoning, were there. I got feverish with the lack of friendly customers service at this location. The whole crew from managers on down to the servers seem like they are all sedated.The food was so tasteless and ordinary, I felt like an ecoli upchuck to get rid of that meal and go someplace else to get a tastier meal. Like maybe Taco Bell. Last of all  e-coli diarrhea was they way I felt after paying good money for poor service and tasteless food. Three times now. Now who's the sicko!
Came here on a friend's recommendation & was very disappointed. The tacos are OK as far as taste but EXTREMELY small for 3$/ea. Like tapas small. I ordered the rock shrimp tacos and a chicken taco. Being familiar with food of various kind, I thought the rock shrimp was literally Rock Shrimp (a unique class of shrimp with a hard exoskeleton hence the name; which also tastes similar to lobster). NOPE. It's some kind of spicy chilly breaded shrimp. Was quite spicy btw. I'm currently pregnant so my taste buds have to be craving spicy in order to eat it & today was not the day.   On to the chicken: taste like chicken filling for empanadas. Nothing more. On to the toppings: SHREDDED CARROTS?! This is not an authentic Mexican taco spot. Just a strange Americanized fusion of what tacos ought to be.   Beware the Asian chopsticks they give with takeout  you as well
Terrible food! We went to try it since Shabusen closed down at this location. Kyo has the same concept but the food quality is so different. Normally you will think that on a weekend, the seafood will be fresh. But the salmon has fishy taste. The Teriyaki beef is swimming in liquid (not sauce). And 3/4 of the ribs are fat!  We will never go back to this restaurant again.
We love McMenamins and rarely venture out elsewhere when we choose to go out to eat.  A couple of weeks ago we brought family members to Kennedy School, after telling them all about how wonderful McMenamins was and that they had to experience it for themselves.  One of the things I highlighted is that the service, drink, and food is consistently great.  A week or so later, my boyfriend and I came to this location as a celebration for completing our move that day from Beaverton, OR to Vancouver, WA.  The restaurant was fairly busy but service was fine and the beer was great.  The food however took a very long time and when it came out was not good at all.  My boyfriend and I ordered what we order about 90% of the time (burgers) and were both very disappointed.  I immediately remarked that my burger tasted like a burger from elementary school BBQ day - dry and charcoal-tasting.  My boyfriend showed me that his burger bun was dry and crumbling away, and by the middle of his burger there was hardly any bun left in his hands.  He also commented that his fries were cold, which made me think that our burgers may have been fine initially but left under the food warmer for too long before being brought out.  I am sure we will venture here again as we live so close, but we definitely left this last visit with a bad taste in our mouth about the Vancouver location.  Hopefully what we experienced was a rare occurrence for this location and not the norm.
Bar is staffed with ignorant management and won't serve tourists with legit passports and USA issued visas. Not the place to visit if you're only a tourist in the fine state of Colorado. Well they served the white ones who had Estonian passports, but not the Mexican ones with Mexican passports!
Can't understand the hype, but it might be that we also didn't go during the brunch time like everyone recommended. Quail was not good and neither was the bisque I got. I might have hit an off day, but I would not come back.
Seriously? Where has customer service gone?   Ignored for the first ten minutes. Not even a hello. And we sat AT THE BAR.   Food took forever. Probably 20 mins.   I am pretty sure none of the servers smiled once.   Food was ok. It came with a moldy cherry.   This was my second time here. Felt like I would give it another chance. Due to poor service, won't be back.
The first time I went here was about 4 weeks ago while my mom and sister were in town. We just got regular manicures and pedicures and they were great. The staff here is really nice and the place is very clean, but I was disappointed my pedicure only lasted about 2 weeks.   I came back anyways last week for a gel manicure and pedicure for an event. Again the staff was very nice and still very clean, but it hasn't even been a week and my gel manicure chipped and is now fully peeling off. I am so disappointed. My gel manicures usually last 10 days at least and I do not know why this one lasted only 4 days!  I will not be coming back to this salon that is for sure.
I wish I could give no stars. Came in with a party and they didn't have someone for me so I had to wait while all my friends went and finished. While they did start both nails and toes at the same time they rushed through and completely did the worst French manicure ever. I kept thinking they would fix it and then nope top coat on, done.  I tried to tell her and she began filing my nail?!? The french is uneven and overly thick. I will never come back here
edit to add: And what better way to confirm my opinions of this place than a profane, grammatically-challenged, personally-insulting private message from what I assume is an employee of the farm!  I just got this message from "Ali A." the morning after posting my first review:  "Greg my (EXPLETIVE DELETED) . I assume your name either Greg easterly Are you for real or you just work the maE next door ? You paid $10 dollars and spent a couple ours with people catering to your unappreciative personality and you managed to critique even the parking attendant and everyone else who worked at  this farm maybe you belong at the next door miserable place with the miserable (EXPLETIVE DELETED)heads . No insult intended just telling you what I think of your (EXPLETIVE DELETED) up review of a family farm"  edit again: Ooh, and another one, just minutes later, from "Mario K." calling me "retarded."  These guys just don't know when to stop digging.    A mature and well-reasoned response, surely.  Please read my detailed, specific review below.  Note that I am in no way affiliated with any competing business; I live an hour away and was visiting friends for the weekend.    ***  I was very disappointed in the haunted corn maze. I know the farm can't control the weather, but regardless, they were still charging full price for a maze where 3/4 of the corn was laid down by the wind.  It wasn't so much a maze as an open field of mud and darkness, covered in 2-3 inches of water and knee-high corn stalks.  It was very slippery and generally miserable; it didn't seem like any effort had been made to mitigate the mud (no hay or barkdust or anything visible under the water).  Definitely not suitable for children or the elderly.      The ticket lady told me that their real haunted maze had been flooded earlier in the day, so they were doing the scary stuff in their standard maze.  If that was the better-condition of the two mazes, then the other one must have been a literal swimming pool.  Every staff member I interacted with seemed overworked and snotty (with the exception of the people doing the scaring IN the maze - they were all great and making the best of a bad situation).  One parking attendant directed me to a handicapped parking area (not marked as such) and then yelled at me when I parked there.  A different attendant raised her voice and took a very sarcastic tone with my girlfriend for failing to stay on the "pedestrian path" through the parking lot (it was dark and poorly marked; there was no need for her tone).  The girl speaking over the PA system to make announcements sounded like the most bored, sarcastic teenager stereotype imaginable.  There was no attempt to create a festive or fun atmosphere.   I also have to wonder at their decision to blast modern pop music over the PA system in the main area, because it carries over into the haunted maze and really ruins what little atmosphere remained.  Since I assume that the corn won't magically stand itself back up after the wind storm, and I doubt that they'll be replacing their entire staff between now and Halloween, I would definitely skip this maze for the rest of the year.  I have heard that there are other locations on the same road, and I would definitely try one of those first, because they can't be any worse than Bella Organic Farm.
Yesterday was my special lady friend's birthday, so, naturally, I wanted to treat her to some very tasty treats at what many websites call a top 5 Portland restaurant- Paley's, if you haven't figured out what I was alluding to just yet :) Anyway, I called two days in advance and left a message outlining all the requiring information for a reservation, per the answering service's request. When I called at 5:30, yesterday, when they open, the lady on the other end told me that they had no records indicating that I had ever called. To add insult to injury, she was very rude as she explained that they had JUST filled their final spot and that there was nothing they could do for me, aside from possibly giving me an 8:30 slot....I don't know about you, but I'm not interested in sleeping all night with beef tartare in my belly! Well, I'm done with my tears. I'm sure the food is very good, I just wish I could have at least sampled it rather than only getting a taste of what their customer services is like. We went to Wildwood and had such a good time. Please believe that the Manila Clams changed my life!
Horrible experience mainly due to the older lady at the door with a horrible attitude because she can't see or read...a good friend of mine booked a $250 table to surprise her significant other for his birthday. She put the table reservation under my name and hers so that we would be there to surprise him once they arrived. The lady (which I'm told is the owner's mom) told me several times my name was not on their list and there are no more tables available. They finally let me in to stand around like a sardine then I decided to ask someone else about our reservation who saw my name right away...by this time my friend who made the reservation and the birthday guy arrived outside and were told they had to wait in a very long line even though they paid $250 for a table...I went outside to get them and the old lady was very rude once again saying make them wait, I told her she doesn't have a table, etc...even though another worker at the establishment told her we were on the list...the lady continued to be rude and not only did she not let them in for another 20 minutes she didn't want to let me back in because she was wrong and had an attitude when I showed her my name on the list...she even went off on the employee for simply correcting her...to finally get in and seated was very stressful and the party scene just isn't worth the headache of dealing with the mom at the door. FYI the rest of the employees were very nice but I choose NOT to go back. There are too many places in Atlanta with very good service, especially when you pay $250 just to sit...
This location needs some serious work. Every single time my husband or I pick up food to go the order is never correct. The sandwich is always completely wrong. And the last time I went in the manager apologized and fixed it and still have it back to me incorrectly! I called corporate finally after it happening 5 times and was told I would get a call back and never did.
It's a organic meat-eater/vegetarian/vegan   McDonald's. Using some good ingredients and mixing it with ok ingredients and than turning it into some bland concoction.   Even when I was still eating vegan junk food I would have never liked this.... ever.  The place was clean and huge but I can't even imagine it fully occupied.
VERY LONG wait. The waiter brought out the food and messed up my friend's order. The manager said he's charged him half for the wrong food, or he could wait 15-20 mins for his actual order. Oh...and he would charge him half. Sorry but it should be free.   We waited an hour for the food to come, and they only have 1 oven for the whole place. I wouldn't really come here again, or I would come when it's not busy.
for screen repair... shop around  HIGH prices and was told 'go ahead shop around'  My bad that I did not $35 for a screen door and $30 for a normal screen  a couple of weeks later I saw a sign at the local hardware shop and inquired what the price would have been. It was a lot less. $13-$18 per screen.
I've eaten a Fleming's a few times, and with so many options a stone's throw away - Grill 23, Abe & Louie's, Cap Grille - I won't be back.  To me, there is nothing special about the food at high end steak houses.  It's all pretty much the same and isn't eactly inventive or inspired cooking.  But that's ok.  I know what I'm after when I go - a big hunk of high quality beef.    Ergo, what it's really about is service...attention to detail.  I just didn't experience that at Fleming's.  I ordered a Martini with olives.  I got a drink with no garnish.  I asked for my steak with bernaise on the side.  I got no sauce.  I know these are nit picky details, but again I differentiate steak houses with the details.
depending on when you go the service is either ok or terrible. the last time i was there and probably the last time for good was in November.  the server was going epically nuts cause it was busy (i think her name was CJ or something like that),  she started by saying sorry but i have a table of 10 so things may not be that quick... ok but then she was rude on top of it,  she forgot our coffees and made it seem like it was our fault, instead of a glass of water she slammed a full picture on the table (not the nice wine bottle ones but the 2 liter ones at the bar).   we thought it was just us but the girl at the table next to us looked over and said "good luck" when she left, they also had a crappy experience.  over all on top of that food took a while to come out and on average is mediocre and not worth the price.
$4.72 for a SMALL chai?! Seriously!? It was alright, but too much milk not enough spice. Might as well go to Starsucks for that price and quality.  And the seats on the benches are about half the normal size. Probably not going again.
This place is not a good place to go with a big group. They will force a big amount of gratitude per person along with the total cost of the order when the services was not something special. It will be my last time there.
Meh.  save your time and go up the street to Hai Ky for better Vietnamese.  Extra star for the presentation of our fried rice in a half pineapple.  Clearly, I am feeling generous.    Honestly, the place kinda grossed me out.  And that is saying a LOT from a person that was a Wan Fu regular, which was  previously located immediately to the right, but now closed.... I believe due to health code violations.  This place actually made me sick, but i kept that on the downlow since the BF was so proud of himself for finding a "new" Restaurant for us to eat at.  Sweet guy.   But a super fail in the food category.
Still meh. What am I missing that compels patrons to award four stars?  Arrived early on a Thursday night but the bar was already stacked. Was a spontaneous restaurant decision since we were nearby and we did not have a reservation. Predictably, was offered an undesirable table, which I can live with since we didn't have a reservation and they were filling up. But the waitstaff was banging into me so often that I was beginning to think it was intentional. Maybe it was. The sideways glances from the hostesses and other waitstaff as they surveyed the room were unfortunate. Hey, we can see you!  What was good -- my glass of Cabernet and the cannoli (hadn't gone soft, not too sweet). Regrettably the gnocchi were mushy and the sauce watery and bland. The duck pappardelle was just unspecial - the only flavor that popped was gamey duck. The server was paced well but his compadres clumsily offered me the wrong dish three times. Just ask me before putting the wrong dish in front of me.  You can pay 40% less for two more stars somewhere else on Washington St. Granted, may not be an apples to apples comparison but  you know what, we were happy to free up the bad table at Stella.
You have one of the rudest people working at the call center at 888-749-8541. His name is Coby or Colby. I spoke to him about changing my reservation because I put it in for one day earlier by mistake. He gave me and the Expedia agent an attitude on several different calls. When the reservation change was finished instead of telling me about a confirmation email or saying thank you and good bye at least he immediately hung up the phone on me. I work in Health Care where customer service is important and he is one of the worst people I have ever spoke to. If I were the manager I would immediately fire him. This was not based on one incident. It was over 3-4 phone calls. I usually never write reviews but he is a problem in your company that you need to fix immediately.
This is the worst Nepali restaurant in Boston area. Please avoid this restaurant like a plague. I found out this restaurant via groupon. We went there and told that we have groupon and we are here for the dinner. The manager looked sad after we mentioned about groupon. And then everything went downhill. We have never been treated so horribly in any restaurants in the whole United States. We were treated as  if we are eating for free. The manager was horrible. He gave us the worst of attitude. I will never step a foot inside this place again in my life. And I suggest all the yelp user to do the same.
I ordered the O.G. topped with sauerkraut, which I thought was just okay. The line wasn't even that long yet ordering took forever and getting the food took forever too. The guy wearing a fedora helped me and he was a bit rude and weird.   Overall, I must have waited 20+ minutes for a mediocre hot dog.
This place opened up just recently and really they have some good pizza just as good as signal across the street. I like the location and the cleanliness. The staff are honestly really chill people.   But I like how theirs no garbage can near by so it would be easier to dispose of any mess so their isn't any clutter anywhere I mean it would be really convenient. It's really funny how I asked an employee for an ash tray and he gave me a cup instead then several minutes later one of the staff peeps out the door and says "sorry guys you can't smoke at the table" so me being understanding and reasonable I don't create a problem. Rather going on Yelp and writing this review.   What my question is wheres the signs that say no smoking? If their was I wouldn't be taking my time out doing this review. But overall good pizza.
Just gross.  Grease running off the bacon onto the plate.  Hash browns was cooked with so much oil they had oil in the middle of the Hash browns.
The food is not the cause of my bad review, it is the service. Started with the hostesses that blatantly had no clue what they were doing and allowed people coming in after us to be seated before us. Waiter and waitresses will pretty much ignore your tables unless you are in a booth. The food took about an hour to make even though we got lettuce wraps, it's chicken on top of lettuce... Not that hard.   This is not the first time that I have encountered horrible service here. The first time I went to this restaurant we had to leave because we waited a half hour with no waiter or waitress even coming over to get a drink order. Not to mention that it was an odd time during the day when there was no more than 20 people there.   I don't know who manages they need to hire more attentive wait staff that isn't just standing around diddling their thumbs. It was obnoxious the pace they were moving and most of them were oblivious to their surroundings.
I recently ate at this place with some coworkers for Saturday brunch. The food itself was pretty good, and they had a good selection of alcoholic beverages. It was a little tight as far as seating went but we were a large group, so I get it. However, my biggest gripe came at the end of the meal. As we were waiting for the bill 2 people who were waiting to be seated came up to our table and very rudely asked if we were done eating. They stated that they were from out of town (it's Austin, everyone is from out of town) and they had been waiting to be seated for 2 hours (they decided to show up in the afternoon, on a Saturday, at a trendy restaurant). There were plenty of other people waiting outside and none of them were complaining. As this was happening none of the staff bothered to intervene. That was where the visit went south for me. There should have been someone from the staff stepping in to help these people out and make sure that we could wait for our bill without being harassed. My advice for anyone wanting to visit this place is to enjoy the atmosphere, the food, and drinks but just make sure you eat fast to avoid being harassed by impatient out of towners.
I tried the hamburger. I'm not sure it was even real beef.   It tasted more like a sour and beef combo. The service was horrible and the prices are outrageous.
pizzas good, people who work there suck and cant keep a game face when things are semi-busy on a werk night. caesar salad was boring and sad.
When you have your online ordering system say that the order will be ready in an hour and you call the customer and tell them an hour later that it will not be ready for an additional hour then yell at the customer and tell them that you are doing them a favor and after 2.5 hours the order never shows up and then when you call again you tell the customer that you had told them you would pick it up...you will never get my business again TRUST ME on that one, and I will let everyone know not to order from your establishment!
Wow! I'm surprised at how many people have such a lack of knowledge on what tastes good and what a good burrito is. Let me start by saying this is the second time I've been here. I really wanted to like this place coming from California, I love burritos and this place happens to be right in front of where I live. I didn't want to write a negative review after my first experience (which was horrible), so I decided to give it a second shot. First time I was here, I had the chicken burrito. It was so bland. If you're going to put rice and beans in all your burritos, make sure they're well seasoned. Their onions are just very huge sloppy chunks. I felt like I was just biting into onions. For my second visit, I decided to go with their popular pork and Chile burrito, chicken quesadilla, nachos with the meat chili and guacamole. Burrito was once again super bland. Half of it didn't even have any meat in it, I thought they accidentally made the vegetarian one. Once I got to the meat, it was once again flavorless... the nachos came out with no meat chili which I had to pay $4 something extra for (good thing I checked my box before I left). The quesadilla was super soggy and dripping with liquid. The guac was under seasoned and didn't even have cilantro in it. Just overall another horrible experience. Anyone who says this place is good, is not a good person to ask for food recommendations. You're better off going to Taco Bell.
I finally tried them for the first time yesterday.   The food looked good, tasted good until my last bite. I ordered the escargot appetizer.  Literally on the last bite, I was chewing on a strip of metal.  It came from the metal scrub they used to clean the wok/pan!!!  Back track a little bit.  I went after the lunch crowd, at 2:15 pm.  There were three tables total with customers, including myself.  I waited for a long time for the older gentle to take my order.  I got my food at 2:40 pm.  After I hailed down the older gentleman, he said the cook is human and he makes mistakes.  When he brought out the entree, there were exactly four shrimps for a $11.95 lunch menu.   I feel it was a bit pricey.  I was gun shy to take another bite of my food.  I only ate the shrimps after careful inspection of each one.  The older gentleman did comp my food as long as I promise to give them a second chance.  So I lied and said yes, knowing full well I will never step foot in that place again.
I echo the prior poor reviews and wish had checked Yelp before my colleague booked Avi White (owner and sole locksmith, I believe) at Austin's Premier Lock & Key.    This unscrupulous operation charged over $500 to rekey some locks, or $32/lock, about triple the normal $12-$14.  In addition, Avi charged both a service call and labor (normal practice is one or the other).  My associate did not catch the overcharging before swiping our company card.  I initially thought the ludicrously high amount was a billing mistake.  Avi was slow to respond to multiple calls (took a couple weeks) and his tone was belligerent.  He only became responsive when I mentioned posting a review.  He promised to come back after conferring with his "boss," but that was over a week ago and no call-back.  Reading the other reviews, the overcharging and poor service seem to be a systemic pattern with this company.
What an awful experience! Will not be returning! I am the ideal patient that has no cavities, teeth work, or problems. My whole appointment was just one awful thing after another.   1. Upon my arrival I'm told they don't have a hygienist so someone else will be doing my exam. Why would you schedule my appointment on a day there is no hygienist when I need a cleaning?  2. Assistant spent half an hour taking my x-rays because she couldn't get the machine placement correct. Do you know how uncomfortable it is to hold that contraption in your mouth because someone else isn't getting the camera position correctly. 3. Assistant immediately began polishing my teeth and snagged my lip in the tool. First off, why are you polishing my teeth when my teeth haven't even been cleaned yet? Also, as the person polishing my teeth, why are you not maneuvering my lip away from my teeth so you can polish the front of them without spinning my lip into your tool. 4. The dentist? or whomever Anna Nguyen is, returned to actually clean my teeth, and used the ultrasonic. That's fine, however the assistant was not paying attention and continued to suction my throat rather than the water coming from the tool. She also would look away causing her hand to move to then suction my lip or cheek instead of liquid. 5. Once the cleaning was complete the assistant returned to struggling to polish my teeth and then flossed. At this time she missed both of my back molars but I did not say anything because I plan to just floss them myself and get out of there.  6. Lastly, I opted in the beginning of the appointment prior to knowing that the experience was going to be less than professional, for varnish to be put onto two teeth. The assistant proceeded to dab the varnish all over all my teeth, getting it onto my lips and piles of the product on  my teeth.  My lips are still sticky 2 hours later.    I really wanted to like this place but it seems that it's a bunch of newly graduates or maybe interns working here.  The two who handled my appointment today were not even on their website as part of their "Team". Long story short, I will not be returning and I hope that no one else deals with the same.  The Pro's I can say is their front desk seems very knowledgeable, in particular their insurance specialist and the business itself seems very up-to-date with everything being digital.
Aesthetically, the newer, southernmost location of the Hyde Park Grill is great.  Architecturally clean, great patio, slick yet casual bar on the inside, decent wine selection.  But this Hyde Park grill got me thinking:  part of the charm of dining out in Austin is the same thing that can make restaurants here an occasional challenge to review, that is, that the very best local service here is prompt (yet casual), attentive (but not snooty).  And while no one could argue that the new Hyde Park Grill offers a visually simple and appealing approach to dinner, our service was more casual than attentive, our food more adequate than outstanding.  It's a fine line to walk, and not everyone does it well.  Many in our dining party attempted to harden arteries right away:  there were chicken-fried entrees, plenty of cracked pepper fries to go around.    Here's an excerpt from an actual conversation on that front:  Us: so, um, what are you guys known for?  What's good here? Waitress: (shrugs) the fries, I guess.  This is one of those situations where you really wish you could give extra half-stars, as some of the shenanigans going on outside during our dinner had nothing to do with the restaurant itself (some guy at a nearby table fighting with his girlfriend or parole officer, repeatedly jumping the patio railing and standing on his car in the parking lot...seriously, it was odd), and our food certainly wasn't awful.  But it wasn't great.   Let's hope Hyde Park south works a little harder to bottle some of the magic that's made the original so popular.
This restaurant gets 2 stars strictly for historical relevance to the city and overall nostalgic ambiance.  The food isn't worth spending your money.  If you want great brunch food, this is not the place to eat.  If you want okay breakfast food that doesn't quite compare to what you could make on your own at home, then this is the place for  you.   I ordered cheese grits and got an equal cheese to grits ratio.  Cheese on the bottom of the bowl and grits poured on top.  I had a nice glob of cheese leftover at the end, even after I mixed it all together.  Corn beef hash was definitely out of a can, which is fine, but it tasted extremely old.  There was a gross metallic taste.  I did enjoy my pancake.  It was light, not too thick and had crispy edges from being cooked on the griddle.  My other gripe with this restaurant is there's no sign in sheet.  Managing seating is done using the memory of the hostess, the bus boy and the patrons. A simple notebook and pen would solve this issue.  We will probably never be back.
Below is my original review.  I'm updating it, but the star rating is not changing. I've now been here three times. The second time I got the chicken Sausage and sweet potato hash. It was fine but not remarkable.  Again though, the service here Just sucks. I mean they have the worst unapologetic attitude and we wait forever. Forever to get the waitress to take our order, forever to get our coffee, forever to get our food....And they have an attitude that is just awful about it. As if they are the only crowded brunch place in the city. I'll be going anywhere else instead from now on.  Original Review: So foodies this place would get 3 and a half stars from me. They have some delist food and some interesting choices.  I had the big nasty and it was decadent and fattens beyond belief. I could not finish and had to bring half of it home. So as far as my meal, it was very good.  The drinks sounded good - interesting.  I had the cherry limeade and my friend ordered something  I now can't remember. It was really mediocre and I didn't finish it. Watered down and not flavorful.   The worst part of our experience was hands down the service. Please note this: Rosebud does no substitutions. None. Zero. Zip. Nada. Forget that breakfast is usually the easiest meal to custom make- that often they take 2 minutes to cook eggs and make it to order.  Forget the fact that my friend was a vegetarian. They will not make any substitutions.  When my friend begged them to leave the bacon off at they would not. When she asked for tomatoes instead, they said she could order them on the side for 3.95.  3.95??? And that is what she did and they literally gave her a saucer with tomatoes.    On top of this our waitress was soooo rude about it.  Terrible.  I mean it was unusual - I have never been to a restaurant that refused to make any substitutions for breakfast  and her attitude towards my friend was almost as bad as, "well, you shouldn't be a vegetarian." Despite my food being good, I haven't gone back and I'm not sure i will. Lots of good breakfast in Atlanta- no one should feel like a criminal for not eating meat.
Tried scheduling an appt- online scheduling is not user friendly though Jacoall swears it is. Needed to reschedule the appt and wasn't able to online, called in the morning and left a message asking to reschedule for a time later in the day. Didn't hear back, called again at noon and sent an email. No response. Called again at 4pm and sent another email. Finally heard back. No respect for customers- told me the tool was easy to use when it wasn't and didn't acknowledge why it took 9 hours to get a response. Can't imagine using a salon that doesn't care enough to return a phone call, regardless of whether or not they claim to be a "receptionist free" "busy" salon.
Too many rules, surly staff, average beer.  Felt like I was having a drink at a convent.
I find better designer labels at Value Village. And i'm not joking. Huge mess and full of tacky, cheap crap that is not designer by any stretch of the imagination. Seriously, go to the Salvation Army or Value Village. Cheaper and better quality and cleaner! And not all made in China.
I had high hopes when I purchased certificates for this service through living social.  The first delivery never came, Jeannie told me it was sent to my house instead of my business, then she realized it wasn't sent there either.  Anyway we rescheduled for the following week, mistakes happen.  I ordered 4 meals for 2.  The serving size of the protiens was ok, but the food looked like sad 'leftovers'.  The serving sizes of vegetables and starch was the equivilant of 2 tablespoons.  I called to inquire why such a small amt for 2 adults and Jeannie told me that was because the quality was so high.... not in my opinion, I know when carrots corn and green beans are poured out of a frozen vegetable bag.  The lasagna was made with canned tomato sauce and was mushy.  The containers feel like you could poke your fingers right through the bottom, very flimsy.  Your money would be better spent ordering take out from a restaurant to get fresh food and what you actually want instead of whatever they cook, you have no say in what comes to your door.  Live and learn.
This place sucks. Service was bad ... slow and long wait for a simple pizza. The place was not even busy for a Thursday night. We had to wait 30 mins before the waitress took our order then another 40 mins for pizza ... when the pizza came out it looked pale and no flavor at all. Crust was doughy ... price wise? Over priced and the food is not worth the price and time. A lot of wait staff just standing around smiling.... not a good choice for dinner. If the place was busy, you may have to wait 2 hours to eat your dinner. A good idea may be to call ahead before showing up. I can only give it a one star coz service and food was really poor.
Worst breakfast I paid $35 bucks for 2 in a long time. Avoid eggs Benedict and corned beef hash.
So incredibly disappointed. I went to get a gel manicure and as soon as I left the salon my nails started to darken, and it almost looked like they were burnt. It seems that she may have left my nails under the UV light for too long. I'm not the type of person to demand a refund, but I definitively will not be going back.
Be careful with this place. I stood there as one person after another had issues with their billing. They told me one price then tried to charge another. I saw 4 consecutive customers have the same issue. Watch them close. There is a pattern here
Watch out!!!  I ate there 9/29/16 and had my credit card information stolen and used from there. I asked them about it and they claimed they knew nothing. It happened in less than 30 minutes.
The most horrible homophobic bar in Boston. Don't do it! "Get these homos out" - said by bartender
Not sure why this place was voted on Portland Favorite Eatery. We ordered the hanger steak and the waitress didn't asked us how we liked our steak so it came out bloody bloody rare. The tapas dishes were overpriced for the quality of the food. The bathroom was super dirty with no toilet papers. Nothing special here and will not be coming back.
My husband and I decided to go here one night to grab some quick pizzas! We were out all day, and busy so we were starving! We picked up our pizzas and drove home which isn't to far about 10 minutes away. Anyways when we got home, I took a bite out of the hand pan pizza and it was completely raw!!! The dough wasn't even cooked, and I almost gagged! How in the world can someone give their customer an undercooked raw pizza! It's just awful! So naturally we called to let them know about the situation and asked if they could deliver the new pizzas to us, since it was their fault for messing up in the first place! Well long story short, they said they wouldn't because they did not deliver to our address, even though it was literally 10 minutes down the road in the next city over! So my husband decided he would just go grab the new pizzas...Well 30 minutes later my husband comes home with the new pizzas and guess what.....they were undercooked and RAW!!!! At this point I was just fed up, so I called dominos back, and told them they once again sold me undercooked pizzas...so the girl on the phone puts her manager on the phone, and I explained the situation. The manager then tells me she personally made the pizza and if she kept it in the oven any longer it would have burned! I told her well then you need to be re-taught how to make a pan pizza because what they should be doing to avoid it from burning the toppings or being undercooked is putting the dough in alone to cook a bit and then taking it out adding the toppings and putting it back in to cook! Clearly dominos needs to retrain these employees at this location! Anyways point to this story is my husband had to go back a third time for new pizza! While the other pizzas got cold! They didn't even want to credit us for the pizzas but they made sure we brought the other undercooked pizzas back! Like seriously they make me laugh!!! What are they going to do resell the pizza that should be trashed? What a joke! Needless to say, I contacted corporate and I hope they take this matter seriously because as a customer and for this huge inconvience they should do something! Anyways do not go to this location unless you want raw dough for your meal!
I arrived at 6:15 today and was told they were "all done" despite being open until 7. The barber who delivered this news shrugged when I asked why and then said they were short staffed, which would make sense if they didn't have barbers on every chair.   This is one of several times I've arrived before the shop is "closed" and been turned away or found a locked door.
I ate this place with my mom.  It was a big disappointment for both of us.  The 马兰头拌豆腐， the vegetable is not  马兰头，the dish seems to be taken out from refrigerator for a while.  We order another dish which supposed to have crab and shrimp inside.  However there is no crab at all.  The waiter said that crab meat is dissolved inside the dish soup.  That dish costs for 20$, which name is totally misleading.  In the end, we have to pay this low quality food for 50 - 60  $, they even could not accept visa credit card.  They said only over 100 $ can be paid over credit card.  In the end, I have to pay on my debit card.  We travelled from San Francisco.   We have ate in many nice shanghai restaurants in San Francisco.    We are very disappointed by suhang, not only for its ripoff price, but also.the low quality food.
Everytime I go to this location I leave annoyed. Why is there a cash register in PINK?!? Because whenever I walk up to it and start to wait in line the cashier is so always so rude and says go over to the other side. Mind you all she was doing was chatting it up with a customer she knew. There is only like two girls in there that were actually helpful. They need to really get it together in there. They're so unprofessional...seriously. They need to hire people that actually work instead of chatting!
Generally I enjoy this particular Starbucks,  though today an employee, (tall male with styled short blonde hair)  was quite rude and very unprofessional while I had my order taken.       NO matter if a customer is on the phone or has ten screaming children, it is YOUR job to make them feel welcome. It is NOT your job to be pretentious and treat the customers walking into your business without respect.        The people that choose to walk through the door and get coffees and such..... PAY YOUR PAYCHECK !! Try performing the basics of your job, Mr. Cashier, and read the guests order back to them before they pay, then you wouldn't have to make snide comments. Also you may want to lose the "I'm better than everyone because I work at Starbucks attitude" and try a little guest service. After all,  IT IS YOUR JOB !!!
The quality continues to decline each visit. Our pizzas crust was so hard I had to chisel it with a knife to cut it into bite size pieces, barely any sauce and even less toppings:( I remember when Twilight Pizza was the best in town! We won't be back.
Got the stars only because the Saganaki was good and the hummus too! A bit oily but good !  We're here on vaca and Greek food is one our favorites . The cheese as an appetizer was good but the remaining food we ordered was very bad !  We ordered our kids Mac and cheese and they only had one plate left . Really I have 3 children and 2 of them wanted the Mac . What restaurant in Orlando in the midst of tourist  has one meal of a kind left ? And it's Mac and cheese ??? So they taught . Our waiter was nice enough to split it as if it was 2 entrees so they wouldn't fight . I appreciated that but even after it was split the position was ridiculously small !  Btw our waitress was nice ! Then we ordered the fried calamari , it wasn't the good quality type I can't explain it was so rubbery ! I just had calamari last night and got me wanting more !  The dip they had was made In house , ok I'll give them credit for being unique but unfortunately I did t like the sauce !! So that just went down hill ! We also ordered the ground beef meat balls ... Ewe... So out of the can !!! Definitely not fresh!  We also orders Falafel ,it was horrible . I can't explain anymore it hurts !  At the end our we were charged for the my son's drink a kiddie soda . But it's included in their meal so why was I being charged for the soda that just completely lean mean mean months, and the waitress explained since she entered in the order that my son ordered water that was considered his complementary drinks, are you serious?! Since when do we pay for tap water ! So I asked her to remove it and she said that's just the way the system works I told her please go talk to your manager or this is going to be a big issue then she finally went and removed it. That completely threw me off and pushed me to give her a 10% tip. I visit Orlando one see year and I always look forward visiting my favorite spots this is definitely one place I will never return to! Ew!
It closed!!!!!  What a shock.  It's kind of hard to make money when the servers don't wait on customers.
Vegetarian review - Lacks flavor big time  We tried all the vegetarian appetizers which all felt incomplete and lacking flavor. For the price, the food was not upto the mark. I ordered the hakka eggplant and the udon noodles which were both oily and lacking flavor.   Drinks were the best part of the meal. The pineapple basil and the orange margarita were pretty great and refreshing.
Had no complaints until I received a credit card charge for "smoking damage".  The hotel manager, Ms. Emily Nebrasky, said that she personally inspected the room and noticed the smoke damage.  Neither my husband nor I smoke. We never have. We had no guests in our room. While there I did notice a slight odor but chose not to complain about it. Despite advising Ms. Nebrasky that we are prepared to sign affidavits to this effect she refused to reverse the charge. What happened to the customer always being right?
After twenty plus years of buying food from Cathay Pacific; its come to an end. The final straw was paying $70 dollars for lukewarm food, which included dried up and burnt boneless ribs and no seasoning whatsoever.  It just isnt worth driving 30 minutes to spend $60-$70 dollars for food that gets tossed into the woods.
I had a living social voucher and thought that I would be able to use it for a move out clean since there would be no furniture or anything but turned out that they said they could add the voucher to a move out clean if I added another $150. Now this was a 1300 sq ft apartment that they were SUPPOSED to clean on Monday but because they claimed to be so overwhelmed on Monday, they scheduled it for Tuesday (yesterday). So when they arrived which was hours after they were supposed to; they were supposed to call us to let us know when they would be done. Apparently, they came around 12:30 and didn't even call back until the next day only to complain that they were not even able to finish the job because they were so overwhelmed by having to clean a prior job and felt that it was too much to clean our apartment. They complained that it was too much to clean the refridgerator, oven and bathrooms. Now when you do a move out clean, that is about all there is to do, other than cleaning the windows and such. Basically Ms. DAWN CSERNAI was rude and very unprofessional but not completing the job she and her crew were initially hired to do on Monday in which she had us waiting 6 hrs only to tell us that she couldn't do it on Tuesday and then to call us on Wednesday to say that the job was too difficult. Very unprofessional, unreliable and rude. Do not offer specials if you can't handle the workload and do not accept a job if you have no experience in doing it!
I'm very disappointed with the menu and price change that recently took place at Panera, I ordered from the new pick two menu and my lunch was $9+ and the piece of bread was really small as usual.  I rather go to Sweet Tomatoes and for the same price I get a better variety and the food is actually fresh unlike Panera.  Just in case you didn't know Panera soups come in a bag and are re-heated at the restaurant and their bread come in a package and baked there.  And of top of the service is not the best and the bathroom is always dirty.
Save yourself the time and support a business that practices better ethics. Good food never makes up for the sour taste that accompanies discrimination and unfair treatment. Ever. Don't discriminate your customers based on their race, what language they speak, or whether you're friends with them or not. Every customer deserves to be treated the same as any other. I would give negative stars if I could, worse than zero. I would pay not to come here again.  Arrive and guy at front counter asks "what do you want?" Obviously, food. Why else would I be here? I am asked "Do you want a sandwich or soup?" Well I don't know. Could I sit down and see a menu, please? He sits us down and tells us they ran out of beef pho but they still have turmeric noodles. Since my guest and I have no other soup choices, we both order that dish.  Table of six people walk in less than 5 minutes later. One person obviously has been here or knows the people. Waiter guy states they have beef pho but ran out of turmeric noodles. What? Just said the opposite to me. They then produce 6 bowls of beef pho, 2 more bowls for their own workers, and even fill extra to-go orders for that same table.  Don't go telling me that you're out of something when you offer it to another six customers right after me. Sure, you might know them. But how does that make you appear to other customers who are in the restaurant that weren't given the option to order that dish because you claimed you were out?  Cherry on top after all of this: $15 minimum for credit cards and debit cards.  Bottom line: Again, absolutely cannot support a restaurant that provides generally poor customer service like rude waiter(s) or blatantly lies/can't treat customers equally. I cannot accept any form of blatant discrimination. Doing business these days isn't just about what you offer or the quality.
disappointing... ran out of pearls and my pineapple slush was completely ice. five dollars for a cup of ice! you'll have to PAY me to come back..... also never get the avocado flavour... disgusting
Worst hotel I've ever stayed.  Service is terrible.  Only one friendly person, Carlos, at the front desk was great. Not one other friendly experience.  Bueno Vista Suites needs to provide their employees with customer service training or do a complete house cleaning except for Carlos and Tondra. The rooms are filthy.  Carpets have gross stains.  I couldn't bare to walk on the carpet barefoot,  It was so bad I laid a path of towels down to walk throughout the suite.  The plumbing was broken in the shower.  We reported it and asked if they could have it repaired while we were the parks, but we requested no maid room service.  The attendant not only was rude about it, he flat said NO we can't go in the room if you have the do not disturb sign on the door. We said " well can't you make a note and document that we, as the guest, request no room service? Because we need plumbing repairs in the room? " He said No.  At that point we had received such horrible service already my husband just told the man fine this is typical for the service we have received this entire stay at this hotel.  We proceeded to leave the hotel for the parks, Obviously upset and you'd think the guy would reconsider and try to make it right, but no he let us walk right out knowing we have a plumbing issue that needed repair.  The issue was that the shower faucet flew off the wall while I was showing and hit my leg. That night and next day we had to shower in the tub with water shooting straight out of the wall from a copper pipe.  The shower head did not work.  We will make do as this will be our last night of a seven night. We missed breakfast.  I called room service for a pot of coffee.  I wait 30 it does not show up.  So i call to check on it.  Tondra who is very sweet said she has not record of room service.  She took my order for a pot of coffee and 15 minutes later I get coffee.  Five minutes after I get another knock at the door and its Tondra with coffee.  I tell her they just came.  She said how much did they charge you.  I told her it was 9.00.  She said it came from the hotel next door which buena vista also owns and that it why it took so long she said they should have told me.  They didn't .  Tondra assures me I will not get charged twice.  Tondra and Carlos were the only good things about this hotel.  There are so many hotels near Disney you have many choices.  I highly recommend you steer clear of this place.
Not a fan of the customer service here at all.   Especially when one cashier (anita) states to the cashier I'm at that my items are old, contact a manager & give lowest prices.  Purchased (10/18/2015)  in the saugus store.  Never going in here again!!!!
Services are good but they do not know how to deal with worker's compensation properly. And they flat out refused to work with my nurse who was trying to get them paid.
I've been here before but it's gone so down hill. Paid extra for breast that was the size of a large wing . It was overcooked and puny. I gave it a one because the pie was at least good
I wish I had the opportunity to try the food here, but our waiter never put in our order and got our drink order wrong.  Total clown show.  The manager was apologetic when he realized what we had experienced... after an hour of sitting at a table next to a garbage can, we left.  We live in this city and there are many places to stop in for a quick bite.  I would rather eat a McNugget than anything from this joke cafe.
I went for a work lunch- I don't think any of us were impressed. The food reminded me of Chinese buffet style, it probably would have been more pleasing if it had been set up that way. The server was very gruff, it was odd. She did explain that they were busy and the credit card machine was down so I was forgiving for it being slow, regardless service just was not good. The veggie egg roll was really good!! My entree was ok, I had Singapore noodles. I have had better for a lower price. I think we all thought our food was ok.
Blackened fish tacos are awesome. Halibut fish n chips are gross, hard to chew, when i showed them they said it was because they were cold.  They were like rubber, worst I've ever ate.  They took 3 dollars off. .whatever not coming back. 21.95 for leather fish minus 3 .. yuk!
Oh my God - this place has been degrading from good to worse over the years! You can come here for the salad and the soup that comes with the appetizer. We waited for 30 minutes to eat a bad main course!  The 5 cheese ravioli just not up to the mark!  The veggie pasta had no taste and all of the kids menu was a yuck
This place was so annoying . No service , and roaches ! The only thing that was good was the front desk lady .
Haven't been in a while and apparently I haven't been missing anything. The service was the pits. I don't think I can remember being served by a more disinterested and incompetent server. Although we wanted to order one main dish before the others, she never put the order in. One dish showed up the opposite of how we asked for it. The quality of food was very disappointing. A dish containing chicken, shrimp, and beef contained nearly inedible beef. Despite it being very clearly "massaged," the beef was still unchewable. I would recommend nearby Suzi's any day.
Skip the guac, unless you don't mind paying 1.95$ for a spritz ..everything else was pleasant.
Food amazing, delivery is bad. Maybe one or two times out of tens of times I got my order without something missing, damaged, late, or being cold . I keep coming back because the food is really good. I recommend that you go eat in.
Attempted to stop by with our two dogs after a walk on the beltline . A third of the outdoor tables were available and no other customers were waiting . Treated extremely rudely by wait and  hostess staff and the manager who seemed intimidated by her staff and left after being unable to get seated . Please try Amsterdam Atlanta instead where we were given kind and attentive service .
I have had something personal going on so I haven't been able to write a review until now. Most of my friends who have beautiful hair have said nothing but positive things about Van Michael salon so I was very excited when I needed to get a haircut and finally made an appointment. Here's some background: my hair was down past my waist and I had some blonde highlighting/balayage toward the middle and ends. Notice that I am using the word had.   I booked the appointment with one of the new talents and had to wait almost 2 weeks for the appointment. The salon was very nicely decorated and was extremely busy with zero empty chairs. Here is where things start to go south.   I met my stylist and she was very nice- I won't say her name because I really don't want her to get into trouble. She asked me what I was thinking of doing with my hair and I explained that since I did have very long hair I did want a cut that was more substantial than a trim and I gestured to her on my body about how long I wanted the cut, which was about to my mid-chest level. This would have been a cut around 6 inches. Remember that I came in with waist length hair. She said "wow that is a dramatic cut" and I said "Well it's not that bad, I will still have length" and she agreed and I didn't think anything of it. Looking back this should have been a blaring red alarm. I also said "I was thinking of bangs in the front" and she dismissed me with "no I wouldn't do bangs on you."    So first she gave me a one minute shoulder massage which I was not expecting and was actually kind of painful because I was tense. After this she led me to the basin and washed my hair and did a nice scalp massage. Then she took me to the chair and got started. She was asking me some kind of small talk question- like where I'm from or something- when she started making the first cut and this was the end of my long hair. I guess there was a miscommunication where she didn't understand how long I wanted my hair? Or maybe she wasn't thinking and just did it from muscle memory? I have no idea. I wish that I had vocally stated where I wanted my hair to be in length because unfortunately the stylist cut almost an entire foot of my hair off. There was no going back- she cut the entire length off with the first snip.    The only thing I can do is beg the salon to implement a policy of when someone comes in with very long hair, to please show the amount of hair about to be cut and confirm that it is okay to cut so much off. This could have been prevented if she had shown me the amount she was about to cut, but it was too late. I was staring at my reflection and I stopped talking and she noticed this. My hair went from past waist-length to just above my collarbone. She did some choppy layers and the haircut would have been very nice if it was what I wanted, but it's not at all remotely what I wanted and I was so proud of my long hair and it is all gone now. She cut so much off that the highlights/balayage I had in my hair were cut completely out as well and my hair is all monotone. I did not saying anything because realistically it was too late and there is nothing anybody can do- my hair can't be reattached. I went home and cried. The last time I had my hair this short was when I was in high school and I hated it as much then as I do now.  I will have to wait the year or more for my hair to grow back. When it does, I don't think I will risk going back. So, PLEASE, Van Michael- have your stylists confirm when they think a dramatic cut is about to happen.
Came in on Sunday for lunch and it was packed. Their parking in the back is cramped and always full. We got a table pretty fast, but did not get a menu or tea until we were able to wave someone down 10 minutes later. They are definitely under staffed, if you want something you have to wave someone down.  Most of our food came in a decent amount of time but we had to chase them down for a bowl of wontons and a drink we ordered. I felt like I could not enjoy my meal because I was constantly looking to make eye contact with a server.  When we were finally ready to get the bill we asked 3 different servers for it, but they all forgot to bring it to us. We ended up going to the front and waiting in a big crowd just to pay our bill.  Food is decent, but probably wouldn't come back.
If I could give this place zero stars I would. The hostess are complete morons. Me and my kids walked in and the hostesses told us we had to wait 25 minutes. I said okay, but then after looking around there were empty tables EVERYWHERE. I asked why we couldn't sit at one of those tables and they said those tables and whole sections were closed. Talk about bad customer service. They need new hostesses.
Food was good. Service was abysmal. Had to ask 4 WAITERS FOR SOY SAUCE TO GO WITH OUR  SUSHI !!!!  We were there after the lunch rush (small crowd) and they rushed to give us the bill but took another 15 minutes to bring it back.
Awful Awful Awful.  I've slowly watched BW3 decimated from a trendy growing cool sports bar into an absolute dump. Well, this was my last visit to any of their restaurants, and I use the word restaurant loosely. Their wings are tiny.  The service is snail-like. (Does it really take 55 minutes to deep fry some sh*tty chicken? This particular location was grossly understaffed on a Saturday night- (Hmmmm Saturday nights with a lot of sports on TV may make our location busier then a Tuesdsay at 11:30 AM. Maybe we should staff up???) Our waiter had 8 LARGE tables all by himself- he was actually very nice and trying his a** off. But one man can only do so much. The manager in charge was grossly unqualified to do any type of damage control.   This was the last trip for me to this or any crap hole. Luckily for the denizens of south Hilliard, a Roosters is opening just a half mile up the road. I'll see you there.
Decent, but not great.  Even though Sushi Town is closer, my boyfriend and I prefer to go to Marine Polis Sushiland down by Beaverton Town Square instead-- their dishes are something like 25-50 cents cheaper per item and the food is better.
Seemed fine years ago. Used them to host a nonprofit site for free, then a low price. Then they started some weird stuff, like asking for non profit evidence every year. Then they stated asking for domain renewal confirmation that created fees if we missed the notice, so I added auto renewal with my credit card. Then started charging my card before asking for non-profit evidence and making it hard to get refunded. They just became a big PITA. I cancelled three weeks before renewal, but they charged my credit card anyway and did not resolve it with email or chat. There is no phone number to call. This was the first time I have disputed a credit card charge with a bank. It was very frustrating, so here it is, a bad review.
Go here if you are starving or are going to miss a meal or two. Portions and calories out of control. I prefer quality fresh ingredients however if you want a LOT of HEAVY food this is your place! The food was definitely comfort however the menu lacks creativity IMO. If you eat here for lunch be prepared to want a nap.
We came for a medical conference nearby, so didn't have much choice of where to stay. The room was clean, but VERY small. The toilet in our room had a flusher that didn't work properly. NONE of the basic hotel niceties were provided - like sewing kit,  stationery or postcard (even on request), q-tips, shower cap, not even hair conditioner. We stay here 3 days and they still hadn't replaced our shampoo until I asked - then of course we got 3 bottles on our last day. The hotel restaurant (Grille) was not very good in terms of food or service, and in terms of ambiance, is just a load sports bar. I've heard there's a brand new residence inn nearby - I would DEFINITELY try that instead if we ever have to return to this area.
Not worth the trip. Small portion or giant plates? You decide. Bad service and low quality food. Very loud in the restaurant. I honestly can't figure out how they stay in business.
I stopped by February 20,2013  and found the place didn't exist so I went to the mall customer service desk and was told they went out of business in November 2012.
I brought my 2012 Chevy Malibu to North Shore Auto Body after it was in an accident and had extensive front end damage. The work took two weeks longer to complete than promised. When I finally got my car back, none of the parts used to repair the front end fit properly (see photos). Dave told me that he fully warrantied all of his work, but when I brought the car back to address this issue, I was told that it was due to the fact that after market parts were used and there was nothing he could do about it. I unhappily accepted this answer, but a few months later I noticed that the parts were so ill-fitting that they were starting to shift and were lining up even worse than they did originally. I went down to speak to Dave about this in person. He was not there so I left a note for him, and was assured that I would hear from him the next day. That was over a week ago, and I have yet to hear from him.
Called prior to coming in to ask if they can treat the scratches on the sides of my 2015 Highlander. The person on the phone said that as long as you can feel it with your nail or something along those lines, they can buff it out.   I went in and asked the service person before handing my car off and he sampled a little spot and said that it'll look a lot better because they're going to use a machine to buff it out. He gives me a recipe slip and tells me to go inside to pay for it. My total for the Ultimate Exterior was $150 give or take since they were having a promo on detailing.   I left and came back 4 hours later when I received a call. The car looked nice and shiny since it was in the sunlight but there were still some spots on the car.  I was literally standing there picking black things off my car with my nails when a lady came up to give me my keys back. She noticed I was picking at my car and started to help me pick off the black spots. (Obviously she knew that it was unacceptable that spots were left on the car after a $150 detailing job)  I left somewhat unhappy about the job they did on my car and now, a couple weeks later, I notice white marks left on my black trim. They weren't there before I took it in and my scratches have come back.   Basically, if you want to pay over a hundred dollars for a car was and some waxing then come here and get your car "detailed". Complete waste of my time and money.
The curly headed blonde boy at the concession stand was utterly rude and condescending. The absolute worst service I have ever received. For a high classy theater, this server is not trained to provide a delightful customer experience yet one that is obnoxious and undermining. He needs to go or more customers will.
I have not eaten here, but I have come in for drinks on various occasions and since my last visit i decided to add a review. Empire has potential to be a good place, but it can't quite get there. In my opinion it gets way to crowded in there, especially near the bar. You may say, well kid that's pretty much normal anywhere you go on a busy night. But the fact is the place is not crowded at all. The entire design of the bar was horribly added into the space provided. It takes way too long to get a drink in here and you constantly have people on top of one another trying to get one. Then a big table is situated right in front of the bar, which limits people from getting to the bar. These are just some of the issues with the layout. Empire, if you want I will draw up a nice layout for you for free.
This was basically the most disappointing dining experience in Austin, if not in my entire life. This restaurant came highly recommended as one I should definitely try in my neighborhood, so maybe I had too high expectations. The food was worse than low-end pre-frozen microwaved diner food. You might like this place if you grew up as a starving child in western Africa and this was the first place your adoptive parents took you when you arrived in the US. Otherwise, steer clear and don't believe anyone who tells you this place is great, and you *have* to try the fries. Trust me, it's not worth it. Ignore my advice and I guarantee you will experience extreme buyers remorse and mild heartburn.
People go here because it's withing walking distance of their office, and they didn't - or forgot to - bring their own lunch.  That's the only reason it's busy.  As mentioned by other reviewers, their food is "OK", but not great.  If you're expecting a Snarfs or even a Quiznos, you'll be disappointed.  Also they have recently repainted with brighter colors, but it still gives off an "institutional" vibe - they should hang some photos or add some real decorations.  I also echo what others have said about service, I asked for something slightly custom (one of their subs on Panini bread instead of on a sub roll) and the cashier made a point to say that they don't usually do that, but she asked the sandwich-maker and they both said "OK".  Great, I tipped an extra buck and looked forward to my sandwich on nice crispy panini bread on this cold winter day.  Ten minutes later (yes, that's the standard wait time), my number comes up, and it's a regular sub.  Seriously disappointing.  The order-delivery person said they could re-make it but my co-workers already had their food and I didn't want to wait yet another ten minutes.  Very dissapointing, and a good reminder of why I avoid this place unless I really have no other options.  Also rating them low because I heard that they were complaining to the city about the food trucks which are starting to stop by the office park, cutting into their business.  I'm sorry, that's called capitalism - the appropriate response is to improve the quality of your food so that you can compete for that business, not ask the government to ban competition and leave you with a weak product.
As a Chinese guy, I should say taste of this restaurant's hotpot is boring. Worst than make hotpot at home. Eating at here is waste of time.
Let me start with the fact that the classes I have attended here are great. However, I purchased a package here that was not honored. I'm disappointed in the business side of btone, although the classes with most teachers are great. In my experience with studios around Boston, both through class pass, memberships and packages, I would say there are other establishments where you can get as good of a workout for less hassle. It seems as if they are still in their growth stages and not quite sure how to handle a multi location business. Give them a few years and they will be on track. Until then, look to barre, classes at exhale, and other small groups classes!
This Parking deserves a NEGATIVE ranking.  Probably The Ultimate Worst Parking lot  in the East Coast.   Please note that: (a)  It's probably one of the only parking in Boston where you pay a "Valet" charge, but you have to park your own car. (!) (b) There is no mention whatsoever of mandatory "Valet".  (c) They provide you with a ticket that mention that your car is damaged (?) (just in case....) (d) They are so eager to grab your keys that it's a challenge to try to exit your own car.   (e) The "Valets" are just plain rude.    Avoid at any cost:  Take a cab! Take the T, Walk if needed to.
I ran in the other day to get some 5 pound weights since I loaned mine out over a year ago and I don't think I will ever see them again.  I knew exactly where I was going and should have just been in and out.    I had my weights and was waiting to check out.  There was one woman in front of me.  There was one woman helping her and 2 standing there talking.  I wasn't in a hurry so I just politely waited.  When the one lady was done helping her customer, she looked at me and walked away.  I stood at the register bewildered.  Where did she go?  How come no one wants to complete my sale?    She finally came back and looked at me and turned away.  Finally I spoke up... "Excuse me, can someone help me check out?"  She turned back to me and said something about how she didn't know I needed help.  How can that be?!  I am standing at the register with the items I wish to purchase.  She then decided that the only thing to do was be rude to me.  She didn't even put my weights into a bag.  I was so annoyed at that point I thanked her and juggled the weights, my purse and keys and left.    I will only return if I have to.  Dick's is too far to go when I just need weights, but Sports Authority has lost my business for all large purchases.
The amenities aren't amazing but they aren't terrible. Same with the units. But the staff is the worst. We had a leak, everytime it rained water came in the window. After 6 months of the management saying they would fix it, our lease ended and we left. I would not recommend, if you have any problems, you are on your own.
This place is not even packed and it took 30 min to be seated and is now taking another 15 min to get a server. Fried tomatoes was beyond salty; felt my blood pressure increasing with each bite. Waiter didn't bring any napkins till 15 min after the food came out. FOOD AND SERVICE HORRIBLE!!!!
Visited on a referral from a friend.  Want to punch my friend now.  The food was ok.  I stayed for the Beer.  I was planning on trying a variety of beers but my plans changed.  I was watching the MLB playoffs and the game was close and in the 8th inning.  I was ordered a flight to try a few beers and the guy switched the tv to thursday night football.  I asked him to turn it back and he said no because people wanted to watch football.  I looked around and no one was watching so i asked the few people at the bar and they said they did not care.  I told this to the main bar tender and he would not change it back.  I canceled my beer order and left.  I will not be returning if i am in the area.  There are far too many great bar/food locations to waste your time at this place.
Never going back....  Got together with friends we hadn't seen in a very long time so we didn't make a huge deal about how bad our food was on Saturday night.  I ordered steak, medium rare, and it came out well done... The First Time.   Waitress took it back to have it corrected and once again it came back well done.  I'm normally not a picky eater but honestly this steak was not edible.  I also ordered the mashed potatoes as a side.  They were mashed and came with bacon and what appeared to be a slice of Kraft American cheese that they took the wrapper off of and laid on top.  Very disappointing!  For a restaurant to charge the prices they do you would think they would do better than that. The real kicker for me was the fact that the manager never came by one time to check on our table after we had sent a steak back twice.  Instead, our waitress offered us a free dessert.  In the end, we paid for a steak and potatoes we didn't eat and we will never go back there again.  Poor customer service!!!
I rent cars when visiting Oregon several times per year and use a variety of rental companies.  Generally, I consider Avis an upper tier rental company.  Since I was adding some leisure time to the tail end of this business trip, I decided to use Avis.  What a disappointment.  The car received was a very very worn bare-boned Jeep Patriot.  The interior was in bad shape, the brakes squeaked constantly and the car's ride was terrible.  By far the worst rental experience in years from any company.  I'm sure Avis would have swapped the car if I'd returned to the terminal, but with tight timing it wasn't possible.  My concern is why would a car of this poor safety and quality ever be rented by a company like Avis.
I'm surprised how overly sugary a lot of their donuts are. I prefer Tim Hortons or Voodoo Donuts even though they use a lot of sugar too, at least theirs taste better.
I ordered a meal w/ one side, and two regular order of sides - enough food for two people. Chicken express employees decided to squeeze all of this food into one yellow box - meant for one person. I'm allergic to okra and there was so little room in the box that my biscuit was completely smashed by the side of okra...yum. Please choose many of the other establishments that share the block with these idiots.
I went here for an express mani-pedi and I wasn't all that impressed.  I've never been to a spa, but I was looking for a salon that I could go to on a regular basis to get my nails done.  Call me cheap, but this service is overpriced and I think I'll continue going to a place down the street in a shopping center.  The express mani-pedi took over an hour (which is stated on the website) but I feel like it took this long because things were done in slow motion, not because of the number of services given.  For example, the woman didn't cut much length off my nails so then she proceeded to spend a large majority of the time filing them down.  And the warm lotion wasn't so warm, but just a runny mess and the woman ended up wiping off with rough, dry towel.  I thought this was so she could paint my nails/toenails, but she wiped the lotion off my calves and forearms too.  The basic foot filing is also a joke.  A light file was gently brushed on each of my heels about three or four times.  I could have done better at home.  The woman did a nice job painting my nails and that is about all that I'm pleased with.  The staff was nice, including the woman doing my mani-pedi so if anything that is what would bring me back for another service.
I am giving this review two stars because I have always gotten good service from Checker Cab via "Taxi Magic" in the past.  First, I tried calling Checker repeatedly during the late afternoon, always getting a generic message that said that no one was available to take my call.  I left a message, with no call back.  I then used the online booking tool that allowed me to book a cab. I received a that said I ordered a cab at 7:37 pm.  I was trying to get to a concert at the Lakewood Amphitheater, which started at 8pm.  I received a text that my cab was NOT dispatched, and placed another "order," via Taxi Magic and was told via text that the cab was dispatched.  After another 20 minutes, I decided to just drive.  I just want to know:  why are cab companies, especially affiliated with Taxi Magic, not available via phone, and why are they not jumping at a cab fare that would be around $35 with tip????
So we had a reservation for 6 at 5pm ....meg our server was very friendly - we had to ask for an extra setting - the entrees took an one hour and 15 minutes to come - very slow - we did have apps- the wine took a while to come - the busboy wasn't very friendly - no smiles - steak dish was cold - my seafood dish was pricey for a very small portion- as the dinner went along the service level got slower...one entree was under cooked - took over 10 minutes for it to be re delivered ...for the prices charge the level of service is lacking - portions are on the small side too-  I won't go back - the manager came by to ask about the re cooked entree but didn't offer anything nor did he say thanks for coming or ask about our food-  Over priced - poor service - average food-no real concern for the customer= I'm surprised how you stay in business....disappointing for almost $400 spent ....
Some friends took me here for dinner. They said it was really good, we had reservations, got seated, our waiter seemed to be disinterested or something cause our food took forever, they weren't notably busy, we got the food and honestly it was completely average. Like the only thing I remember about the Tiki Masala was that the sauce was almost like a red spaghetti sauce, which if you're a huge Tiki Masala fan you want that creamy rich, buttery sauce. Left unsatisfied, nothing quite like spending a good amount on a meal and not being happy with it. Food is 3 stars, poor service knocks it down to 2. Won't ever go back.
I bought flowers from Twig for my sister's first Mother's Day. My family and I thought Twig would be the perfect place to get them from. I went on their website and picked out an arrangement and called to place the order for the ripe arrangement.  First of all the girl on the phone wouldn't put pussy willows in the bouquet because she said they wouldn't look good. Funny thing is I'm a florist myself and didn't appreciate her argumentative attitude about what I wanted.   The arrangement came and the design work was horried. It looked nothing like the arrangement online and all the flowers were cut short like an amature had made this. I understand the vase was like a rose bowl but it looked like there was no rythm or reason to the design. Within 2 days half of the lilacs (surprised they even used them in the arrangemen) died. This was a centerpeice for a dinner party and my family and I are shocked of what arrived to my sister's south end home.  I called Twig on Monday when the flowers were delivered on Saturday to express my disappointment and concern. I spoke to a sales girl who said she would pass my information onto a manager and someone would call me back.  It is now Friday and I have not recieved a phone call nor do I expect they will call. I will never order from Twig again and feel they are extremely unprofessional and need to hire more experienced designers.
I hate to write a poor review because the tellers at this branch are wonderful - and they deserve five stars. But that is the only aspect that deserves accolades. We opened a new account this summer and it has been one disaster after another since then. The woman who opened our account was so distracted and talking about other topics that most of the account was incorrect and most things were not explained to us or discussed. After a month and a half of getting her mistakes corrected, they announce the branch is moving on the last weekend of August to the new location next door. That was the last communication Citizens had with its customers. The branch did not move that weekend, the temporary location was closed, the new one wasn't open, and customers had no bank to use - without any warning or signage. Now the new branch is open, and all three ATMs are not working. I switched to Citizens from a local bank and regret every bit of this move. This has been a horrible experience from day one.
I received a total hack job. I asked for help on the sides and the stylist asked me what size do I want. I would never go back there even if I was paid to do so. My haircut looks like it was by a blind man with a weed wacker.
The ice cream here is amazing! Buuuuuuut the people behind the counter were so high that I had to tell them my order multiple times and had to watch them clumsily out my order together. Not a terrible experience but not that great either. I'd come back for the ice cream, not the service.
I've pasted the review I posted to the Facebook page for the franchise and on the Wendy's corporate page.  EDIT - FEB 1, 2018 - It happened again.  I ordered three junior hamburgers (NOT cheeseburgers) and a large fries at the drive-thru.  The order-taker repeated my order for accuracy.  I get up to the window, get my order, and discover the fries are rather overcooked.  I was given replacement fries, but was made to wait until two other customers had received their fries & sandwiches.  The replacement fries were on the edge of being overcooked.  Then, upon arriving back home, I discovered I had received cheeseburgers.  AGAIN.  FOR THE 4TH TIME THIS MONTH.  Each time I ordered hamburgers.  Each time I received cheeseburgers.  How hard is it to tell the difference?  I hope the franchise manager is reading this - I've written a complaint to Wendy's corporate too.  This was just going to be about the fries.  Then, I got home, and saw my burgers.  I ordered four junior hamburgers, ketchup/mustard only on each of them.  I saw my order accurately listed on the display by the drive-thru menu.  I get home to discover I have four cheeseburgers.  For me, that's not good - I've never cared for the cheese @ Wendy's, just a personal preference.  The cheeseburger thing has happened twice now.  The fries - for the 5th visit in a row, the fries were near inedible.  I'm not sure if they're always overcooked, just sitting around too long, or a combination of the two.  It seems I can't get fresh fries unless I visit during the peak of lunch rush.  All of that is a shame - Wendy's is my preferred fast food burger chain, and this is the location closest to my house.  But if my orders keep getting screwed up, why should I come back?
I just came back from this place today, I was excited to try the food after it was recommended to me by a coworker. The Jerk Chicken was bland, as if was made to be served in a nursing home. The plantains were hard and the rice tasted like to much cinnamon was added to it. Jerk Chicken is suppose to be spicy not sweet, which is exactly what it was. Very disappointed, especially for food the cost $13.50. I honestly can say that I don't see this place being around much longer. With this quality of the food that they are serving and their high price this shouldn't last.
They're nice enough here, and they sell some nice looking furniture, but i question the quality.  Years ago I purchased a leather sectional couch here for approx $4,000.  (Perhaps their quality has improved in recent years?).  It lasted about 2 years before i went to sit down and as i did, I heard a loud "snap" (i'm not a large or heavy person) and a piece of the frame clearly broke.  The couch cushion in that area immediately started sagging.  Luckily it was under warranty.  I called and the company sent out a rep to examine the couch. He didn't even flip the piece over to feel the obviously broken piece of wood frame poking through the bottom (which i later found to be cheap particle board and not suitable for furniture). He told me it was sagging because i always sat in that same spot and it wore this way over time, which is absolutely not true.  (And even if it was true, a couch is meant to be sat upon and for $4,000, it should last more than a couple of years).  So the 5 year warranty was totally useless.  I got a quote to have it repaired and it was actually cheaper just to buy a new couch.  This may not be Dania's fault, but they should sell better quality furniture for the prices they charge--or stand behind them.  I loved this couch, while it lasted.  Buyer beware.
The food has gone downhill and cheap over the past year.  I ordered there so called "jumbo wings" and they were smaller than BW3.  On a second occasion I ordered a steak sandwich.  The bun weighed more than the amount of meat.  Finally, on another occasion I ordered the nachos and they used cheese sauce, like you would get at a baseball game.  The food is not inexpensive and you would not expect this quality.  Do I need to say more....
A solid 2 star.  Here's why.    As of now it is just a tasting room that isn't yet licensed to sell pints.  So the good news is the tasting samples are free.   However, the place isn't anywhere near fully setup and the layout is exceptionally boring.  They have 15-20 plus tap handles installed but only 4 beers on tap.  All 4 beers are IPA's.  All of their IPA's are traditional American IPA's (not west coast style at all).  IE:  No late addition hop flavors or dry hopping. They have three unique IPA's and one IPA that is a blend of the 3 other IPA's.  Boom Sauce was decent.  I'll give them credit on that.  The others where almost average, and one out right sucked.  My worst home brewed IPA tasted better than Consolation Prize.  The two guys working there where cool and very polite however, their knowledge of what's going on at this brewery was fairly minimal. They couldn't tell me the IBU's, a single hop variety used, or even how many barrel system they are using.  I talked to other locals at various breweries and they expressed disdain for the owner calling him some rich guy, and I quote "a trust fund baby that knows nothing about beer".  I have not met the owner so I will not express my personal opinion, however these are quotes from locals at a brewery in Chelsea.  I'm not going to knock the place for it's in the middle of no where location since I can see this becoming a very cool place some day with the right style and architectural design ideas.  If you create a cool layout that incorporates outside seating, glass walls, large wood beams, stainless, and art this place could be very cool.  Even if they don't do anything and make it a simple tap room without food it could still bring in the people.  You guys need variety.  Going all in on 1 IPA is a recipe for disaster.  Especially since traditional IPA's are already becoming a thing of the past.
I've been coming here for years and they have always been helpful but the workers today are especially nasty! I love the weekday crew compared to these grumblers. I spent over 50$ here and the least they could do is be polite. Boo on the barista and boo on the lady at the register. The only friendly one was the blonde girl who seemed to be the lowest on the totem pole. No thanks for you guys.
Pretty sure I had written a review about 1 year ago but it mysteriously disappeared--- well back then I had ordered the hot chicken teriyaki I ordered was just teriyaki with red pepper flakes dumped on top. Seriously.  Well... fast forward one year later and I decided to try their burgers based on the reviews. NOPE, just NO. False advertising. They are not charred. The beef tasted like they pan fried the patty. It also tasted and looked like something that you buy pre-frozen at the store. DO NOT LET THE GLOWING REVIEWS MISLEAD YOU.
Beautiful setting. The patio area is great for a date night!   However, I felt that was all this place had. We ordered truffle fries and shishito peppers and were not impressed. We also ordered cocktails which were very watered down.. We left after one round.   Service was good. The waitress made sure to come around often.
None of my topping were cooked for some reason and hardly any cheese whatsoever.  Strange for a pizza place.    Gave more than one star because they were friendly.
Stopped by for a margarita with a few friends. Service was terrible.  Went to the bar for clarification about a friends drink order and was shocked at how rude the bartender was. She was curt, short and bitchy. Not to mention the horrific smell of sewage when I entered. Good customer service may have over shadowed some of this. I was embarassed to have even suggested this place to my friends .. Iwill NEVER come back, again.
I'll start off by saying that I grew up around dentists, my mom had been in the dental industry for over 30 years. The girls at the counter were very nice, however the dental assistant was a ghetto mess. She was unprofessional and insisted I call my mom while I was there to find out if her job (which is a dental surgery office) was hiring. The dentist then suggested I get a root canal, and my teeth are in no condition to need a surgery like that, so I told him I would not be doing that procedure that day. I have some sensitivity due to braces (he never asked if i had worn them) but nothing that would warrant a $1500 root canal. In addition,  the heigenist is religious and decided to subtly me know i want living my life right- I'm single and on birth control, I don't want kids, I watch too much tv... All because I war engaging in her small talk. Oh, and the computers were filthy with dust... scares me as to the cleanliness of the tray of the facility.   Bottom line, they are an unprofessional office that will rip you off if you don't know any better.
We live in the neighborhood and today was the second time we've walked in to no hostess. Zero. No one greeted us. Last time we walked to the bar section and sat down for about 15 minutes before we were noticed. Today, after waiting for a few minutes, we left and walked to Logan's where we were immediately greeted by two people and promptly seated by the fireplace.
If I grabbed the right one, this is in the Austin airport. Unfortunetly I have been here twice out of desperation since there is not a lot of options at the airport besides food court type. The food is fine but the service is probably the worst I have ever encountered anywhere.   If I didn't know better I would think that the servers were prisoners that are forced to work here. Zero sense of urgency or care. They are a bit understaffed but if they acted like they were trying a bit the tips would show it.   The first time I ate here the waitress tried to talk me out of coming in. She said we close in an hour. I said well that's fine I hope to be on my plane by then.
Way over priced. Food quality was really bad. Noise in the place was way to loud for any kind if conversation. Took an hour to be seated. Had to send my food back and have them take it off the check. Couldnt eat it. Burnt and tasteless. In summary, too loud, too expensive, bad service, food really really aweful. Would have preferred going to Dennys.
The worst bar customer service I've ever experience I ordered three tacos and extra kimchi the bartender did not let me knowthat there was an up charge for extra Kimchi  when I got my receipt there was a five dollar up charge for KimChi  when the manager came over he told  mr it was a fifty cent up charge so therefore I should've only gotten charged a dollar and 50 Cent. The manager then proceeded to argue with me and let me know that the bartender was in the wrong but also that guest get offended when you let them know there's an up charge I disagree I want you to know if I have to pay extra for anything somethings are not expected to pay an up charge for unfortunately as good as the food was I will never return back to this restaurant simply because the general managers customer service was horrible he walked away on me at the same time agreed with the service that I've gotten and agreed that the service that I got and was correct which was poor service
Horrible place! Hotel gave us a 10% off so we went there. We gave the coupon to our server right when we sat down. When the bill came at the end she told us the coupon wasn't valid for what we ordered. If you like dealing with used car salesman this is a great place to go!
Yuck. And I'm being generous. We were all geeked on finding this vegan/veggie Chinese restaurant. But were sorely disappointed.  We were the only ones there, asked for recommendations, and opted to order take-out. We focused on the "meat" dishes. The food all tasted the same -- and not good at that. Kinda like they used the same sauce for everything with just very minor alterations. We ended up tossing half of it away as it was just that unappetizing.   Vegetarian/vegan can be made so good, and there is so much potential with Chinese and Asian cuisines... so there is just no excuse for their unimaginative, boring, bland food.
Terrible customer service. They served less than 1/4 a cup of mostly-inedible-beef-gristle, soggy "fried" rice, and a soggy egg roll for $9 dollars. We thought there must be some mistake because of how little meat there was, but they refused to fix the issue when kindly addressed. The woman claimed, "The chef doesn't make mistakes."  The new portions are an absolute joke, hit up Sea Dragon, China House, or Din Ho for a MUCH for satisfactory meal with a bigger bang for your buck. There is a reason the dining room is usually so empty, this place will be closed soon no doubt.  Check out the photo I uploaded as proof, I'd like these crooks to address this issue.
Awful. Bad Service. Average overpriced sushi. Dirty. We went on a Saturday night. The waitress rushed us and pretty much tossed our food on the table as she ran by. My Husband's meal came out about 25 minutes before my sushi. We didn't have napkins or a silverware and had to ask several times. There were three fly's flying around our heads the entire time. I will never be going back.
i went here for my birthday. NOTE: If you sign up for their online email mailing list known as the Chef's table, they will send you a 30 dollar certificate for your birthday month.  This means that you may use that 30 dollars during the month of your birthday. My birthday is in July so I went.  First of all, being from LA, I didn't expect much knowing that Austin doesn't have as huge an asian culture as LA. However, from everywhere else, I expected portions to be "bigger" like the Texan way. I was sadly mistaken. It cost at least 30 dollars a person. Presentation was horrible. The chef barely did anything cool. The one thing he did do was the volcano which has been done hundreds of times. The quality of the food was subpar, Ill go back to LA for Benihana
Came here last summer. We went up to the top floor/patio since it was a hot day. Now let's get down and dirty:  You can tell a kitchen is not run properly when the waitress tells you they don't have any more calamari or even fries! There were a few other things they didn't have but I forget. I think I ended up having their salmon burger. Nothing gold worthy there. Prices are pretty high so I didn't get drunk. If it weren't for a pretty hot live singing girl with a guitar and waitresses wearing ridiculously short skirts, It would get just 1-star.
Wow, it hard to imagine this to be worse. Super slow, poor service.  Hard bread (not fresh). No receipt. Had to ask twice for water.  But the kicker was the cookies. My husband ordered 2 raisin and one chic chip cookie. First we were told there were no raisin cookies, even though we could SEE them. She nodded when we pointed that out, and she sold us the two cookies, then immediately turned around and dumped the rest of the cookies on the tray into the trash. SERIOUSLY??
I've been to the Barcelona in Brookline loved the food and atmosphere so I was expecting the same at this location. The ambiance, service, and drink selection were wonderful; however I couldn't get past how disappointing the food was. I honestly thought it was a joke when they brought out the shrimp dish - it literally had three pieces of overcooked shrimp drenched in oil. I ordered a citrus arugula salad with manchego that sounded great but realized once I started eating that it had a ton of olives in it. I like olives but it just didn't work with the rest of the flavors. The clams and the broth were delicious but we were served a clam that hadn't opened. It wouldn't have taken much effort to remove the clam, but maybe the kitchen was having a bad night. The only redeeming part of the food menu was the charcuterie selection. Overall a big disappointment.
Never ask for help from store manager Billy! He is a moron. We asked for help, and he avoided helping us at all costs. He immediately tossed our questions aside, and proceeded to scream for Rebecca repeatedly becoming agitated that she wasn't able to meet his immediate needs. What did he do next you ask... , keep screaming for Rebecca like there's a god damn fire happening in the toddler section. Billy, you suck at your job, and I hope corporate reads my post.
Holy S@?T does this place need a makeover.....I walked in there for the first time about 3 weeks ago .....I was so in the mood for a good salad bar and I knew this was where to go.......the salad wasn't bad at all really.....seemed fresh....tasted good.....but the place was dingy and old looking.....like bad......it didn't particularly look clean......the managers office was at the end of the counter with a curtain draped over it.....strange....just a really off atmosphere......didn't really seem particularly busy either.....which makes sense.....with panera around the corner who needs this old show........wrecking ball maybe???
There is nothing that this bar offers that you can't get practically anywhere else. I don't like to throw this word around but I honestly feel this place is racist. I've seen them not let in my African American friends for their attire when there were other patrons right behind him dressed the same. When I pointed it out I was told "He must have changed once he got in". DON'T give them your money.
I stay in a lot of Hampton inn properties. This one is pretty typical. Except no wifi. Front desk personnel is much less than welcoming at night. Seeming by checking in we were making them work and bothering them. Also there was blood on the sheets. The waffle maker didn't work.   Just much less then what I've come to know on the consistent quality of Hampton inn properties.
What a disappointment! Harvest has been our 'dad's birthday venue' for years (decor suitably manly etc, etc) but brunch last Sunday was bad. The menu was boring, food looked tired and tasted dry. The red flannel hash in particular should be sent back to the drawing board. Big chunks of undercooked  cold potato and tough meat with a helping of watery sour beets stuck on top as though each ingredient had been shoveled out of a separate tupperware container. Noticed a few patrons looking at it equally skeptically. The dad had one of the eggs benedict concoctions and the poached eggs were hard. Only daughter who had the burger was happy, but at $35 one might hope so. The fruit tart was nice but not special, the chocolate tart a big hunk-a-dry chocolate on a pastry base. Service was gracious as usual, but not enough to make up for expensive dire food.  Won't be back I'm afraid.
I had a TERRIBLE experience at this place. I walked in for an office visit for some vision problems, and when I walked up to the desk to check in, the receptionist didn't even look at me or say "Hello." She just said, "Name?" Then, the optometrist that saw me had absolutely no bedside manner. His shirt was untucked, he didn't look me in the eye, and spoke in medical jargon that made no sense. He insinuated that I had a very serious eye condition, and then did nothing to explain it or soothe my worries. I ended up going to an ophthalmologist because he insinuated that I had a serious issue (I was not about to let him examine my eyes further). Turns out, my eyes are perfectly fine. I shouldn't even have glasses, and they've been feeding me prescriptions for years. At this point, I feel like I've never had a proper eye exam from this place. The place is empty, they have hardly any stock, and all the frames are out of date and cheap looking. I wouldn't be surprised if this place went under soon. Do yourself a favor, and never go here.
Horrible.  Not sure who shit in the bartenders corn flakes.  Below average food.  Over priced.  Arrived in a great mood, left wondering how this place was still in business.
If you are looking for a semi cool place to have a beer then this is your domain.  The food is only ok and the sushi is over priced for the size.   Take out is very slow.  Sad to say but I thunk sushi express have bigger pieces and it's cheaper!
I decided to try here because I drive by it all the time. I did takeout. I ordered crab Rangoon, drunken noodles, a Thai salad and a mango smoothie. They told me 15 minutes and it wound up being a little more than that, no big deal. The set up is a little different than I was expecting their register is sort of half way in the back almost behind a curtain. I paid about $30 for everything. The crab Rangoon wasn't what I was expecting, it seemed like there was some kind of fish with egg. I've had crab Rangoon from Thai places before and it was still with cream cheese I'm thinking maybe they misheard me or I ordered the wrong thing ok no big deal. I open the salad and there is a big black hair on my avocado. Gross, I throw the avocado out and try to see if I can stomach the rest of the salad. It seems ok but after the hair not really feeling it. Move on to the drunken noodle and they just taste off to me. Too much fish sauce or something. Can't even eat it and I wind up throwing everything down the garbage disposal. Mango smoothie I drank while driving I'm not sure what o was expecting but there were all kinds of strange textures going on and after reading some of the other reviews I do not want to know what it was. I'm sad because I really wanted to like this place but I am grossed out and will not be going back.
The food is mediocre. The service is terrible. They messed up everyone's order. No one refilled our waters or brought out more bread, despite asking multiple people multiple times
Okay, to the point. This place has given me the worst customer service experiences! Not only once, not twice, not three times but multiple. Obviously I occasionally go back for urgent situations and because I want to give them the benefit of the doubt. This morning, on september 9th of 2017 at about 9:40 AM, I walked down to sharps to receive just a shape up. (15 minutes tops of a barbers time.) I've sat patiently for longer than an hour. Out of all of the customers that a barber have picked up, I wasn't even greeted. The receptionist didn't even greet me, she was sitting on her phone the whole time..... There were many flies flying around the seats also.  I then decided that it wasn't worth the wait anymore and I left. FYI, these barbers also have given me razor bumps plenty of times and have cut into my actual head from time to time. Many of their good barbers have left and moved on to different shops as well. I've been going to this barber shop since i was 17 and now I'm 22 and I'm deciding to part ways with this particular shop. If anybody needs a barbershop recommendation, I prefer  cut n edge on Massachusetts Avenue.    -Mike
Went here for breakfast before a sports event we were going to. We had about an hour before we had to leave so figured we had plenty of time. We ordered right away and the service the whole time was truly horrible. We asked for napkins and they never came. We asked for creamer and it never came. We ended up having to take creamer from another table because it just never showed up. Then we finally get our food AFTER 45 MINUTES OF WAITING and the waitress just kept staring at us like we were being jerks. We gobbled down our food as fast as possible and ended up being 15 minutes late to our event. Food wasn't even that good, it was just average.
My boyfriend and I went here after a night at the theatre -- very conveniently located on Huntington Ave. Since we were famished, we thought why not give a try?  I wish I would have gone elsewhere.   It was not busy but we had to wait for a table.  We had a hard time communicating to our waitress what we wanted because of a language barrier. It took forever to get our food. The food, although had a good taste, it was mediocre at best. My beef dish was rather hard to chew on. The portions were not that big. It also took a bit to get our check, even though it was not busy.   The decor of the restaurant is chic, which made the time I was waiting for my meal and check, bearable.  I will not be going back there. Boston is full of better restaurants with superior service.
I think two stars is a little harsh but prices are overinflated and yo cream is much better. I've had better experiences by using my mom's Costco card and buying a bulk bag of candy and adding the ingredients to store bought ice cream. 1 star for atmosphere, 1 star for decent yogurt.
Food is rather mediocre and overpriced. The only redeeming quality about this place is the location and views. There are way too many good restaurants in Portland for diners to waste their money here.
Got three cupcakes at 2.50 they were just OK . I didnt see what was the RAVE about .. I think a lot of yelpers  give place way much more credit than what is due.. For a cupcake to be $2.50 each..it should taste better than one you can make at your house.
Ordered take out here and was not super impressed with the pizza...Maybe it tastes better when eaten on the spot? Overall it was a disappointing expensive pizza. Did not think it was worth the money.
Service was awful food bad and poor quality.  Dirty, messy table, greedy female server trying to push higher cost menu items.  Went in around 1pm on a tuesday, based upon reviews, thought place was going to be packed, not one single table with paying customers, just 2 employees sitting at one of the multiple tables in the back partvof the restaurant, and 2 other people arranging tables and walking back and forth. Finally, after 5 minutes, the greedy server came around to take our drink order, some of us order iced water, some coke, and sprite, and my son order a lemonade, which after 3 minutes, she told us they where out of.  She offered him either a coke or sprite, which he rejected, and asked instead for a glass with iced water.  After 5 minutes, SURPRISE, he had a lemonade on the table, or at least looked as one, but no it was a flavorless glass of water with lots of sugar in it. Now, going to the food, dumplings were delicious, eggroll tasted like frozen food boxed one, sweet and sour pork was crappy, crispy beef was great, walnut shrimp was ok, about a B+, chowmein and fried rice were lousy, flavorless and warm, not hot as they should.  When the check came, I don't understand why they impose you a 18-20% tip already included on your bill.  I don't know if you agree with me, but why should you tip that much for service that was bad, and when the server doesn't do a good job according to your expectations and in turn tries to push items that increase your check, so that she can pump up her 20% tip that she didn't deserve.  Tips are deserved with the quality of your service: terrible service = no tip, bad service = no more than 10%, ok service = upto 15%, great service = 18% up to no limit.  Again, tips are worked for, not imposed.   Do not waste your time here, look for a better option if craving Chinese or try some other type of food.
This 'Post Office' is my idea of hell. There is always a line of at least 7 people, and, despite usually having at least two people on staff all the time they will never put more than one person dealing with customers. They have an incredibly unhurried approach to service, even when the line is snaking out of the door. I don't think it's ever taken me less than 35 minutes to do anything here. aaaargh. I feel like like I'm in a Kafka play...
I really don't know what kind of concept this chain was going for. A noodle house is one thing, but a noodle house with a ton of different cuisines all in one isn't the best idea. If you want overpriced noodles, mediocre food, and an overall bad food experience. You should eat here. If not, go home and make your own macaroni and cheese. It'll cost you 10.00 less.
I walked over from the hotel for dinner and sat in the bar. The bartender was friendly. I ordered the filet with all vegetables. The veggies we're very boring. Like something you would get in public school. The filet had no flavor. I added lots of salt! I won't be back.
Service was poor at best. My husband ordered a chicken and beef combo. When his meal was served it contained shrimp which he is allergic to. Our appetizer which were ordered before our main meal was delivered half through the entree and came out burnt.  Manager refused to talk to my husband. We will not be back and don't recommend this place to anyone. It used to be good with good service but not anymore
Avoid! Positive review here doubtless written by the owner. These guys sold us a defective refrigerator. The brand and model they sold us has had class action law suits against it. I would not recommend this place.
I ordered a Burrito, and they gave me a Quesadilla.. Then when they brought out the Burrito, it was SMOTHERED in extremely salty cheese, and there was a bunch of extremely salty cheese INSIDE the burrito as well, and an okay amount of steak. This was probably the SALTIEST BURRITO I HAVE EVER ATTEMPTED TO EAT IN MY LIFE. I had a stomach ache for 8 hours after I ate half of this burrito.  I rarely give out 1-star reviews, but both of my friends did not like the food here either. Poor quality, and extremely salty.
Is it just me, or is the shop owned by 19 year olds? I never see any older adults. Ever.
Horrible customer service. Their story keeps changing every time I call about what times they can possibly come. Additionally, they won't notify you before they come...you instead are supposed to just wait around for 4 hours for when they might show up or leave an extra key with them). Who has that sort of time, especially at these prices? I found other services that were willing to call me half an hour ahead of time and who provided way better customer service. This company isn't worth your time.
I purchased a Groupon to tan for my wedding, when I came into Tan Republic the young girl working there gave me ZERO information about the salon, the beds and the lotions.  She suggested a lotion that caused my skin to break out in small bumps and put me in worst bed for me for 8 minutes. I WAS BURNT ALL WEEKEND!  Everything she did for me was not at all what was best for me with my Irish heritage and very fair skin.  I went in on Monday and talked to a different girl who convinced me to purchase a different lotion to help my skin at a very discounted rate and gave me a free tan in the Diamond bed. She worked really hard to make things better.   The next day I came in and talk to the owner, he was a complete @$$ HOLE to me and basically told me that his employees are lazy and now that is my fault and my wallet is going to have to suffer because of their lack of effort to serve me as a customer.  I have wasted over ONE HUNDRED DOLLARS from my wedding budget now on tanning and am completely screwed over.   I WOULD NEVER RECOMMEND GOING HERE IF AN OWNER CAN TREAT CUSTOMERS LIKE CRAP AND TALK BAD ABOUT HIS EMPLOYEES.
Rented from them for the second time and it will be the last! I got a 2016 Ford mustang and my car wasn't clean at all I had to clean it myself because it was all sticky, there back window wouldn't properly close and when I would close the drop top I had to pull it closed myself. I returned the car earlier then the original drop off date. A few hours later I had realized that I left items in the car so I found myself calling over and over again and no one ever answered me (and there suppose to be "24 hours") So I had no choice but to wait to the next morning. I spoke to an unhelpful front desker who I asked to forward me to her manager which then hesitated and proceeded to do what I had originally asked of her then asked her again to forward me to her manager. Manager didn't help me either!  In conclusion a bunch of thieves work for this company. I lost 50 bucks worth of goods and they could care less about there customer service. Do not rent from them if I have nice things you'll be keeping in your car!
This is the worst. Avoid at all costs from Hartsfield Jackson.  Driver was texting and driving and on the phone the whole trip. Dangerous!
Ok but frequent renters and corporate renters will not be impressed. The service was satisfactory but as a frequent corporate renter the experience was not great. They aren't as polished or knowledgeable ad the larger Biston branches. Some things to keep in mind if you do rent follow. Know your corporate policy. They don't rent to business often and will try to up sell you on insurance (or scare you into it which I found unprofessional), they also put a very large hold on my corporate card, I've never experienced that in 10 years of rentals.   Be on the look out for damage. The cars are filthy on the outside. This is mystifying as a car wash is down the street. Make the representative confirm no damage for each questionable area. I agree, dirty cars give the impression that they are hiding damage.   For business, I'll try to stick with the bigger Boston branches.
We bought a slice a of apple strudel and a day-old almond horn to take home and were really disappointed.  The strudel was below average and not as good as supermarket strudel, but at 4 times the price.  The day old almond horn tasted like it was a week old, desiccated and starting to turn.  Just say no.
Don't be fooled by the nice little neighborhood outside or the tour of the facilities. Save yourself and don't move here:   Living on the pool: don't count of sleeping much due to 6 am skinny dippers and tons of people boozing at the pool. Every Saturday, every Sunday, and many week nights during the summer.   Management: after  we had repeated, serious electrical problems, so we had to prod management to figure things out once it became a fire hazard. Maintenance inquiries are responded to quickly but definitely not in a way that makes you feel assured about further problems or the quality of work done on the current problem you called about. Other than maintenance, pretty unhelpful in general and not willing to work with you to find a solution to a problem.  Laundry: one room w/ 4 working machines for hundreds of apts. I'll leave it at that.   Parking: lived here less than 6 months and almost get hit inside the parking deck on a weekly basis. Security is no issue for someone wanting to get in/out without a key.   Oh, and don't forget about the bent and scratched knife I found in the hallway a few weeks before they started investigating attempted break-ins.   My apartment is unfortunately not great enough to make living in a super loud hotel seem bearable - looking forward to my lease ending.
I tried to give this place another chance. I ordered different dish from last time. My honey BBQ chicken was burn. The chef covered that by peeling off the chicken skin. :( Disappointing.  Plus, the restaurant staff is not helpful and not flexible. There are many open tables in the restaurant, but the server push all their guests in one side and all tables are pretty close! i can reach my arms out and touch other table. I asked to change table so me and my friend can feel comfortable and have our conversation (because we can hear other people talking and loudly). The staff refused to let us change even tho there are so MANY open tables. I can't understand this place.
We went for drinks and a snack on Sunday afternoon so the place was empty and we had no problem parking.  The service was good, the queso was mild but really tasty.  The Spicy and the Mex Martini were good drinks but I have had better at other Tex Mex places in town.
This is the closest Mickey D's to me so it is almost essential. They are pretty fast and drive through is never overwhelmed. The food has never be anything to complain about but the employees are terrible( with a exception or two). I always am pleasant and say thank you and these girls never say anything back and just close the window. I think that is totally rude. I think the owner should maybe talk to them about being a bit more friendly because there are much better options out there on the same price point.
I ordered for pick up today and their online me u states for lunch its $9.25. When I picked up my order the total was $11.00. They brought me my food and check then disappeared. I came back to the office to check the menu to make sure I saw rhe right price and yes it was $9.25. So I called and made the suggestion That They update the menu prices so people are prepared. Luckily I had my card and not a $10 bill. So the reason for the 1 star is because after she told me the prices may change she hung up in my face. Rude  I usually order from E-San Thai but there usually really busy at lunch.  The food at Maiphai is okay but E-San Thai is much tastier, its just a block up the street and the staff are much friendlier.
Inconsistent. One good experience, and the next time was awful. One pizza had too much sauce, the other hardly any at all. Both were overly doughy and thick, a really disappointing experience at much too high a price. We won't be going back.
YOU DON'T ACCEPT PAYMENTS OVER THE PHONE????  This is super unbelievable... Tonight I called to make an order for my wife to pick up. I tried to pay with my card over the phone and guess what??? They don't take payments over the phone "due to fraud". Are you kidding me?? In Boston, MA?? In the year 2017??? This is NOT a third world country. This is NOT 1987. Why is every single GREAT restaurant in Boston taking payments online and over the phone??? And then the girl that answered the phone got on the offensive when I questioned her about such ridicule policy. This is so unbelievable and frustrating!
This review is solely about the breakfast service.  I used to come here every weekday morning for breakfast tacos and coffee on my way to work. A few months ago they hired a couple of new guys for that shift, and since then the service at breakfast has declined sharply.   The guy who used to run the counter at breakfast was cheerful, courteous, and FAST. There were plenty of all the different types of tacos wrapped and ready to go, and I could grab my coffee, choose my tacos, pay and leave in less than five minutes, usually just as long as it took me to fix my coffee and take out my wallet.  The first time I went since that guy left, there were two new guys, one running the counter and the other preparing the tacos. Both of the kinds I usually get weren't ready, and the taco prepper took a while to make the tacos, then set the bag down on the counter without letting the guy manning the register know that they were ready. I stood there for several minutes until the cashier noticed the bag sitting there, even after I told him they were ready and had been set down.   The last time I went there, there was only one customer ahead of me in line, who looked tense and irate, waiting for the same "taco prepper" guy from the previous time to fix his tacos (he usually wears a bandana on his head). This time he was also running the register. I got my coffee, waited in line while the gentleman ahead of me finally got his food and paid.  The guy came and took my order, started chatting me up while he sloooowly made my tacos. Then he asked me if I was okay (I guess it showed on my face that I was annoyed), and I told him I was just in a rush. Then he loudly said that they're never in a rush at Live Oak Market, and I told him that they used to be, and that I used to be able to get my order quickly. He told me to have a nice day, and I left.   I've worked in customer service for years, including working as a barista at a busy coffee shop, and I find the notion that "rushing" during what is known as "rush hour" on a weekday morning to be perfectly acceptable. The primary reason people stop there is because, yes, the tacos are good and so is the coffee, supporting local businesses is important, AND because you can jump out of your car, grab your food and coffee, and get back on the road in five minutes or less (or you should be able to, rather). If you're not prepared to "rush" between the hours of 7 and 9 a.m. on a weekday, and you're serving breakfast and coffee, then you're in the wrong business.  Luckily, a family owned taco truck opened directly across the street from Live Oak Market in the old Valero parking lot. Their tacos are less expensive, taste much better, the staff is friendly, and they're always ready when you get there. So, no more Live Oak for me in the mornings. I make my own coffee and get tacos across the street.   (During the rest of the day, the staff is great, and I still love the store in general, but I hope they replace their early morning staff.)
Brand new place that opened near Royal Oak Skytrain station. I came here on the way to my workout.  I was really looking forward to this being my go-to place after my work out, however, was severely underwhelmed, mostly by the customer service.   They acted as though they would rather be elsewhere than serving customers. It was empty and they acted as though I was interrupting their busy day.  When she asked how I wanted to pay she looked at my credit card as if it was a foreign specimen.   Rather than putting my waffles at the table I was sitting at. She waited outside the washroom for me and just handed me my plate.   The whip cream was half way melted by the time it arrived. I ate my "cream soup" with a spoon.   My matcha waffles were un epic. Hello where's the matcha? Clearly hiding since I tasted no matcha. For all I know they could've used green food coloring.   At least the bathroom was clean. Plus points for that.
I have sent 2 packages that are serviced to this Post Office.  Both tracking numbers say out for delivery and shipping is delayed.  One is over a month old the other a week old.  I tried calling the post office and no one answers.  I've called every day for a week at different times of the day no answer.  This place is completely useless.  How hard is it to scan something as delivered!
Where do I begin? Did the patty taste like burnt shit? You bet! Was the bun cold? You better believe it. Did we wait 40 minutes for our two basic burgers when there were literally no other customers inside? Of course!  All this in one location. Come on down and get yourself your own $10 garbage.   Killer Burger? More like Nasty Burger. Am I right or am I right?
Sat for over 10 minutes, no one came had to go find someone to even get a drink.  Best part of entire experience was the source dough bread.
The slowest service. I was visting the area for the second year in a row and had the same slow service. The barerista looked like see was day dreaming the whole time and acted like it was the first time she had seen coffee.
Got out of work early to get nails done. Read reviews for this place and thought I'd give it a try. Perhaps if I got a female tech to do my nails, I'd be happier than I am right now. The male tech was clearly new. Put FOUR coats of polish on my nails plus base and top coat. Needless to say my nails took ages to dry and had air bubbles and streaks through them like prunes. I asked if I could get less polish for a nail that was completely botched and was ignored by himself and his coworker. Let's just say I won't go back to pay $15 to be a guinea pig for a poor nail job and even worse service.
They tremendously over book. I finally wised up and left this practice for another area dermatologist. Expect average wait times of 30-45 min.after your scheduled appointment time to be seen. The last time I was seen for MOH's surgery I noted the timeline: - 8:00 am: Appt. time:  - 8:45 am: Called back to treatment room for pre surgery prepping by nurse. - 9:00 am: Prepping complete - 9:20 am: Dr. arrived for surgery.  (Laid on my stomach for 20 minutes waiting (surgery to back of leg) . - 9:35 am: Surgery complete. Returned to waiting room to wait for biopsy results. - 12:45 pm: Called back in to treatment room. Told biopsy revealed all of tumor had been removed. Wound was sutured and bandaged.  - 1:05 pm: Left clinic. TOTAL TIME: 5 hr 5 min. I had similar experiences for two previous procedures, so this not an anomaly.  Today I went to my see new dermatologist, Dr. Demetrius, The Dermatology Group, in Longwood, for a MOH's procedure. The previous Advanced Dermatology had failed to note two areas needing treatment. Timeline: - 10:30 am: Appt. time:  - 10:35 am: Called back to treatment room for pre surgery prepping by nurse. - 10:45 am: Prepping complete - 10:50 am: Dr. arrived for surgery.  - 11:00 am: Surgery complete. Returned to waiting room to wait for biopsy results. - 11: 15 am: Called back to treatment room. Told biopsy revealed all of tumor had been removed. Wound was bandaged (no sutures required.  - 11:20 am: Left clinic. TOTAL TIME: 50 min.
My friends and I ordered burritos, I love the white card system, but whoever made our food got our orders all mixed up. We figured, whatever, we're hungry -- burritos don't have to be perfect to still be great. But when we bit into them they were COLD, and the service was really fast, which means their ingredients are just hanging around in the kitchen at room temperature. GROSS. My friends wanted to send them back but we figured they would just microwave them or something. I feel lucky we did not get food poisoning from this place. BEWARE!
The one vegetarian option was "ordering the fish dish without the fish"....  So not a great selection.  The $25 order of fusion fish and chips was dry.  Tasted "Fine". But "fine" is not really fine when you are paying $25 for a small amount of dry food.
Went for a late Saturday night dinner with my boyfriend last month before Christmas.  We were enjoying a little "staycation" and had checked into the W hotel for the night. After a relaxing afternoon of massages at Bliss we made a reservation for 10:00 at Maggiano's up the block.  When we arrived it was bustling with Christmas parties, Birthday celebrations, and groups groups groups.  Definitely not the most romantic couples setting, but we were fine and welcomed the energy and fun company.  However the service was pretty abysmal.   We checked in right on time for our reservation and the host told us it would be a short wait. We asked if we should get a drink at the bar and he said no no no you'll be seated very shortly. So we shifted to the side allowing others to come and go, and we waited...and waited....and waited some more.  After about 10 minutes we shifted about 3 feet to the bar which was not very crowded at all. There we waited....and waited...and waited again although the bartender was not busy at all.  Finally I shouted out my order for a Stella draft and he snapped out of it, brought me my beer, and took my guys' order.  We drank our beers and still, no table?  Eventually after over 25 minutes I went up to the Host again and asked what was up?  He looked perplexed and then realized he had given our table to someone else in error.  You know mistakes happen but we were standing right in front of him and I tried to make eye contact half a dozen times but he never once looked away from his computer screen or from chatting with colleagues.   We got a brief apology and were finally seated.  Luckily we were in such a good mood we didn't let the past half hour get in our way of a good time.  But here's where the real fun begins.  We were sat in the middle of it all.  Parties all around us but we didn't mind, though my bf had to move his seat every two minutes for waiters to get through as we were apparently sat in their immediate line of traffic.  We did however mind the fact that we had to wait over 10 minutes to order drinks, another ten + to order our entrees, another 15 to receive.  And what was put in front of us was the saltiest food either of us had ever tasted.  I like salty food but my pasta dish was INEDIBLE.  By this time it's after 11, the crowds have thinned out and there are teams cleaning up all around us preparing to close down.  When the waiter came to clear our plates and saw I hadn't eaten my meal he did ask why and after politely telling him it was too salty, he took the pasta off the bill which we did not ask for but we did appreciate it.   In the end we experienced really bad service and were fine with shrugging our shoulders and chalking it up to the busy holiday season, but the fact that our salads, app, and entrees were unimpressive and overly salty really added insult to injury.  The good news?  I was planning on having a heavy Italian feast, but I end consuming very little food, which is much better for my waistline :-)
I have it on good authority that Papa Razzi recycles bread from their bread baskets, and it doesn't surprise me at all. The service here is REALLY slow--my family has made the mistake of going here for a "quick" dinner just because it's close to my house, but running out to Route 9 probably would have been faster in the long run. Their food is fairly good, I suppose, but I would much rather go to Mark's Sandwich Shop--in the same building--than Papa Razzi.
I loved the food but the guy at the food cart was extremely rude. He also said I would have to pay extra (it's not written anywhere about this extra charge so I think he just made it up) if I didn't eat at the bar even though it's a food cart. He said I would have a 20 min. wait so I would have to move my car as I parked in a 15 min. spot and I asked for a number and he made it seem like I was an idiot for asking for an order number. So I said forget it...I probably won't return just because of him though the lady, who showed up after I re-parked, was quite cordial.  Two stars because the food is decent (fries were burnt).
Should have read the reviews.... The staff was pretty dull. Not rude, but not engaged either. The bagel was 'aight. I asked for it toasted and received a slightly warm doughy bagel.    The bacon scallion cream cheese had a lot of rubbery bacon fat in it. Gross.  Oh, and it was something like $5.50 after tax for my bagel in cream cheese. Maybe if that was the best bagel and cream cheese I've ever had, but this certainly was not the case.
We had 4 dishes a few months back, all were so bad I can't even explain. Fried potstickers were mushy not crunchy, the soup had mystery meat in it that very tasted off. This is not one of those dives with great cheap food, it's just a dive.  Chrismas decor all year round lol. There was so much noise from the lottery machine, the tv, the radio. The most noise came from what I believe was the owners kids, they were eating at another table and each kid had their own noisy video game to play. It's not a bistro, but they call themselves that. All the good Asian restaurants are on NE 82nd. Nothing fancy there either, but delicious food.  The only reason I don't give them 1 star is because no one was mean to me. It's like your typical Asian restaurant, not super friendly but not rude. My friend left as much food behind as I did.   Oh yeah, and they were 8 points from failing their health inspection report earlier this year :/ Wish I had checked that first:  http://www.co.washington.or.us/HHS/EnvironmentalHealth/FoodSafety/restaurant-inspections.cfm
I'm so sad the old chef left. When we first started to come here - it was SO delicious and the menu seemed to change frequently (which I like). The mussels with julienned veggies and garlic toast was to die for, but alas - it is no more.  We have gone back maybe 3 times since the (original or at least last chef) left and all 3 times it's just been ok - pretty boring forgetttable meals.   The menu has been the exact same (except specials) all 3 times over a 10 month period and nothing really stands out that much. The mac and cheese - meh I can make it better at home. The steak - I've had better at so many places. the braised short ribs - I've had SO much better elsewhere. It just felt like the quality of food went downhill and so did the flavor (it was bland).   I do have to say the drinks are fun and tasty (lots of specialty martinis) and a decent wine list. Also the servers have always been friendly, but occasionally on the slow side to bring dishes/refills.
I've been here twice for dress alterations. The first time, I showed up a few hours after my dress was scheduled to be ready. She needed another hour, so I just had to shop around and then went back and got it.  The second time was a nightmare. As I was getting fitted, two customers came in for their items and were told that they weren't ready yet. So when I was told my dress would be ready in a week, on Monday, I assumed it would be later than that. So I went in on Thursday and it still wasn't ready. I was told to come back on Monday. I went later that week...still not ready. So finally on my third attempt, after three weeks instead of one, the dress was ready. It's clear the woman working here is just two busy. But I would have rather been told it would take three weeks from the start, instead of having to come in three times. And a phone call explaining that the item is not ready would have been great, but that didn't happen.
I have been here once before and actually really enjoyed the food.  The mac & cheese is delish and the french fries are tossed in truffle oil--a nice touch..  However, last night, I was treated so rudely by the manager I will never come back--and this is to their detriment since I live just blocks from the new location in Charlestown I was hoping to visit for brunch soon.  We walked in to find the place jammed, and we were only wanting a seat at the bar.  The hostess sent us upstairs to the bar on the 3rd level, where they said two seats had just opened up from people they had just seated.  Up we went, to find two people who were seated at a table moving to the openings at the bar, and they offered us their table.  We made our move to sit at the table when the manager, who saw it all go down, rudely told us to get away from the table because he had a waiting list.  All we wanted was a drink at the bar...but hey my money's as green as anybody else's.  I'll just spend it elsewhere.
After a mediocre meal and poorly made drinks, they lost our credit card. Not only did the other servers not help to locate it, they thought it was funny. After the 20 minutes of terror, they found it at the bar. The manager came to our table and left " free dessert with purchase " coupons in our bill folder. I was not satisfied. The manager was rude, not understanding, and impatient. After talking to him for a minute he rips up our ticket in a sarcastic manner at our table and walking off in a huff, I vowed to never go back. Never ever again. If you go, pay in cash. Don't risk your credit card security.
I'm with other reviewers who were underwhelmed.  Portland has some viscious competition for breakfast places but even so...the good experience here ended with being seated quickly (early on a Sunday). Decor - I can get past less than chic surroundings when all else is worthy.  In this case it just gave us flaws to look at while waiting. Service - bad is really all you can say.  Impolite to rude.  Orders were incorrect.  Generally it didn't seem if anyone cared if we were happy or not. Food - over-priced and underwhelming.  Everything was very basic and portions were small.  I prefer a portion like this to the 2000 cal meal you are presented other places, but not when I'm paying over $10 for a plate with no meat or seafood on it.  Like another reviewer, we were also given one sliced strawberry (in October) as the fruit with the meal. We live in a beautiful city with a great food culture.  No need to come here with so many other places to choose from!
Clearly a business owner with absolutely no regard for the fact that a REAL customer might not agree with him or other reviewers.  I was a real customer who simply chooses not to even communicate with someone who cannot take the slightest bit of criticism.  Someone from your business, along with a member of the Cousins management team, wanted to come into my company's office and discuss the possibility of us doing catering business with WL.  I told our receptionist we are not interested.  If that makes me a "fake reviewer/customer," then that's fine with me.  If I ever was going to give you a second try, that definitely won't happen now.  Had you not immediately tried to flag my first review as being fake or from a competitor, I might have considered that you were having an off day the day I tried, but since you decided to make it personal by insulting my vocabulary, forget it.  BTW, my neurologist uses the term "migraine headache" because it is a specific type of headache.
Service was ok. Amount of meat on my roast beef sandwich was very weak. Cool building though.
I'm very particular about my tuna fish subs. For a food that is so simple to make that even a child could do it, one still has to realize that there is a particular taste for every individual.  Mayo or Miracle Whip? What is the tuna to dressing ratio? Celery or no celery? Onions? Canned in water or oil?  Tuna may be the most simple yet most complicated sandwich one could eat. And I think Harry O's did a good job and met my requirements of what a good tuna creation is.  But Harry lost points elsewhere.   I asked for lettuce, tomatoes, and pickles...I think there were roughly 3 or 4 pickle slices on my sub. Tomatoes totaled the same. Yet the lettuce overflowed out of the top of the sub and dropped all over my plate, my floor, and my lap. It was a mess of lettuce.  The sub roll was nothing unique - definitely not baked fresh as it looked and tasted store bought. Some places can pull off using store bought bread, but they usually compensate with the other ingredients, or as I like to say, the ESSENCE of a sandwich.   The service was nothing friendly. Kind of cold and strictly business. I felt nothing personal about this establishment which is usually one of the best things about buying from small business.  In the end, two stars for very low/fair prices for the neighborhood as well as a successful tuna fish concoction. Go here for cheap food if that's what you're looking for. Me? I'll be at one of the other bazillion restaurants in the neighborhood.
Horrible experience.  We have eaten here before.  On this visit, we had a reservation and were promptly seated.  Our waiter was at the table just after we sat down.  He took our drink order and salad order.  When he returned with our drinks we placed our dinner order that consisted of three side dishes.  Fettuccine Alfredo, spaghetti marinara, and spicy sausage.  What seemed to be longer than expected for our order, our waiter brought the fettuccine alfredo and spaghetti marinara.  He immediately left.  Both of these dishes were lukewarm at best.  The spicy sausage never came nor did the waiter come back by the table to check on us or offer a drink refill.  After about 15 minutes I got  his attention and asked about the sausage, his reply was that it should be coming.  After at least another 10 minutes he brought it and dropped it quickly on the table with no comment and left.  No management was ever seen.  Finally got the waiter's attention again, sent the sausage back and asked for our check.  That took time also.  Just the worst in service, lukewarm food, and no concern apparently by management to check on the customers.  Too many choices in the Arena District for this place to expect us to return.
We stopped here with the kids after a recommendation. The main dining area was full. There was a room off to the side, but it smelled like a gas station restroom. Okay....How did no one notice? There was some room on the patio so we opted for that. Lots of choices. The breakfast tacos seem popular. I went with the sweet potato hash. It was good. The wait for the food was close to 30 minutes. The crowd seemed cool except for a bodybuilder couple who kept staring at us....  Yeah.... I won't be back. It was all too weird, smelly, and uncomfortable.  They have a dog friendly patio.
100% do not go here. Look I never review. This place though got me feeling some type of way. We went out on a Friday night so it's ok if it's busy but this place was pretty relaxed compared to other spots. But the wait to get a table was 10 minutes then when we we seated no one checked on us for 20 minutes. Other tabled seated after us even had their orders taken. We didn't even get a drink order in. 10 outta 10 wouldn't do again.
The course was in terrible shape whenwe played on Saturday, it was overbookedwith no rangers out to keep play moving. Iuse to play there twice a month but not now until they repair the course.
Started off promising with the sun choke and spinach and bravas, but everything after was disappointing. The rice in the paella was undercooked, the flank steak was chewy instead of tender, the jambon was smoky but otherwise tasteless and not paired with anything. Most of the other dishes were oversalted, and the ahi tuna tasted off. Server seemed overwhelmed and did not ask what was wrong when food was left untouched. Food came out quickly. Maybe it was an off night because it was extremely crowded and I had heard good things.
The cleaning has been anywhere from okay to good but it's pretty inconsistent. The customer service however was good and I enjoyed my visits for the most part. Unfortunately, Adam (the owner) tends to decide to not show up and open the store or decides to close hours before the stated closing time. I've had it happen to me now twice in the last month (a few others in the year) and each time there hasn't even been so much as a note on the door. Just lights off, no notice. If you decide to use this place, make sure you call ahead, even if the hours state they are open.   Came here originally based on yelp reviews and now leaving my own.
Great Store.......BUT, if you don't shop there for 6 months, all your loyalty points get nuked....a pretty RAW deal.  For an added bonus...no empathy whatsoever from the management there.....I'll stick with Liquor Mart....
Everyone loves this place! I DON'T!   Okay, if you are gonna card everyone.. please card everyone! Not just some.   My bartender was no where to be seen once i ordered my drink and food...my drink was empty...and i was dying for water..or another drink... my friend had to get up..and walk to the other end of the bar to get us a drink. After we got ours...this asshole comes back. Do we need anything? NO.   Gives us our bill..tries to take it when it's obvious we are trying to figure out how much we each owe.. like come on..i know you are trying to get off work, but it's a snow storm and i'm pretty sure you were just going upstairs to sleep in your free room at the marriott.   My mojito was good..but very very...light. I swear, there was like no alcohol in it.
Horrible for oil change! Set up a reservation online for a fixed time, but apparently that means nothing!!! Still have to wait for more than an hour..  I went to waffle house across the street, waited in line,  ate breakfast,  got back and they still hadn't started on my car!
Very disappointed and at some points had thoughts of "is this really happening right now?". I bought a groupon for a full set of eyelash extensions with 1 fill. I go to my appointment for the full set of lash extensions. I'm right on time for my appointment and I walk up to the glass door, which is locked, but I see the woman (who I assume is going to do my lashes because she's the only one in the small room) and she is on her cell phone. She notices me when I walk up to the glass door by looking in the mirror and seeing my reflection. She continues to talk on her phone and hasn't turned around yet to face me. I knock and she still doesn't run around, but I know she's already seen me through the mirror she's staring into. I was thinking "what's going on here??" Then after about 20 seconds of me staring at her and her back turned toward me, she finally turns around and points to the chair sitting outside the glass door and when I look down I see that it has papers to fill out for first time customers. I sat down in the chair (mind you she's still on the phone and hasn't unlocked the glass door) and fill out the paper, probably taking about 2 minutes to fill out. I stand up and face the glass door and she's still on the phone, I'm standing there laughing at this point because I can't believe this is going on. Then I had to pee, so I just walked away from the glass door and went to the bathroom (this place is set up inside a building with other clinics/salons). I go to the bathroom, walk back to he glass door and she's now what it looks like saying goodbye on the phone and then unlocks the door to let me in and says "sorry". I was so mad, but didn't say anything and went on with the lash appointment. I've gotten lashes done before so I knew what to expect. Basically the outcome was mediocre (I wanted monger and told her, but they were average length) and my left eye was red and hurting for 2 days afterwards which has never happened before with pervious lash extensions from other places. I will never go back there again and seriously that woman was so rude to be on her phone ignoring me for so long when I got there ( for probably 20 minutes total)
The minute we walked in, we knew service would be slow. And so it was. Signs on the outside table said "see waiter to be seated", but nobody was there to seat us. After a while the waiter came, we sat outside and it took another 5-10 minutes till we got our drinks. Another 25 minutes till we got our food (chicken salad, sandwich). The salad was drenched in a red dressing, the chicken was hard to chew. The sandwich was ok. Kids pasta was seasoned with pepper (parents will understand why this is another minus...). The waiter was friendly but that couldn't make up for the overall bad experience.
Visited this establishment for a going-away party which was pre-arranged with the restaurant however when we arrived they had no seating reserved for us.  We had all bought tickets (provided by the restaurant for that time and date)  which included a burger and a beer.  Burgers were pretty tasteless, not juicy, buns were nothing special either.  The best thing I could say about it was that the fries were hot and crispy.  Some of my friends reported that the oxtail soup was also good.  Service was shoddy however and there was nothing about the experience that will be tempt me back again.
This place is way overrated... Im not from the area, and my GF whos from there, gassed this place up to be something special. Went on a Friday night recently, around 8. Some lady who worked there helped us find a spot in their lot, which was a nice touch, as parking in SoBo is beyond attrocious, cars might as well be banned from parking within the city limits. We sat near the bar area...Hella loud in there, sounded like some obnoxious souls were in the vicinity. Yelling and hollering and such,I mean i get it its a a bar but it was only around 8. We get seated and waited around 10m to get a waitress to our table. Service overall was really slow. After we got our decent cocktails, another 15-20m passed before we got approached to order meals.   As for the food, we decided to just get entrees. My Gf got the pork chop and it seemed to crisped on the outside, almost burnt. Her risotto was decent, but overall it was lackluster. I was gunna opt for the prime rib, they were out of it at the time. No biggie I had a lobster pie in the on deck circle...So I got it, really rubbery and quite bland. The portion wasnt that great either. Not sure why I got fries with it, but I did. The fries were ok, oversalted thought. We waited another 15m after we were done for the check. When the check came, my GF and I split the bill...For the food and service we got, this place is overpriced...I heard the quality took a dive after they remodeled it, from my GF whos been going there for a while. Seems like the place is surviving on name/prior reputation and old time regulars. I wouldnt go back. Week later we went to the Lincoln Tavern up the road, and I was blown away that place was incredible and a better value.  Final note, after I ate here and checked some other reviews the night of, I stumbled across one of the restaurants customer service reps for yelp, Don. His replies were very unprofessional, belittling of the reviewer, yet entertaining, due to the fact  I couldn't believe someone who represents the establishment would write such things. I read all the poor reviews to see him go to the point of attacking the patron and accusing them of being at fault for their poor service, never seen anything like it. In this case, on a public forum its probably better to let the poor reviews stand alone, rather than make the establishment look a bush league eatery.
The people who work here are rude, rude, RUDE!!!!  I needed razor blades (which are locked up) and the person on the floor couldn't be bothered to help me get them, and then complained when I needed more time to figure out which ones were the right ones.  I will seriously never go in there again, if I can help it.  There 's a Walgreen's right across the street.  Go there instead, is my recommendation.  They take FOREVER, but at least they aren't rude.
Scenario: new to the restaurant. We walk in and are greeted by no one. Restaurant is quite empty. We aren't sure what to do so we approach the bartender and ask if we can seat ourselves. She doesn't give us a firm yes but instead says "sure." Hostess then arrives at our table and hands us two menus. Ten minutes go by and we haven't been waited on or checked in on by any one. Two gentlemen enter--are immediately seated and waitress brings them water. 20 minutes now go by. Restaurant is filling up (we know this because we are sitting in the middle of the room--front row seats). At this point we are hungry and pretty annoyed. My friend tries to flag down a waitress and she, without exaggeration, ignores her and continues on her way.  Now please be aware that we are polite, patient people who wouldn't normally leave, but tonight we received the worst service imaginable at a restaurant. We ended up leaving still without silverware or water on our table. I wish Yelp could take away stars as this restaurant deserves less than 0 stars.   First Yelp review for me (that's how angry I am right now). So we are at the restaurant next door enjoying a few large glasses of sangria :) Cheers!
Unless you are willing to wait 20-30 min for a drink, don't come here. Literally 5 people in front of me waiting for a drink and it took that long.
Worst place ever, please be cautious. Worst costumer service I ever seen. Doctors are not to friendly, rough and careless, wont use it anymore and DBPR should check this place.
Went here on 1/5 and was extremely disappointed in the food but more the service. Me and my husband have been here several times because we love love love their rotisserie chicken meal. Upon sitting down we looked at the menu but we already knew what we were going to have. If you've been to Luke's you know that they have an open concept restaurant. Our server came over and took our order but upon looking around we saw that all the servers including our server, were seated at a long table on the floor eating what I suppose is their lunch. I use to work as a server and it has never been acceptable to eat in front of guest especially if they do not have their food yet. There were about 8 servers seated just eating. We got our food pretty quickly and were very excited to start eating since we love this dish so much. Unfortunately it did not taste as it normally has in the past which is AMAZING! We still ate everything but when our server came around and asked how was everything my husband asked if they had possibly changed the chicken recipe? Because it just didn't taste as it did all the other times we came. She explained that the recipe was still the same so we said ok no big deal. I saw her approach the manager on the floor to tell him about our question on the chicken recipe. He looked at me while she was talking because our server pointed to our table and he rolled his eyes like he did not want to be bothered about the situation. Plus we were the only guest at the restaurant at that time. He not once came to our table. Me and my husband were not looking for a free meal or anything free for that matter because we ate the dish. As a manager you should be concerned with all guest especially returning guest. Unfortunately we won't ever be coming here again.
$41 for a medicore mani/pedi. I'm newer to the Chestnut Hill/West Roxbury area.. does anyone recommend a better place.  One that actually CLEANS your nails?
First the entrance makes no sense.. Before you get to the hostess table, there's a room with tables and guests dining.  The waiter is pretty friendly and knowledgeable of the menu. He is a little heavy on trying to get some wine at the table, but this is expected with fine dining. He proceeds to get our drinks and informs us we will be getting bread soon. Comes back and takes our app order, bread still on the way.. Comes back with the appetizer and still no bread. I don't want the bread, but it's just poor management if you cannot bring bread to the table before apps. (Yes, I used to be a server)  Calamari - It is delicious but it is not your typical calamari. It is served under an Asian slaw with no dipping sauce. Jumbo Crab Cake - This is definitely jumbo, and definitely crab. It is one large patty with a TON of crab. This was also very good and the roulade it is served with is not bad at all. Tempura Lobster Tail - This was good, and I am pretty sure they left it on the shell so we had no doubt that it was worth the 33 dollars. I would rather get the lobster boiled but the appetizer just came fried.  Panko-Crusted Halibut - this was the special and the fish itself was fresh, but the flavoring was on the bland side and not enjoyable Bone-in Filet - asked for medium and got medium-well. It was dry and lacked flavor. Filet - not bad, but was nothing to write home about. I can make this better with the right cut of meat. Ahi-Tuna - this definitely lacked flavor, but then again the person who got it wanted it to be medium. If it is sushi grade tuna I would do medium-rare or on the rare side. I won't dock points because of flavor.  I expected way more from a fine steakhouse.. They had great appetizers but bad entrees. Step up your game please.
Average wine, average food, average service and average atmosphere- the price is above average for what is provided. Although I'm very disappointed and will not be back, it was one of the only places that didn't have an hour wait to eat, hence the 2 stars.
I have come to conclude that all Steak and Shake restaurants are the worst Steak and Shake restaurants.
This is the first gym I ever got a membership to about a year and a half ago.  When signing up I explained to the manager that I worked out of town and if I decided to go work back up north that I wouldn't need my membership anymore.  He said he would make note of it and would cancel it himself even if I didn't move.  Four months in the manager left for another location without me knowing and when I tried to cancel my membership they told me I couldn't unless I actually moved my permanent residence somewhere where a Steve Nash was not located.  I guess that's what I get for taking someones word and ended up paying for it for another 8 months.   Also, the parking is HORRIBLE! I have never seen worse.  Must have seen at least a half dozen accidents in that four months and if you go at a bad time your waiting 20 minutes or more for a spot.  The place is VERY busy too, sometimes it was even hard to get on a piece of equipment.  There were positives though.  It was one of the cleanest gyms I have been to and the staff was very friendly...
The tacos are great, but the patio area is constantly filthy and thus swarming with flies. Having to swat away flies after each bite is quite unappealing. Clean up the patio area and I'll increase my rating.
I order a combo that comes with drink and french fries. I cant believe how unsanitary this place is. They handed me the drinks with the straw already in it. It made me feel uncomfortable , so i asked for a different drink and they give a hard time. I drove off and would never come back to this In and Out burger again.
When the guys at Modern Energy installed my window treatments I would have given them 4/5 starts.  However since that time they have no-showed for a repair appointment, and I have not been able to get in touch with them.  It has been three weeks since I was last able to get in touch with them.  I decided to go to their store which is listed on Brazos Street.  No one in the building had seen or heard of Modern Energy.  This is shady and weird.  What gives?
Staff moves slow took a half an hour to get a carry out of a salad that had already been prepared , place was filthy it was disgusting I'm never going back to this Wendy's ever again.  Half of the people in line inside just got frustrated and left
This One Star rating is for the service I received.  I would give Gilbert's Zero Stars if that was an option.  This morning was a beautiful but cool (55F) Sunday morning. I met some friends and we decided to go to Gilbert's for brunch.  I've been to this restaurant quite a few times and have always had good service and decent food.  That is, until today.    Gilbert's won't get a nickel from me again. I have never been treated as rudely and disrespectfully as I was this morning by the manager who was on duty for brunch.   My friends and I wanted to sit next to the window, which is an openable overhead door similar to a garage door but glass panes.  The door was closed due to the cool winter air  The only table available was near the main restaurant door, but I was ok with putting up with that door opening and closing as patrons came and went.  Our server was attentive and courteous and we placed our orders.  As soon as our coffee came, another guy came by and asked, "Do you mind if I open the (overhead) door?". However this was not a question - - it was a statement - - meaning, "I am opening this overhead door".    I objected and asked that he not open the door due to the coldness outside.  As my friends later observed, this guy actively ignored me. He proceeded to open the door entirely.    I pressed on and asked him to close the door.  He told me other patrons asked that it be opened.  The people sitting next to our table gave me a quizzical look.    I asked the guy to get the manager, at which point he said he WAS the manager.  I told him, calmly, that this was bullish$t.  Again, he actively ignored me.  At no time did I raise my voice or cause a scene.  However, my friends and I picked up our belongings and went up the street to The Nook where we enjoyed our brunch and the waitstaff appreciated our business.    If you want a nice, enjoyable brunch, I recommend The Nook over Gilbert's any day.
Has anyone else had any experience with this people at Spa Illuminata? Well, I have. Let me tell you; I thought I was dealing with professionals. They were everything but that! This people do not give customers receipts of their payments. I made a huge mistake of not requesting one for my cash payment, and for my misfortune they' asked me to make a payment that I already had made. When I mentioned to them that the payment was made, the conversation went from bad to worse. They started screaming at me and treating me with total lack of respect. That's the type of people they are. Long story short, I lost my money, my treatment, my energy, my experience there were very unpleasant. I will never recommend this "Spa" to anyone!
Was coming back from Boulder and we stopped into Spice China, and it has gone way down hill.  It's like a poor imitation of a PF Changs.  They make no attempt to make real Chinese food anymore, and their "chinese-chinese" dishes on the menu are as crappy as their chinese-american shit.  Too bad, they could do better, but they just don't want to because the people who live and work in Broomfield and Louisville wouldn't know the difference.
This Past winter, I experienced a rattling noise on starting my 2010 Prius.  It happen randomly several  times.  Recently,  I received a Warranty Enhancement Notification - ZF3 from Toyota regarding rough idle and/or rattle noise from the transaxle at cold start due to a sticking Exhaust Gas Recirculation (EGR) Valve. Ahh, I said, that sounds like my problem. I brought the car to Beaverton Toyota to have the EGR valve replaced on 9/29/16. Not surprising, they couldn't get the car to fail in 72 degree weather. The letter stated, "the vehicle may illuminate the check engine light and set a diagnostic trouble code (DTC) P0401."  The optimum work is MAY. If the dealer knows it MAY or MAY NOT trigger a failure code and the customer complains about cold starts then repair the vehicle.  I spoke with the warranty manager and customer service manager but they refused to repair the vehicle.  They said wait until the car fails and then they can repair it.  Who wants to wait until their cars fails to repair it.  That's why it's call PREVENTATIVE MAINTENANCE. They sent me to Toyota Customer Relations but they sent me back to the dealer.
This is NOT a place I'll ever come again!! We waited on food that SUCKED!! The manager hired some new Hispanics and said they couldn't read and understand the orders and he yelled at them all night while they threw spatula all over the place. And the Manager was the worst ever. After all the men got their food, the girls waited an hour later to get our sorry food. And dos we get a discount, he said its only so much he can do. Wow. Really!!! My 1st and last visit here!!
I've been cut with the nail filer twice and had bleeding. When they remove your SNS, they soak it in acetone and get impatient so they use the drill and it completely ruined my nails because they overdid it. It's taken months for my natural healthy nails to grow back. They even charged $10 to remove my SNS. I asked why it doubled because they charged me $5 the first time and they said "because we're starting again" whatever that means. It seems like they make up prices. They rush to get you out of here. Wouldn't recommend.
Three tables occupied in the entire place on a Friday morning. We were seated promptly and ordered quickly.  We waited an hour for eggs benedict. There was not a rush of any sort. When they did come, the egg whites had not been at all cooked. We could not finish our meal and left shortly thereafter. Expensive, nasty and unaccountably slow. If you really must eat breakfast on Hawthorne and can't stand to wait to be seated, I guess go for it, just make sure your expectations are exceptionally low.
I ate here several times a few years ago because it was convenient. But the grime, the lackluster and possibly grimy food, and the sullen staff just turned me off. I went back again this week because my husband insisted on trying it. Our tap water came in styrofoam cups... mine was stained with dirt. The service was still sad and the space was still grimy. The falafel was fine but not made with love, and I'm actually just hoping it doesn't make me ill. I don't trust that place.
Even one star is too many for this company. The company is very resistant when it comes to cancelling a reservation. I requested a cancellation within the full refund window. The guy who runs this company said the reservation has been cancelled when it was not. The refund did not come through and the dude went non-responsive. I had to file a claim via PayPal. The company runs ads on Craiglist with multiple different names. I really should have paid more attention to all the negative reviews here. Please study them carefully and save yourself time, money, and energy.
This place is terrible. My mother is from the same part of India as the owner and this places food doesn't even hold a candle to the food I eat on a daily basis at home. This place is for dumb white people who think they are eating good Indian Veg food when in fact they are just being robbed.
Great coffee but I was put off by the customer service. I got a quick coffee through the drive thru. I smiled & said thank you, handed the receipt back, and when she saw that I didn't tip, I was given a blatant rude look and absolutely no response back. I didn't feel it necessary to tip on my $4 drive thru coffee, I've never seen that before. I gladly tip at restaurants where I'm given great service or treated well. I'm always looking to support businesses, the coffee was great, but I didn't appreciate that at all. It made me feel like me going there and buying a coffee wasn't enough. Probably won't go back.
Sorry but you failed on the pedicure - at $45 you really need to step up your game. The foot basins move so you can't put your weight on them, you have no polish dryers and there are no extras that would warrant me coming back - the foot massage was too short, no hot stones, no lotion etc. For $45, you can get a manicure and pedicure with all the fixin's at MANY nail salons along Marine Drive. Definitely wouldn't go back - front desk staff was mediocre at best. The only plus was the friendly pedicurist and the interior design.
Oh dear. What a sad state of affairs this is. To think that the organizers have been doing this for years and yet the market's constant is only its continuing state of decline is just pathetic. Firstly, do not even try to tell me that there is no indoor space they can put this junkyard carnival in. Vancouver is one of the world's foremost business hubs with convention and event spaces galore - not to mention that the VConCentre was only steps from this nightmare before christmas event (no offence to Jack Skellington - who would have been appalled at sheer nonsense this place hides within its $8 admission gates). Spare your cold nose, ears and extremites as well as yourself the cash and time and spend it all somewhere else. Preferably give it to the many homeless people lining the streets of the harbour rim.  "German-themed" PLEASE! There must have been 6 German booths in total and the rest were manned by randoms selling shitty tchotchkes and people that were very obviously not German trying to sell me and my very German husband perogies. Pathetic! German Pizza? Doesn't that sound inviting? Oh, its just regular pizza and the people making and selling it aren't even German - surprise, surprise.  The one saving grace of this place was the authentic pork hock stand, but in below freezing temperatures, it was either we lose the tips of our noses to frostbite whilst standing in the long and winding line in the rain and dew or wait till our next trip to Europe to sample a "shweinshaxe" and stein of Bier to wash away this horrendous experience from memory.
We used the Party Place on SE Stark for our wedding last month. If I had the option, I'd probably give them 2.5 starts rather than 2, but I couldn't justify a 3 and you can't do half stars, so....  Our first impression was great. We loved their selection, and their prices seemed comparable to other party rental places (which are all way overpriced, in my opinion, but that's another story). The woman we worked with in the showroom was FANTASTIC. Can't say enough good things about her. So nice, so patient, and so helpful.  The reason for the not-so-great review is that their delivery was late (really threw a wrench in our schedule the day before the wedding and made us scramble to get everything ready in time), but mainly because of the way they responded when some of their rentals were not in proper working order. Our caterer had requested that we order a large propane grill, which we did. Unfortunately, when she arrived to start cooking the day of our wedding (the day after the rentals were delivered), she found that the propane was leaking and only half of the grill was working. Our caterer was amazing and somehow still managed to get dinner done (later than planned, but what can you do with half a working grill when most of your menu is grilled?!), but it was a massive inconvenience.   After the wedding, both the caterer and the venue owner told us they thought we should let the Party Place know about the problem, and they both expected they would be decent enough to offer us a refund for the cost of the grill, since it created such a problem on our wedding day. So we emailed them when we got the final bill and requested a refund for the grill... and about a week later got a response saying, "I split the cost of the bbq with you since you did use 1/2 of it.  I am wondering if anyone called us when they found it wasn't working to see if we could trouble shoot over the phone and possibly help to have it fixed as it may have been something minor."  I'm sorry, but we thought that response was really lame. Way to dodge taking responsibility for your malfunctioning equipment. No, our caterer didn't have a chance to call because she was working like mad trying to salvage our wedding dinner with half of your grill not working! And we were on a ranch with poor cell coverage (which we had notified your staff of ahead of time)!   It was only a grill in our case that wasn't working, so it could have been much worse, but I'd hate to think about how much someone might get screwed over if something more costly didn't work as it was supposed to.
What more can I say? If I had listened to past reviewers, I would have known that the food would be late.  I had 1 excellent experience through Foodler, however, and thought, "why not?"  Well, 3 hours later, I had to cancel the order.  When I called Night Owl,  I heard "the driver is running slow because the roads are icy" (probably true), "he already paid for the food,  and it will come out of his pocket if you don't want it" (guilt, guilt, guilt, eeek!), and "but he's almost at your house."   I explained, "everyone has left-- what am I going to do with all of this food?"  The response by Night Owl?  "Fine.  It will just have to come out of the driver's pocket."  Then, he hung-up.  I feel horrible-- yes, my mother raised me with guilt as an effective tool-- but why pay for food I wasn't going to eat, because they are running hours & hours late?   My guests had already left.  I'd rather munch on peanut butter crackers than cold, guilt-infested food from Night Owl.  Sigh... I'm never using this delivery service again.  Foodler's great, but Night Owl should be ashamed of themselves.
I've never had a superlative experience at this Cup o' Joe.  I generally head here before seeing a film at Lennox because it is closer to the movie theater than the Starbucks inside the bookstore.  I've learned to stick to the simplest beverages possible, because anything fancy that I've ever had has been incredibly distasteful to me--I once threw away an Egg Nog Latte from this location after two sips, it was that foul.  I love Egg Nog Lattes, they're one of my favorite Christmas coffee treats--but not from here.  For convenience, it's not too bad--it ranks above gas station coffee--but I'll never visit this Cup o' Joe when I have other options or when I get to suggest the venue.
Okay, c'mon people.  We all know this bar is LAME.  Full of sketchy guys and idiot college kids.     That being said, I had a great time at Sissy's.  I am a believer that a bar is what you make of it and who you go out with.  I KNEW it was going to be cheesy with a clientelle that-- if I had met them on the street by myself-- would cause me to duck into the nearest store front, I KNEW that should the booty shake make an appearance the majority of the men there would take it as an open invite, I KNEW there was bound to be a lot of bad kareoke performed by sad old men who slick back their hair with lots of oil in an attempt to look "hip"... if you go in knowing, you can't  be disappointed.  Cheap beer, two-for-one appetizers, kareoke, top-40s dance floor-- standard Boston college bar fare.  This is definitely a place to go if you just want to get sloppy for a night.  Any other experience, go somewhere else.
The ladies behind the counter were very nice and friendly. Nice enough that it makes me sadder to have to give this low star rating.    I went in to get a to-go order. I asked if I could order dishes without MSG. I was told YES. Yay! There was a bit of a wait, but nothing outlandish. So far so good.  I really wanted to like it. It did not meet expectations and would not have even if I had never read all the stellar reviews.  I ordered sesame tofu -- and got the lunch deal so I could try the hot and sour soup and eggroll. I paid $1 extra for the rice to be fried rice.  Results: Eggroll just bad and greasy (went into trash); was given 1/4-1/3 cup of fried rice - even though I paid $1 extra to have fried rather than steamed rice. It was definitely not enough rice to go with the sesame tofu. I deserved at least one more small scoop of rice for the extra dollar I should think. The little I had of it tasted good. Very, very disappointed on the teen-niney portion of rice!  The sesame tofu tasted good (though a bit too sweet for my taste). I would have registered no complaint however if it were not for the several inch-plus long black-burnt chile pepper in it. Don't get me wrong. I love hot and I have no problem with chile peppers in my food. Which is why at first I thought it was just part of the meal -- until I tried to eat them. They felt and tasted dry and burnt. I took some time out to fish them out.   The hot and sour soup? One of the worst I have ever had. I could detect neither the hot nor the sour. It looked and tasted to me more like egg drop soup, because it had (really too much) egg in it.  I'm a hot and sour soup lover -- so this was another major disappointment. I could not bring myself to finish this tasteless soup.  I paid nearly $10 for a bad egg roll, yucky soup, a smidgeon of rice and tofu heavily laden with a sauce full of burnt-black peppers. Oh, and there was an unexpected "treat" of some kind of fried wheat something or other. Tasteless and unhealthy to boot, that also went in the trash.  Not a happy camper. I do not believe I will be back -- but then again, maybe just for the green beans with vegetarian fried rice in a pinch.  I feel certain Gordon Ramsay would agree with me on this one!   P.S. I love the fortunes in their fortune cookies. Words of wisdom -- very cool.  UPDATE:  A couple days after I posted this review a friend came over with takeout to share with me -- from this same restaurant~! She brought two takeout orders of the shrimp lunch deal with vegetable fried rice. She was given only a tiny portion of the fried rice (explained above).   One the positive side, the eggrolls were MUCH better this time. i believe it is because the eggroll I was given before must have been a leftover and cooked twice (not cool).   However, this time what was old was the fried shrimp. The batter on some pieces of it were so stale my teeth could not go through them.   The soup was probably egg drop this time; I really could not tell. It was below par to my tastebuds.   They need to learn one very important thing: KEEP IT FRESH. I have been served "way too old" in two different items on two different days in the past week, so I'll stick with the 2-star rating.  If I ordered from there again I would just say no when offered the "lunch deal," knowing I would get a decent amount of rice with the dish.
Dillons is your regular old average bar on Boylston, that for some reason has a rep for being  a nicer place than it's neighbors. And because of its rep, people seem to love waiting in absurdly long lines in order to have the privilege of drinking there.   SPOILER ALERT: If you wait in line, you will get in and find just an average bar, full of average people, and average drinks. Quite disappointing. Skip the line and go to one of the 11 bars you can see from said line. Trust me, same crap in those bars....except no wait.
Bad restaurant for such a great historical building. Food mediocre at best. But it doesn't matter because of the waaaaay too many 65" tvs. Really takes away from dinner. Not a place for date night. Yuck.
The 1st time I went it was great! I went back again looking for the same lady but she was not there so I try someone else. I'll laid there for less than 10 mins and the massage was more of a Swedish massage. I stop in the middle of the massage and explain by demonstrating I want a Deep massage. I laid back down and give him about 5 mins. I got up and walk out. Of course they chase me to the door and ask me to pay. Pay for what!!! He didn't do anything and process to walk out the door. As long as I been getting massage I have never walk out.
Great food, terrible service. I worked in the restaurant business for many years and I have never seen such ridiculous service. I went to dinner with a friend and we ordered a full size appetizer and medium pizza, intending to bring leftovers home to our families. The server tried to tell us not to order so much and made fun of us when the food arrived! We also needed our check split and our server was m.i.a., so I asked the woman at the counter who was not doing anything, her attitude could not have been worse. We felt like we were an inconvenience to our server, as he was busy talking to other employees. My family has eaten at Ryan's for years and the service was always wonderful at the original location, but the new location needs better service and more training!
We been here twice. Both times same feeling.  Atmosphere is cool, small pub. Very cozy.   Food - just ok. Nothing to write home about. I had the fish ands chips which look amazing in the picture but was greasy as ever when I ate it.  The waiter asked "how was it?" I told her it was a bit greasy for my taste to which she replied, "well it IS fried"  well smart aleck, I've had fish fried that didn't make me feel like I drank a glass of fish grease.  I was turned off by her comment the the chef took it off the bill.
2pm Sunday.  closed  thought the sign said Tavern.
I've come here for the "Dollar Sushi," which is offered Monday and Tuesday nights from 5 PM - 9 PM. However, I think last night will be my last visit. Nothing wrong with the service, but I'm not too keen on the sushi. The rice, to me, was too strongly seasoned with vinegar, and instead of the rice grains being light and fluffy, they were packed together and a bit soggy, almost congealed. I think I only spent $8.50 for 16 pieces of sushi, so the price is very affordable, but I felt like I was forcing myself to eat the last few pieces. I wish ATL had a good sushi happy hour or AYCE sushi, but I have yet to find one.
Awful ! Awful ! Awful !   We went here for lunch yesterday & i cannot put into words how awful our service was. Waiting over an hour for a bowl of soup and a crab burger.  Not to mention the waitress asked us if we wanted refills on our drinks 20 mins before we received our meal.  We received our food and finished eating - still no refills.  I could not get out of this place fast enough.   Never mind the fact I asked for rolls and butter when we first sat down, when I received the check the waitress still said they were in the oven. Basically she forgot, since the table next to use received their rolls 5 mins before.   Management should really take control of this place, if you cannot handle the amount of quests that you have in the restaurant. You should be on a wait. You're not doing any justice to anyone by seating everyone that walks in the front door. If your staff cannot handle it. Leaving guest sitting at tables looking around for help.   If you're Service at 50 % that day because you are under staffed or over seating ....Do I only have to pay 50% of my bill... of course not. So I expect to receive good service. And eating my meal with nothing to drink is honestly just that basics.
It's a transit center at Vancouver Mall, and it's great on paper, due to it being ... well, a transit center. It's usually clean, but thanks to it being at a mall, there are teens and a various assortment of people smoking cigarettes and being generally obnoxious nearby. My advice? Get off the bus, and find where you're supposed to be going next, as quickly as you can.
My Asian salad was great! The fries were tasty.  The calamari portion was a joke (literally about half the size as the menu depicts). My husband's burger with "crispy friend jalapeños" had one crispy jalapeño...the rest had no breading and no crisp.  The service was among the worst.  Their cider tasted like Boone's Farm taking me back to my underage drinking days.  No sign of a manager. Did I mention the service sucked?  Do yourself a favor and order to-go if you absolutely must try their food.  Their beer wasn't that great anyway.
Dined on Tuesday, June 28. First the good. Incredible fried chicken, well done. Unfortunately can't say much for the rest. The yellowfin tuna sandwich was about 1/2 the size of the bun, definitely not worth the cost. But the bun was at least good. The travesty was the famous Hyde Park fries....stale, cold and the final bits of the pile. Ended up eating four or five and tossing the rest....these are Hyde Park fries we are talking about. Seems like no care was being given in the kitchen. Not at all up to par with the main location.
In this Argentine inn you have to make a reservation to enter, lack of ethics made us wait more than 20 minutes and the restaurant empty Just because they saw Latinos giving race preference to the white Anglo I do not recommend this place freeze/burn Empanadas of yesterday for more than six dollars? am not, not,  not, never return here.   En esta fonda argentina tienes que hacer reservación para entrar, que falta de ética Nos hicieron esperar más de 20 minutos y el restaurant vacío solo porque nos vieron Latinos dando preferencia a los anglosajones No recomiendo esta fonda. Empanadas de ayer por más de seis dólares Yo no regreso aquí.
I have been an avid customer of this location, and have received excellent service. However this evening I felt I had to unfortunately write this review about my service.   I went to Barcelona Wine Bar tonight with a large party (12 people) and when it came time to settle the bill, we divided it by what we ordered. We are all working women and could not split the check evenly because many of us only got drinks (myself included).   Our waitress was very put out that we were not hurrying the bill to her to be charged. Granted....we were a large party, and we were her last table...but we were calculating the money to charge per card (we did not ask her to do the math as we knew that would be too much to ask).   She came back to our table at least 5 times to hover over us if we were done. It was uncomfortable and we were hurrying the best we could. She was even put off that we were doing the check this way when we told her.   I had only order 1 glass of red sangria and was over charged what I put down (over $10). Needless to say I will not be going back to this establishment. I understand that does not mean much to a large chain and restaurant like this and I'd never thought I'd be this person writing that "yelp review" but if you have a large party coming to this place be sure that one person is paying or you won't be assisted properly at all.
My family tried this place last night for the first time to go see Inside Out....I wish I would have known more about the way things worked before I went. The over all atmosphere was  ritzy, nice, and very clean. The movie was displayed nicely and the seats were very cushiony and comfortable. I didn't realize I paid for the cheaper seats that do not offer food service and that was really inconvenient. The lady at the front told me I could order at my seat but I guess she was wrong. I had four kids with me and my husband had to stay with them while I brought out food for everyone...I felt like I was interrupting other people....and I missed a lot of the movie. Our dinner, dessert, Alcohol, and tickets added up to $230. An employee whom I believe was a manger, saw me carrying a lot of food on my own so he offered to help, which was very nice of him but when I grabbed the tray from him half of my 15$ pizza fell on the floor and they didn't offer to bring out a replacement, that made me upset. I spent a lot of money with them and he saw I was struggling, I just think that they should have done something about it. Another thing I really didn't like...I saw him touch his face at the food counter and then pick up some fries it his bare hands and place them in our dish. They hype up the food with the names and the price as if your getting some amazing gourmet meal, and don't get me wrong they also present it well, but it was like cafeteria grade food if you get what I mean....not good...not worth those outrages prices. This just goes to show you looks are not everything....it looks awesome and its comfortable....but so is the movie house off 620 and there prices are a tad cheaper and the overall experience dining and all was much better and they had really unique menu and the food was amazing and everyone gets service regardless of the seating.
The food was 'eh. I can't say it was bad or delicious.   A bit too Americanize to be a great Mexican spot
I love bowling, but I don't love waiting almost two hours for a maximum of two games.   Our group of four was told there would be an hour wait.  Luckily, Lucky Strike has plenty of lounge type seating so we hung out and had a couple drinks.  Unfortunately, the drinks are the weakest I've ever had.  I swear there were three drops of vodka in my drink.  (FYI - I am not a big drinker, two glasses of wine and I'm drunk).  Also, the bartender was pretty terrible, see below.  The wait ended up being almost two hours.  Bartender.... To the bartender that made the drinks last night who was really busy talking to her coworkers and not listening to me.  I ordered a Jack and Ginger, not a Jack and Coke and a Raspberry Vodka and Soda Water with a lime, not a Raspberry Whatever and Sprite with no lime.    Bowling... It was fun.  The shoes I got as rentals were still warm, mmmm hmmm yeah.... I love wearing someone else's warm stinky bowling shoes.  I guess this means business is good! ;)  Bowling food/bar service... Waitresses are hard to come by when you're bowling.  I was starving so I ordered the appetizer sampler.  It had 3 chicken tenders, 2 mozzarella sticks, and two spring rolls for $15 - not worth it.  Go to some bar down the street, get some awesome bar food, and call it a night.  Despite my bitching, I'd probably go back.  Overall it was fun night.  Just be prepared for a wait, weak drinks, and lousy food.  That being said, have fun bowling and get your drink on before you get here! :)
Stopped by here to get a coffee- tall Pikes Place.  Every time I go to a Starbucks drive-thru , I ask them to leave room for cream and ask for a little half & half in a separate cup (because I like to add the amount I want).  Every other location has done this without any problems.  This location charged me an extra 60 cents just for an inch of half & half, which I would have added inside the store for free.  What the heck?  The next day I stopped by again, but made sure I asked for the cream after I had paid.  Both times, the girls were not the least bit friendly.  Glad I was just in town for travel, and won't have to stop by this location again.
I feel like they just were not trying.  They seem to be proud of their bacon, so naturally I ordered the B.L.T.  Flavorless tomatoes, white lettuce, and the bacon, oh the bacon.  The dry, evenly hot, beggin' strip looking bacon.  Judging from how dry and evenly hot the bacon was, my only guess is that it was microwaved.   A MICROWAVE!!!! What a sin!  What a shame!  Simply disappointing.
There were maybe 8 tables in the restaurant,  yet the waitress was too busy talking to her buddies to assist us. Food was horrible!  My daughters honey bbq wing sauce tasted spoiled,  and the Thai curry sauce was sour, not sweet as the menu synopsis stated.    Yuck!
The staff does not communicate with each other and one of the managers (Ralph) does not seem knowledgeable about his job nor does show eagerness to help customers. I was constantly being given different if not incorrect information throughout my entire rental process.   I paid an alternate method (money order) when dropping off the car and somehow the money order has been "misplaced" And they still charged my card after Ralph said it wouldn't be. I have now paid over $700 for a standard week rental. And only after calling bank, corporate (to which I was given the wrong number to) and money order company, my request to review the video footage is finally being obliged. Overall outcome of this is still pending. WORST RENTAL EXPERIENCE EVER!
By far my most disappointing bar/lounge from any of my visits to Florida. I am in Florida at least one a year so I have been to many establishments over time and have never experienced service as slow and disappointing as this place. Two out of three nights here this trip they have been out of Bud Light and every nigh the service has been the slowest I have ever experienced in any bar/lounge in any state. The only other bar open past 9 pm was also out of Bud light and closed at 10 pm. After waiting 25 minutes for a bartender to take my order, being told that they were out of the beer I had been waiting for was not what I wanted to hear.  Hope not to be back to this hotel/bar again.
I thought the pizza was pretty tasty but the mezze platter was disappointing. Because the flafel appetizer came with taziki sauce, we assumed that would be on the mezze platter with the flafel, but no that was $1.25 extra and it was NOT GOOD. Really, if you are going to be a Greek restaurant, please you've got to have tasty taziki. Also they did not put any feta on the supposedly "special" house fries on the mezze platter. Can you tell I was not happy with that menu choice?  But we did like the pizza - nice crust, plenty of toppings. I'd go again but probably just stick to pizza, maybe try a salad next time.
I'm happy giving this dealership 1 star, because they fail at everything that a dealership should succeed at AND everything a business should succeed at, period.  For starters, the way I do business, is by referrals. I bought my BMW from Herb Chambers BMW, because my father bought it there; I bought it from the same guy, and I didn't haggle. The truth is I didn't have to haggle, because the guy gave me all the coupons/rebates available, and made the financing process go extremely fast, and painlessly.  After I sold my BMW I was in the market for a more value-priced Honda Accord. I asked for a referral from said gentleman (Kevin Bugby at Herb Chambers BMW). He referred me to a sales person at Herb Chambers Honda that would 'take care of me'. I assumed there would be an equal level of service as what I was accustomed to. Boy was I wrong.  For starters, when I got there (at the scheduled time), he was busy with another customer and handed me off to another sales person. Not a big deal, I know i'm not the only customer out there. I agreed to test drive with this person, after which I asked to speak to my original sales person. I was informed that they were still busy and that this new guy could help me; not a chance, I insisted on waiting, and waited for another good 15 minutes before my original sales person saw me.  I won't delve into the details of the conversation, but after doing substantial research on car prices, I discovered that Herb Chambers Honda was pricing their cars substantially above market value. I pointed this out, and was repeatedly told that this dealership does NOT lower its prices. Fine; but where was the white glove hand holding, where was the loyalty reward for being a Herb Chambers repeat customer. I was treated like a pest off the street.   In the end I bought a car substantially below Edmunds TMV at a smaller dealership. While that experience also left much to be desired, that dealer worked with me on the price and priced it competitively even though they didn't have to.   Why 1 star? Because when I buy a car from a dealership, and my father buys a car from that dealership, I expect to be treated better than some guy off the street the third time I go in for a car. No reward for loyalty, no business to you.
We brought our pup to paws up on the recommendation of a friend. He started there at 3 months old and was only going once a week for some socialization and just fun for him. For about 2 months we didn't hear anything but glowing reviews about him. Then we started to get feedback about him not socializing well.    After one visit we were told if he didn't improve he wouldn't be welcome back. I asked what we could do to help him be better pup and they recommended training, hanging out with dogs more and going to dog parks. They told us he needed to be brought there before 930 am. If we took these actions and they saw improvement they would continue to take him.   We were a little taken back as this was something we never saw at home but took it seriously. We took a 3 week break from paws up and began work to help our guy. We went to dog parks, brought him everywhere we could and hired a trainer to help. Everything we saw was positive and decided to bring him back to paws up.   My girlfriend brought him and was told he was not welcome until training was complete and re-evaluation let him back in. This was NOT what was told to me the last time I went there. I was told they would still take him with the understanding he was on thin ice as long we began doing all the thing they recommended. We took every action they told us and are taken back by the refusal of our dog.   I took everything that was said to us very seriously and worked to rectify the situation.  We saw no issues with socialization outside paws up but still took the steps they recommended. To be denied and my girlfriend lied to about what was said to me makes me furious. If you are going to recommend things and the people go out, do all the recommendations and then be told something totally different when you come back is a terrible way to do business.
Maybe my expectations were too high because of so many good reviews. Dunno, really. But my first Hopdoddy experience wasn't the greatest. Had a couple of out of town visitors for the day and we all decided to try Hopdoddy for lunch. The line to get in, which is normally down the block, was fairly short and manageable. My high hopes were lifted even more because of that. The line inside forms right down the middle of the restaurant. Which meant that my guests and I were asked to move out of a servers way many more times than once. Most were nice about it; you can't help being in the way because of how the line is set up. One server, who was apparently having a very bad day, was not so nice about it. He was downright rude, actually. And, no. We were not standing in the areas where signs directed us not to stand. We were merely standing in line waiting to order our food. We finally get to the counter to order. 2 burgers. 1 salad. Order of truffle fries. 2 milkshakes. 1 beer. Over $70 with tax and tip. That's a lot of money for a burger joint. I was also a little taken aback at being asked to tip before any service was given. But I did tip, because I appreciate and respect the work of food service workers. Got our table. Nice young woman brings our order. The truffle fries were amazing. Best part of the whole meal. Milkshakes were good, but not $6 each good. The burgers were the biggest disappointment. The other burger orderer at my table said his was ok, but not nearly as good as he had thought it might be. I took a bite of his. His assessment was correct. It was just a decent burger, nothing special. Mine was grossly undercooked in the middle. Our server never came back to the table to check on us and a very kind young man offered to go find her. She finally showed up after I had eaten the cooked edges of the burger and was no longer in the mood for the rest of it, cooked or not. I didn't really want another burger at that point. I didn't want what was left of the one I had to be cooked some more. Maybe I would have wanted those things 30-40 minutes earlier if she had ever come back to the table. She didn't offer any of those things, anyway, so it was a good thing I didn't want them, I suppose. She apologized that my burger was so undercooked. And left. I was appreciative that I at least got that. Maybe I went to Hopdoddy on a bad day. Maybe another visit would prove more satisfying. Not sure yet, whether I'm willing to give it another try or not. Those truffle fries sure were good, though. But, still.
Waited an hour and still no rental for us. The lady said "we're waiting on numbers from the manager." I think they're actually waiting for someone to return a car, clean it and then we can have it. We have reservations too. Price was great but be prepared to wait hours for a rental.
Great prices for a filling lunch.  Not a fan of the chicken.  It has a funky metallic after taste, but the vegetarian options are pretty good.  The chutneys are excellent, especially the spicy one.
We all know all Starbucks are great when it comes to quality. I am basing this review on service. Today was very frustrating waiting 24 mins in drive thru for one latte. I have seen other busy Starbucks be successful with a employee outside with a iPad taking orders to speed up the process. I have a better shot of going into south Austin to a Starbucks with out a drive thru, park, get off, order and still get my drive faster than this drive thru. This isn't my first experience with waiting times being this long. Please fix it. Your location is in a prime location for people who head into Austin. I hope something gets done soon.   Back again here on 10/23/15 I can see nothing has changed. 12 min wait in line with only 4 cars in front of me
This was a convenient breakfast stop prior to entering the train station which is conveniently across the street.  Service was friendly and prompt. Black tea was made and served in a French press and was good.  Fried eggs were ordered 'over easy' and were cooked more medium. Also, the pan or surface used to fry the eggs left a brown crunchy crust on the eggs.  So, over easy eggs here crunched a bit.  Toast option was limited to only brown and  came with only a single butter pack - not enough for two pieces of toast.  The wash room was clean but children's high chairs are stored in the washroom adjacent the toilet which seems not ideal.  It was overall okay for breakfast.
After reading the reviews I was hesitant, yet I decided to call because they are listed as one of the closest providers in my insurance list. When I called and told them that I am a new patient, the lady put me on hold for a really long time - longer than what I want to be put on hold for. Then she told me that she was going to give me a call back in 5 mins and asked for my phone number. She never called. In addition to the reviews posted here, that's enough for me to decide that this is not going to be a good dentistry office.
I had a great time because the show was great, but the place sucks. Over enthusiastic security, and they're just a**holes, the process for getting in is incredibly slow, unless you attempt to choke down $15 worth of food at their horrible restaurant, then you can skip the line. The opening band sounded terrible but the headliner sounded great, so whatever you make of that. I was on the floor but being up on the higher levels must have really sucked for those people because you can't see anything if you're not in front. I gave 2 stars instead of 1 because the bartenders were cool and everybody was smoking tons of weed and security didn't even try to stop it!(it was a reggae show)
Tropical grouper to die for.  Unfortunately, that my fish eating friends was about 7 years ago. They had it on special and it was amazing. They do have uncomfortable picnic table seating and a loud, bright decor and bad service.  Not a fan of those things.  I'm from Boston and love seafood, this place is cafeteria seafood at best.  It is not worth going to.
Stopped in for a burger to-go - around dinner time.    I had the Front Porch - added cheddar cheese.  Added skinny fries and a drink.  Total came to $12.08.    What I got was a burger that somehow managed to be both dry and greasy (patty was dry, but each time I tried to bite into - oil literally ran out of the sandwich onto my chin, boobs and dress - it was slightly disgusting / slightly comical.    My fries were 'overcooked' and my lemonade was sweeter than syrup.  The produce was also pretty bad.  My tomatoes were mushy / grainy.  Also - based on the price of the burger and Vinings adjacent real estate - I would expect some decent napkins.  When I asked the bartender for my drink 1) which had been forgotten and 2) some napkins.  She gave me some C-fold napkins.  You know - the super-thin, rough, NON-absorbent, kind you find in public school restrooms.  Which made my attempt to clean up the oily mess I described above even more comical.   But that's a little nitpicky.  :-)  Positive notes - the servers were friendly - if a bit rushed - the place was nicely appointed and the restrooms were clean.
Absolutely the worst place I've ever been. Horrible service, over 30 min to get our food and there were only 3 other tables in the whole place and our food was cold. And 25 min to get the check from the time we asked for it.The worst food I've ever had. Flavorless and cheap food substitutes like cheese steak used in a quesadilla and cream cheese instead of sour cream. Avoid this restaurant. Im only giving one star because this site won't allow me to give zero.
I wish I could rate this location a negative number of stars. Been using H&R Block for more than a decade. This year the customer service was so bad it was confrontational, I was waiting for my appointment and an available agent offered to see me, the receptionist actually refused, saying "she can wait".  I CAN HEAR YOU, I'm literally two feet away. I bit my tongue since my partner was already seeing an agent. Then they argued with us about payment, and when we opted to have the payment taken out of our tax return, they "LOST" our return. It's now past tax day, and a month after we filed, and they're still giving us the runaround. You could chalk it up to a language barrier except my partner speaks Spanish. There's no excuse for such phenomenally bad customer service. We will never use this company again, wouldn't recommend it to my worst enemy.
Not a fan! Pizza ok but chicken parm and garlic bread were super soggy. Ok to bring kids for there $5 cheese pizza
- Ive been coming here every week for almost a year and it WAS the best viet cuisine i'd ever had hands down. But now its gone down hill thank to new owners.   To summarize: - Service was terrible and incompetent. Server didn't know the menu, very low voice volume and didn't understand english.  - Food took 4 times longer than before.  - We were seated prior to 4 other tables that were sat after us and they were served their food long before they took notice that we were aggravated and waiting.  - Music is now some upbeat hip-hop jazz. Its strange.  - Noodles were stale and food portions were smaller but only slightly smaller.  - My friends Pad-thai came with pre-squeezed limes which leads us to believe they are possibly re-using food.   Overall i wont be returning here. Instead i will be dining at the Bumby location where the original owners now reside.   Also, my veggies looked old, not re-used per-say but old as in sat out for a while and left to wilt/brown. Again, i will not be taking my friend groups here anymore. Go to Bumby and save yourself the let down.  UPDATE: As we finished our meal the manager came over and asked about the lime and apologized and removed her meal from the bill which was quite generous of him. She was pretty happy but i still feel the new owners will need some time to work out the kinks. I will return in time to see if things improve.
Consistent food quality and extremely bad service. I always have to wait for chicken to be fried for my order. When the order is wrong, there is no apology, only excuses.  Frustrating!
Went here for lunch and was really disappointed. The Pad Thai tasted like something from Lean Cuisine, which is a shame as this is usually my barometer for Thai food places. California roll and Avocado roll along with crab stick nigiri all were what you'd expect from Kroger's sushi department. Not bad, but nothing to get excited about. I've wanted a good Thai restaurant in Little 5 for along time. Looks like I'll have to wait a little longer.
I know Yelp is normally a review site for food/drinks but I went to the Jolly Roger on Sat night for music and it sucked. I hope the owner of this place realizes that TV's, Neon beer signs and no dancing room does not make a good live music venue. It's pretty simple, just turn those TV's off, unplug the neon beer signs and make some room. You have potential and great bands.
This place is not a good place to go to eat. To drink yes...but to eat...NO   The service is horrible. The first time we went there our waitress forgot we were there and had to remind her.  The second time the service was bad again and the pulled pork sandwich was pretty nasty. I couldn't even eat it. The nachos weren't great either. How do you mess up nachos??   Most locals in MH that I talked to stay away from this place.  I was not impressed. I will definitely drive further to get decent mexican food next time
Was extremely disappointed in our experience at Fore.  The service was OK and the food as decent.  It was still Happy Hour so I ordered a drink.  They had the liquor listed on Happy Hour for $5.50 so I ordered a drink on the rocks.  On the bill, the liquor was $5.50 and the "rock" was an additional $1.38.  Seems pricey for a small glass of ice, I'm afraid to think how much extra a whiskey and coke would have been!!  Was hoping for a good neighborhood spot, will never go back.
A/C broken but the food is ok one of the ppl working there told me the air was broken for almost 2 weeks I will not go back into the A/c is fix this is not a 3rd world country  if so can I get third world prices
This was the worst Dunkin Donuts I have ever been to. All of the staff seem to be annoyed with their customers and coworkers. No customer service skills! One employee was dumping trash and then helped a customer without washing his hands. Disgusting! There are too many Dunkin Donuts around to waste your time going here.
Takes forever, nice clean decor but no character in this place at all, and coffee tastes exactly like every other local coffee place in Vancouver. What's with that?
basically: don't bother, try someplace else Went with four people and order the veg/meat combo that sells per person. The food was not that tasty, injera lacking flavor, and the price is exorbitant for the quality/quantity of food. I've had way better in Philly, tucsonArizona and other places in Boston.  Won't come here again unless someone else is paying and I'm having a craving for bland ethiopian
I'm very annoyed by the fact that I wasn't informed that the very expensive, white oil based paint (which I bought many pints of, would yellow dramatically if not getting full sun.  Example, the doors in the master bath and all the crown molding in the bedroom and part of the kitchen have turned yellow as French vanilla icecream over about six months.  Assuming you use this paint on wood that's getting full sun (silly as that limitation sounds), it's the best, most glossy paint I've ever seen.  Looks like you poured olive oil on the walls, which is a good thing if that's what you like, as my wife and I do.  I called the manufacturer and they explained to me the issue with needing UV rays, noting that's only with the 'brilliant white'.  Red (which I also bought) and others are fine in darker locations.  The fellow at Phillips told me after the fact that it's all oil based paints that need sun or they turn.  Bottom line, I generally like the place and the paint, but that was pretty darn annoying to be an obvious oil paint newbie, asking lots of questions but have that one notable fact missed.  I just re-painted most of my wood work today, so it's now back to white.
Came to The Bishop after seeing all the great reviews but didn't get treated well at all on my visit with my partner. The service was okay, food was good as expected but the management is piss poor. Turning down money because of a small rip in the bill? To my knowledge it is illegal to turn down legal tender. I've worked in numerous fine dining restaurants and I've never heard of this "policy". Was told my money wasn't good enough... Defiantly need better management. Not some dirty dyke.
so i came to Boston on a business trip, and after work hours we decided to take a walk and stop by at this bar. so i gave the bouncer my ID card and since in my photo i look darker (i had a tan) and had black hair , which now i died it blonde they did not let me in!!! she was staring at my ID and me for a while and then asked for something that had my name on it, so i gave her my debit card which had the same identical name and still did not let me in. like are u serious??? ITS ME!! its my same face. why would u ask for something that has my name and still not let me in??  that was sooo ridiculous, that has never happened to me in my life ever!!! i would rate this place a 0 stars if i could for the poor service. so STUPID .
This place is pretty hit-or-miss.  The prices are pretty high...but I could overlook that if the food was all really good.  Unfortunately, I've had some things here I don't like.  Their sandwiches are just OK and their cupcakes are nothing special.  Makes me really miss Chocolate Pink (RIP)!  Something I do like, though, are their scones.  The apricot and white chocolate scone is very delicious.
I should have read the reviews before going here.  A white friend of mine recommended it, he clearly knows nothing about good Dim Sum.  First, place is small and cramp, not enough room to push through a cart.  They hand deliver most of the stuff on a tray.  Interior is out-dated and crampy (80's low ceiling), needs some serious upgraded to the restaurant.   Except for some of the dumplings, the food was generally cold and not hot like it should be from a steamer.  The fun rolls was very powdery.  They have some pork ribs with some coffee sauce over it.  Sounded interesting so we tried it.  This combo DOES NOT WORK.  I dont know what the chef is thinking.  For my wife and I, a bill of $50.  I dont mind paying for good Dim Sum when food and atmosphere works, this place does not come close.  And your not getting any atmosphere.  I was fooled by the long line into this place.  I can not explain why the wait and long line.  Clearly, white people do not know good Dim Sum.  There was about 20% Asians as well.  I'm guessing they are just trying like me or live near the area and dont want to drive to TNS.  Save yourself some money... Go to TNS!
It was 90+ degrees outside and when I came in for a urinalysis  work, and after signing in, I asked for a glass of water. The lady sitting at the front desk was extremely rude saying it was my job to be hydrated and if she got me a glass of water she'd have to get one for everyone and she doesn't have time for that. I apologized but let her know I'm very well hydrated, it was just hot and I was thirsty, she huffed and went and got me a glass of water. Then I waited for close to an hour (they seemed understaffed), which was very hard as I had drank lots of liquids and had to pee. But I couldn't go anywhere because I was there for a urinalysis test. Overall very unprofessional and would not recommend going here for testing of any kind.
Jasmine Sola is usually a hit or miss. A hit when they have their bi-annual sale ($10 Juicy top --- woohoo!). A miss when you're surrounded by the snooty sales clerks and the snooty shoppers --- usually makes for a not-so comfortable shopping experience. Most of the clothes are overpriced and not well-made. If you find yourself in one, be sure to check out the bags; they are typically sturdy and have an original personality. Oh yeah, they also have a shit return policy, even on items that aren't final sale.
Alice doesn't live here anymore.  Neither does a good chef.  The food was truly disappointing in selection, crowd, and option to sit.  No one enjoyed their meal.  It was the same menu as virtually every other location in Universal, except for Harry Potter locations (which are all pretty much the same themselves).  Universal should take this cue - run each restaurant on it's own, with a separate creative, management and service team. Hold each restaurant to a higher standard of uniqueness and food quality and variety.    Every dining spot in Universal feels the same, and this is no different. Same menu choices, same way of cooking, virtually nothing healthy to select, and table space is just too scarce.  I avoided the meal plan after trying it for one day. It just didn't pay as far as convenience, options and timing.
Courteous staff.  Very friendly with exception of airport shuttle driver.   Decent room.  Bigger than average.  Bathroom barely functional with crazy big door configuration.   I would have rated higher, but the airport shuttle was ridiculously bad. Hotel is less than 5 minutes away but we had to wait 45 minutes and then argue with the driver to let us on because it was almost full.  Had we not argued it would have been an hour or more.    Shuttle experience bad enough that I can't recommend and won't stay here again.
Went to fill up and the pump was so slow so we only filled up half a tank. Then we came back a few days later and tried to fill the tank again, and again the pump was super slow, like 10 gallons in literally 10min. So I tried to be helpful and went in to tell them they might have a problem with the pump. The women working didn't want to hear it and said there want a problem. I know they do t make much money on the gas but I'll never go back since there are plenty of more convenient places to fill up.
We visited Garden Grill for the Seafood buffet on Thursday, April 5th on the last night of our Spring Break vacation.  We had about $200 left on our Disney Rewards Redemption card from CHASE Visa and wanted to go somewhere where we could use as much of that money as possible before we left the next day.  We called to make a reservation and I explained the situation and was told that Garden Grill does not participate in Disney's dining plan but they do accept the Disney Rewards Redemption card.  Once we arrived, we were seated promptly and made our first trip to try buffet.  My son got chicken tenders and we asked our waiter for some ketchup for them.  He was busy but we saw him come back out 3 other times in which we tried to get his attention while my 8 year old sat waiting to eat.  Finally, after about 12 minutes we walked across the dining room and took a bottle from another empty table so that he could finally eat.  After we returned with our first plate, we were told that each paying adult gets half a stuffed lobster but they "make them quickly" so when we finished our first plate, to let our waiter know and he would have them to us quickly.  From the time that we let him know we were ready to the time they were delivered was 21 minutes by my watch.    As many other reviews have noted the crab legs were overcooked and rubbery and the seafood buffet selection as a whole left much to be desired.  We asked for our check about an hour and 15 minutes after we started (which is an eternity for a buffet) and when our $140 bill arrived joked, at least the meal was free since we had these last 200 redemption dollars to use.  After we gave our card to the waiter, he returned to let us know that despite what we had been told when making the reservation the Garden Grill does not accept Disney Redemption cards.  The Manager, Shelby came over and apologized to us and said that the Swan hotel has no way to charge the Disney Redemption cards and that we would instead have to pay out of pocket.  Her only consolation was if we knew who we had spoken to when we made the reservation, she would speak to them to make sure she knew that the Garden Grill does not take these Disney Redemption cards.    Obviously, we only came to the restaurant because we wanted to use the last of our "free" money and could have gone to any number of the different Disney restaurants that do accept the cards if we were told correctly that he Garden Grill was not able to take them.  Had I not specifically asked about using the card and then we came to find out we couldn't use it, I still would have been very disappointed but on some level it would have been my responsibility for not checking before.  In this case, I did ask and was told specifically by a Disney employee that we could use the card.  Despite that, we had the double whammy of not being able to use the final $200 we had saved from our Disney Rewards card and also having to pay out of pocket an additional $140 for a meal we didn't feel was up to Disney's usual standards.  Had we not had the payment issue at the end of the meal, I would have given Garden Grill 2 Stars for the meal itself and the service, but when Customer Service is factored in, I'm giving my first ever 1 star review on Trip Advisor.    I understand mistakes happen and people misspeak or are sometimes misinformed but for Disney, a company that is world known for their outstanding customer service to essentially shrug their shoulders at a situation in which their employees mistake cost us $140 was beyond disappointing.
The service is awful and the help is arrogant and the food is over priced this is only in the Clermont location
Horrible!  Play LOUD music at pool area till 11pm.  Toilet did not flush.  Dirty rooms.  Horrible customer service!  Would not return even if stay was free....
No no no no no... I can thank a business associate who made this reservation for our group for the experience here.  I don't even know where to start- My first tipoff that we were in for an interesting evening when a visual assessment of the gender makeup of the other patrons was about 90/10 male.  At 7pm, the house lights went down and stayed down... Why? Because... The mood needed to be set for the belly dancers- wait who doesn't like belly dancers? But wait, during the belly dancing, the employees heave stacks and stacks and stacks of white cocktail napkins...napkins, napkins, and more napkins. The waste was/is absolutely unfathomable... And, when you factor in that napkins on the floor and the table top, are slippery... The risk manage to involved with witnessing this just pained me. The food was a step above a chain place... I had high hopes when we were handed a mortal and pestle to make our own hummus... After that, it went down hill.   We couldn't converse with each other... The staff seemed overwhelmed with our party size and orders and bills were very confused. My thought is if you are looking for a place to host a bachelor party without the threat of having to paying for bottle service, do dine here!
Only come here for brunch if you want to get buzzed and ONLY drink!   The brunch food here was absolutely horrendous. I ordered the most expensive item! Corned beef hash. How the hell do you screw that up? Well let me tell you because they did, royally!! Thing shows up ice cold and it didn't look like corned beef more like spicy chicken and to boot they threw tomatoes in it ? I was so confused. I had to tell the guy it was cold and they were really nice the next bowl ingot abruptly and it was steaming hot which made it more edible. My friends ham and eggs looked like spam. I love this place late night to party and dance but the food SUCKED absolutely without a doubt will never go again and the prices were unbelievable high for such a shitty meal. - Later west end johnnies
I took our 8 month old pit mix pup here about once a week for about 2-3 months. At first he was exhausted when i picked him up but after 2 months i noticed he was full of energy when I picked him up. When I would pick him up he was always in a kennel by himself and the owner brought him out to me a few times making comments about his pit bull energy. Yes, he plays rough.. he is a puppy. That is why i pay $30 to take him to daycare, so he can burn that energy off and learn to socialize. The last few times i picked him up i noticed not only was he full of energy but he was also cowering when we pet him which he had never done before. I just had a gut feeling something wasnt right. I called them and asked if there were any issues with him and I was told the day before he had been in "time out" several times for "instigating fights" and "being aggressive." This is a dog that LOVES everyone and has NEVER shown aggression before. When we raise our voices at him he goes in his crate. I asked why they havent addressed this issue with me and didn't get an answer expect that I might consider walking him more. Isn't this why I am paying for daycare? They did say they would monitor his time outs to let me know, but at this point I don't trust that good things are happening for him there. I have since heard some very unsetteling things about what goes on here. I won't get into because it is not something I actually witnessed but it validates what I thought was going on based on what I experienced with our dog. He seemed to be singled out because he had energy and was a pit bull.
They were our only option and treated us as such. We did a construction loan where they base the loan off the appraisal of the paper plans.  They were grossly under-appraised resulting in pmi even after paying 35% down. At the end, the appraised the actual version which (no surprise) came in higher- high enough to avoid pmi, but they are refusing to let us use that value unless we pay 5k to refinance (plus we'd have to pay the higher rate) - ridiculous....they don't care about the customer at all.  The appraisal is still very low just because our house is so unique and there aren't comps. Plus we were told we could use the final appraisal up front, the final appraisal is a legit appraisal and should be handled as such, and we did put in out of scope work to justify the higher appraisal.
Waaaaaaay too over priced for the food quality. Came an hour after lunch started & had a salmon and avocado roll and the yellow tail scallion roll. Fish smelled very fishy and looked even worse. My yellow tail roll was falling apart. My miso soup was lukewarm and gross looking and they didn't give me a spoon for it (I ordered pick up ahead of time). My salad was very brown- didn't even eat it. I will not be back here again- there are MANY other places I'd rather go. I was too hungry to bring it back so I'm just leaving this review.
I just went in for an early lunch. There was one other person in the entire restaurant. I looked at the menu and went over to order. The cashier NEVER even looked at me. She proceeded to ask her coworker to help her enter a grub hub order, asked the lady waiting to sign a receipt. I waited. No acknowledgement- not even a glance from either employee. They continued stocking items, grabbing vats of beans etc. I just stood there. It was literally bizarre. They avoided even looking my direction. After an awkward amount of time I left. I'm not asking for immediate service - but even a glance to acknowledge the human being standing right in front of you and an "I'll be with you in a moment" and I would have waited patiently for quite awhile. I'm writing this from the Chipotle a block away.
Thanks to a number of reasons, pricing, douchiness and others, this is no longer a hangout for me. It's still fine if you're 20 and drink vodka sodas.
This is a review for their take-out only as I have never sat down to eat there.  I picked up two pizzas to take home and when I got home and opened the boxes I was appalled.  They were both BURNT.  Not just well done.  BURNT.  There is no way they would have served this at a table because it would have been sent back.  I'm thinking they were counting on no one opening the box till they got home.  Then to add insult to injury, when I called and spoke to the manager (who should be fired), he was down right surly, made no apology and only offered a refund if I got back in my car and drove the 25 minutes back to the restaurant.  Do they really get that many people trying to screw them out of the cost of a pizza with a phony complaint????   Never again.
Usually Lucca deserves a 4 or 5 from me.   Until last night (Sunday March 30th)  we have always had consistently good food, service, and enjoyed ourselves.  I do not know what has happened but last night was not good.    The glass with my whiskey sour had spilled during transport from the bar and became sticky on the table.  My simple salad was gritty and not up to usual standards.  The Cavatappi was just fair.    The service was dreadful.  Three times one of our supper companions asked for more water and I finally gave her mine which I had not touched.  While we were eating dessert, the waitress came by with "more water."    My husband asked for some extra pecorino for his pizza and it never came.    While we were waiting to order dessert and again while we were waiting for the check, the waitress was busy drying knives and forks and spoons at the entrance to the kitchen.  It is going to be a while before we return and if the same thing happens again - that's it for us!  We have been steady customers for more than four years and never had a bad experience until last night.  Our previous visit in early January was fine.  Perhaps there are new staff members who are "still in training?"    Jeanne Ferguson
I created a yelp account to review this place.  Worst experience ever.  Was there couple hours ago.  The foods were just OK, but the service was HORRIBLE.  The server acted like we didn't exist, we waited a very long time for our foods and not once did he come by to ask how we were doing.  The worst part is our bills for 3 people included a 20% tip. He did not deserve 20%!!!! DO NOT GO TO LOCONTE.  Go to Familia Giorgios, right next door!!!
This is not our first purchase with Austin Couch Potatoes...we recently bought an all leather sofa and recliner by Flexsteel and was told by our salesman at the time of purchase it would be THREE weeks for delivery. We are now on the FIFTH week and still nothing! The last time we called our salesman was quiet after we asked him when we could expect our furniture...he just transferred us to someone in the office who said "No ETA, sorry!" Sorry? We are starting to think we should have gone somewhere else and not have had to put up with this ridiculousness.
I was in the neighborhood and stumbled across this small local business.When I first walked into the store it's was pretty neat and quiet. I ordered a small pistachio in a cup . It's tasted okay but certainly not the greatest to pay almost $4 for this one . It's ridiculous overpriced for someone who has a family or on a budget. You gotta be like middle class or rich to afford this. I honestly could pay $4 for a medium/ large at Baskin-Robbins or something else. All I'm saying if you want to spend a ton of money on little bit of product be my guest , my friend.
Westin should remove their name from this hotel.    This is a sad version of what a Westin hotel should be.  The rooms are small and run down.  The bed was definitely not their famous "heavenly bed" that all Westins carry - it was so uncomfortable.  It seems like all the furniture in the room was worn.    The only pluses are the amazing view in the Sun Dial bar and the Starbucks in the lobby.
This place is terrible!!!!!!!!! Run away!!! I had my sons appointment yesterday and they had me waiting in the lobby for 45min when I finally asked them what is taking so long she walked in the back and like magic they were ready for him. He didn't even get the exam just the cleaning because we had waiting so long. Who has 2 hours to spend at a dentist office? I had my appointment for today and I made sure to make my appointment for a CLEANING and EXAM - after reading the reviews and sure enough they said they would have to scheduling the cleaning for another day - that's after I waited 30min in the waiting room... I'm a nursing mom of two I don't have time to come to the dentist more than once every 6 months. While I was waiting in the chair I got up to go to the bathroom and this nurse chases me down and asks me where I'm going like I'm a kid in a school hallway - I'm sorry I don't need a bathroom pass I'm a grown woman... Then the dentist did my check up and explained that I need to have another dentist to check my wisdom teeth. They treated the fact that I'm 30 with my wisdom teeth as if I was some alien - they don't bother me I don't need them removed no need to see someone about them... then some girl pulls me in the office to tell me all this work I need done and offers their payment plan credit card. I politely declined and thanked them for the information.... I called them a few hours after and told them I just want to schedule the cleaning so I can be done with this for the next 6 months and after going back and forth about telling her I'm not paying $101 for a cleaning when my insurance covers it. She finally said that she would have the hygienist call me - but go figure I didn't receive a call... This place is terrible. They are like pushy used car salesman. They don't care about their patients at all....
Every table was messy, and when I nicely asked the guy to wipe off the table where we wanted to sit, he actually said he wouldn't be able to get to it for a while (nodding significantly at the growing line behind me) and offered to get me a wet cloth. Not his fault that the restaurant apparently understaffs its evening rush, but I don't think I've ever been asked to clean up after the previous customer before. In fact, as I was wiping the table I concluded that I was cleaning after several groups of previous customers, as there was food in several stages of dried-on-hard. I wiped the adjacent tables because I'm a good person, and also figured I was building up my immune system. The food was good, but maybe not good enough to justify having to clean your own table.
Going out of business soon  This place is terrible. I live close so have tried to like it. The food is just not good. Limited menu of poorly done selections. Wine served in water glasses. Limited beer menu. The only good thing is that it is usually empty suggesting that it might turn over soon to some worth going to. The location and space are good, so hope for someone else.
Just boarded my flight to Sacramento and of course it's a prop plane. Seriously Alaska when are you getting rid of these hunks of junk??  They are so unbelievably uncomfortable!!!!! God Alaska when in the world are you ditching the "prop planes"????  I fly you guys all the time in the NW because I have too but your planes have to be the most uncomfortable and cramped planes in the US!  Pleaseeeee do us all a favor and buy new planes.
Do you miss the old days of fast-talking, freewheeling, sleazeball salemen, and management who hold you hostage in a chintzy lobby for hours and won't magically "find" the car you want "in the back" until you're leaving? Come to this dealer for an authentic Reagan-era car dealer experience. Sit back, have a laugh, then go to another Kia dealer if you're actually planning on buying a car, but be warned, Orlando Kia North in Longwood is owned by the same people, so it's just as sleazy.
While the restaurant and food itself was great, my experience with the waiter (Peter) was less than perfect.    My friend and I were just trying to have a peaceful lunch together, but Peter kept flirting with us, to the point of interrupting our conversation.  I felt entirely uncomfortable interacting with him, and it definitely left a bad impression of the restaurant in general.  I just don't understand how a restaurant could allow an employee to interact with their customers in such an inappropriate manner.    Again, the experience with the restaurant as a whole was pleasant, apart from our experience with Peter.  The food was fairly priced and delicious, and the Sangria was great.  But as long as Peter works there, I don't feel comfortable coming back and would not recommend this place to anyone because of it.
TL:DNR - Delivery sucks, food was cold and flavorless.  Delivery: We flew into Boston and got in super late and found that this place was open until 3am! Score! We made the order through Yelp at 1:05am last night, thinking we'll have some awesome food to eat! We called to make sure that they received the order and was, indeed, delivering it. They told us 40 minutes. This was at 1:10am.   2AM - No food. We call and they tell us that the guy left half an hour ago and should be there any minute. We call the third party ordering system 15 minutes later (2:15am) and ask them where's our order. We're starving. We haven't eaten real food (only plane snacks) since noon west coast time, since we've been on the plane the whole time, we were just hungry. They tell us to keep waiting. Our food finally shows up at 2:38am. They apologized and said it was very busy.  Food: You'd think that because we were so hungry, we'd just think the food was delicious all around, right? No. It was not. The food was barely warm, and mostly closer to room temperature. We ordered the Taiwan Style Wonton Soup - the soup was flavorless, the noodles were mushy, but the wontons had decent flavor to them. The soup tasted like a watered down version of how the soup should be. We also got the beef fried rice, which was fine for fried rice. We also got the Panfried Pork Buns Shanghai Style, which was cold by the time we got it, so it was pretty gross. I can't speak to how it might taste when it's warm.  I can't say that I can really update this review because I don't live in the area, but it did suck to hope for good food at the end of the night after a long flight only to be disappointed with a cold and flavorless meal. If you're ordering delivery, just be aware.
It's the longest running ride (time wise) universal's ever made, yet it felt like the shortest. Although it probably has the longest wait, so they have that going for them! It was also poorly constructed, as it broke down and didn't get fixed until 30 minutes later. Even after they fixed the ride, the 3D wasn't working. I come to universal quite often, and have never had a bad experience before this. Personally, I don't understand why they would rebuild a ride that was shut down YEARS ago.
Wish I could give this place no stars because their staff has some of the worst customer service I've ever seen and I'm a server.
Unless you enjoy horrendous guest service, I would suggest looking elsewhere. Been with this unit for several years and have yet to have a positive customer service experience.
A pretty room with good service but not for a lunch brunch. We found the food less than we expected. Corn beef in hash was chunked style fatty and not seasoned. Perhaps little can be done to make a vegetarian omelet exciting but ours was too much cream cheese and not much more.      We may have been there at such a quiet time with few other tables occupied it was not representative of other circumstances. However not recommended based on our experience.
THE FOOD IS AMAZING...but there's more to a restaurant than just the food. I've been to this place twice and both times the food has been pronominal. However, both times the service and prices have been below average. I had the same waiter both times and both times I felt like I was on candid camera. While the food is out of this world, so was our space cadet waiter. He didn't know the differences between the steaks but pretended to explain why they were different. When asked about a good wine, he pointed to the only two options I asked about on the menu. I understand that not everyone is an expert on these things, but when I pay $250 for a 4 person meal, id like the server to have some knowledge or opinion about the food/drinks.  The service was not great but that wasn't all that contributed to this 2 star review (of what is supposed to be a 5 star restaurant). We waited over an hour for our entrees, and didn't receive our sides until we were finished with those entrees. When a restaurant is busy, I understand... However we were one small group of 4 total groups in the restaurant when we ordered. Not sure what happened, but if I were the server, I would have at least comped the sides and at least a round of drinks. He did apologize 3 times, which we appreciate. But 3 separate apologies should be a realization that something is wrong.  Not sure if we will go back, which is sad because the food was so good.
We've been twice in the time this location has been open.  Both times we have had burgers only and they have been good. Quiet Monday night and it took a long long time to get our 2 burgers.  At $11+ per burger it was not worth it.  Fuddruckers is better. Hate the "motif".   The place looks warn.   Staff was very friendly and courteous.  Not a fan of the chain restaurants, especially steak places where everything can be covered by cheese and more fat.  This place provides a sad view of the American diet and why obesity is such serious problem today.  We saw it first hand the night we "dined".
I was a regular costumer from this pub,till I was barred from it a 2 months ago You may asked why, One day at happy hour I went to have a few drinks ,just like every other day,I went to the men's bathroom and I saw one of the cooks doing his business at urinal,I did wash my hands and he did not and went straight to the kitchen and started hanging some costumer's salad,I told him that it was wrong,because he used the bathroom and did not wash his hands,the manager heard me and other costumers too,because I took action I was told never to go back to the pub A few days later I did repot the incident to the Fraser health department with is in the same block,the pub went under investigation and many violations were found,they even had cockroaches infestation in the past Also a few months ago I saw one of the cooks,he was taking his coffee break at the back door,he was drinking beer with one of his buddies,I took a video,I showed the the manager the same day and no actions were taken,but according to WCB he should not be under the influence of alcohol,he's putting himself in danger and his coworkers ,I still have he video available You never know what's going on behind the kitchen ,all I can say is: Good luck and eat well there
I've never written a review but felt compelled to write one here just in case it could save someone from even visiting this location. By far the worst customer experience and rental experience I've ever had. They forced insurance on you that was not explained when making the non refundable reservation. The car was filthy inside and out, i literally cleaned trash off the floor from a previous renter. There was no windshield washer fluid which I would assume would be noticed in a pre rental check of the car. The staff was beyond rude ( wouldn't even speak to you post rental) I guess once they have your money repeat business is not s priority to them. I usually find the good in every business. This location and car rental has NONE. But it was my mistake. I guess you get exactly what you pay for. Please save yourself the aggravation and rent elsewhere.
Had the Southern Fried Chicken Salad. Wasnt very good. Menu says it has a chicken breast on it.. Ended up with just chopped chicken fingers. Very disappointing and menu is not accurate.
After positive reviews in the paper and thumbs up by a couple of friends, I was excited to check out Nook, a relative newcomer to the West End. How disappointing.  It was a hot summer night, and there's no ventilation inside the restaurant. It's like a sauna in there -- we walked in, and almost walked right out. If it weren't for the fact that a table for two was available right away, we probably would have left. Maybe we should have.  We ordered the chicken liver with capers crostini ($6) which was just ok. It was basically pate, and I like pate, but I was expecting chicken livers -- something a little bit different from pate smeared on toast. Capers were fried beyond recognition or taste.  When the caprese (buffalo mozzarella and tomatoes & basil, $10) arrived, we nearly gasped. The portion was so small, given the price -- maybe 5 cherry-size tomatoes sliced in half, with a chunk of cheese. It tasted okay, but not worth $10.  When the pancetta (and... I can't remember) pizza ($15) arrived, we actually gasped out loud because nearly half of the pizza's surface was charred black. We looked up at the waitress, and asked in disbelief, "is it supposed to be this burned?" She sheepishly answered yes, but offered to do it again if we didn't like it. Uh huh.   When she took it back to the man-in-charge-of-pizza (not the owner-chef) standing no more than 10 feet away, he angrily tossed the whole pie into the trash. It took another 15 minutes for the replacement to arrive, and though not charred on top, the bottom was still severely burnt black. I don't know -- crispy is one thing, but why would I pay money to eat soot?  The pancetta was super salty, as pancetta can be, but there was nothing else on the pizza to offset or balance the saltiness. It was almost inedible, but we were so hungry by then. In short, the pizza was a disaster.  In conclusion. Strike 1: I was fanning my face with the menu the whole time because it was so unbearably hot in there. Strike 2: The Caprese is a ripoff. Strike 3. When the table next to us cleared, a waitress used a scented chemical-smelling cleaning spray and a rag to wipe it down, and we had to sit for the rest of the evening smelling Pinesol-like fumes. Strike 4. They had the audacity to serve us a $15 pizza that should have gone into the trash to begin with.  So nope. We're not going back. Probably ever.
Terrible company!  They will not even communicate with me or show up for an appointment.  The guy I was working with before is no longer even with the company.  I am guessing he didn't get paid either (see earlier review).  This whole thing is very shady.  I would not suggest signing a contract with people who cannot even make it to an appointment...three times!!!
I reeeeally love thai food but this place is not the reason. The signature thai boastful flavor is what i was after and the two i received were bland, and one of the meals i was given was cold. When i politely asked for it to be microwaved (im really not too fussed about reheating since i do it at home with leftovers anyways) the hostess wasnt apologetic and even asked if i was sure it was cold. Lol. For two people the meal was 45 and i generously tipped 10% cos im a pushover.
This place should update their acknowledgement for different id around the world. My gf had a North Carolina id and they wouldn't let her in because they believe it was fake. We weren't sure if it was a racial thing or a homophobic thing. But over all it was a bad experience. If I could I would give this place no stars.
This food here is alright, but they just raised prices and it's now unreasonable. My go to meal went up by $4. $12 for a small lunch takes this place off my list.
Came in, opted to sit outside at first but it was a little chilly for my children and I. So I immediately asked the greeter to seat us inside in a booth. He got an attitude and said "you'll have to wait until a bus boy cleans a booth" I waited almost 15m and was never seated while I watched him seat others.
Never again.  Especially not for the price.  At least $2.75 of the $3.00 a cupcake goes towards sugar.  For all 10 flavors I have tried, the cake was worse than that out of a box I could make at home and the frosting was inedible.  I will be taking my cupcake money elsewhere in the future.  I've tried 6 cupcake places in Atlanta and Gigi's takes 5th place for me.
I've been to this salon a 3 or 4 times now. I always get a full set of acrylic nails usually costing about $45 not including a tip.  Don't get me wrong; every time I have come here they always nail the design (pun intended) I show them, no matter how complex and they always look fantastic and just like the design I wanted.   However, they are very aggressive (consistently) while filing my nails. It is often uncomfortable, sometimes painful, and my skin around my nails is usually red and sometimes cut.  My main reason for the two-star review is my concern of their sanitary practices. Last time I got my nails done, the nail tech used the nail file on me and immediately put it back into her box with her other supplies... you are never supposed to reuse a regular nail file on OTHER people, especially when they have a tendency to cut skin while filing which is highly likely to cause infection! Same situation with the electric file she used later; she did not sanitize or throw away the tip or anything before putting it back in her back box with people's nail dust sprinkling over her other tools. I haven't been back since (don't want an infection!).   Overall: great nail art, mediocre service, and poor/concerning sanitation practices.
They did a sloppy, sloppy job on my vintage trailer. You can see drippy caulk from the window edges and on every screw on the window trim. Charged me $300 to pack wheel bearings and put new caulk around the windows.  Plus when I went to unlock my trailer, they had jammed the key in somehow and now I can barely open it.  The key is all scratched up and it doesn't want to work in the lock.  I'm very unhappy with their work.
Ummm the DJ had an air raid siren??!?!? Jack and Cokes were the weakest I've had in Boston @ $6 a pop in little plastic cups. We begrudgingly switched to beer. The staff took my half full drink twice while I was dancing.  This place is cheese. The only reason I went was to meet up with some girls my friend knows. It's as if someone read "Opening a bar for dummies" and then ignored the advice. Im not going back.
Look it's 10:00! Time to play something from The Cars first album.  I'm not knocking The Cars (I think I would grow to hate any songs I had to hear at the same time on every single workday).   I'm not nearly as upset with the DJs for playing the same songs over and over again and shilling for laser hair removal centers as I am with Alan for making me listen to them play the same songs over and over again and shill for laser hair removal centers.
I wanted to support this place so badly. I'd heard awesome reviews about their food and was excited to eat healthy and green. I had also heard tips about their wait times being long and was cautioned to order in advance, so I did. I ordered over the phone an hour in advance. Mind you, this was a lunch order. When I arrived to pick up my order, I was sure that an hour would be plenty of time to make a meat free, raw HALF wrap. Apparently I was wrong. The guy at the counter said my order still wasn't ready, but ensured me it would be out promptly. He insisted on taking my payment to expedite things, so I paid.  Fast-forward another 25 minutes, and I'm still sitting there waiting. When I realized I was about to be late for an afternoon work meeting, I got up and asked the guy for a refund. The first words out of his mouth were, "I can't do that." Seeing that they use a Square payment terminal for payments, I explained that he definitely could do it, and I insisted that he do so. I offered to show him how, but he was already in the process of doing it. I waited for the refund receipt, saw it pop up on my phone and left in a rush, understandably a bit peeved, but I should have known better. I went back to work HANGRY AF, having wasted my entire lunch break.  When I checked my account later that week, I noticed that I hadn't been issued the refund. I check the refund receipt and realize that the guy had sent the refund to another customer's card. Now I have to get on the phone and try to rectify their error to get my money back.   I'm thoroughly disappointed. Furthermore, considering that this is a fellow black business, I really wanted to support them. Unfortunately, I won't be back to even see if the hype about the food was warranted.  Guys, we HAVE to do better. We have to expect better of ourselves if we want others to respect us.   PLEASE do better.
This is my fifth time using my Mears from MCO to an off property hotel and definitely the worst. I waited 50 minutes for a taxi to pick me up. There aren't enough Mears shuttles and taxis at MCO to supply the demand. Unfortunately, the only Uber MCO allows is Uber Black so Mears is definitely cheaper. Be prepared to wait an exorbitant amount of time until you're picked up.
Not a review of the food, simply the lounge.  The bar area is terrible.  Between the overpriced drinks, with their short pours and small glasses, and the mid-40s J-shore wannabes in the bar area, this is a must miss.  All the waitresses wear corsets, basically turning the place into a pretentious hooters.  1 Star. Would not even review again.
BUYER BEWARE. I ordered my daughters leotard online on 8/25 and paid for priority shipping. As of 9/10 I still have not received it. I emailed them twice to follow up and no response. I live in the same state, so how long should I expect to wait with no response??
I had the worst experience there the last time I went. A group of us went to celebrate my bachelorette party. Knowing we had a large group, we made reservations three weeks a head of time, even calling the day before to make sure everything was good to go. We all got there and it was just a disaster. Apparently they sat a party of 60 who were a half an hour late to their reservation. This pushed everything back over an hour. We finally got the manger to seat us an hour later and were unfortunately in the same room as the large party. Our service was as good as it could have been. They did comp up some drinks and food (it was still frozen!!). I was upset with the way the reservations were handled. We were there to have a good time and relax and it was stressful. We couldn't even all sit together. I would not recommend this buca to anyone. Very disappointed.
They really should take down all of those annoying signs claiming there is such a thing as a "Fast Lane" on the Mass Pike.  None of the lanes are fast.  In fact, if you drive over 10 MPH through them, it won't scan your transponder and you'll get a citation in the mail.  Awesome.  Speaking of citations, from what I understand, the MA turnpike authority likes to hand those out like lollypops.  I've gotten a couple of them for driving through the fast lane with a perfectly good, functioning transponder with plenty of money loaded on it.  It's not one of the shitty Chinese ones you get from MA (at least you don't have to pay money for those anymore), it's one of the good ones from NY that actually work.  The MA turnpike authority makes you fill out paper work to appeal the $50 citation.  They made the paper work easy to fill out -- you literally check a box if you have a working transponder, which makes me think this type of thing happens ALL THE DAMN TIME. As if it isn't annoying enough that you have to do that in the first place, they hit you with a $5 administrative fee + the price of the toll.  Seriously?  I have to pay you because you fucked up?  I did nothing wrong.  Take the toll money and admit that you made a mistake.  I have a theory that they just randomly pick people to charge a $50 citation to in hopes of making up some of the money that the pike is hemorrhaging.  Here's an idea, get rid of the tolls and you won't need any of the personelle and buildings to run it.  I'm still baffled how they get away with their fines.  Imagine if Walmart worked like the Mass Pike.  I'm sorry ma'am, I overcharged you for your tube socks.  I'll refund the money, but I need to charge you the full price of the socks (not the sale price) and charge your credit card a $5 administrative fee.  There would be massive outrage, and people would boycott Walmart.  I'm pretty sure that would also be illegal, yet it's OK if the state does it.  Just one more example of how screwed up MA is.
I have loved HopDoddy since they took over Cissi's spot on Congress.   Their quality has dropped on my last few visits and they seem to be putting too much salt in their burgers.   The biggest flaw is that they do not post their beer prices and they are steep. I was charged $8 for an Austin Beerworks brew. Now, Austin Beerworks makes nothing but than the finest beer in Austin (Scree!!!!!), but obfuscating their beer pricing costs HopDoddy a star. $8 is too much for even a local beer, but hiding the prices is deceptive.
Final Decision: How do you burn toast? I've had better  So we wanted to check out a NE diner as we were planning a trip to Boston.  Yelped this spot and thought this place would be a good one to check out.  Big disappointment.  Decor: Pretty cool, real diner feel with decoration from the 80's and the look of a library from the Breakfast Club movie  Service: pretty attentive, but it seemed like the waitresses were fighting over who was serving us at our table.  Food Ordered: French Texas Toast with sunny side eggs, toast, sausage and homefries.  The french toast was not to remarkable, the eggs were okay, the homefries seemed a little under-seasoned but the sausages were good.  The sad thing about the meal was the toast was overly burned to the point that it was not edible.  I couldn't understand how they could serve something like that.    Overall my experience was okay.  I noticed that there were quite a few regulars in the diner, but all were men, which could be explained by the busty young waitresses.  But my food was just okay.  Again, I think I'd rather go to Denny's.
Waited over two hours and never got pizza. Tried calling back and call would not go thru for over 30 minutes.  Get pizza elsewhere.
As much as I hate to admit it, I must be getting old. If this place is any indication of the younger crowd's choice, then count me out. I swear, the guys working there today looked like a couple who were seen panhandling on the street and were hired out of pity. All my friend and I could do was look at each other, roll our eyes, and wish we'd gone somewhere else. Tattoos, nose rings, and scroungy. And what's up with the whole knit ski cap thing?   When I walked up to the counter, ink boy was busy with the Espresso machine. He shot me a look that made me feel like I wasn't supposed to be there. Our eyes were locked intensely for a brief moment. I looked away and thought, gee, maybe he was hot on me or something.  The coffee and tea were good, but the music left a lot to be desired. Most of the people in the place at the time were probably between 25-40 and what was blaring on the stereo? Rap music! They were obviously playing the music for themselves without any consideration for the people who were there at the time. I find that extremely annoying.  I do like the bar seating along the windows though. That's probably the best thing about the place for me. Is it enough for me to want to go back. No way. I think I'll try Peet's
The 2 stars I gave were strictly for the pancakes - they are really awesome, if I ever go back I'll just stick with them.  Everything else, food and service, was crap.  Cold eggs, over cooked bacon, and the biscuits were clearly frozen and thawed - no attempt to warm them up.  If it wasn't for the pancakes I'd give BBD the lowest possible rating.  The server at least took off 10% for the terrible biscuit but she and her co-workers need to improve their customer service dramatically.  An the bus-er should be fired, plowed through a couple customers, then knocked over someone's kid, no apology, no nothing from him or the hostess who witnessed it.
Worst place I've ever been to. Waited 40 minutes for someone to come take our drink and food order. Then waited another hour and a half for our food that never came complete. People kept coming and going and we were still waiting. Very poor service. Complained about it to the manager 3 times and he didn't do anything about it. Very poor service. Never coming here again.
I came here for a quick lunch one weekday, and was the only one in the restaurant. Not only did it take them over 25 minutes to serve me a very small portion of shabu beef and vegs, the waiter actually told me there was a mix up in the kitchen...  ...as in he forgot to put the order in. For the only person in the restaurant.  Go to Chinatown for shabu.
Just sat here for 10 min after being seated with no service. No drinks no introduction nothing. The host seated us and gave us menus and we just sat. Decided to get up and leave. Won't be back.
The food is okay, but their delivery people are consistently rude. There are a lot of restaurants in the area with better Italian food, so I highly recommend taking your business elsewhere
The place was empty but it still took waving down the server to get drink orders in after sitting for more than 5 minutes.  The Bourbon Sunrise was made with whiskey (I just think that's funny) and is heavy with sugar.  Some love the edamame here - given the wait for it (15 plus minutes), it was a little on the soggy and lukewarm side.  I don't think it was fresh to order.  The tacos -- shrimp tempura and the beef one - were nondescript and lacked any real flavor.  I have had better at other places.   After our meal, it took waving down the server to get the bill.   Maybe it was an off day -- but the place was empty.
$40 for dinner for two for Vietnamese, no booze and not even a side of rice?  aargh.  Lemongrass squid was pretty good, flavor and texture, but a lot of weird corn (mutant baby corn) to fill up the plate and too much sauce and too salty.  Spicy lemon beef was really tough, with a propane taste and smothered in a gooey sauce that wasn't remotely spicy and very sugary.  Bubble milk tea was bitter and the portion small.  Coffee with condensed milk was good - tasty, sweet, temperature good.  One server was pretty good, the rest pretty bad.
IF YOU HATE GOOD CUSTOMER SERVICE THIS IS THE GYM FOR YOU: After reading some of the reviews I cant believe Golds Corporate hasn't fired the Manager since this is a CORPORATE OWNED GYM. I am new to area and when I say new I mean this is my first week here. I wen't to the gym to check it out because like a car I would never purchase it without taking a test drive first. The person that showed us the gym was not friendly at all and looked like he had never touched a weight in his life ( not very inspirational ) He went on to tell me that to get a trial guest past I would have to have a Local ID.  I just moved here this week I doubt i'll have a local ID for a while.  Also he told me that if my roommate and I wanted to work out it would be 32 DOLLARS A DAY ! Two days would be more expensive than paying for a whole month it is obvious that they just want to pressure you into getting a membership.  I want to go to a gym where I feel the staff is supportive and welcoming . When I went to check out 24 hour fitness they gave me a free 3 day pass no strings attached and were super friendly.
$10 cover charge for this place even with a dinner reservation? Ridiculous.  Try your luck somewhere else. This food is not worth it.
Total tourist trap. Went there with a large party celebrating a wedding. Ended up getting charged $205 for shots. Waitress would not fix it. Had to make several phone calls the day after to get it settled. Manager would only refund $50, so I ended up paying $15 per shot when regular cocktails are less than that. Food was horrible and overpriced and service is horrendous at night. Never again. Save your money, go somewhere else. There is nothing special here.
My rating has changed because it's sad that this place has potential but they choose to have unfriendly servers that could give a darn if you are that.  I've been hear several times and its a repeat in poor service.  I was there for lunch today but the waitress could give a crap I need to get back to work.  I acted as if we were inconveniencing her by being there.  We were very kind and ask for everything nicely but apparently she had something up her a$$ just like the rest of the staff.  I understand people have their bad days but in this industry you have to work on your customer service to make a tip.  A tip is optional and you're not entitled of it.  I wouldn't go back here because of the service.
Very expensive food, two dishes and rice ended up being about 45$.  Masaman curry was cold when it arrived with a hot bowl, seemed like it was old.  Would not recommend.
Some key things from my brunch outing to Genie's:  1. Waitress failed all my expectations I have for good service.  Wasn't friendly when approaching us, didn't check back in after we got  our food, and took so long bringing us a check even after we had empty plates and cash ready that we finally just left what we owed and got out of there.  It wasn't even busy.    2. The food all seemed good on the menu.  All pretty basic stuff.  They had scambles, pancakes, etc.  I got a breakfast sandwich and it was just...meh.....All the right ingredients but it just felt...unspecial.  My breakfast date said in theory everything should be good, but also described her food as lackluster.  Too bad.   3. There were not one, but two small hairs on my plate.  I understand things happen, but two kinda icked me out.    4. THERE WERE FLIES EVERYWHERE.  I don't understand if this was just our table or the whole restaurant, but there were largish fruit flies crawling all over the wall by our table and all around us.  Super SUPER gross.  Maybe one, but I couldn't believe I counted over 15 flies, just above us on the wall.  It was disgusting, unsanitary, and distracting trying to keep the flies from landing on our food.  I wold have said something or asked to move if ANYONE had come to our table to check on us.    Gross.  I hope I never have to go back.
Yelp needs to add ZERO rating especially for DIRECTTV.  WATCH OUT!!!!!!!!!!! DON'T FALL FOR THE 2YR CONTRACT. You need to read the contract carefully before signing or ordering the service. It says contract for 2 yr, that DOES NOT mean the promotion is for 2 yr.  The promotion is for a year (low price) but the 2nd year, you are paying  more....!!!! and they WON'T DO ANYTHING FOR YOU.  THE SWEET TALK ON THE PHONE???? --- Dont waste your time with them. LOYAL CUSTOMER?  How can you call me a loyal customer, if the price of your service increases (NOT DECREASES) every year and you are bind to the CONTRACT??? Would anyone become a LOYAL customer??? hhmmmmmm...... that was kind of STUPID for whoever is training you to say that on the phone.
If cheap beer is all you care about, this is the place for you.  It is huge in among the hipster/mod/indie crowds and is always packed.  The only times I've had fun here were when I brought interesting people.   The bar itself is rather uninspiring.
Terrible. Can't even remember the last time I had an experience this bad. Placed an order 5 hours ahead of time to be delivered at a specific time. Called 15 minutes after the expected delivery to a worker who struggled to find our order and only had a "he'll be there very soon" resolution. Pizza was 30 minutes late with an incompetent driver who for some reason, wasn't able to see our apartment's giant block letter sign. This late delivery created a whole domino effect for the evening we had planned. Gatti's Riverside, if you can't fulfill scheduled deliveries appropriately, hire more drivers. If you can't hire drivers, don't allow scheduled deliveries or ensure the website specifically states 'Estimated' 'Approximately' etc. so customers know what to expect.
The isles are crammed with junk, making it impossible for 2 carts to pass.  The registers are slow, with not enough baggers.  The produce is bruised and bad, with fruit flies.  The only shining light is the deli department.  The deli crew is friendly and efficient.  I wish Arlington had a Hannaford.
Hubby and I went here for dinner after reading the Yelp reviews. We both ordered the cheese burgers and fries.  I got a house margarita and he got moonshine.  He really enjoyed his moonshine-not my thing so I can't tell you for myself.  The house margarita was lacking in flavor.  It tasted almost bitter....But it was a Friday, and much needed, so I sucked it down anyways.  The burgers looked much better than they tasted.  Both came out looking like an in-n-out burger, which got me really excited. The excitement soon faded after my first bite. The burger was not seasoned at all and the bread did not taste fresh.  The fries weren't much better-they were limp as if they weren't cooked long enough. Service wise the guy was super nice who took our order.  Overall, I felt that for the $20 we paid for our meal, I would have been better off at Burger King.  I personally won't be coming back here again.
Located where McDonald's once was in Downtown Disney, this is a chicken counter service restaurant. Though there is a separate burger counter and bakery counter. You will find rice and beans, besides the hand cut french fries. The food was only average and tasted as if made from frozen items and not fresh. I found the prepackaged flan to taste very factory made. There is a condiments bar, with salsa and other sauces. Cleanliness was not on their list of priorities. Not sure I would ever go back.
Disclaimer: This review applies only to their happy hour, read on if that's what you're considering.... ...and if you are thinking of doing it, DON'T!  This used to be one of my favorite places to grab a flavorful after-work marg with my friends until I experienced the last straw yesterday.  Not only are the half-sized margaritas now a DOLLAR more (making them the same price as "any old hour" margaritas at most other restaurants), but "open seating" apparently has a subtext meaning "chum-up with the right waitress and she'll call savesies on a nice big booth for you."  The waitress actually removed us from a booth in the OPEN SEATING area we'd been eyeing for 25 minutes saying there had been a group of five other girls who had "called it" already--even though she admitted out loud that this was an open-seating affair.  So, only venture here if you like your drinks expensive and your happy hours standing up in an awkward circle by the bar (or just become besties with the right waitress...that apparently goes FAR).   Poor form, Oba...will not be returning.
Unfortunately, like most places with an amazing view - that's what you are paying for, not the quality of food. I had their sirloin, which came out as steak tips on a skewer; not what I was expecting. Everything on the plate was extraordinarily bland - its called salt and pepper folks; please use it. My friends had the same comments of their fish dishes.  Our server was very pleasant, and attentive. The wine list was short, but reasonable. I would come back for the live band and outdoor seating again, but I'd only nosh on some fries, and eat elsewhere afterwards.
As others have mentioned, the service is terribly slow at Shota, so expect a long wait for your food. We ordered salmon sashimi, a sushi combo, and the nabeyaki udon. The food was average, nothing spectacular. For prices we paid, we were surprised at how small the portions were.  Next time we're in Kerrisdale, we'll try another sushi place down the street. We would not recommend Shota.
Went to salem with a couple of friends and came upon this place for lunch.  The best part was only waiting ten minutes but I wish I got a hotdog from the carnival across the way.  Everything was awful from the waitstaff to the food. I recommend finding somewhere else to eat, even if it's fast food before going to this place. Awful !
This place used to have great pho. Went last wed for the $6 special and place had 2 tables occupied. The pho was water down and noodles tasted like they were out of .15 ramen noodle pack. Try Tan Mi.
We ordered two dozen oysters, they were shucked at least 30 minutes before we got there. Super dry, slimy and not good. Could tell they had been sitting for a while.   Super bummed.
2006 Camry towed in for not starting. Diagnosis- key synchronization bad. Tried to upsell very expensive maintenance not required at present time.   Paid for repairs made and came back the next day to retrieve Camry with another person. It would not turn over, battery was dead (was a Toyota replaced battery still in warranty). Called about non starting the next day and was promised that if I returned key at noon, it would have the battery replaced by Saturday 4 pm. I did so, received no call that it was ready.   Monday I was called and told the battery was fine, I related that it would not crank the engine and the service advisor said "We'll check again" Then called back and told me the key would not open it, I told them to keep trying that was indeed the key to that vehicle. Later I received a voice mail saying the battery was replaced under warranty.  I was lied to on three occasions, the first time when the initial diagnosis was made, Service Advisor said battery tested fine. Second when I was promised the battery would be replaced and ready by 4 PM on Saturday and third when the Service Advisior said they would check the battery again.  Automotive batteries do not go bad overnight, I had related that the battery was low and needed to be jumped to attempt to start prior to having it towed in. To miss checking the battery on a a vehicle towed in for not starting is to miss a major part of due diligence in diagnosing the problem with any vehicle.  Trust is something that a business tries to build with potential customers by public imagery and testimonials but is lost on an individual basis in an instant when a lie, misdeed or omission is discovered.
My friends and I tried to go here at about 11:30 on a Friday night. The doorman would not accept my friends different ID despite the fact that she had already spoken with the resident police officer there to clear its being used. We calmly discussed this with the doorman and offered to bring the APD officer over to speak with him.   The doorman became EXTREMELY RUDE and asked us to leave, PUSHING ONE OF THE WOMEN. He was extraordinary inappropriate. There was no reason to become rude and certainly not violent.   Vanquish needs to hire people who will act appropriately. I do not recommend this place.
For the price comparable to Blu ill, NY we had 7 course menu and no single dish was completely good. Most of the dishes were too sour and contained basil.  The only one really good thing about the dinner was service. Unfortunately I don't know name of the server but she was the only one in the restaurant on September, 13th. I definitely don't recommend Castagnia.
This lady is out to get your money and nothing more. If you have an issue with the nanny, expect nothing. We eventually fired the incompetent nanny she sent our way-swearing up and down this was one of her best nannies she had on staff for 6 years. Well, if you no show to pick up my son when I am in an airplane we are pretty much done. I called Nurturing Nannies at his point because we were consistently having problems and it was made out like I needed to be more patient and understanding-meanwhile my husband had to leave work emergently to go pick up our son. When we addressed it with the nanny-she was shocked that we were so upset. The old saying that showing up is 90% has some truth to it and neither is true of the owner or her nannies. Also, my CPA has asked for a receipt for the services of Nurturing Nannies. I received an email reply after several emails to use a cancelled check. No, that is not a receipt. Expect nothing once you write your big check.
Worst company.   Very rude customer service. I called them and got delivery for tomorrow.  But I found another delivery for today and I told them to cancel the order after 5 minutes. The customer service was so rude and disconnected my call twice. I will never do business with them again.
Do not ever ship from online to this store!! No one at desk on a slow Wed at 12p. Then Daniel the "customer service supervisor" came and told us that he needed to get our item from the back to bring to the front and that it would take him a "couple min." He came up with a palate jack with our item on it (we saw it) among other items and then proceeded to make a second trip to the back. He took his sweet time. Another lady that was also waiting left bc it took so long. We waited a little more than 30 min to get our item. Did I mention it was very slow in the store?? In my opinion they need a new customer service SUPERVISOR!!
Belligerent, nasty to my wife. Wouldn't take more money when offered due to his complaining of their  Condition. First groomer in Boulder who wasn't happy to groom them. Took them there due to convenient location. Our mistake. Life to short to deal with unpleasant businesses.
Ordered online 12/17/14 at 1:57 pm. Was given an approx time of 57 minutes for delivery. After 1 hour and 45 minutes I called and cancelled the order. Was advised to tell driver I cancelled order and that I didn't want it anymore. Going on 2 hours now and I still haven't had the opportunity to decline the pizza.
House of Blues has a well known reputation of being called "House of rules". They strictly turn down anyone from entering the show for the slightest reason or they kick people out easily. Ok I understand that, although it can be slightly frustrating when some innocent people get turned down or kicked out. What I DO NOT understand is why it took an hour and a half (I am not exaggerating. I arrived at the venue at nine and finally entered at 10:25) to allow people into the venue. The line was enormous and went down the block. What made matters worse was that the line hardly moved at a reasonable pace. There were people freezing  (this was at 6 degrees) and it even started to snow. I, and everyone else who had to wait, know the doors open at seven, but we have the freedom to arrive whenever we want. If house of blues wants to avoid absurd lines, poor customer service, freezing customers, visibly unhappy people (ex. people boo-ing) then clearly state when doors will close therefore avoiding absurd waiting and clusters of people or have a better system of getting people into the venue. I paid money expecting to see a full two set venue of Lotus. I only got to see the last set, but was very unhappy with the cold, wait, and lack of organization and coat check. This has made me want to never support the House of Blues corporation ever again. A twenty minute wait is understandable, but an hour and a half?! I had enough time to walk a block and a half to the nearest restrooms and back. The line was still growing too during the wait. Additionally,  tickets were still being sold at 9:30 too. What is with the desperation of trying to over-pack people into a venue that is clearly demonstrating their lack of ability to accommodate? Extremely disappointed.  (Event was for Lotus 1/25)
So after my bizarre experience with Rich, I emailed Les Schwab Corporate in Bend.  The next day Nate called and apologized profusely for what happened, he also follow-up in an email promising to investigate.  I agreed to go to their other location on Columbia Blvd for my alignment.  The alignment was done, no fuss.  Nate reported back: "After researching this heavily with the St. Johns store, I hate to say, but I think that they were reluctant to do the work after not installing the parts themselves.  We clearly don't condone this, and I'm very glad that Columbia Blvd. could take care of this for you..."  My car is aligned, my trust in Les Schwab in St. Johns is not.
Great to have this resource around. Having said this, it's a shame that the inventory is a big old and worn. Worst is the attitude of the staff. A dog roams free. After stating that it was annoying me, the clerk said that it "would sniff and go away." The dog stayed around and was in the way and then proceeded to start licking my toes (I was wearing sandals). I said in a master's voice to the dog, "Go away." The owner/clerk hollered at me from behind the county, "Don't you yell at my dog." So, I'm afraid they have lost a customer. Better to go to Barnes and Noble for their excellent travel map collection or shop on-line.
The food here used to be awesome, especially the pho but the last time I went, it tasted like it was either over cooked or leftovers from another bowl. The noodles were all broken up and tasted nasty. I haven't gone back since then. Their spring rolls are delish and thai iced tea is bomb. Hopefully, they have fixed the noodle situation since then.
We consider ourselves pizza connoisseurs and have eaten it worldwide. I would eat pizza morning noon and night, hot, cold, leftover fresh from the oven. We had heard that it was mayor Menino's favorite pizzeria so we decided to try it, driving over 30 minutes  to sample their pizza. The place was not busy yet it was a half an hour wait for our pizza. We specifically requested that the pizza not be burnt. When it was delivered not only was it burnt the waitress refused to acknowledge that it was, making excuses. Cheese was burnt, crust was burnt and hard as a rock in the places that were not overdone. The waitress finally offered to take it back but at that point we were beyond hungry so opted to try it. We ate less than half and did not want to bring the rest home which is unheard of at our house. Then we had to have another waitress search for ours to get the bill. Needless to say we shall not be back. We cannot determine what was worse the Pizza or the service. Regina's or for that matter anywhere has it all over Santarpio's.
Been here multiple times over the past few years and this is the last time I will ever go here. Almost every single time I've been here I've had a problem yet I still come due to friends. I usually come during happy hour with some friends, and this time was no different. The server was friendly but the service itself was complete crap. We ordered a drinks right away and got them pretty fast, but when we ordered food it took an hour and fifteen minutes to get to me. All we ordered was two sushi rolls and some chicken tenders. An hour after waiting I had to ask about my order, which the waitress thought already came out. After 15 minutes our two sushi rolls came out but it took over 30 minutes to get the chicken. At that point, our entire party already paid and left to Friendly Confines, so we were stuck eating our chicken and waiting for our bill. It took another 20 minutes after that to get our bill. At that point, we missed the opportunity to visit friends so we just ended up going home. What a miserable experience, I will never come here again.
Love the inventory but have had two separate negative experiences with the employees. Register employees act like they shouldn't be bothered by you when you walk up to their register. We waited again today while a couple of employees had a conversation but didn't acknowledge us at all. And when it was discovered that our item didn't have a price tag (our fault?), the cashier acted like it was a major imposition. Most importantly, when we discussed her attitude with other employees, she lied about what she said to us.  We won't be back.  It's a shame because the selection is awesome.
This is place is in the bottom 1% of my Chinese food experiences.  The atmosphere in the restaurant is creepy and the food tastes bad.
I remember going to the drive in in mid summer in a small car with vinyl seats pic mosquito repellant burning in the ashtray and metal speaker stuck on the window and that was a more pleasant experience.   It seems like this place attracts people that go to the movie to text and make Facebook post,  kick your crooked mold smelling seat every time they move and then discuss Facebook and other pressing social issues: where have we seen that actor before? What do you think will happen next? Do you think this popcorn will make my ass even larger than it already is?    The theater is in desperate need of implementing some serious maintenance upgrades. On top of the rude patrons that seem to frequent this theater. Theater #1 was hot and muggy, hence the comparison to a drive-in in The Summer. Sub sound bleed through from the other theaters disrupted low volume dialogue. The picture was decent but not wide screen. More like an old TV set. The ticket kiosk did not work.   The only redeeming moment to this experience and the only star, was the concession attendant who was nice and personable.  Other than that, there was nothing redeeming.    I will for the record state that one would be better off trying to watch a movie back stage at a "Toddlers in Tiaras" or "Dance Moms" TV show filming than go to Southpark Cinamark theaters.   It is a shame as this place actually used to be fairly decent.   I know for certain that I will not go to this place again. Save your self go elsewhere.
We went here after a show at the concert hall nearby.....on OpenTable there were so many open reservations for the night we were looking at that I didn't think we needed one. After walking in to a chilly reception from the bartender and waiter, they informed us they were "slammed because it's a show night" which is totally understandable.....except there were open reservations every 15 minutes the rest of the evening. So I logged back onto OpenTable, made a reservation for 15 min later, walked back in and told them we now had a reservation. This time the host/manager was actually kind to us and got a table ready. Not even 20 minutes later, the place was empty!! See photo for proof. Jt was crazy. I get if you don't have enough staff for the night, but be honest about it, don't be an asshole and tell us we need a reservation in the hopes we turn away.  As for the food: not good, not worth the $100 bill we left with. It took 30 minutes to get our food, my salmon was served raw, so I sent it back....they returned with a less raw but still uncooked fish. I ate the outsides of the piece, if that makes sense but would never recommend this place to anyone.
I bought a round trip ticket to Paris from Boston, on my way back they changed my departure not only to another terminal but to another airport all the way across Paris, end result I lost my flight then I decided to look for help, found the AA counter but the only help they suggested was to buy myself a one way ticket back to Boston, they didn't offer any help at all beside talking between them self in french thinking I couldn't understand what they were saying If it wasn't for the amount of free miles I still have I wouldn't fly with them again
Plus they have a sign saying they're the number one choice of Trailblazers fans! Obviously trying to represent affiliation with the Blazers if you don't stop to think about it. And how would you know about the fans, have you figured out who they all are and polled them?!
If it were possible to give no stars, that would be my rating.  Arrived on a Friday at 709pm and they had 4 tables vacant.  They managed to ignore us as we waited to be seated until 724pm - no eye contact, no welcome, we'll seat you in a minute.  Nothing.  Once seated, we waited till 752pm to have our orders taken.  They had 4 people working but only the tall sullen guy was taking orders. The other 3 were mostly hiding in the kitchen.  The food came out at 824pm and our water glasses were finally filled after that.  The combo plate at $16.95 was horrible.  Tiny portions of 4-5 items, all mediocre.  The goat curry were 2 pieces of very bony gristly meat - gross.  The lamb curry was dry as leather and had 5 small cubes for $13.95.  The shrimp chow mein (don't ask) was a bowl of mostly cabbage and onions with very little noodles and 2 small shrimp.  Terrible service, not good food.  What a waste of a Friday night and $46.  I went home and ate pretzels.
This place was disgusting. The floors were filthy and trash all over the tables. Not to mention the cashier girl Dolores was very rude and seemed annoyed that we had a big order. Lesson to be learned here....... always, always choose Chick-fil-A
I've been to the painted pin on two separate occasions and it has potential but management needs to adjust some things. They try to create a very boogey environment but at the end of the day it's a bowling alley and it just doesn't work. I asked the waitress how much a drink was and she looked at me with a blank stare and said "I don't know", I say oh no one has ever ordered this particular drink and she said "no, no one ever asks how much drinks are" well exxxxxcxcuuusse me! I had to walk to the bar and just find out myself. I didn't make a scene though.. To be honest I felt kind of stupid. On another occasion my friend wore a nice black French hat that complimented her outfit and she was told to remove her hat or she would have to leave. It was a dressy hat!  They try too hard to be upscale but at the end of the day its a bowling alley and once they chill out a little bit it could be a nice little spot. Also bring cash because they don't like to split checks even if you have a large party but If you have  a nice waitress they may do it but it's frowned upon.
Thai Lunch Haiku #1  I ordered Pad Thai, But this tastes like spaghetti! Why use tomatoes?!  Thai Lunch Haiku #2  I paid thirteen bucks. Mediocre food-court food. Such disappointment.
Note: I didn't eat the food so I can't comment on that.  I called the restaurant on a Friday at noon to see if they deliver to our work location, 2.2 miles away in Needham.  The gentleman on the phone asked for the address and said no, we were two far away.  I asked what the radius was because we were only a couple of miles away and he began to raise his voice, and said we WON'T deliver past route 128.  I find this odd, that a new comer to the food market would not deliver, as there are alot of businesses in Needham that would probably enjoy their food.  Also, other companies such as Papa Ginos (right next door to Jimmy John) deliver to us.  I will not be dining here in the future.
Horrible experience. After waiting 45 minutes for a table outside, which was not busy, because we wanted to sit outside to smoke, we finally received a table. Only after that were we informed that this was not allowed. The manager on duty did not care and told us it was our duty to inform them so they could tell us no ahead of time. Highly unprofessional  While waiting for the table, we ordered queso, which was forgotten by the kitchen staff, and took 20 minutes to arrive. This was on par with the wait for the entrees we later ordered, which took over 45 minutes to show up.  I will never go back to this establishment. While their food was mediocre, the management and kitchen have a long way to go. I feel sorry for their waitstaff, who were as attentive as they could be to their peers obvious misgivings.
Don't go here. My waiter was fine and the food was fine up until someone who was supposedly working there (not my waiter) took my card and bill and disappeared. My waiter came out to collect the payment and looked surprised, "did someone already take your bill?". The entire wait staff looked very worried and my waiter came back and asked me if I had paid with cash or card, and I told him that I had used a card. He said "oh ok I just asked because I don't know where she (Roxy - the person that took my bill) went. After a while this lady came out and said she "lost my card" ... I was speechless, never in my adult life has anyone ever just lost my card, especially when the card machine is 20 ft away in line of sight. She said she took care of most of the bill, but this was extremely suspicious.. I've now had to cancel my card because I suspect this lady was up to something and I am considering filing a police report... you don't just lose someone's card and come up with a bullshit excuse of "I'm just so busy" when the place is freaking empty.. I don't have other cards and it's been a difficult week to say the least.
I have been to sooo many hotels and I am shocked to see the quality of breakfast. It's horrible. If I were you, either I would eat out or not eat at all. The hotel is dated overall. Not bad but nothing to attract me to come again. The beds were alright. Not many people to help clean your tables or attend to you @ breakfast & for some reason everyone keeps on staring at you! Don't understand why everyone was super loud & kept on talking in their own language without any courtesies  for the others. My daughter is learning this language in her school. But to be surrounded by everyone speaking a foreign language & not English was really annoying. This hotel will never get my business again:(
I could have given a ZERO Rating for this place. This is not a traditional Dine-In Restaurant. It is located inside an Indian store and has 2-3 tables. To tell that the food was the worst would be an understatement. The food was stale, tasteless and the chicken and shrimp were undercooked. The dosas served were COLD. I always thought street food had a good blend of spices, but here the food was bland. The worst was the Rajkachori. From when has rajkachori become vegetables inside a Bathuraa with very less yogurt. You would be better off avoiding this place. There are plenty of options for Indian Cuisine around Central Square. Would never go back here.
Worst shopping experience I've ever had! They have a horrible return policy, rude employees, the manager is zero help, and the store is a cluttered mess, and it smells.
Sometimes old memories should remain old.We visited on a very quiet Sunday evening of a long weekend, the decor is very nice and cleanso we were happy to be here happiness didnt last long the Sangria was aweful redwine,&club soda and they called it Sangria thankfully my friends gave me a heads up the Corona was awesome we decided to order another drink in the bar before entering the dining room the waitress took our order and kind of forgot about us after about 15 minutes we got up and went to the dining room without our drinks and told the hostess ,we never did see that wzitress again from the bar we only received our bar tab.Our waitress greeted us at our table she seemed nice enough and asked if we were ready to order we asked her a few questions aboutitems on the menu and she really couldnt answer them,this is a brand new restaurant her traing was a month ago and there are not a lot of items I ordered the steak tips which came out fully marinaded alla Doms in Malden the menu never mentioned marinade.the double cut pork chops were not double cut but 2 pork chops,the brocolli on the plates was so hard and rotten on the bottom i like al dente but the veg of the day was supposed to be zucchini .that was a surprise i would of liked to know,my friends chopped salad was ok except she asked for the dressing choices and was told it was the original Carrolls dressing when asked what it was the answer was i dont know(do u remember 30yrs ago I dont and she wasnt old enough)We all got thru dinner and no one ever came over to table to ask how everything was the entire wait staff.chef,manager stayed in the back of the restaurant talking .So thanks for the memories i will leave as memories.
Expensive and Very little ingredients put into the drinks--pearls, coconut jelly, grass jelly and etc. They were very cheap with the grass jelly in their bubble teas--2 small pieces and that is it! The tea itself is too milky and everything is add on extra cost.   Coco cannot be compared to CHATIME which is so generous with their pearls, grass jelly, and etc. Also, CHATIME's tea itself taste way better and less milky which robs the true taste of the tea.   Service at CHATIME is also more friendly and you are NOT nickeled and dimed like you are at Coco's.  Now that I have had a chance to compare both of these  tea places, never again Coco for us but Chatime is it for us!
I arrived 45 minutes before her listed closing  time and she asked me, "if I'd mind coming back tomorrow".  There was no one else there.  She may be a good barber (I don't know), but seems like she doesn't get customer service and I like to spend my money with business that treat me with respect and this isn't one.  To bad, I love local shops.
Meh. Came here for lunch on a quiet weekday. When we walked in, instead of getting seated we had to order and pay from the bar first. This was made extra awkward by the fact that we had never been there before and needed to take some time to look at the menu. The menu itself is fairly limited but has some unique sandwich options. My husband and I both ordered the same thing, but they did not come out the same. His was missing two things in fact. I don't even know how that happened. The sandwich got really messy too and there was no silverware to be found. (World's tiniest napkins here, btw). I also fetched my own bottle of ketchup. I had to grab a straw for my drink because the glass smelled so strongly of detergent. Good to know it was clean at least. The metal chairs were super cold and not very comfortable. Interesting concept, but too many other options in the area that I've had better experiences at.
What are y'all smokin'???  Went there last night (12-08) to watch the  Christmas boats with some friends.  When my wife went on line for reservations she asked for window seating so we could see the boats. We got there at 7:30 and the boats come back by around 8ish so we figured no prob.... We walked in on the bar side and saw that the place was packed. Some woman said "just try to find a seat anywhere".  We said we had reservations so she said to go thru the bar and around to the dining room. Whilst walking behind the bar area I was hit with this foul odor comparable to cat urine.....it made my eyes water.(still we decided to stay) We get to the waiters podium and tell the we have reservations for a window seating.  Our waiter takes us up a stairway and past the cooks line in front of the kitchen and seat us in a boothlike arrangement that is only seperated from the kitchen with a curtain (CLASSY) By the end of the meal my wife felt that she was cooked to perfection. We were up in the nosebleed section and could barely see out the windows across the dining room. The waiter coudn't even get our drink order right 4 diet cokes a sprite and 5 waters.c'mon it was as if I wasn't there he just glossed over me...... No appetizer(couldn't really decide) they have alot of oyster choices. 3 of us ordered the beer cheese soup one seafood chowder and one spinach salad.  We all enjoyed the soup , it's a little bitter at first but the cheese on is really good. My friends chowder was so small so I really don't know if he had gotten a good taste of it. The spinach salad had some odd white stuff on it that didn't taste right (daikon perhaps??) I had the arctic char .....It was crispy on the outside and flakey on the inside ( the way it should be) It came with shrimp risotto which was mushy like oatmeal. My sister in law had the chicken marsala which was dry and she said the mashed potatoes tasted "fishy". Wy wife had the filet mignonettes which were a little fatty but otherwise unremarkable. My other friend had the tilapia and although it didn't taste fishy it tasted deep fried.  Dessert was blah my wife and I had the marrion berry pie which was dry. My friends pumpkin cheesecake was nothing to brag about.  All in all a mediocre evening...... Waitstaff not so great, Food not inedible....but for the price you pay should have been much better. Atmosphere??? what can I say we were being broasted.
I've been going there for 15 years. It's that kind of pizza place you tolerate at 1am when all of the other places are closed. But they aren't open at 1am. They've helped me not eat pizza much when I'm in my own neighborhood.   Pros: conveniently located. run-of-the-mill pizza if you like uninteresting pizza. Acceptable meatball sub. I don't remember what I thought of anything else I tried there and maybe that means something.   Cons: run-of-the-mill pizza. uninterested staff. There's no love in this place--they've been doing it for a long time and they obviously don't think about customers anymore.   I've seen them greet regulars warmly and they've mostly been amiable with me--though occasionally they've been rude to me. Not "get lost" rude, but "I'm talking with the guy in the back and you're just the thing I need to do so that I can get back to my conversation" rude.
THEY STOLE OUR FOOD, LITERALLY!  I don't know what to say, this was the plot for a Curb Your Enthusiasm episode but it happened to us the other day at Amrhein's.  We were celebrating my dad's birthday and went out to eat a family meal.  My brother ordered the Lobster Mac n Cheese and went with a full order (this cost $24).  One thing you have to understand about my brother is that he is built like a stick, he decided to get the full order because he could bring the leftovers home with him.  So the end of the meal rolls around and both myself and him decided to take the rest of our food back.  I ordered the Pumpkin Risotto and also had a fair amount left on the plate.  We ask the waitress to pack our leftovers and she comes back with a plastic bag containing the leftovers in two boxes.  We never opened the leftovers at the restaurant to check, I mean why would we?  I guess we were naive to assume that the restaurant would give us the food we paid for.  We came home and decided to put the food away in the fridge.  That's when we noticed that the box containing my brothers food was tiny, compared to mine.  This was despite the fact that his portion was much larger and he barely ate a quarter of it.  It was at that point we realized that  either the waiter or the kitchen staff had basically taken my brothers leftovers for themselves and put a skimpy serving in a small take out box.  I hope this is clear.  THEY TOOK OUR LEFTOVERS FOR THEMSELVES!  WHO DOES THAT?  We are joking about how this plot mirrored a Curb Your Enthusiasm episode and then we decided to go on Yelp and see if anyone else had a similar experience.  I have not read a review like this yet, but there are plenty of 1-2 star ratings, we ended up learning about other shady practices such as not honoring vouchers and not giving customers back exact change (i.e. rounding off totals for themselves).  To be honest I don't think the whole thing about the change is that big a deal, but when I compared that to the experience we just had I couldn't believe that this restaurant continues to be in operation.  Basically Amrheins was the most screwed up eating experience I've ever had.  I'm looking forward to telling EVERYONE about what happened to us.
I can honestly say this is the worst restaurant experience I have ever had. We went with a small group of people for Wednesday trivia and right from the get go things went wrong. Our server looked like she belonged in a dirty, cheap strip club, at best, then continued to screw up order after order after order. I never got the food I ordered until after my entire group was finished, then when I got it it was wrong. So I finally got up to the manager to complain and he clearly doesn't care, he didn't even apologize or offer to comp anything.   There is a lot more terrible experiences but I honestly don't feel like remembering it all. Just please please stay away!
I ate at Tavern in the Square for the second time yesterday. My boyfriend and I sat at the bar.  At first the bartenders seemed like they would be attentive, but that was not the case. We ordered lunch and drinks. These were served to us, but once our drinks were empty they never offered another drink.  I watched one bartender walk by 5 times and look at our empty drinks, but never once did he ask if we wanted anything else.  My boyfriend had to ask for our check instead of it being offered to us. Honestly we would have had a second drink, but were never offered one and should not have to ask especially when the bar was not crowded at all. The food was actually really good. I had the classic macaroni & cheese, and my boyfriend had the candied bacon and bleu cheese burger.  This is the only reason I gave two stars. It's a shame that the service was so bad cause we typically spend a lot out at restaurants and return to places with good service. Next time we're in the area we will try another place.
Ramen was not warm, and the servings were so small. The service was horrible, and the egg was cold. They should just stick to the other location, it's great. I'm not sure what happened with this one.
I stopped in for a drink at the bar. The bartenders were more interested in conversing among themselves than greeting us.  The male bartender responded in a pretentious manner when I asked him a question about one of the desserts. I think he was more concerned about practicing his dance moves behind the bar.  I can't speak for the quality of the food or service in the dining room, but based on the bar experience, overrated!
Went to dinner there before and found fly in my Pad Thai. Let the waitress know and she just shrugged her shoulders. Nothing off tab and no apology. Place sucks!
Every time I do a two star rating, I just want to say Meh and leave it at that.  I wasn't thrilled with it here. I love the space but was underwhelmed with the place. I got chips and guac and a pomegranate margarita. We were just stopping in so we didn't do full meal. Hopefully that would have brought my rating up. I would probably stick to beer/wine for a drink next time.
Went there Friday night before a symphony performance and it was downright AWFUL. We ordered 3 apps and drinks. The bartender was never behind the bar, it took forever to just get a menu -let alone our food and our check. The mozz triangles had no flavor, the nachos were plain (hardly any cheese) and the spinach dip was basically frozen green giant spinach de-thawed and thrown in a casserole dish with no cheese, cream or flavor. Would not recommend to anyone and will never go back!
If it was possible to give it zero stars I would. They're not able to hold an appointment , commitment or service. I would rather never waste my time and go somewhere else. If you expect not to make it to your event on time book here.
We tried this for the  time and did not like anything about it.  The food was not good tasting and the service was really bad.  Unless you really love Iranian food you will not t place. Not recommended.
This Walgreens pharmacy drive thru has poor customer service. I've been sitting here for more than 20 minutes with no one answering my simple question of if a prescription came through.  They need more pharmacy technicians or something.  The drive thru is not convenient if you have to wait 20 minutes to even get customer service!  Find a different Walgreens
First time at Habana.  We started our meal with Chicken Croquetas.  Nicely fried served with a slightly sweet and spicy green salsa.  Husband had Lechon Asado.  Pork was on the fatty side, but had an ok flavor.  I had the Empanada Cubana.  For $10.99 this a la carte item is seriously over priced for what you get.  The ham in the dish was no better than prepackaged lunch meat.  Not overly impressed.    Service was ok.  While initially our server was very attentive, he soon disappeared and rarely checked on us. We had to ask for water refills and our check.
I take a 10-minute Lyft to Tin and walk into the restaurant (which seems only slightly busy at 2pm) and ask if I can please place a To-Go order. My boyfriend and I are visiting from out of town and need a quick bite to eat between juggling plans, kid, work, visiting relatives, etc. One of the waiters, fairly rudely, responds "no we don't do ToGo orders when it's this busy." Ummmm, ok. I end up having to sit down at a table to order and eat my food onsite and just get an extra sandwich that I ask for in a to go box. My waiter (someone else who was actually nice) said sure no problem at all. I then proceed to see her (the first waitress) take two ToGo orders as I am sitting and waiting for my food. Aside from my direct issue with this waitress, I saw a couple eye rolls between and at the other waiters directed at each other.   Basically the food was fine but I had a bad taste in my mouth from the interactions that I really can't imagine going back any time soon.
Update to my last review.  Since I last dealt with motomethod, I had my motorcycle motor rebuilt and had since taken it back several times since they couldn't get it to run properly time and time again. Gave up on them even though it had only been less than 6 months since I had the rebuild. I decided to take the bike to a different shop, I took it to Daytona Yamaha on Hastings street in Vancouver, right around the corner from Motomethod. They assured me they would get my bike running properly and they did, it runs great now! Finally I can ride my motorcycle with what was supposed to be a "freshly rebuilt engine ready to go" Turns out my carb float needle and seat we worn out and I had a half plugged fuel shutoff. After taking my bike to motomethod on more then 1 occasion to have the carbs worked on I was assured the carbs were in excellent workig order.  Well clearly that was not the case and unfortunately I had to pay somebody else to fix their mistake. Oh well, lesson learned. Daytona Yamaha has gained a new customer and Motomethod has lost 1.
Been here twice. Food is mediocre at best. Service was poor both times too. Definitely won't be back
The service was ridiculously slow, and they weren't even busy. We waited almost 10min before anyone came to the table. No water, no bread basket. I had a grilled chicken and guacamole sandwich which was good, the tomato basil soup was delish, but they really skimp on the "fresh" fruit. Probably will not return to this location.
Came here for lunch. The food is okay and you get charge for the location that it is in. I got the chicken teriyaki box. The portions for lunch is good.
Greasy and uninspired. I've only had the take-out, but I've never had a good experience with it. Everything's very salty and greasy. Serving sizes are generous, but you're not going to want to eat all of it. Also, prices are quite high. The Chinese food is subpar (even by takeout standards), and they scrimp on vegetables and meat (lots of carbs thoguh). The sushi is okay, but you can get the same quality at your local grocers for much less. Overall, I don't recommend this.
First time visit was for brunch... the waitstaff seemed off, spilling coffee on the table and very slow to bring our drinks. Food was good but there were some issues, biscuits were served cold and hard (like refrigerator cold). We gave it another try for dinner, had a reservation at 8:30PM, were not seated until almost 10PM! Again the waitstaff seem off, for a high end place you'd expect very polite and personable waitstaff, but they seem oddly unprofessional and not very organized. The building and grounds are beautiful, and you can tell they are using great ingredients, they just need to get it together and create a better experience.
DO NOT WASTE YOUR MONEY!  I took my "out of town" guest to Lucile's this morning, hoping not only to share one of Boulder's more iconic and historical breakfast settings, but to enjoy a delicious and hearty meal.  My nostalgia for many previous experiences fell way short.  Several frustrations: The restaurant looked like it needed a good scrubbing The food was underwhelming, lukewarm, and had the odor of old shoes The $10.00 waffle was dry We had to wait for silverware service and the grungy pepper mill was empty The entire experience was very disappointing and the ratings truly belie the reality of a Boulder restaurant that has seen better days.  Sorry Lucile's, it's time to make improvements!
I was visiting friends in Portland last weekend, and we went out for dinner and drinks to Blue Hour. It's in the Pearl which is the hot spot in Portland-I was looking forward to it. That is I was...until I sat down. We were ignored by the wait staff for about 20 minutes. They made up for it by bringing us complimentary glasses of sparking rose.  There's a fondue dish that's supposed to be amazing on their bar menu-we wanted it as an appetizer, and we were told that the chef doesn't serve any of the bar menu in the main part of the restaurant....what? When we pressed the waiter he said (verbatim)..."When you become a 5 star chef and open a 5 million dollar restaurant, then you can choose to serve what you want. But until that happens-this is how we do it here." Had I not been an invited guest, I would have walked out of there without a glance back-instead...I ordered dinner. The food was alright-not "5 star" but it was good. The prices were way too high, there wasn't an entree on the menu that wasn't under $30. Perhaps I'm spoiled since I live in SF and we have fabulous restaurants, inventive menus, reasonable prices and good service, but if this is the "best" Portland has to offer- I'd rather starve.
The service is mediocre at best. They pretty much take one order and then take 3-5 minutes to make it, and then come back towards the counter to take the second order. Which is fine and dandy...until they run out of an ingredient and the person(s) standing in line end up standing there for no good reason for 5-10 minutes. I can't tell if it's understaffed or if they just continuously manage to hire the most unenthusiastic, slow moving staff members ever. The fact that they have a small box for tips is laughable. Am I tipping you for wasting my time? If there was any other bubble tea place in the area, this place would have gone belly up ages ago. The product is average, the prices are pretty in line with an average product. If you get your drink order in 10 minutes, I would consider that a win.  If Starbucks were run this way, I'm sure there would be riots.
I came in for an oil change...I had called the Lamar location about an appointment, and they told me these guys would get me in and out as a walk in. Pull in, no one comes out for a bit, so I'm wondering if I shouldn't have pulled up to one of the empty bays. A guy finally saunters out very slowly, gives me a form, and says "45 minutes to an hour." No other info, and they've just finished the only other car there, so I'm wondering if I heard wrong. I fill out the form including my phone number, ask the guy if it's really going to be 45 minutes, and he goes, "yeah, maybe slower." I thought about leaving at that point, but I wanted to get the oil change over with. The office is attached to a coffee shop, and since the other shop on Lamar recommended waiting there, I head in. Wait an hour without hearing anything, go into the office again to check how much longer, and realize my car is already out in the lot. I ask how long it's been ready, and was told it's been a while, but they figured I was in the coffee shop or somewhere else. I asked why they didn't text since they had asked for my phone number, and was told they don't do that. Every question I asked was answered as if I was inconveniencing the guy. I don't usually get pissed that quickly, but the guy just seemed like he could barely be bothered to breathe, much less provide customer service. Normally, shops will tell you what to expect: how they will (or won't) contact you, where your car will be when it's done so you can keep an eye out for it if they don't notify you, and then they'll go over your car's condition and whether anything needs to be replaced soon. None of that from this guy. I got so fed up that I left without my receipt. I wish I'd read the reviews on this place before going. I've always heard great things about Groovy, but this place is tanking their reputation, and honestly, if they allow a branch to be that bad, there's no way I'll trust them with my car repairs.
I was shocked by my experience at Toyota of Braintree today. I went to test drive a 2011 Highlander fully prepared to terminate my existing lease early. The salesman took some basic information from me including the fact that my lease wasn't due to expire until the end of year. His attitude changed immediately.   Little did he know that I was looking to end my current lease early. He reluctantly took my license to make a copy for the test drive and went to get the keys. I overheard him talking with the sales manager who, I'm assuming because they didn't think I was "ripe" for a purchase, told him to "make it quick."   When the salesman returned I told him that I had heard what the sales manger said and that if he considered it a waste of his time, there were plenty of other dealers that I could go do. He had a shocked and horrified look on his face and stammered that "they were busy." Aside from one other couple, I was the only person in the showroom. The salesman handed my license right back to me without any explanation.   I cannot believe that in this economy and with all of the problems Toyota has been having they let me walk right out the door. Their loss-I take delivery of my new Highlander at Expressway Toyota on Wednesday.
Really not worth the price. I was charged 300$ for my roots to get done. She suggested I do two tones. It turned out very brassy on top and and didn't match the rest of my hair. Way too much money for a color I didn't like at all.
A mediocre indian food experience.  All of their food was bland and just plain crappy.  Naan wasn't fresh, meat was dry and lunch buffet felt like a rip off.  Did I mention they're pricey?    Stay away.  This place is for those who have never had good Indian food and unfortunately probably won't turn any of then on to trying it again in the future.
Love the beer, servers are super. Just remember, buyer beware and check your tab or I guarantee that $7 beer will show up as $8 on your bill!
It's funny. Yelp says Howling Wolf is open and delivering (when you filter by open and delivery), however, I was just told by the staff that they are no longer taking delivery orders. On top of this, they have told me in the past (5+ times) that their delivery wait is 2 hours.   It takes a maximum of 5-10 mins to drive from point A to point B in Salem. These 2hr waits did not happen in the month of October, so it's pretty unreasonable.
A waste of $40+  The staff did not help sell the place - indicating they were out of nearly everything (how hard is it to make fish spread?), and kept telling us they would have more tomorrow.  Does this mean I'm supposed to come back tomorrow?  The limited menu would limit my desire to come back.  They also did not know how to make peel and eat shrimp - it came covered in sauce with a side of drawn butter, nor did they know how to answer the phone.  There was no knowledge of the beer, despite the fact the space is only 200 square feet and no one was there, so they could practice memorizing it.  The only selling point is the location on the quaint brick alley - order at your own peril.
So I've had the pizza from here several time over the last few years, and I don't have any complaints about the food. Their BBQ chicken pizza has to be my favorite, which is why I'm so disappointed in my last two visits. Two months ago I ordered pick-up and they ended up making the wrong pizza, so I waited for the right one and the manager let me take both for my trouble. They turned around the second one in 15 mins, very hot when they gave it to me. The manager was very nice and great customer service.   The second time was quite worse. I was on my way back from jumping my girlfriend's car and decided to stop in for a pizza as I wasn't feeling up to cooking. I ordered a 14" BBQ chicken pizza and garlic knots (my go-to). I paid and told the waitress I would be outside as I had my dog with me. Told me it would be 20-25 mins. A little over 25 mins later I threw by dog back in the car and went inside to check on the pizza. Turns out they had given it to a dine-in table that walked in while I was sitting there. Worse off that wasn't even the pizza they ordered. Guy said that he would make me another by since I paid there was nothing else they could do...waited another 25 mins until the delivery diver came out to give me my pizza. At this point I didn't care to argue as I was just hungry and ready to be home. (ordered at 7:21...got in my car to leave at 8:11)  I'm not saying this is a bad place to eat, in fact the food is really good. Just wish they would work on getting me the right pizza...
Not impressed.  If this is the best Chinese food in the area, we are all in big trouble.  We ordered Chinese delivery from this restaurant.  The portions were large but not tasty.    The egg rolls are strangely filled with pork only...alas, no cabbage or anything to give it a crunch.  Just a "mushy" diced pork inside.  Ewww...  The egg drop soup had a nice flavor but was underwhelming.  There were mushrooms in it but none of the mushroom flavor permeated the broth.  Mushrooms must have been added as an afterthought.  The overflowing portion of pork fried rice had little to no flavor, and the pork pieces were extremely fatty....ewwwww, again.  The Hunan chicken had bell peppers, water chestnuts, and bamboo shoots along with the chicken.  The sauce had a hint of spice but certainly nothing worth writing home about.  Too much ginger flavor.  And as for the won ton soup, I've been told that the won tons themselves are fabulous; however, the broth tastes like nothing more than water.  Overall, disappointing.
DON'T GO HERE IF YOU WANT TO BE TREATED RESPECTFULLY.  I have been calling this gym since December 2nd, my contract end date, so that I could cancel. No one will return any of my calls, nor tell me if it is okay to send in the certified letter or if I have to do it in person.   After being on vacation I finally was able to go in in person and just get it over with. Every time I walk in the building, no employees look up to greet anyone, they continue staring at their PCs. I stood there for 30 seconds before saying excuse me can someone assist me?   I explain I have been calling and talking to people at the front desk and "leaving messages" with a "Clint" that I need to know how to cancel. I explain no one will call me back and so now I am here in person to get it done. They say, you can only do that Monday through Friday. Are you kidding me? Where are those hours posted? After all of the calls I have made to this gym asking how to cancel and no one tells me I can't come in on a Saturday early afternoon?!   Finally they let me see someone named Daniel. The front desk employee says "you can go back to that office" and points. I go back to the office and Daniel continues to sit on his PC, doesn't look up, and doesn't say hello. He goes on to say that I have to come in Monday through Friday and fill out a form. Could he at least look up and look me in the eye?! Could he say hello how are you? So I sit down and he doesn't like that. I am a customer here, wanting to CANCEL. I explain, I have called SO MANY times trying to ask how to cancel and no one told me I have to come Monday - Friday? He doesn't care. Finally I explain, I worked for a different gym company for 3 years and I would never treat someone with such disrespect as this gym has done for me and that I can't WAIT to cancel. I explain that this is the worst customer service I have experienced at a gym and all I want to do is cancel. I have followed all of the rules, I fulfilled the contract, just give me the paperwork to sign so I can be done. Finally he gets out the cancellation form that was at the top of his drawer. Seriously? All that fuss for something that was readily available to you?   He then has the audacity to tell me that I should keep my health a priority after I have already explained that I run outside and running is free and that I don't like this gym. I realize he's a gym salesman and they have to say those things when people are cancelling but seriously he couldn't get up off of his behind to greet a customer at the door and he wants to tell me to not be lazy? Ok.   I can't wait to not see Golds Gym on my bank statement. I will never step foot in a Golds Gym again and I will go somewhere that they treat the customer with respect.
Pizza/experience was not good. Ordered the margarita pizza and it was horrible. The "mozzarella cheese" was thin uncooked/lightly cooked tasteless peices of anything but mozzarella cheese. The basil was thrown over it (and old) in large pieces and there was huge chunks of orange cherry tomatoes on it instead of regular slices of tomato.  The "pizza fries" were horrible too. Soggy and no effort to make look or taste good.
Service was horrible, manager was largely indifferent, food took forever and was either burned or cold. The manager ended up comping our meal since the entire experience was so awful.  Then when we were leaving we heard the staff talking about how we were "the people who didn't want to pay for their meal." Will never return.
They charged me 15% tip although there was no waiter/waitress to give you service. The food is not any good comparing to authentic turkish kabab. The price is pretty high. The worst part was there were NO parking lot!
If I could give this place 0 stars, I totally would. Unfortunately, yelp is too kind and does not give that option out. We ordered a $40 dinner combination (variety of dishes comes with this combo). We had a party of five (2 adults, 3 children), so that was plenty enough. The waitress brought everything but only brought four bowls of rice. I asked if we could get another one, and she said "no. We only give 4 with this" and before I could say a single word, she turned around and left. I don't mind paying extra for a bowl of rice, but she rudely said they only gave four and left. I am not joking when I say this, but she did not come to our table to check on us; not a SINGLE time. So my family of five had to split the rice. When it was time to leave, we only left $5---a dollar short from 15% tip. We were so unhappy that the lady neglected our table. As we were walking to our car in the parking lot, the waitress comes out and calls us--saying that we did not tip enough.   Are you kidding?? I refrained myself from keeping all the tip, but sure.. She did bring the food out to begin with. However, the way she talked to me and my family was very condescending and not worth my money.   The food itself was okay. Not great, not terrible. I won't recommend this place to anyone unless you are looking for crap service & mediocre food.
The food is fresh,  but not as good as I though. We order a Oden hot pot, and thought its going to have something special inside, but turn out the ingrdient inside are all that can buy in supermarket. Overall is too pricey, and dissapointed.
We sat and watched other tables sit for over 10 minutes with their food in the warmer before it was served. Saw ours come up, another almost 10 minutes. I asked to speak to the manager and it was not busy. There were 2 servers standing chatting at the bar while our food got cold! Manager showed at our table before our food and I expressed my opinion on how food was not being served timely, and his reaction was that the patio area was busy?! So what!, It wasn't, there were fewer people outside than inside! No regard for customer service and living so close and having lots of visitors to our condo on the same street, would never take anyone there.
Mary Chung is OK.  Only go here if you don't feel like going further off Mass Ave to get to Mu Lan.  For what its worth none of the Chinese people I work with like Mary Chung.
I was really looking forward to checking this place out. I thought this would be a kid friendly place to have fun until I saw they allow open carry...inside their business....their LASER TAG business. What could possibly go wrong? I'll take my business elsewhere.
Well what can I say...our appetizer - chicharrones weren't ordered by our waitstaff (she said she forgot) the pimento cheese burger melt had no pimento cheese  and was actually cheddar cheese with pimentos (Varsity has a better one)! The lamb burger was cold and everything else went downhill!  Guess we won't come here again!!!
I went in to get a minor repair that cost $200. They did the full inspection and invented an ADDITIONAL $1200 more for me to spend on things that were not broken and did not need to be done. Then I heard someone come in and insist to a lady that she get her air filter replaced. She had to say no 3 TIMES. Horrible place. Don't go here if you can avoid it.  Edit: I opened my hood recently to find that they'd left garbage on my engine. A broken headlight, a plastic bag and some pieces of cardboard. How sloppy.
I relocated to Atlanta in July of 2014 and this was the first nail salon I visited. I liked the convenience of the location (I live in Decatur; but go to Whole Foods several times a week and its in the same parking lot).   The parking is easy, the prices are good, I never had to wait more than a few minutes to get my services done (gel mani & regular pedi) and I went to this nail salon regularly for several months.  I was a fan of this salon until my visit about a month ago; which turned out to be my last. I had just returned from vacation and came in to get my gels redone. The girl who did my manicure was WAY too chatty... and while she may have meant well, her questions and comments to me were just plain rude.   First of all, its none of her business to comment on the fact that I dont work. She asked if I had the day off of work (it was Presidents Day) and I casually mentioned that "I always have off of work" and tried to change the subject..... but she proceeded to bombard me questions for the next 30 minutes regarding my lack of employment. Comments from "oh, your husband must do really well"... to "oh, so why dont you have kids, then?" (again, NONE OF HER BUSINESS to ask that). It was incredibly rude and completely unprofessional.   Then, when I went to pay, she noticed my Chanel wallet and said "oh! when you're ready to get rid of that, give it to me!" Again, just not okay and so very unprofessional.   Im sure she wasnt trying to be rude, but she was talking to me like we had been friends for years and I just met this women. Not okay.    I wont be back. Its a shame too because I was a regular customer for awhile; but I wont subject myself to a strange and uncomfortable experience like that again. I felt judged and disrespected.   They need to refresh some of their staff on how to deal with customers in a professional manner.
I have no idea how anyone who has tasted real Chinese food can give this place anything more than 2 stars. Their food is overall extremely salty. Their Fu Qi Fei Pian was awful, it is NOT authentic at all! It did not even come with any chilly oil or cilantro, which are the key ingredients for Fu Qi Fei Pian. I even tried the beef noodle soup, which is bland and salty. On top of that, the lady behind the counter is rude and mean! She kept on staring at me, which made my meal even more unappetizing. I know good authentic Chinese food, this place just dose not cut it for me.
Lunch with clients here on 27 July.  Service was very attentive.  Vegetarian version of Cobb Salad was good.  But there was lipstick on my water glass.  Gross.
I'll admit that I'm very picky when it comes to nail salons, but this place gets the award for worst manicure I've ever received -- ever. The first time I went there, they did a good job, so I decided to give them another shot. Big  mistake.   I went with my mom, whose manicure was finished first. The technician cut her very badly -- we're talking huge red gash on the side of her nail. No apology, or even acknowledgment. She also asked for square nails and got round ones.   When it was my turn, I specifically asked the technician not to cut my cuticles. She did anyway. And boy, did it hurt. She seems to have completely cut my cuticles off on each of my toes, leaving tiny, painful cuts on every single toe. Two days later, it still hurts. The manicure was even worse -- the technician managed to cut me with the filing board. That's a first -- didn't even know you could cut someone filing their nails! My nails are jagged and uneven, and the polish is globby. When I get a less than stellar manicure, I usually just put up with it, but this one is so bad that it's embarrassing, so I'm going to have to get someone else to fix it.
Expensive loud and over stimulating. Service was terrible while bowling. They do have nice bowling lanes, all sized and organized bowling balls. But please if they're going to charge what they do then let's raise the bar on service and customer service skills.
It is a tourist trap and you get tourist trap quality food and service. If you go during the weekend, it is full of college age riff raff and it unbearably loud. If you're looking for a place to take people from out of town, it can be fun. I like the indoors portion with the fire during the winter months.
Terrible!! I thought I'd try this place since the location is so convenient.  TERRIBLE IDEA!!!  I had a blazer and a silk dress dry cleaned the day before a business trip.  Much to my dismay, they did a horrible job.  They white blazer didn't even look clean!  They ripped the hem out of my silk dress and left it looking tattered and torn.  It was over a $300 dress that I had worn 2 times!  For those items along with a silk tank top, I paid over $40 to have "cleaned.  I brought the dress back and they refused to fix it.  The man in charge said it was probably cheaply made even though it was a high end brand.  I finally persuaded him to fix the hem but once again they did a horrible job.  It looked as though a child sewed it - strings were still hanging off the hem line!  Needless to say, I will not be returning.  Expensive. Horrible cleaning. Poor customer service.
This place is way overpriced for pizza! $6 for what would approximate a large slice at any other place. Their dinner entrees are also ridiculously overpriced for a take-out/ casual dine in place. They do have wine and beer, which is nice, but this is not the place to go for food.  Also, the rice pudding is inedible. The only thing decent about this place is the bucket of flat bread they put out near the register. You can nibble on it while you wait. But, sometimes there is no bread and that makes me mad. Since you are already ridiculously overpaying, you can at least have some free bread.  ReYelp 11/15: Is this place out of business now? What is going on? Anyone have an idea?
I've been traveling more then average on business as of late.  I was in San Diego couple months ago and tried couple shabu shabu places there.  Now work decides to fly me to Boston so I decided to check out the shabu shabu.  After reading yelp reviews between the 2 shabu shabu places I chose Kaze.  The decor was nice.  Service was decent.  The cut of meat was good. So why the 2 stars?  The broth (soy sauce seaweed) was too salty.  The veggie choice was below average.  But my biggest gripe is the sauce.  WHERE THE HELL IS THE BROWN SAUCE!!!  All the shabu places I've been to has the brown dipping sauce.  It only came with soy sauce of some short.  It was too salty.  If that's their version of ponzu sauce...FAIL!!!  They also came with some hot sauce.  It only took me a short time to realize this was Chinese run and they are trying to influence some of their sauce to shabu shabu.  This is suppose to be a Japanese cuisine not a Chinese hot pot restaurant.  Fix it to make it more authentic and I may return.  Btw, I love Boston!!  Super nice city.
Whoever decided it was a good idea to go to this place after work on Friday must have been smoking the crack pipe. We had a reservation for about 30 people, but the staff hadn't really set up the tables in a way that we could all sit together and talk, so we had to get creative and do it ourselves.   The drinks, were not too expensive, but that's probably because they were pretty watered down. I asked for my usual, double rum and diet coke, which arrived to me in a short glass, which should have been my first clue. Since it was in a short glass, I was expecting it to be much stronger, as the ratio of booze to bevie was smaller. I am not a large person, but if I can drink four of these and not feel a little wobbly, that's probably not a good thing. When you are a pub, don't you think the one thing people come to you for should be amazing?  We ordered the "cheesy" nachos as per the menu which were $16.75!  $16.75!!!!!!! SRSLY! These nachos better be sprinkled with cheese made of gold if they cost that much. The nachos arrive and the first words out of my mouth are W.T.F? There was barely any cheese on our "cheesy" nachos. Guacamole was extra so we had almost naked chips with salsa and sour cream. Who's pick was this place again?  The waitress we had was good, she made sure I always had a drink in my hand. I also got a shot from the alternative Zack Morris at the bar, because I was on a mission, and so far I had been unsuccessful. At least I was able to make my tequila-face once last night, so it wasn't a total bust.   They had a big screen projector with the opening ceremonies of the Paralympics on, and when that was over they had a band playing, but I didn't really stick around for that. There isn't really anything about Ceilis that makes it Irish, besides the fact that it sells Guinness. Why do all Vancouver pubs want to be Irish anyways? Why can't we have more Mexican pubs with donkeys that you have to ride when you get really drunk? I can tell you one thing, I won't be spending my St. Patrick's Day at Ceilis.
Atmosphere is nice / cozy... Location is convenient/close-in.... But their drinks and food are overpriced and subpar. On my recent visit I spent $10 on a rock hard tart and a watered down chai. Lastly, out of the handful of times I've been here over the past few years I have hardly experienced friendly service. Not even a smile from the staff. Which, for me, makes the atmosphere not at all worth it. Skip it.
Pho Hoa has trouble slicing its meats so that their thicknesses match the type of cut. For example, rare flank steak should generally be pretty thin, so that it has a good chance of cooking while sitting in the soup. (But probably not shabu-thin). In the bowls I've had at Pho Hoa though, 4 of 4 times my bowls of pho were not only served lukewarm, but the rare flank was not able to cook thoroughly. That was because it was cut way too thickly and because of the soup temperature. Tonight I also nearly chocked and gagged on the bubble tea I ordered: The bubbles were rock hard and not really cooked, and the ratio of heavy cream to tea was so high that the taste of black tea was nowhere to be found. With Pho Thien Thien and Xinh Xinh just around the corner, I see no reason to go to Pho Hoa for the beef pho. (PH's pork chops are another matter; they are really good!). Two stars. I'd give another half-star for the diplomacy served up by the waiters to this couple behind me who couldn't understand that PH doesn't serve wontons as part of their pho.
Went into WRB yesterday around 4pm after hearing about its outstanding food and beer, not busy. Found a seat in the tap room and waited more than 20 minutes as servers made their way to others around us. When a server finally did come over to us, the person was extremely rude and refused to take our order saying, "I'm busy right now" before walking off. Needless to say, despite their reputation, it's unlikely that we'll return if this is how they treat their customers.
Memorial Day ... and only 2 cashiers open - who also work at a snails pace with an attitude. They like to not look their customers in the eye and really enjoy chatting with each other. I won't be back!
Eh, the night i went there were too many gross dudes (from blow-outs to unbuttoned shirts to shoving hard-ons up my ass), a decent cover band, far too many slutty looking girls who couldn't hold their liquor and over priced drinks plus a ridiculous cover... but it was St. Patrick's day, what more can you expect from anything in Fanuiel. I will say it is just about the Only place in Fanueil I'll go though so take that as a vote of confidence.
Gave it a try today with a friend for lunch. Had the cheeseburger and fries. Ordered it medium well. Came out PIIIINK and very very runny/bloody.  Server confirmed that was not medium well, and they cooked me another one.  I was skeptical when it came out so quickly; this time it was just very pink, but not as runny.  The server wanted to make sure it was fine before he left. I said it wasn't medium well, but I was hungry, so just to leave it.    I ate about a half of it; the burger was only so-so, even with the undercooking aside.   I figured I'd fill up on fries anyway, but I hadn't tasted them before making that assumption. The were SO salty! Really not sure who has told them that these fries are what people want...   The service was good and attentive, and that part gets them from 1 star two 2.  It might be a good enough place to go get drinks after work, but I'd skip the meal next time.
Servers with the crapiest attitudes and dirtiest hair...and let's not forget you have to navigate through a wall of cigarette smoke to get in the door as these useless servers suck on cigarettes and complain in the parking lot.  Of course, you learn to overlook the pond scum they hire to serve you, but having a cockroach come running from underneath the syrup bottles to join me for lunch was too much for even me.
We had the chicken and BBQ pork banh mi and the laos noodles. All was disappointing in taste and presentation. The sandwiches are better tasting at the Asian Shopping Center.  Service was friendly and attentive.
Breathtakingly expensive is how I'd describe Boston Standard Plumbing -- as in so expensive as to take your breath away.  I don't know if they do this for everyone, but they played the old "Roto Rooter" fixed-price game with me whereby they show-up, size-up the job, size-up the customer, and then quote an outrageously high price for the job.  Too pressured to think clearly, the customer agrees and regrets it afterwords.    What's outrageous?  I paid $682 to replace two faucets.  It was all straightforward work on modern sinks in a 5 year old condo.  The work was fine and the plumber was nice and respectful, but if you don't have money to burn then find a different plumber who will do the work at an hourly rate or more reasonable fixed rate.
The idea of this place isn't bad. I mean, it's easy to think that with beer, fries & flavored ketchups, how can one go wrong?   It goes wrong when you don't have enough real estate to accommodate your customers & don't bother to find another way to mitigate that problem. At peak times, Saus continues to serve food & beer while customers are standing, with nowhere to set the food & beer down while attempting to dine.
Handy does not have competent cleaners. Cleaner claimed that she had vacuumed that floor but later on a friend was walking barefoot and stepped on a large nail and bled. It might be cheap but you'll be better off doing the cleaning yourself.
Is this place even still in business?  Looks like it could possibly be closed.  Went by at 2pm on a Wednesday and no one was there.
I took my daughter here for her first full set of acrylic nails and got a new full set of my own. When my daughter was looking at the polish colors, the technician asked if she wanted the gel color and I said "Sure". I have always had gel over the top of my pink and white acrylics to keep them shiny and strong, so I figured this was the same thing but with color instead of clear. The same effect could be achieved with regular nail polish and a coat of gel on top. When I pointed this out, I was told, "Oh, we don't do that." Of course they don't! Why do something that is usually $5 extra when they can dupe you out of $20!!! Which they didn't tell me until the end. As for our full sets themselves, they were both horrible. I knew that what the guy was doing with my nails was wrong, and the guy sitting next to him even joked that I had a look on my face like, "what is this guy doing?" And I did, because he was doing the pink part of my pink & whites first, which isn't how anybody who's ever done my nails (about 25 years worth) has ever done them. He told me not to worry, that they would come out better this way. They are lumpy, uneven, too wide and it's almost like he was trying to save on acrylic powder, because there's barely any on the nails. Usually there should be a slight curve of the nails when you look at them from the side. These are completely flat, except of course for the lumps at the bottom and tip of the nails. I kept pointing out things for him to fix, like one spot that literally had NO acrylic on it, and he was irritated that I was questioning him. So he finally "finishes" and asks me how they look and I put my hands down in front of him, looked him in the eye and said, "How do YOU think they look?" He inspects his work, fiddles around and files here and there, and tells me to go wash my hands. Also, when I asked him what the difference in price was between the pink and whites I was getting, and the regular acrylics my daughter was getting, he acted like he didn't understand me. I rephrased 3 different ways and he still acted confused until I said, "Are the pink & whites like $40 and the regular $25? Or.... " and he said, "Yes". What a coincidence that I guessed the prices perfectly! There is no price menu on the wall, so be careful about what you're being charged. Overall it was horrible. My daughter's nails are even lumpier than mine, and $85 later, we will NEVER be back here again. I felt like crying.
Tried this place since it was in the neighborhood and I love their other place, Ria's. Food was good but nothing exciting and a bit pricey.
I used to enjoy Shino Express until this past week when I experienced a severe case of food poisoning and a flurry of bad food experiences. My boyfriend and I both ate the same lunch and dinner, except I had a tuna roll at Shino, which he did not try. For breakfast I had oatmeal. Case in point, the tuna was to blame, and I am never going back there again. Not only that, but the scorpion roll was awful and the spicy chiken teriyaki roll was dry. I also ordered a salad and the lettuce was dirty and dry. I can't stand dry, dirty lettuce. I had a suspicious feeling when I looked at the sushi in the case. It looked a bit mucky and somehow a little unsanitary. Guess I won't be back for awhile.
I pulled in to this Firestone tire center in Orange City Fl.  because I had a tire going flat and needed to get it fixed, It was 6:00 pm an hour before they close. I waited for about 10 minutes before the manager Chris came in and the first thing he said is we are not taking anymore customers. I said but my tire is going flat and needs repaired. again he said we are not taking anymore customers. Now there were other customers there and I realize they would come first, but all he had to say was i have people ahead of you but i will get your tire fixed since its going flat.( aka customer service).  Luckily there was a tire Kingdom around the corner and they were cleaning up and getting ready to close for the night. They said no problem we will fix it for you. They jumped right on it and fixed my tire which had a 4 inch bolt/screw  in it and they had to take the tire off the rim to fix it. They never once complained and were so much more professional. Come to find out they had a special and it only cost me 11.50 to fix it. I would not recommend going to Firestone in Orange City Florida. Their customer service is horrible and that is because of their Manager Chris. i will be calling corporate and making a complaint against This store and the Manager. I am also a retired Fire Fighter and  I know a lot of fireman and their family's in the Central Florida area that always need car work done. I will be spreading the word DO NOT go here. Take your business over to Tire Kingdom in Orange City where they treat you like a human being and are very Professional.
We were looking to rent a house.  We email and called, over a week later no response.  Not too impressed especially with such good reviews. First impression was not so positive.  Went elsewhere and received great help.
Just as bad as any other subway with the added gross out factor of a very sketchy clientele. Bad for the neighborhood too, they intentionally blocked the drive through lane of neighboring cafe Speedboat coffee shortly after subway starting to serve breakfast. Coincidence?
Sunday night - busy but no reason to be losing your mind as a server/bartender. Walked in to be ignored by valet/doorman.  Hostess looks out from under her eye lids and huffs "its going to be at LEAST and hour for two".  Say no problem, we're here now and happy at the bar for the wait.  Hostess says that two people are leaving the bar tables and they are first come first serve.  We say that's just as great and promptly seat ourselves at the dirty table.  Bus boys come and clean it up, present water and bread - and I go to the bathroom.  While I was in the bathroom the bartender has come over and taken a drinks and app order.  My husband ordered a house pinot for me and a traditional Bud for himself.  He said the bartender kept trying to upsell him on Sam Adams and it felt really awkward to decline.  My main complaint about this place was the service received.  All around us people were being treated nicely - things would go wrong with their order, they'd complain and yell and get comped.  Meanwhile the table for two, being quiet and courteous, happy with their order -is made to feel they are not good enough to sit in the BAR at a chain restaurant filled with tourists. The bartender would have had his easiest table of the night and easy tip if he JUST took a SECOND to acknowledge us as fellow humans.  What a dick.  Typical only brings out the smile when presenting the check - and of course as I suspected has charged us $15 for the "house" wine which was actually the most expensive pinot.  DICK!  We took his thoughtfulness off the tip that would have been left and took off. Food was mediocre, portions are smaller and WAY WAY WAY overpriced.  I hate getting gift cards here.
Ordered 4 vegetarian spring rolls and 2 tofu. They said "well it's two to an order" so I said fine however they want to ring it up, I just want a total of 4 vegetarian spring rolls and 2 tofu. The guy was having a hard time getting this crazy concept (language barrier). So I get there and total is $37 and change. They obviously doubled the order. No worries I repeated what I wanted, the older lady gets mad, yells at the younger order taker, gives me the look of death (a look my wife usually does before I go sleep on the couch) and then goes into the kitchen. An older man (maybe the owner) looks through the window on the kitchen door, gives me the "disappointed dad" look, and then goes back to work. $17 later, a hassle, and some ok spring rolls later, I learned that I will just drive out of the way to Pho Thaison next time.
IT TOOK FOREVER! The lady seemed very confused. She didn't really comprehend what we were saying and messed up all of our orders
First night in New England and based on the Yelp reviews we landed at Finz. The last patio table was seated just before us so we agreed to sit inside. Service was super super slow. My arugula salad with raspberries was mediocre  at best and, oops they forgot to tell us they were out of raspberries so I just received blueberries. Moving on...I intentionally order the scallop dish with the gnocchi. But when I was served my scallops there was no gnocchi to be found. Oops... Forgot to tell you that too! So, they offered to take "my salad" off to make it right. The saga continued but needless to say we were just done. Thanks for making the first night of my highly-anticipated seafood journey so very meh, Finz.
There are a lot of good things about Johnny D's, but brunch is not one of them. I ordered blueberry pancakes and scrambled eggs with a cup of tea. The blueberry pancakes were fairly tasteless and a bit tough, but the real kicker was the eggs. I took one bite, made a face and said "Eww". Naturally everyone at the table asked what was the matter! Someone else gave them a try and agreed they were terrible. I suspect were made from processed egg mix rather than fresh eggs and gave up on them, but my brunch mates asked the waitress to send them back. The second batch was no different. In hindsight I should have changed my order to eggs over easy, but it didn't occur to me at the time. The oatmeal, which I originally had no intention of eating, was like glue. On top of that, the tea was terrible. Oh, they have fancy tea bags but they bring you a cup of tepid water to dunk them in. Some places just don't get tea!  I suspect these deficiencies are because they only serve breakfast on the weekends and can't pay as much attention to it. I'll go back to hear music or maybe to have dinner, but never again for brunch.
Staying at an AirBnB in the area.  This place was the closest breakfast spot in walking distance.  Neat looking spot with a trendy feel.  Food looked good on the plates of others thru the window, so we entered.  3 hostesses at the entrance.  Got seated immediately.  After about 20 mins, there was no visible wait staff - while the hostesses chatted it up.  The manager finally comes over after busing a table with dirty dishes in one hand to take our drink order.  Our overworked, bubbly waitress eventually surfaces to take our food order.  Food is served and we dig in.   Ketchup requested at the onset is not delivered until omelet is halfway consumed.  No raw sugar for the coffee.  Grit croutons served with the Caesar Salad - WTF?  Several little things prevent this spot from being top notch.  But "its the little things that count", right?  All in all, the food was "okay" not good.  $40+ for an omelet and salad &  2 coffees.  The place suffers from "poor staffing" not "under staffing".  U could not make sense of the 3 hostesses and 1 waitress staffing model.  But who am I? (lol) Time will tell if this lives up to the type generated by the lines at the front door.  It will probably survive a little longer than it should due to its strategic location.
dont come here.  greens and fairways were in poor condition, and even worse than that their employees are RUDE.  range balls are cracked and old.  SO many other clubs at comparable prices make it stupid for anyone to play here.  BEWARE
Worst customer service ever. Hadn't even left the parking lot and went back in to get my cup filled and the owner himself yelled at me about their policy for not allowing people to fill their cups after they left the front door. I understand if I had driven off, came back 2 hours later and expected a drink, but seriously? Also on how I wasn't allowed to use the restroom for longer than 5 minutes.  I'm never going there and the whole experience has put a bad bitter taste in my mouth for all JM stores.
Never actually got to eat there. They cancelled our reservation 30 min before we were supposed to arrive, after receiving a confirmation email on our reservation just 2 days before. How rude!   At least it was a cloud with a silver lining: we ended up eating at Neptune Oyster Bar instead and had the most AMAZING lobster rolls I've ever had in my life!
Gross. The waffles had clearly been baked or made hours ago, the bacon/cheese/avocado was on a sweet base of some kind. Cheese was cold and dry- not even melted.  The banana Nutella was so saturated that it was soggy, (again cold) and carried about 4X the amount of whipped cream as the volume of waffle.   Also- counter girl was rude, sullen, and made me feel like walking back out.   Not going back :/
These people don't care about their customers at all!!!! No one can answer questions on the phone (because they need a manager to guide them) and managers are never available.   I've been a member for more than 10 years and I've been happy with them until recently. I agree with others, they are no longer trustworthy and no longer customer service oriented.   They also recently changed their user interface and bill payment software - and those new services S-U-C-K. Bill pay takes money from my account 5 to 7 business days BEFORE my authorized payment (instead of the day I set the bill to pay). I can no longer use the bill pay service because I get paid on the 1st and have bills due on the 2nd, which means they would take money out of my account on the 27th or 28th of the month.   I'm closing my account ASAP!!!  I encourage others to steer-clear of this awful, terrible, horrible credit union!!!
Arrived in Orlando today after an eight hour car ride from South Carolina. My son became ill with a fever cough and sore throat and Disney recommended us to this urgent care center. We arrived, did the paperwork and gave them our insurance card and drivers license at approximately 9 PM at 9:55 PM they called us up to say they finally verified the insurance,  wanted the $50 co-pay and informed me that there were nine people in front of my son.  We headed straight to Dr. P. Phillips hospital and within 15 minutes of arrival we were registered, had vital signs taken, and had a throat swab done. We are now in the waiting room waiting for the results. I highly recommend anybody who needs any kind of care stay clear of this urgent care center.
Definitely not far enough away from the bad side of town.  If you are a female and go there by yourself, even in the middle of the day, be prepared to have people think you are hooking and yell out to you.  Not kidding.  Wouldn't go back there to save my life, sorry.  It's pretty but I've seen a lot better, and felt a lot safer.  I honestly don't know what these other reviewers see in it - I must have gone on a very very bad day apparently.
Got a call from a different sprint store(a "third party" sprint store) yesterday saying that i was due for an up grade next month but i could have it 1 day early(today) if i wanted.  so i talk to my husband because we thought our upgrade was in may and we wanted iphone 4s's.  so today i happen to be downtown and see a sprint store(a corp. store).  i walk in and right off the bat this guy (chauncy) is being straight up rude.  i ask him if i can get this deal right now, in his store.  he tells me that i can call sprint and ask them if they will bump my up grade to today( a whole 24 hours) but he cant do that for me.  he then walks away.  i call sprint from inside the store and sprint tells me no.  so i pack up my kid and my things and i leave.  no one says goodbye or offers to explain to me why they cant do it but this other store can.  long story short, i just drove to the "third party" store and i am now playing with my new iphone. guess chauncy really didnt want to make much money today
I was a little disappointed with the lunch special. I ordered 1/4 chicken and white rice and beans. I think the rice and beans were good but the chicken was dry for sure. It was dark meat too which leads me to believe that the white meat would be worse.   The worst part of the experience was the tres leches. It was not at all like the picture. There was no topping and it was pretty dry too. Please do not order this based on the picture they show.   I might go back to try the fish from reading the other reviews.
blech!  Horrible dinner tonight.  There were 5 other tables all sitting with their menus for ages and not able to get the wait staff's attention.  They were ignoring most of us and once we finally ordered and then finally got our food, it was not worth the wait.   Bland chicken curry.  Icky everything else.  I will never ever come back.  Bad service, worse food.  Stay away.
This is my first entry in Yelp and after my trip to Vancouver, I have a reason to Yelp.   I went up to Vancouver for five days/four nights, with my girlfriend, and thought the Empire Landmark Hotel would be a nice place to stay. The price was good, location was right, and the website made the interior look great. During the time we spent here, we found the front desk to come off a little rude and short with their answers. They put us on the 20th floor which over looked Stanley Park but that was about the only nice view we had. The room was small and looked as if it wasn't updated since the mid 90's. The towels were scratchy, the sheets were just average, and the room gave off a vibe that it could have been filled with bed bugs at one point (it didn't though). The TV was an average 19" and when we rented a movie (not a skin flick BTW) the sound was all off on the video. I called down stairs where they then sent up maintenance to check on it and they went on to say the $11.95 charge would be taken off of our bill. When we were checking out, the charge was still there and they questioned me as if I was lying to them about the sound issue.  For the money, this place wasn't very special at all and I think next time I'll save some money and go to the Holiday Inn.  Overall my trip to Vancouver was great. Friendly people, beautiful scenery, and great food. The hotel experience wasn't so good though. Two Stars for the  Empire Landmark Hotel!
I have been going here for years and have loved it. but today when I went, the lady was rude to me in the first place and when I went to eat my food you'll never believe what I found. I know this sounds absolutely insane but I found a rock. I was very surprised and when I went back to tell them out of courtesy, the worker looked at my rock and then looked back at me. She then spoke to a co-worker and came back and told me that since I had eaten some of the food I could not get a refund and then she threw the rock. She did not apologize for their mistake.
The worst experience ever!  The place is nice but the management is horrible and if they don't find a new one I don't see them being open long.  I didn't like the drink I received because it was very sour (Bronx bomer) which already took an extremely long time, and as you can imagine the next one took even longer. I waited patiently just for the server to tell me they couldn't fix it because they were out of an ingredient.  (I don't understand why they tried to make it if they didn't have the ingredient) apparently the missing ingredient was also the same thing needed for the drink I wanted to substitute it for,  so I just went with a basic vodka cranberry that took Forever! When I tried to express my problem with management I couldn't because they never came and the worst part was that I seen him intentionally not come the table.  I didn't want anything free just wanted to let him know the bar issue so that he maybe could fix it but I now know why everything in there was disfunctional. Overall I didn't really drink, the singer was off key the whole night, and the food took forever as well.  I will never go back and I don't encourage anyone to spend their hard earned money there.
I spent over six (6) weeks in India on vacation. So, I am familiar with Indian food. I thought the food was okay, but for what I paid, I am very unhappy. I got takeout and I received  small portions and a big bill. For the money, I would rather go to the other two Indian restaurants in Brookline.  Also, the interior of this place is yucky and when I drove around the back of the restaurant to exit, there was so much junk that I was afraid of getting a flat tire. Very bad impression. Dirty, messy. I would never go to this place again. Over priced, very small portions.
I've been to a few Chef Hung's beef noodles before, including the two in Beijing.  The food in this one in Westbrook Village is quite nice, but the service is horrible!  Especially that male manager who's been rude and dismissive both times I was there.  Anyone wants to try the beef noodle there better watch out for this guy.  He seems to be the only male employee there.  All the girls are super nice though.
Wahlburgers , fancy burger joint or sad attempt to advertise for his brothers movies. Although I do enjoy the movies for the most part the burgers were somewhat lackluster. The waitress who guaranteed us their meat was so fresh they are not afraid to cook it rare, medium rare or well if ordered that way was unable to deliver a medium rare burger not only once but twice. An appearance from the manager would have gone a long way but we did not receive that or any type of discount off my $11.00 burger for the long wait while we watched our second burger sit under a heat lamp until only the waitress who ordered it could deliver it! Unfortunately the onion rings being the only thing we enjoyed are just not enough to get us back to this restaurant!
Came here this morning to have breakfast with my daughter, when we walked in, not one of the many servers, greeted us. Then when we were finally approached, no smile, no how is your day. Nothing. Our server, Jane, seemed to also be in a bad mood. Hardly smiled and seemed like she really didn't want to be there. Made the whole experience sour. Although the food was quite good, I would not recommend this place to anyone because of the horrible service I received.
After waiting more than an hour for a table we were asked to sit at the bar. We agreed. This bar was outside on the patio near a drafty makeshift tarp door. As soon as the little table near us opened up we moved to it as it had a nice little heater under it. We were then asked to move back to our original seats. Boo. I'm getting tired of amazing food at resaurants in Portland with wait staff who have attitude problems. If you own a good resaurant be warned that people will eventually stop coming if you have grouchy employees.
Lame ride! I want the 2 hours of my life back!   If the line is anything more than 45 minutes, don't bother. This 5 minute ride is mildly entertaining at most.
Wow. What a waste. I knew this place was a tourist trap and only went because a bunch of other people were going with work.  Though the waterfront setting is nice, everything else is very much not worth it. The food is only mediocre at very high prices; the service is lackluster; the music is loud and terrible; there are paper plates. Paper plates? At ~$30/person for lunch?   I'm not the biggest fan of Legal Sea Foods, but for approximately the same price, they prepare seafood much more skilfully, in a better setting.  Had my boss not been very kindly picking up the tab, I'd be pretty upset at having blown my money here.
The food is very low quality and the service barely luke warm.   I have tried it a few times hoping that i had caught it on a bad day but it just seems to keep getting worse.
This breaks my heart more than anything else because my boyfriend and I LOVE their wings and their wing salad!!! BUTTTTT I've really had it up to here with this place - this is the second consecutive time this location has messed up my order. Finally I asked for the manager (the first time he was "busy cooking") and all he could offer me was 5 measly dollars off the NEXT time I order which means nothing to me because I will never order delivery through them again. When I asked for 5 dollars off of my order for the present order he called me "hun" and gave me a disingenuous apology. Sorry Wings over Brookline I gave you a second chance and you continued to disappoint two of your biggest fans
Overpriced Average Italian Food. We decided to go to Andiamo's on a Friday night. We decided on the menu by viewing it online. The service was outstanding as it should be - it was quiet. The atmosphere is very typical "Italin-esque", but it didn't have a cozy feel to the restaurant.  The Food: Gnocchi were of average quality. The sauce was medicore, very thin, and the halved cherry tomatoes were an odd addition. My fiancee had the shrimp risotto, which was rather bland, but the shrimp was cooked very well. We finished the dinner with a $8 cannolli. We were shocked to only receive one cannolli, which again was average. The bottom line: Good service, average italian food, and certainly overpriced! I judge a restaurant based on whether I want to go back. Sorry, Andiamo's...you didn't make the cut.
It's been 1 hour and a taxi has not even been dispatched to my location yet... When I called for an update the lady just said "I'll keep working on it" no apology no sympathy... I'm going to be so late for work... This is unreal.
Small portions and overpriced for what they offer. Our party tried a variety of their dishes including their german pancake, biscuits/gravy, and breakfast burrito. Food tastes alright but it's nothing special and it definitely doesn't justify the price. I cant help but feel a little underwhelmed when i pay $60 + tip and everyone is still feeling hungry. Would not go back unless there is a dramatic change in price.
We stayed on August 16, 2018. Around 10pm, out came the bed bugs! Room 6418. Immediately we checked out and were assured we wouldn't be charged. Even gave me a folio showing no charge. Next morning, the room charge shows up on our card. It is now September 14; and after speaking with numerous reps and being promised credits 3 or 4 times and waiting the 5-7 days, no credit has arrived. I'm now disputing with my financial institution. What a nightmare. Stay away from this place. They admitted to me that because of the prevalence of international tourists, bed bugs are tracked in somewhat often. And customer service is beyond terrible. Based in the Philippines. Be aware!!!
The food was great .. we had breakfast... the service needs some work...  we had to ask for everything ... hopefully the waitress was just new    Gave it a second try. Service is crap. Will not go back
Wow... the only thing on this menu that is not deep fried or covered in a garlic butter sauce is the shrimp cocktail!   OK... not totally true, there are also crab legs & lobster.    Went there this evening for a private party.  The restaurant was great in hosting us and we had 4-5 dedicated servers.  The only drawback was the servers hadn't decided how to split the room prior to our arrival, so it was 4-5 servers running around the room taking orders with no rhyme or reason.   At the end of the function, it was chaos as people were trying to leave and the servers were trying to match up the checks to people...  crazy times!  Anyways, the food:  Nothing that I was going to eat... save the shrimp cocktail.  6 medium sized shrimp in an artsy-fartsy presentation on a rectangular plate.  It was good, the shrimp were fresh but at $1.33 per shrimp, I'll skip it the next time.   The other orders at my table were: clam chowder- soup like, smelled like clam chowder (yummy!) and was nicely presented with freshly shopped parsley;  Lobster Nachos- nasty greasy chips, haphazardly piled on the plate and splashed with a creamy "something" sauce and a small amount of lobster meat (they were hardly touched- that nasty); A child's chicken tender meal-standard; and of course the cheese biscuits- flaky, tender, cheesy, greasy, garlicy goodness!  If you want a good seafood meal, I'd go elsewhere... , I liken Red Lobster  to seafood as Taco Bell is to good Mexican cuisine, but if you want fried, greasy grub that is serviceable then this is your place!!
I hate to kick a local business but this was the worst slice downtown out of all of them. Granted, I haven't been there in quite a while so it might have changed by now but I remember the cheese tasting cheep and being very oily. The crust seemed very limp like it wasn't cooked long enough but I could be wrong.
I'm writing this review to tell a tale of my experience here.  I used to visit this store frequently for myself.  It was fun and well priced.  However, maybe about 4 years back things changed.  You used to go in and snag a half way decent chair, desk, or sofa regardless if it was newish or had a "label" for about $75.  The furniture back then was really reasonable.  I understand that they wanted to keep the antique dealers at bay and this may be the reason why the prices spiked, however, in doing so they have basically increased the price for all including those people who really are in need.  I now go in and look at the furniture and a housewares and feel really angry that some unsuspecting person will go in and pay $300 for a used piece of furniture in thinking that they are getting a good deal.  Not so,  it's better to go to a discount furniture store (Building 19 or even Bob's) and buy new for $350.  I thought the purpose of the store was to help those who couldn't afford new have something nice, not to rip them off.  So the antique dealers aren't buying in there hardly anymore (they used to swarm around the trucks unloading on Friday night) but now the people who don't have a lot of money can't happen upon a great deal too.  I don't know how extensive the antique dealers would buy and resell, but it would appear as though there is a bigger profit happening at Sally Ann.  Is that money really going towards the programs they have and not into someone's pocket?  I rarely if ever visit this store anymore.
This review didn't even get to the coffee. Be aware that when you walk in that there minimum purchase if paying with a card is $3. That said the lack of actual customer service will be a cold slap in the face. These "Batista's" and I use the term lightly, will screw your drink up and still make you pay for it as stated by the signs on the cash registers. There is a reason Starbucks is king, not that I think that they have the best coffee, it is called customer service. I think it's time for this store to be turned into a pet shop.
Decent little place, nothing special.  Food was decent, service was good but then we were the only table in the place so I would expect the service to be good.  One dish was slightly under cooked, the other was fine.  Restaurant was clean, nice view from tables in the front.  Waitress was very friendly.
It's pretty... If you like instagram more than real life then this is the place for you! They do have games, but the place is not set up in a way that encourages game play. The drinks were pretty gross as well, they looked cool, I got a romulan ale, while it was blue and it smoked, it tasted like smurf anus. The bartenders are predictably girls in short shorts that are slightly game themed. You can see that they sunk quite a bit of cash into the decor, but the execution and the overall feel of the place isn't there. I don't believe I'll be making a return visit.
I want say that the previous issues have been resolved. I tend to react before discussing the problems and apologize to the provider for this. There was some misunderstanding and this has been worked out.
The food was okay but the service was crappy. I wasn't even finished with my food when they gave us the bill. When I asked to takeout my strawberry shake, because I couldn't finish it, they gave me a rude reply and handed me a plastic cup. I rather spend my money somewhere else.
Jeez, what a waste of a perfectly good building. I mean it's just such a pretty Art Deco inspired building, but there is none of that spirit.  We went on a Saturday night to do something sweaty before cooling down at the W, and it was really little more than a casual prom dance.   If you want the illusion of class without having to do any of those silly things like have taste, anything better to do on a weekend, or opinions on things like music, than Felt is the place for you.   I mean, if you like top 40's music, but hate having to listen to it on the radio than you will love Felt. If you miss that summer after high school when you and your bros would drink a thousand bud lights before passing out in your outfit that you picked right off the mannequin at Abercrombie an Fitch than felt is the right place for you.  Maybe that sounds too cynical, but there really isn't anything about this place that makes it any different from another top 40's dance bar. Just go to whatever one is closest to you.
2 stars are literally for the queso...what is crazy is I just went last week when they first opened and was very impressed with the tostadas, romaine letter and the cheese was not finely shredded..I go back today and no exaggeration it looked like Taco Bell's tostada. Cheap lettuce and cheese
You know this bar would be awesome if they didn't have that huge door guy Craig who sexually harasses women and then constantly harasses them when they turn down his advances. Don't expect the owner to do much about it either. Honestly the bar staff and some of the shows they play is the only thing worth going for at the risk of having a run in with that disgusting door guy. Good luck ladies.
Zay-E-Lee is usually perfect.  Today was not a perfect day.    I ordered my usual crispy catfish, my wife ordered spicy basil chicken, my son ordered beef stir-fry and we had about 4 appetizers. I bite into my crispy catfish and realize that the fish is not the freshest and my wife tasted her chicken and realized that the chicken might have been bad or rotten or old or something, either way, the chicken tasted horrible.  We decide to inform the server that the chicken didn't taste fresh, she states "Well, it's the chicken that we have been serving all day and it's the same chicken in your coconut soup."  By the way, the chicken in the coconut soup tasted old as well. Instead of just taking it back, the sever got a bit of an attitude with us.  My understanding of customer service is that when a patron tells you something isn't right with your food you apologize, take the food back and offer another solution.... none of which she did.  The server was more concerned about how much we were going to have to pay for the replacement food than the fact that chicken literally tasted rotten. To top it all off she charged me and extra .50 for about 1 tablespoon of ginger sauce.  Mind you, this was over $75 of food we ordered.  To be treated poorly for sending food back and being nickel and dimed for ginger sauce is pathetic.  If this is any sign of the future for this restaurant..... you fill in he blanks.
So East Dedham Nails is has a new owner and the new name is TopCoat Crew. The family is from Wellsely and let me tell you they must think East Dedham is a sister town of Wellsely. I got a gel manicure and it was $41 . $41 where most places around here charge $25-30 and my mani did not come out any different than any of those places.
2017 - I went to drop off my dog for a grooming appointment.  I saw two groomers holding a small dog down and pulling hair out of the dog's ears... they were PULLING, not trimming with a buzzer or scissors, but barbarically PULLING!  The dog was making the most heart wrenching cry sound.  The dog was in pain and scared.  I asked them what are they doing, they explained to me that breed of dog has hair growing in the ears and need to be removed otherwise the dog get ear infection.  They told me the previous non-Petsmart groomer didn't remove the hair.    I don't know what they tell me is true or not but can't they cut the hair instead of pulling?
Second time here. The first time was fun at happy hour. My friends and I had a few drinks and it was a good time. Until my friend became to drunk and they kicked us out which is fine..... But they double charged my other friend on his card.   Second time.... We show up after work. It was busy but not over the top. We just wanted food and drinks. Drinks, good. Food, not so much. menu isn't descriptive, nachos have 7/11 cheese and the burger meat taste like I got McDonald's.
Been here twice...can't see myself coming back unless every other place in the 20 mile radius is closed and the only thing in my fridge is mustard.  I usually take negative yelp reviews with a grain of salt- but the 20 reviewers that complained about the service before me were not being dramatic. you basically have to stand up and wave your arms frantically to get their attention.   Now to the pizza....we did a half/half situation. half fig&prosciutto, half special (basically a Hawaiian named something fancier). the fig and prosciutto must have required less oven time or something because it tasted like burnt parchment paper.  At first I thought they forgot the Gorgonzola cheese but no- it was just too burnt to taste.  So I guess my first pointer is coordinate pizza choices by cook time? or just bully your dining partner into one kind.   Now for the tight seating....I get-small restaurant- but if you didn't know any better you would've thought we were a four some with the couple next to us. we were sitting that close.   next time I crave pizza I'll probably just get dominos. cheaper, faster, and not burnt?
To start off, let me just say that I really enjoy Trivia Night, and Harpo's is a great place to meet up with people for drinks and games. This review is strictly separate from trivia night.  As for the service, I have yet to meet server with much else to offer than a pretty face. They're a bunch of snooty self-entitled high school/CU sorority girls using their skinny bodies for better tips. They've never been friendly to me; whenever I order a drink, they make me feel like I'm just another nuisance on a busy Tuesday night. I wish they'd at least give me a fake smile.   You'll probably like this place if you're a total bro. I'll go to Trivia Night, but I wouldn't frequent here for anything else. The bartenders don't understand the appropriate time to cut someone off either. I told them to cut my friend off before all those drinks she had would get the best of her, but they were more interested in being entertained by drunk hot messes like her than concerned for customer safety. Pretty immature, if you ask me!
We always say we're not coming back and we do. Since my burger is spicy (and good) and my drink has been empty for 15 min (so have my kids)I have some time. This place is so badly managed during peak hours. Do your self a favor and go to port orange location. Bummed.
Not impressed. I've always considered Dosha to be high end & professional but they appear to have abandoned their former standards. The stark, drab atmosphere feels less tasteful minimalist, more like an abandoned warehouse. There was no TP in the bathroom so I used a seat cover and their trash was overflowing. An employee was the last 1 in there, she probably should not have let me in there with the bathroom so unkempt. I've had a lame Dosha pedicure before, so when I got a gift cert. for a pedi for Xmas I decided to apply it to hair color instead. I'm in town for the holidays and my roots were bugging me. I'm aware of the varying levels of technicians & I requested a mid-level. My hair is bleached and I didn't know whether to book a retouch or a lowlight so I was surprised that the receptionist didn't require me to come in for a consult before booking. She didn't ask the length or type of my hair, its very fine but there's a lot of it and it's long. When I beheld the stylist I was assigned, I was less than confident about her abilities. Her hair wasn't styled and her overall appearance didn't give me that "Make me fancy like you" feeling. I determined it might be best to skip a root retouch and just do a toner on the brassy blonde so the grow-out wouldn't be such a glaring contrast. She can't mess that up too much. My ends were darker than the top and needed lightening before we did the overall toner to even out the color. We agreed to bleach the ends then tone. Ok. Then she got repetitive & dragged the consult out, having me sign a waiver which she took forever to fill out. I felt like I was at a beauty school. She soaked my ends in a lightener for a bit then she had a male stylist nearby come look at her work afterward- did I get an apprentice? Then it was off to the sink to wash and tone. Her nails in my hair were kinda grossing me out, it wasn't a delightful soothing shampoo. I felt my hairs snag and snap in her unkempt nails. It looked to me like she didn't leave the bleach on the ends long enough. I asked her how it looked, did she think the ends match and she said "they'd better after all that work I did". Okay chic you didn't have to weave or foil. When she walked away I grabbed the ends to compare them to the top and they looked darker. Wet or dry they should match. I was over it, the appt took over 2 hours- by the time I left I was late for my plans. She kept talking about how much hair I have. If the receptionist would ask basic questions about the clients hair when booking you wouldn't have any surprises. If long hair is too much work for you, go back to foiling dummy heads they probably let you sit down for that. She had someone help her blow dry me because of ALL of this HAIR that I have and continued to remark and huff about all my hair. I'm not Cousin It, its past shoulder length hair. I'm accustomed to being blown dry using a round brush, you know given some style but she just blasted it downward using a paddle brush. When she finished, she didn't give me a mirror to see the back and the lighting was so bad I was having a hard time even seeing how the color turned out. I had to stand up to see my hair, and she didn't ask how I liked it I just felt like I was dismissed. She was totally unapologetic about the poor lighting and when I remarked that my hair looked unfinished she said "Yeah it probably needs a flat-iron" so I asked if she was going to do that and she said she didn't have time.  "I underestimated how long your hair was going to take". I believe she had another client waiting. How rude to imply that it's my fault she ran out of time because of my hair length. I came in with my hair styled, I left with my style looking flat and worse than when I came in on a Friday night. I had plans in the neighborhood why should I need to go home and style my own hair when I just had a salon service? Turns out the toner she did worked pretty well- I was able to check myself out in proper lighting when I got to the bathroom at the BAR. I almost felt bad for only tipping her $10 on $85 but I just reminded myself that she didn't appear to care whether I was satisfied or not. She would've had twice that if she'd given 2 sh!ts
I used to love this place!! I would come from Pasco Washington just eat here sometimes. I haven't been here in about a year. Did they sell this restaurant? Service was rude, and pretty much non existent.. they don't have their super hot chili oil anymore either.. we were a table of 8 we only got 4 waters when we asked for more they seemed so bothered. Asked for forks.. never got them.. I won't be back.
I'm extremely upset with the lack of communication & proffessionalism with this establishment. I was attempting to have a specific issue (gas tank leak) repaired on my motorcycle. After having them take a look I was told that I needed to replace the entire tank. I asked if they would be able to order one that I found on-line & they detailed that I would have to order it then bring it in. So after going back to the shop to pick up my motorcycle (that I drove on its own power there) it broke down (while driving) a block from the shop. I called detailing what happened & requested a tow back to the shop (a block away) so that I may order the part & leave it in their shop. Needless to they said no & come to find out the tank wasn't even put back on properly. I gave them two stars bc they offered me refreshments while waiting however I'd never go there again & if you need car work done I recommend AutoTek off 71 near banister cause I found their actions, responses, and general nature malicious.
My Fiancé and I had been into the store a few times looking at rings and speaking to Julio about having an engagement ring designed.  We decided to bite the bullet and invest in having one designed.  First alarm bell was that he requested we pay in cash.  That should've turned me off immediately.  Second was the process - which was relatively hassle free - I say relative because the first time we got the ring back the design was wrong.    The ring itself ended up being beautiful and I loved it.  However here comes the awful part - I originally requested a moissanite stone for the centre stone as we weren't ready to invest in a diamond.  Julio talked me out of it and suggested I get a glass CZ - priced at $800.    Julio told us the ring would be valued at approximately $6,000 after completion.  After receiving the ring I went and had it independently valued, and it came back at $2,000 - we paid over $3,000 for the ring.   It came back LESS than we paid for it! How is this possible?? I asked the valuer about the stone and he said it was CZ stone worth around $60.  I explained to him the situation being charged $800 for the stone and he said he needed proof as there were no distinctive markings on the stone. I immediately went back to Julio and questioned him about how could the ring possibly be valued at $2,000 when we paid over $3,000 for it? And he said 'Because that's how much I charge'  The discussion became heated and all I received in return was utter rudeness and defensiveness - no solution from him whatsoever.  He would not give me proof that the stone was worth the amount we paid.    Ultimately we requested a refund on the stone and he said 'as soon as you walk out of this store no refund'  He said we could have an $800 credit note for a new stone in return of the stone when my Fiancé went in to discuss this with him, but we would have to pay his price for the new stone.  On top of this we waited over 2 months to get our appraisal from Saatchi and Saatchi and it did not come back at $6,000 as Julio had told us in the store, it came back at $3,950.  My Fiancé and I are by no means made of money, and this was a huge investment for us so for a time which is supposed to be the happiest in our lives it has turned into one of the worst.  I am heartbroken.  We were looking at having our weddings rings made there too.  I wish we had never gone into the store in the first place.  Beware - these people are predators and awful scam artists!!
ooooh not good.  The price I was given and the price I was charged were different. The manager did not handle it well. I was rung up for 70 instead of the 60 I was told I would be charged. They had already started cleaning my car and I explained this to the manager - that I wouldn't have chosen the package that was 70 and that he could ask the attendant with whom I spoke to verify that I was given the incorrect price. The manager was a jerk and said pretty much "too bad". Keep in mind I was very polite when I spoke to him. I think it was an honest mistake on the part of the attendant but the manager should have checked with him. and didnt.  THEN it took three days for my carpet to dry. This was a huge problem because I was traveling the next day which is why I wanted my van cleaned. I was told it would only take one day to dry which seemed reasonable. It was awful packing everything on wet carpet! I lined the floors with plastic bags to keep things dry. what a huge pain in the butt. I had a van load of stuff because I was helping my son move to a different state. We were traveling and had to bring everything inside each night along the way so that the carpet would dry at night. THREE DAYS! infuriating! It cost us a lot of time and trouble.
I don't eat here regularly although it's just a 5 min. walk from where I live.  I came here when I first moved to Waltham and I had the steak tip salad.  The iceberg lettuce just didn't go well with the overly charred steak tips.  It was so disappointing.  I would reccommend getting a standard pizza or something of that variety because I hear Cappy's can get that right.
Meh. I've experienced better.   I met up with two old friends at Myers + Chang and was really excited to catch up and share some food.  The catching up happened.  And it was a blast.  But one of us paid 6 dollars for 3 dumplings.  And they weren't spectacular.  I myself paid four dollars per steamed bun (about four bites.  It was a dollar a bite!).  It was expensive.  And honestly, the food did not live up to the price.   I do not plan on returning.
Just had MC for lunch again.  I cannot in good conscience not downgrade this place.   It's not better that any other nasty Chinese takeout place.      Good fried rice requires very little seasoning, usually just a pinch of salt and a sprinkle of soy sauce (for coloring more than anything else).   In order for fried rice to be good, it has to soak up the qi of the wok.   You see, it's actually a physical workout to stir-fry rice, and if you can't taste the labor of love that went into it, it's probably not good fried rice.  I doubt that much of the Pork Fried Rice I ate today met much of a wok.  It was just everything mushed together with a lot of oil and soy sauce.  I also ordered a second dish (I was feeling like a pig), the General Tso's Chicken.  It was more or less Sweet and Sour Chicken (think chicken nuggets) stir-fried with some veggies.  Seriously, this is the crap you feed gui-lohs, do I look like a gui-loh to you?
I have had better from Build A Sign. BUT recently I purchased 20 outdoor signs for our annual sale. They came AFTER our sale, and I had planned ahead following the shipping dates that were given when I ordered. 4 days before the sale, I got an email saying they would arrive late because they were behind. When I called after getting the email (still 3 days to spare for our sale) the sweet girl said "I'm not showing there is a problem, it should arrive on the original due date. DON'T WORRY!" So I did not press for expedited shipping. Only to get another email the next day saying my signs would arrive after the weekend. The quality is good, when I called today when I received the signs and nicely "complain" about my experience, the guy on the phone was so short with me and didn't ask any questions, just said he'd take 10 percent off my order and quickly dismissed me. He didn't even want feedback on how I talked with someone prior to him. I was trying to figure out how to avoid this in the future. SO in the future I may try another company. That guy was the worst. $25 back for $250 of signs I can't use.
Not sure why this was filtered but here is my original review from 10/29/11:  I just used my Groupon.  Though the food was good, the lacklustre service from the man was not worth the visit.  We got there about 1:50 PM and ordered two savoury crepes and a soup of the day and a coffee.  We did not get our crepes until 2:46 PM, nearly one hour later.  During that time, we waited patiently half an hour, and when they didn't bring our crepes, we asked them when it would be ready.  They told us we were next, but for the next twenty minutes, the guy continued bringing food to other customers who arrived after us.  I complained to the server/cashier, and he just shrugged and said they couldn't do anything as there were others he was serving. Well, there are so many other great cafes/bakeries around town, I will not waste my time here again.
Aweful and disrespectful people. We all understand that towing company and their business. But like this Towing service, no. Suppose you park in an empty plaza at Watertown for 30 minutes at night. You did not bother anyone or the business within the plaza since most of them are closed at night. They will earn every penny out of your pocket for their "service" from Newton (4 miles away). Just unethical business.
Not very clean, staff wasn't busy when we walked in, but there were tables covered in dirty dishes.  We had to clear our own table.  Staff/manager were unfriendly, almost the point of being rude.  Were waiting for the ferry, ordered take-out with 25ish minutes to spare... we ended up having to ask for our money back and had to run to catch the boat.  Very expensive for basic sushi, although I can't comment on the quality/quantity, as we never actually get the food.
If I could give this bar 0 stars I would. You want to get into his bar without waiting in the most ridiculous line you've ever seen? Slip the bouncers a few twenties. Saturday night 10 PM and there's a line of at least 80 people wrapping the corner with a whopping 3 people on the dance floor. Johnnie says they don't hold the line unless they're at capacity and that couldn't be more BS! There's a reason they have shades blocking the dance floor from the street... This place is such a joke go to the harp if you're in the area.   Your turn John tell me you don't do this I want a good laugh...
If i could give no stars i would.  I get this is a mc donalds but come on.. atrocious customer service and even worse management.  They get our order wrong every single time, its very dirty inside, very rude female manager, often out of certain menu items.  The last time we went there and ordered specific things in the kids happy meal and they just replaced other items without letting us know in hopes we would drive off.  When confronted the manager didnt apologize n rudely asked for the food back n refunded the money.  Not a toy in the bags and put fries instead of apple slices and they didnt have yogurt either and didnt consult us before putting them in the bags.   If you want to be angry about your order be sure to come here.
Only average tasting food, not outstanding, so the higher than average price they charge means it's not worth it.
If people think that this is good grilled cheese then they must have never made their own at home.    Highly over rated.
It is always hard to write a review when you have experienced a hotel during an event, however this hotel (by their admission) likes to do a lot of events including the Masters. Though it carries the name, look, and amenities of a "Grand Hyatt," this place appears to be set up to handle quantity...not quality.  The hotel was an official NCAA hotel during the Final Four and the rooms were very nice, the service divine, the food delicious, the garden was a nice touch, etc.  So why not give it 4 or 5 stars?  It was not safe.  The entire time we were there pick pockets, thieves, scalpers, and undesirables roamed freely through the hotel and the security staff did NOTHING about it even though it was happening blatantly in front of them.  I mean right in front of them.  While we were there we had all six of our NCAA Final Four tickets stolen, a friend had $600 robbed from her purse, and another friend had his wallet stolen.  When we approached security about this they called the police and took the steps needed to write a report but it was reactive not proactive.  We asked them why they were letting so many non-guests roam their hotel and the head of security snootily said, "This isn't Wichita, KS."  I travel for a living and have stayed in plenty of hotels as have every other member of our party...that statement was outright insulting and inappropriate.  In Kansas City the Intercontinental puts the hotel on lock down for Thanksgiving and the lighting of the plaza ceremony but the official NCAA Grand Hyatt in Atlanta can't?  I've stayed in the top 10 hotels around the world including the Oriental Bangkok...don't give me this "Go back to Wichita Dorothy" crap.  Scalpers hounded us in the entrance of the hotel with security standing feet away, they roamed the hallways, had access to the elevators, etc.  NOT SAFE.  That is why I am giving this hotel 1 star.  It is important to note that the front desk, concierge, room service, bar, cleaning, and all other staff members were phenomenal and becoming of what one would expect from a Grand Hyatt...but what is the point of luxurious amenities if you don't feel safe.  This hotel needs a new head of security, new security policies, and some serious apologizing before I would change my rating let alone consider staying there or even recommending it to anyone.  One of the major brands I work with is 2 blocks away and I can tell you we will not be using this hotel any time soon for our groups when they come to Atlanta.  As well, they charge $15/day for internet which is ridiculous in this day and age when you can get it free from Starbucks or even a Motel 6.  I prefer my treatment at Intercontinental where I get free bottled water, free WiFi, and free room upgrades vs. being nickel'd and dime'd at the GRAND Hyatt.  Lock your doors...the front door is WIDE open at this hotel.
I wanted to post a follow up on my review of Toyota of Braintree.   Following my review here on Yelp I received a call from the owner, Charles Tufankjian.   Mr. Tufankjian was very troubled to here of my experience and we chatted for a good 30 minutes about my experience. He took the time to figure out which customer I was, who my salesman was, and has taken steps to make sure what I experienced does not happen again. During the entire conversation he was extremely apologetic, concerned, and genuine.   While my experience (August 2012) was/is still factual and accurate, it is clear to me that such situations/tactics are not condoned my the ownership.  (Though I can't help but notice some with similar experiences on here 2 years before mine.)  While I won't be in the market for a new Toyota anytime soon anyone reading this should be aware that any such treatment will be rectified by the ownership before they lose another customer.  The owners phone call is a testament to effectiveness of Yelp. I have to again thank Mr. Tufankjian for taking the time to speak with me and his concern for my experience.   Also, he did not ask me to write this follow up either, but after our lengthy conversation and his genuine concerned I felt compelled to.
Quality of the items is good, but the staff is just other-worldly in their rudeness/smugness.
Recommended by an associate for there boil. Although it was quite a few customers, I didn't find it very good. The calamari was superb, but the catfish and chicken were not.
Pretender, usurper, clothes-less emperor - your regality is robed in fraudulence. You only prosper now because the Falafel King has not yet deigned to take notice your puppet principality on his western borders. When he stirs from his stronghold in Downtown Crossing, you will taste his wrath.  And his wrath tastes wonderful, truly kingly - perfect texture, perfect portion, perfect price - unlike your sorry excuses for shawarma, of which you claim yourself lord and protector  A tasteless undersized mess of dripping mush, any semblance of meat pulverized into unrecognizability, your offerings are not fit for the peasants who till your fields - perhaps not even their livestock.   Your kingdom stands on a flimsy foundation, your "Highness", your reign, strictly on borrowed time, false prince. Abdicate now, while you still have your head.
Food and atmosphere are equally terrible.  This establishment has gone way downhill and I will not be back.
I arrived in the midnight and it takes me more than an hour to get my car. There is only one person working there and he is on and off.. They directly charged the fuel service fee without checking or asking. You have to go to the window to remove the fuel service fee. And nobody is there! Seriously, this is horrible. They just wanna to charge you and waste your time.
I took my Sorrento Diamondback in to the shop here on Anderson Lane because the left pedal had reamed out its socket in the crank arm. Should be an easy, cheap fix: replace the crank arm. While I'm at it, I thought, I'll treat my bike to their top to bottom tune up--my main commuter vehicle deserves the love.   Five weeks later, after two trips, and $112 paid out, the bike is in worse shape than when I took it in. I can deal with the up-sell. "No, we won't replace the crank arm. But we can get you a new crank, new arms, new pedals, and new toe-loops." Fine, just get my bike back to me. "Sorry, man, the there's no workable cranks in the whole state of Texas. It'll be a while." So, three weeks later, my bike is back to me with all these shiny new parts, and I'm out $112. After all that time, you'd think they'd have had half an hour to give the bike its tune up, but that seems to have slipped the repair shop's mind.   Which is a pity, since if they'd taken the time to tune the bike, they might have realized that the new crank was completely incompatible with the front derailleur bracket. The bike wouldn't shift out of the gear they had it in when they installed the crank. So, back I take the bike to the shop. "We're going to have to order a new bracket" they say. Leave us the bike. So I'm out one bike for the second time. A day or two later, I get a call back--"Hey! Magic! We just adjusted the bracket. You're all set!" So I come to fetch my bike.   Today I rode in to work. Guess what--the chain still rubs fiercely against the bracket in several gear combinations, making terrible noises. I only really mind because my primary cruising gear range is completely inaccessible to me.   Follow-up: After three trips back to the shop, and the addition of some new, complimentary hardware (new chain, new front derailleur), the scraping is now back down to a manageable level. If you're willing to invest some time in making sure things are set right (I spent an hour an a half in the shop with the friendly tech, John, while he worked on trouble-shooting the chain grind), things will eventually be set right.  Follow-up: After 48 hours out of the AC'ed shop and in my nice, warm Austin garage, the chain is back to grinding at high gears. It looks like the crank that PB installed is just incompatible with the geometry of my old bike and grinding and chain-eating are just some things I'm going to learn to live with. This shop could learn a lot from the adage, "measure twice, cut once." Save your time, save your money, take your bike some place else.
There are good greasy burgers and bad greasy burgers, and Mooyah has bad greasy burgers.  They're a mess to eat and you can't get past the massive amounts of grease enough to enjoy the actual food.  I can't help buy feel like I'm walking into a feeding trough for overweight people with no self respect every time I go here.
Awesome bloody Mary (I had the cucumber & xxx combo) and very good coffee. Everything else left something to be desired. I got the special Cajun seafood  Benedict. The potatoes were burnt, the eggs were small, and I hardly got any topping. My friend got the Cajun ham bene and the meat was almost flavorless and was super fatty. Wait staff and beverages made our experience there decent. Probably won't go back.
This has to be the worst Popeyes chain i have ever been too. The line was short but soon became a chaotic zig zag and a mass of bodies trying to place an order or ask to see if their order was made yet. Maybe they didnt fry enough chicken for the dinner rush. Or maybe there wasnt a manager on scene. It took me 27 minutes from placing my order yo receive my food, than again it was a 14 pcs dinner. Maybe they dont get orders this big. But i did see employees walking to make an order and no one willing to take an order. I will NOT be going back to this location. What happened to standards?!
Food was pretty good -- the portions were decent.  Overall, not a place that I would go to again.
Good selection, pompous staff. I want to return the things I bought here just to support another business with more personable associates. When will charisma and charm to be cool again? Down with crotchety elitists!
Terrible terrible terrible food and service!!! This is my most terrible restaurant experience in this area. I have no idea how they got four star on Yelp. This leads me to doubt the credit of Yelp.
I would have given this place zero stars if I could, but had a good experience with the sushi, so bumped it up to one star.  Admittedly, I came with a Groupon, so I wouldn't say my experience was very normal. The staff was extremely rude and insisted on seating my group separately because we came with two Groupons. Although we were separate parties, the fact that we were all friends and came at the same time ticked them off. They also tried to make us use only one Groupon and come back next time to use to the other one (uhm...what next time?). The restaurant was nearly empty, but they purposely sat us on opposite sides of the room where we couldn't see each other. I understand that they were trying to protecting their business, but they way they treated us was shocking. If it weren't for the Groupon, we would have walked out on the spot and never came back. Being in the restaurant business is also about treating customers right, and this place utterly fails at that. They are losing clientele fast.  As for the food, the sushi was very good and fresh. Appetizers were good too, but not out of the ordinary. However, the Korean BBQ...if you don't think you can do meat wrong, think again. This is not what Korean BBQ should be like. While it's not absolute garbage, it does not ring true to Korean cuisine. I don't think this place should even be called Apgujung.
Came here on an impromptu date night with my hubby. Well...we had our toddler daughter...but we still made it out of the house.   I was looking forward to this dining experience because I had heard some really good things about this place.  The menu was unique. Filled with lots of different options for varying palates. I decided on the "chefs special" which was clams and mussels in a white wine sauce. It was overly salty and covered in some fried potatoes or onions which really didn't make sense with the dish. I just picked them off and put them aside.   Husband had the burger which was tasty, and our daughter had the chicken satay. She loved the sauce, but thankfully my husband was cutting up the chicken and noticed it was pink in the middle prior to giving it to her.  We sent it back and they cooked up a new order, but our poor toddler didn't understand why her food went away!   They also made a mistake on our drink order. Waitress was friendly and bubbly, but didn't offer any remedies for the mistakes.    Would like to try the sushi, but I am unsure if we will be back.
Usually a big fan, but after breakfast today, we may not return. Food was tasty until my wife found a hair in her food halfway through eating. Definitely wasn't hers. I saw it and it was a different color and texture. My eyes aren't perfect, but even I could see that! Another waitress takes it back. Our waitress comes back and says she is deleting it from the bill, no problem. That's fine with us. It was $5. Who cares either way?   BUT then she KEEPS TALKING! She tells my wife she is sure it's her hair because it wasn't there when she set down the plate! My wife goes into all sorts of reasons that it's not her hair - it was buried in the sauce, it's not her color, etc . . . and she still insisted it was my wife's hair!   We did tip, same as the incident at Enoteca Vespaio, but I sort of regret it now. Really weird attitude. Definitely wrong to be so accusatory towards a customer. Probably should have said something. I was just in such shock that someone in customer service would speak that way to us that I just wanted to leave. Doubt I will return. My wife will definitely not.
This has the feel of a total tourist trap. The service was nothing to rave about and the food was bland, especially for the price.   Boston has so much more to offer. Save yourself the trip and go somewhere else.
Don't go if you're not one of the known people. I was watching the giants game sitting at a high top  4 th quarter and the manager just changes the game and doesn't even bother to ask who is watching it.
Chicken was very tasty but for the money really wasn't with it. The portion I received on a take out order was very small. I ordered a half chicken and they must forgot half no white meat was included. Collard greens were tasteless and a very small number of fries. I'm not sure I would go back.
I'm lucky enough to have 3 Waffle Houses within like a mile of my house so needless to say I won't be returning to this particular one.  We stopped in late on a Monday night, they weren't too busy.  A guy behind the line, who seemed nice enough at first, told us he'd be right with us but then disappeared for like 5 minutes.  When he finally returned we ordered our food to go- 2 patty melts, 1 just the sandwich and the other a meal with hashbrowns and a soda.  When it came time to pay my husband questioned the $17+ price (on the menu patty melt meal was only $7, so why would one meal plus just one sandwich equal so much?).  The guy seemed immediately on the defense.  As I was signing my credit card receipt I pulled out the itemized receipt stapled to it and said to my husband "Here's an itemized receipt, you can look at it", just then the guy reached over and rudely snatched it out of my hand and said "No that's our receipt".  He wouldn't even let me look at it, nor did he proceed to offer me another receipt or an explanation of the costs.  Seems very shady to me.  My husband was obviously irritated at that point and started gathering up our food, noticing there was no mayo or ketchup packets (like they normally give you with patty melt meal).  "No mayo?" he asked the guy who answered with "Hey, I was yelling at you from across the room asking if you wanted ketchup and mayo".  Really?  Yelling at us from across the room?  This type of so called "customer service" is completely unacceptable in my book.  Waffle House is a southern tradition- this should include our famous southern hospitality.  My husband asked for the guy's name- which was Brett- on the way out and said he's never coming back there again when Brett proceeded to yell back at us "Good!".  Goodness, I felt like I was in elementary school again it was just so childish.  We left there feeling ripped off and insulted.  On top of it all our food was poorly prepared- the bread was not toasted and mushy while the meat was overcooked.  Just overall a truly horrible experience.
Food was ok. Expectation was very high considering reviews, but all that cold windy travel went in vain. Dumplings were overcooked and thukpa taste merely like a soup. Honestly campbell soup tastes better than that. Server didn't even ask if we liked the food. May be she wasn't even confident about food coming out of her kitchen.  Food was ok but reviews and the food price tag in menu was making me expect a lot. The place is overrated in Yelp.
On several occasions I have been transferred to the owner Kris Kratsas for questions I have had on my large orders and every time is amazes me how rude and stuck up he can be I have never seen a company care so little about their costumers. Sweet has lost my business and so many others. **STAY AWAY**  A FEW ALTERNATIVES  Georgetown Cupcake Lulu's Sweet Shoppe Crumbs Bake Shop Cupcake City Cupcakes On Centre
Won't be going here again. Our server was really nice but the food was tasteless (both salad and main entree). To top it off, the staff turned the music off 45 min before the place closed and started eating at the table next to ours. Turned out to be a really awkward experience so we quickly finished our food and left......with 90 less bucks. Oh and for those of you who like low lighting, this place was pretty bright so don't go here for a romantic date.
I've heard great things about this place from friends, but after coming here a few times under a few different sets of circumstances, I have to say I probably won't be coming back. First of all, parking is a nightmare. This is a huge place on the strip that's pretty busy during open hours, so the 8 parking spots in front are always full. But all around you are "towing enforced" signs for all the other shops with too few parking spaces, so you've usually got to plan for a good long walk ahead of you. That can be a pain if you're coming there to sell clothes, both coming in AND going out (because you WILL be leaving with 95% of the clothes you came with). Which brings me to my next "meh" experience: selling clothes. I went there yesterday with my fiance and the casualties of our closet-cleaning- all the stuff we don't fit into anymore. We had called ahead and had been told that they were accepting mostly fall-winter items, long-sleeved stuff, sweaters, high-end stuff and stuff they have too little of. We brought all our cold-weather stuff- probably about 100 items in all. Out of our assortment of long-sleeved Ben Sherman shirts, Ben Sherman pants (new with tags!), my favorite (but way too small) black suede faux-fur lined jacket and tons of fall-colored slacks and other formal stuff, they took ONE thing. ONE THING. A brown sweater. We took the $2.88 cash instead of store credit. Which brings me to my next complaint- selection. Did I mention my fiance and I had a lot of great stuff to sell because it was too small? We all know what happens when you haven't been single for awhile. No I'm not a size 14 anymore. And that means that the only thing I can shop for at Buffalo Exchange are shoes. They don't buy or sell anything larger than a 16 for women and probably a 38 for men. Sad! Not saying they're fatty haters, and I certainly understand the concept of not offering something you can't make money on- but if that's their argument I find it hard to believe. There were plenty of other women there shopping who looked to be my size- but all leaving with nothing, or with shoes or jewelry. This is Texas, for crying out loud. There are some bigger girls here than what fit into a 16. Again, sad. Their prices are also not that great- they say they prefer to sell items that were in department stores "within the last 6-18 months," but what they don't say on the website is that their prices are pretty close to what you'd see in deparment stores in the last 6-18 months as well. Jewelry and shoes notwithstanding. Now for the good- customer service and location. The staff are always SUPER friendly, more-so than your average college-town hipsters, and they're right next to Toy Joy, so when you leave disappointed with a car full of clothes you don't want (or empty-handed), at least you have somewhere to go to cheer you up. It could be worse. If you're not selling and you're skinny and you drive a scooter or bicycle or walked there, you'll probably love it.
So far on a Sunday afternoon really terrible service for a sit in place :/ so disappointed in that. Annnd the service didn't change at all. Our waitress actually made a face at us while ordering (talk about super rude). There literally wasn't anyone else in the small joint. It seems more like a take out place than anything else. And for one coming from Boston, it really wasn't that good (but we went because there was parking...There wasn't, we looked for the parking place that people said they had and couldn't find it...Maybe we didn't try hard enough? I don't know). Anyway, really disapointing.  In terms of the food, I ordered the coconut thai chicken soup which was sweet. Actually sweet. So for me, it wasn't that good at all (not a lot of veggies but meh, for $3.50, I'm not going to make that big a stink). Also to be honest, I felt like the texture of my chicken was off, I don't say this often but it was almost like rubber, so that weirded me out. My sister got the chicken stir-fried dish with rice noodles that was actually pretty spicy and tasted good. This dish reflected what was said on yelp. My cousin's dish was also good, but not awesome so in the end it was the chicken stir-fried that was the best of all. Real bummer that out service was so lously and rude. No smiles, no nothing and very short of an eye roll from our waitress. So, will not be back for sub-par dining experience and food that was a hit and miss.
Amtrack should be ashamed. I'm Guessing no executives randomly check up on all the stations. Parking is horrible, they make riders have to walk so far at times. The staff is great just needs updating. Come on MAN!!!!!
Oh my gosh, where do I start?!?! Well of course it's the Waffle House so I'm not expecting 5 Star appearance but in regular Waffle House fashion, customer service was horrendous! We sat a a dirty table for over 45 minutes and the table was never cleaned from the previous guest... disgusted. Then the waiter tells the cook to make sure the eggs were well done because that's what one of the people in my party requested. Loudly this old cook replies "I don't give a damn I'm cooking eggs!" Just hoping one day I may run into a Waffle House with outstanding customer service... this sure wasn't it!
Visited Flip Burger on Thursday evening for dinner. Upon entering there was no one to get us seated, waited for five minutes & then went up to the bar to figure out if we need to just grab a table. Finally found someone who walked us over to our table. We decided on sitting outside on a perfect Summer evening.   Service was extremely poor, in fact for the first 20 minutes there was no one who even checked in to see if we wanted to order drinks / appetizers. There were 2 servers attending the outside tables, we noticed 2 other tables which were seated after us who were attended (they got their drinks) & we were still waiting for our waiter to take our order for drinks.   Ordered beer & onion rings to start - took another 20 minuets to bring the first beer. Our burgers came right along with the appetizer. Wanted a second round of beer - received that after our dinner was done.   Finally got tired waiting so had to go up to the counter to get the check - at which point our server showed up stating that he was extremely busy & apologized.   Very poor service & we will not be returning even though we love the food.
This business got so many bad yelp reviews that the owner changed the address from 3812 burnet to 8312 burnet. Same phone number.  Check out the old reviews for a real taste of what a terrible business this truly is.  I am giving this place one star because zero isn't an option.  The first time I broke the screen on my iphone, I took it to another place on Burnet / 183 (not ITech).  They replaced the screen in less than 10 minutes and charged $99.  Fine, but it worked perfectly after that.  Now, I break the stupid screen again.  Googled and this place (ITech) comes up.  Says 59,95 to repair.  I send my boyfriend down there and his son's phone also happened to be cracked, unlike mine his worked still even with a cracked screen.  He takes the phones in and they don't have parts to replace them.  So he goes and does a few errands and comes back to their "promised" time.  Not ready.  Comes back again later, my phone isn't fixed, they need to order parts that won't arrive for 3 days.  His son's is fixed..... SO WE THINK.  I went in and picked up my phone.  Screen replaced, it was working but icons don't respond and it is freezing up.  I thought it was having an Iphone moment.  Nope, neither of our phones are working properly. Both of our phones have a speaker out.  Wow, what a coincidence.    I am so pissed off!
This guy helped train my dog who was a bit older.  I can't fault his methods as there was significant improvement.  As someone else said, you definitely have to do the homework.  However, I found him very expensive and pushy from a sales perspective.  There were a few addons (e.g., a better leash) that he sold that were 2x the price at Petco or PetSmart for the same product.  All in all, my dog benefited from what we did together but I'd be hesitant to recommend him due to the cost and his pushy attitude.
If all meals from this place are like the one I just ate, I'd suggest finding an alternate restaurant. My fiancé and I had this meal delivered by Zifty (which is great, btw) but I felt like I ate something the driver cooked and brought over. I had the sesame chicken which consisted of 10 small bites of chicken with some veggies in a dirty dishwater-esque "sauce". Very watery with no flavor. The chicken tasted like the only seasoning on it was salt. My fiancé had a tofu stir fry that had all of six pieces of tofu in it. I didn't try it... I mean, it's tofu! I'm not eating that! But she seemed equally displeased with the quality and flavor. We each got rice; fried and brown, each mediocre. When we were cleaning up, I got excited about the prospect of having a fortune cookie since I expected it to be the best part of the meal and I needed something to take the taste out of my mouth. Alas! No cookie... Just a bag filled with disappointment and spilled soy sauce. :(
Stopped here today for lunch after having read about it some time ago.  Nice selection of beer both bottled and tap.  Good selection of sandwiches however, the bread used to make them leaves a lot to be desired.  I ordered a pulled pork sandwich, North Carolina style, topped with homemade cole slaw which was supposed to come on a sour dough roll??  The pulled pork was great but the bread could not support nor compliment the sandwich.  It literally turned to mush on the bottom and was inedible.  I did however wolf down the pulled pork which was delicious.  The bread ruined the sandwich.  The same was true for my wife's sandwich which was chicken tips.  Part of the problem could be that the sandwiches are served in a plastic basket lined with a piece of paper that also turns soggy along with the bread.  Too bad.  The menu looked interesting and I would have liked to return and tried more but, as a result, I won't be returning.  A $9.50 sandwich should be made with better bread.
the facility was nice and very clean but the lady that helped us - young, platinum blonde hair, thin - was not welcoming. Since it was my first time wine tasting I was oblivious to what my first step would be. I started looking at the menu and asked her a question about a particular item on the menu and this employee interrupted me and told me to look at the menu and the description is listed on the bottom.  When this employee was giving us our wines, she didn't know the descriptions and came out with a partially filled bottle that wasn't even enough for my group (4 people).   All in all I just would want the employees to understand that not everyone is familiar with wines and customer service should be priority.  My sister, who regularly goes wine tasting, said that today's experience was one of the worst she has ever had.
Food was good but the service was terrible. Literally probably waited 20 minted until someone came and took our order and not to mention the place wasn't even full. There was only three people in there including myself. I think the only way you'll get decent service is if you place an order over the phone and pick it up. The server was rude and NEVER checked up on us. A guy practically had to do her job for her. Overall I learned only eat here if you're getting takeout otherwise go dine in somewhere else.
I'll admit I'm not a pho connoisseur, but I do recognize its healing powers after a night of drinking. As much as I like a good bowl of the stuff, I get bored at the idea of soup as my entire meal, particularly for breakfast. Bacon anyone? But anyway, my fiance, Carter, loves it, so I was excited when I happened upon Kim Phung Restaurant listed in the Chronicle as having the best bowl of pho in Austin. We decided to check it out on a chilly and rainy morning a couple weeks ago.  First impressions were fine (clean with the typical no-frills Vietnamese restaurant decor) with the exception of the fact that the restaurant was completely empty. Any pho joint worth its MGS should be filled with its faithful slurping on noodles on a weekend morning.   Carter ordered the pho, and I, anticipating a big brunch a few hours later, just ordered some spring rolls. A quick visual inspection of the pho, upon arrival at the table, did not inspire confidence. It looked watery, and an empirical test proved the hypothesis. Bleh!   The spring rolls were worse. They probably would have been better without the funky pork meat, but not by much. I actually took to just eating the peanuts out of the accompanying sauce.   Our quest for good pho in Austin continues...
I am never going back there.  First, the lady attending the store is very rude and unfriendly.  Not worth the trip.  They have very little to offer.  I go to England, so, I will not miss anything!  This place was just recommended to me and, so, I thought, I would give it a try!  Terrible place!!!!!
Wow, such a disappointment.  We ordered the beef doner "wrap" and a Turkish chicken "wrap," along with Turkish hot tea for both of us.  The tea came out first and if you've ever had Lipton tea, you know its taste in a heartbeat and that's what was served. No doubt in my mind.  Disappointment #1.  The very nice lady serving us then asked if we wanted hummus and with our assent, she quickly brought it out.  The pita was warm and the hummus was truly delicious and it was quickly followed our sandwiches.  Disappointment #2.  They were very small, about 4" in circumference, and wrapped like burritos on warm, but dry, tortillas.  I guess we shouldn't have assumed our sandwiches would be wrapped in pita bread?  Wrong.  My husband said his beef doner meat tasted okay, but was dry as there was no condiment whatsoever and the situation with my chicken wrap was virtually the same.  Mine was supposed to have a tomato sauce but did not have any, or any other condiment, until the last bite, literally.  Pretty dumb.  Once I noticed its lack of the tomato sauce with the first bite, I tried explaining that to our server, but she has some difficulty with English, so I then asked if I could just have a little bit of mayo on the side.  She came back with about four teaspoons of something like lite mayo.  However, when we got the check, we saw that we were charged $.50 for it.  Disappointment #3.  Don't mind the least paying for extras when it's just because I want extras -- happy to do so -- but this was to make up for their lack of execution.  Bottom line:  we're not going back.  Could we have discussed these complaints with the people there at Troy, yes, but given the overall circumstances with difficulty of communication and some really bad misrepresentation of food, we just wrote it off to experience.
this place didn't live up to my expectations but their pizza did. $5 for a beer is ridiculous and your better off ordering a whole pizza rather then a slice. the name drew me in but frankly you could go up and down 6th st  for this kind of pizza and service
Came here since other nearby restaurants were all full on New Years Day. Turns out that it may for a reason that others were full and Jade Dynasty was not. Summary would be average prices, below average food, average service for an Asian restaurant, lots of dishes unavailable when people ordered, and some hidden fees (tea!?). After leaving, both of us has an upset stomach; possibly due to undercooked xiao long baos. To provide the benefit of the doubt, we overheard somebody saying this was their last day of business before closing for renovations. Wasn't terrible, but left unimpressed and don't think I'll be back unless there are really no choices nearby.
We went for afternoon tea and pasties on Sunday... We had called earlier that week for reservations. Upon arriving they had no reservations for us in their system. We waited about 5 minutes while the hostess "was checking"  all along 4-5 empty tables existed. We were seated for a good 10 more minutes before any wait staff brought us menus. From there, another 10 minutes before ordering (it was very slow), and then the tea and pastries came. The tiniest assortment and 1 French press of tea for $45/person. What a major rip off, and the pastries were mediocre at best in taste. The waitress never came back, not even once to offer more tea or anything. Poor food, poor service, highly priced ! For $90+ tip we could of had a lunch in the North End and all the cannolis we can stomach! Won't be back :(
I won't come here again, the atmosphere is different. Can't blame the waitstaff, it's obviously the kitchen staff that need more structure or CLEANING! The food was horrible. We ordered fried pickles and the pickles were soaked in what looked like dirty grease .  They were not crispy. The mango chili chicken had no flavor. The broccoli was brown and so was the avocado.
You know the feeling in your stomach that you get when you decide that speaking to the "Manager" might be the only way to resolve a customer service issue. The question is, do you take the time or simply let it slide. For of us chose Shilohs based on making a few phone calls to check out happy hour specials.  The Margaritas were $4.00 and wings $.60ea No problem with the food quality but when the bill came wings were $.75 and my 2 margaritas were $9.50. It's not a great deal of money but.... you know. The server couldn't fix the bill but offered to have me speak with her Manager. I took the offer. I explained that I had indeed ordered my 2nd drink before happy hour ended @ 6:PM and the wing prices were wrong.  Imagine being told that once the order is entered in the computer, the "Manager" has no way to change it. I responded with the server and Manager standing there that I brought the issue to their attention and I would pay Shilohs or give the Server a 20% tip.their choice.  I have never ever stiffed a server before. It was not a pleasant experience. Friends at a local Golf course have changed their party plans to "Dakotas" another local eatery and a party of 6 in Cocoa Beach decided to change their plans based on our experience.  Unfortunately, Shilohs has not learned the art of keeping their customers happy.
Food = So So. Some items on the menu were pricey compared to the type of restaurant this is. I ordered the appetizer sliders. I wasn't very hungry but this was still filling.  Waiter Service = Our waitress didn't seem too happy. She actually was very unhappy and I was kinda scared to send back my drink that tasted like water than a Kamakazi. But I still sent it back and ordered the grape martini which was actually really good.   Drink = They specialize in martinis; I tasted a few and they were very strong and sweet. Which was fine for me. I guess I tripped them up when I ordered a Kamakazi cause it tasted horrible and wasn't what it was supposed to be.  Dunno if I'll return.. unless it's just for a martini.
Don't even waste your time.  I love to bowl but the staff here is so strange, unhelpful, and sometimes rude its not even worth wasting my time.  They have assenine rules that are a bother to everyone, they're unfriendly, and tell you they're open when they are closed and vice versa.  I used to love this place but I can't even stand going there.  I used to think it was sad it was going to turn into an apartment building but as many times as I have been disappointed with this place, I can see why they can't make it.
Two stars is giving them the bonus of a rounding up from one star and change. The place was packed at 7:00p on a Friday and good for them, making money is why you're in the business after all. Don't set your expectations too high, it's not an uppity type of place, just what we were looking to try. Yes, 1st time at a BJ's, ever.  Very sticky floor on the way over to the bar. Something must've spilled and wasn't cleaned up well at all. Our drinks were served within reasonable wait. We started with the Ultimate Iced Teas and chose to finish with them even though they were just okay ($10/ea.). Service was a very solid average. Reading the menu I notice the "deep dish" pizza. and think that's a great starter piece. We ordered the small sized (size #2 of 4) Classic Combo and added onion/pepper. The pizza came in expected time, however, it was just warm and not hot. The dough was chewy and seamed under-cooked. Toppings we distributed in an acceptable amount. Note: nothing "great" happening here, never mind excellent. Next we ordered the calamari. There was a reasonable amount and it was very warm, still not hot. But the squid was horrible. The tentacles were very hard almost crunchy and the rings were beyond chewy. This dish was clearly cooked wrong and long. We are no strangers to some fried squid and this dish had to be worst I've ever had. Because of this, we closed out. Five drinks, two app's, no dinner.
Out of all the food trucks in this area, and of all the ones that serve gyros I had to choose this one. SO disappointing. I got the lamb gyro and the meat was definitely pre-sliced from a loaf of some kind. The tomatoes were overripe and the tzatziki was just okay. The only saving grace was the pita. Service was slow.
Found a dead ant in my double bacon cheeseburger - was it better it was dead or  cause for more worry?
When you call this place they put you indefinitely on hold. What a service and good luck calling them. I called to inquire about tired fir my car after being in hold for 30 min I had to go.
I lost my phone. I didn't have insurance. I shouldn't be shamed for it.  I felt that I wasn't being listen too and as though I wasn't even there. I did not have a good experience. Ended up not getting a phone and walking out.
Having had take out from here three/four times I'm yet to have anything that warrants more than two/three stars... having eaten at many Szechuan restaurants/take outs across the GVA, the food from Wah Wing can best be described as sloppily put together food made from poor quality ingredients. Won't be back after tonight's shoddy offering.
I had tickets to Dr. John & Cyndi Lauper  This was a sunday night concert.  Tickets stated doors open at 6pm, with showtime at 7pm.  Great concert... amazing talents.  The downers:  The doors didn't even open til 7 or 7:10.  I had a ticket with a seat in the balcony, so there was no real need to stand in line.  Dr. John didn't even go on stage til 8:45.  Long boring wait... I guess this is the HOB's way of getting concert goers to by more drinks.  After dr. John, it took about 1/2 hour to rip the stage down and set up for Cyndi Lauper.  The entire concert ended at about 11:45pm... Although I loved both performers and they did an outstanding jobs.... this was way too late for those of us getting up for work on monday morning.  And not knowing that this would be a late night was part of the problem.  I can't imagine what it was like for the people who were standing the entire time.  Another downer:  no much ventilation in the balcony... no fan action... kinda warm too.  Also, my knees were too high... for a new venue, the seating has design issues.  Last downer:  They had two big screens on the 2nd level with camera's on the performers.  The camera angles never changed... just a long shot of the stage... My question was:  why even have them if they are not going to be used for close ups etc etc.  They were basically useless.  All in all -- I liked the HOB when it was in Cambridge.  While the show was amazing, I think the HOB mgmt and processes for running a show need big improvements.  Beware of Sunday night concerts... I'm just sayin!
The Parlor Room seemed promising, the decor is nice, if lacking some personality. Wait staff did a good job. We got the fried chicken, which was very salty and overseasoned. We also got the Bahn Mi sandwich, which was fine, but the fries were also powerfully seasoned. It's too bad, we were hopeful about this place.
Dear RMV, I have learned from my friend's mistakes in having all proper documentation and the best time to go so that we could have a pleasant first date.  I was in line on a Tuesday at 7:45a to greet you and was in a fairly good mood.  But not you, RMV.  No, no.  You had just opened your unforgiving doors at 8:30a and ALREADY I saw not one, not two, but THREE of your employees be rude to customers, one of them being myself.  It's 8:30am, RMV.  How are your employees already in terrible moods when the day has just begun?  I don't want to be there as much as they don't, but it is their job to deal with patrons like me.  I am paying you ninety dollars for a new license you insist I have because I am in your state, so how about a little courtesy, please?  Perhaps then people wouldn't grumble so much about having to visit your abode and we could have a pleasant relationship.  You are getting two stars for me aside from the ridiculous prices and rudeness because I was outta there at 8:55a.  Apparently you wanted our date to end just as fast as I did.   Truly, Arestia
After a night of hitting the bars and clubs, I was excited when my friends (Paul, Jeremiah and Jarrod) wanted to eat at Bamboo Luau!  Finally something that wasn't a Diner or Waffle House.  Walking in, everything looked promising, from the packed tables to the speedy service, but when it came to the food...I was really disappointed.  Usually after a few drinks, I could care less what the food taste like, but to be tipsy and really be able to say that my food was inedible is something to say within itself.  I ordered the Happy Family which is shrimp, beef and chicken with mixed vegetables in brown sauce.  What came out was a mixture of meats not even mentioned...scallops, pork, i think my beef look liked duck...ugh, i don't even know.  The vegetables were mainly carrots and onion and the bamboo tossed within it was a bit bitter/sour!?  I probably only ate about 1/4 of the dish and picked out the things that looked like what its suppose to be.    My friends ordered the basics of the General Tso and Shrimp Fried Rice which they said was OK.  I should have just stuck with ordering one of their "flaming" drinks.  (Yes, drinks served in a glass with a flame in the middle.)  I think I'll stick with Waffle House or late night McDonald's next time...
I have flown through American Airlines many times in the past.  For my last upcoming trip, I also decided to use AA.  But now, before my travel date, I regret using them and will definitely not use them again. I made a request to expedite my travel date due to a death in a family.  All I asked for is to change my travel date.  They said yes, but they were going to charge me $830 dollars to do that.  I know that they are able to waive any fare difference and other fees involved in this type of  situation.  As a matter of fact, my father is in similar situation but traveling through Delta.  They waived both the fee and fare difference.  So, how about that?  Next time, will choose Delta without thinking twice!!
This has to be the easiest place to review, now let me explain why. Theming and staff are awesome, 5 star start. You wouldn't expect the amount of class this place has to offer. The food is way over priced, really cheap ingredients are used and it simply doesn't taste good, much less like it should, down to 2 stars. I got red beans n rice as a side and it was exactly like reheated Chinese food white rice with a warm can of red beans poured on top. I also got some sort of shrimp appetizer that was recommended only to find it was 6-7 greasy hushpuppie-like things with no detectable shrimp in them. I paid the check before risking another $15-20 on a poor excuse for an entrée. This place has a ton of potential, they just need to pull in some chef's that actually know bayou food and match the ingredient quality to the price. For now I'll just walk across the street to Publix and grab a Zatarain's frozen dinner for a better quality meal.
Am i on the cusp of being at this restaurants downfall? I had gone here a couple months back and had excellent food. This time around it was a complete 180. We sat at the bar and ordered the polla con camarones ajillo (chicken with garlic shrimp) and she had the fried pork.  The best thing about this meal was the Fried Yucca which we ordered a side of. The rest was MEH at best.  One issue we had was actually getting our food. We were the first to sit at the bar top and order out of 7 people and the last to get our food. we were patient and we kept hearing (your food will be right out) but it took the longest out of the whole bar. We didnt complain nor brought any attention about it. When we got those dishes half was missing from each and took alittle additional time to get.  The chicken with garlic shrimp lacked flavor. Not by alittle but by alot. I was hoping to taste garlic but we couldnt at all. The sauce was watery and lacked any consistency on what i would expect a sauce to be. We had 3 little ramekins of that garlic sauce and put it on everything. We both feel kinda queezie and now think those were bad. I didnt think of it at the time but the consistency of that garlic stuff was more on the thicker side (possible built up slimyness). thinking maybe it was in that bar fridge for too long. Her fried pork was okay but it too lacked seasoning. The rice and the Yucca are the reason why this place gets one star above the worst. Like i said i had eaten here before and it was great. I ordered the Bandeja and the blood sausage was my favorite. i think ill try this place again and chalk this one up as an anomaly.
Order through UberEATS. They sent the wrong order and called to say they were redelivering it. 2 1/2 hours later I was still waiting. Despite the manager insisting they were coming, they have not.
This is a super bad barber shop, and the hair is dyed garbage! Color is a paragraph! Terrible! Upper half color, the bottom half completely no color! My scalp is full of color, tell me to go home and wash it! Even so, hair dye is a mess, hair root is all not color is the color of bleaching agent! White! Terrible! The bleaching agent is all over my face, not to help me get rid of it in time! Two of them almost fell into my eye! I don't care! I'm used to being stupid! I'm not coming to this store again! I will tell all the people around me not to come! Avoid the same terrible experience! The barber asked me to send her hair take to him, I did, I asked how long will it take to get the barber, he said 3 hours, I said so many years of experience in dyeing tell me at least 5-7 hours, he said no, the results gave me a 9 hours!!!!! Terrible! Nine hours is not the point. The point is to make a mess of my hair. I don't want to go out and see people! Bad mood!! Junk shop!
Decent portions, but I found the food (chicken teriyaki) very blah. Recently started working in the area and I don't think I'll be back here for lunch. Maybe some of the other items are better, but any teriyaki place is going to have their chicken teriyaki be the item half of the people order... and the fact it wasn't very good probably doesn't speak highly of the rest of the menu. The staff was very friendly and the place is clean... just wish I liked the food better.
I've been a big fan of this place for years! I recently saw and learn about their cross contamination. I will no it go back. If you're a vegetarian Maki lover or a vegetarian stay away! You will land up eating fish or meat "oh sorry, mistake" when you strictly order vegetarian rolls.
This pharmacy is the absolute worse. Slower than slow, ALWAYS. Today was another shining example: ordered my med refill on the phone last Thursday. The automated system asks when you want it filled. I say, Friday am. On Monday I go to pick it up and they tell me it's not ready because The amount of time needed has not elapsed but I could pick it up tomorrow. 345 at this point in the afternoon. Really?  Your going to make me come back. The young man behind the counter said we might be able to get it to you early, but the pharmacist told him no way. I'm sure there are legal responsibilities associated with not being able to give it to me two hours early, BUT, I know I'm going to go in today and won't be ready. It just happens way too much!   I could go on and on about all the times my meds weren't ready when they said they were. The only reason I stay is because it's close proximity to my home. Every time I hope it's gonna be a new, good experience, But alas it is not
Sorry but 3 stars would be too much. Came here before our flight just to try something new. On a Sunday late afternoon there was maybe 20 people. Waited no less than 25 minutes for a burger and veggie wrap. Wrap was wrong because the waitress didn't take the order correct. Waited an additional 10 minutes for another veggie wrap although that came out correct. Nothing special about their burger either. Should have went to Red Robin down the street. Unfortunately I will not make this place a repeat next time I have time to kill before my flight which is twice a month.
The food was good. However the service was terrible. There were only 2 other groups in the restaurant and our waitress managed to 1. Get our order wrong 2. Not check in after the food was delivered 3 Refill our water even though the food was spicy 4. When she took our order did not inform us that rice wasn't included. It was amazing how bad she was. She wasn't even pleasant.   Either get take out or don't go because a service business with such terrible service should not exist. Especially when there are so many waiters and waitresses working their butts off
I pulled in the parking lot at 8:48 it is definitely not 9pm yet and it's closed....extremely disappointed! Why say that your open until 9 if your not going to stay open until 9, someone else also tried to get in so you lost 2 people's business.
My mom and I came here for breakfast on Memorial Day. Got a table right away. Service was okay. Food...... Terrible! I ordered the house specialty which was french toast. It was supposed to be a custard french toast. It was NOT cooked all the way through. When I brought this to my server's attention, she said that's how it comes. The table next to us ordered it and when it came out, it was cooked all the way through. It looked quite different then the one on my plate. I asked for 2 scrambled eggs instead. She brought me a plate of half cooked eggs. I gave up at that point. It was obvious to me that this was the norm. When it came time for the check, I was charged full price for the French toast that I literally took 2 bites of. Then, the scrambled eggs I took one bite of was also charged on the bill. Ridiculous!  I didn't touch any of the food except the delicious strawberries and hashbrowns! I paid $13.50 for 2 strawberries and a tiny square of hashbrowns. Very disappointing. My expectations were higher..... Won't be going back anytime soon.
Decent food; do not expect any type of good service or you will almost surely be disappointed.
Wow. I haven't had such awful customer service in a hotel ever. Cancelled my reservation after a flight delay and will not reinstate my stay. Stranding me in Orlando on a business trip? What type of establishment would do that? Not on I'd ever use again!
I didn't want to write a bad review since I had a good experience with them in the past (they had cut my large sim card down to a small size for free when I got an iPhone). I got my mom an iPhone for her birthday and encouraged her to go to Tech Zone to switch her phone number from ATT to Ultra Mobile. After my mom's experience, however, I'll never be going to TechZone again or recommending this place to anyone.  The next thing I know my mom is calling me stating that the girl who helped her didn't ask her if she would like to transfer her same number, so ended up signing her up with a whole new number. Then, when my mom said that she would really wanted to keep her own number, the girl told her she would have to go to AT&T to get them to help. My mom promptly went to AT&T after and as expected they said that was not something they could do. My mom also asked the girl if she could have her transfer her pictures and contacts and the girl brought out this large machine from the back room that was so dusty that it didn't look like it had been used for at last 10 years.   My mom went back to UltraMobile and asked them if they could sign her up with UltraMobile with her old number without paying another $20 activation fee. The manager said no. My mom told the manager that the girl who helped her earlier didn't seem to know what she was doing. The manager said she's "good". When my mom told the manager that the old machine the girl brought out to "transfer" the contact list was covered in dust and looked like it hadn't been used in decades, the manager said that it was dusty because of the construction in the mall. I'm surprised she had the willpower to not call him a liar to his face.  I recommend saving yourself some grief and going elsewhere for your phone needs. I love to support small businesses but it's clear the people at TechZone have no knowledge of how to change plans or customer service!!
I got the Pad Thai and it was absolutely terrible!  It tasteded like noddles covered in hot sauce, but it didn't even have the slightest hint of spice or much flavor for that matter.  I would never go here again!  Beyond disappointed!
Realized that I left a comment on the wrong Fujis. This review is meant for the Fuji on 1546 Hancock. Wrote this review back in 2/13/2009.  I give this place 2 stars. Why? Well I went with my brother and his girlfriend the other night. I got there when the waitress served them their drinks and I asked for a ginger ale. Well 25 minutes later, i still didn't get my drink. So I asked another waitress, she brought it right to me after I told her what happened. She asked me who our waitress was, I pointed my finger (Hell yes, I did. I was pissed) - Well, our bad waitress acted all aggressive towards us the remainder of the night. We didn't let it get to us because that reflects on your tip (and yes I tip shitty for shitty service). Aside from that horrible waitress, the music was pretty damn good. The food was decent (Thank god someone else brought it to us, otherwise I would of questioned if the food was tainted). So I give this a 3/5. Truth be told. Beware of the one with the glasses (vague but I didnt get her name).  Update: I actually went here again last weekend (May, 2009) and guess what? they screwed up again. Took forever to get my sushi. And I was sitting at a table near a big group when really, I was there with only 2 other people!! They added the 18% gratuity (tip) to the receipt and charged it on my credit card. How shady is that?!
Went into this place with high hopes but walked out feeling I left hooters with c-rated food. Girls with skimpy booty shorts and crawfish that taste like msg was added. Service topped this off cause there was none. Want real cajun food? Not the place to go.
This was my choice for dinner my first night coming to Atlanta this past weekend. I am a wing lover and once I saw all the lovely flavors they had to offer I knew I had to try them out. I got extremely excited when I saw the "hot lemon pepper" flavor because I love hot wings and I love lemon pepper wings but I can never get them together. I was satisfied with the flavor but not with the size at all. I definitely prefer my wings to be a good size and these were like baby wings. Luckily I ordered 15 wings and smashed every single last one of them in one sitting. I normally would never have been able to do this so you can imagine how small they were. My girlfriend ordered old bay wings which are her favorite. She also ordered three ranches but instead received three blue cheeses which we absolutely hate. The server also called me lowkey rushing me asking if I was still coming. Mind you I'm from out of town and the highway was blocked off so I had to find my own way there without GPS. I let them know beforehand I was from out of town and it would take me a while to find the place. I was being courteous even though they didn't close for another hour.  I might visit a different location when I go back only if the wings are bigger.
Ordered a "pint"of sweet and sour sauce for about 4 dollars and got a very small side of sauce.   General gaus chicken was not good-- like something was wrong with it. (Discolored and didn't taste like chicken)  Delivery took over an hour.   In general, I was overcharged and wish I could get a refund.
Please please PLEASE get someone to handle customers at the hostess desk. Time and time again I have to wait to be seated and worse yet, wait to pay for my meal. You would think at peak lunch hours there would be someone to get you in a table. Nope. Not here.  Painful.
Let me begin by saying, if I were to rate the food that we received, it would have been four stars.  The pasta dish was well executed, the lobster roll was well done, and the oysters were of course well presented and great.  What landed this restaurant a one star review was the general operation of the place.  We came in at 9:00 and understand that it's a hour before close, but after a $200 dinner for two we don't expect to be rushed past a reasonable pace.  We ordered 12 oysters, 6 cherry stones, a bottle of rose and two entrees.  We never got our clams with the oysters.  I assumed they would come as a mid course, but our entrees arrived and they were forgotten about.  Since we didn't want to let our food die in the kitchen while we waited for our clams, we didn't say anything at the time.  Maybe the server just forgot and they wouldn't be on the check.    Towards the end of finishing our entrees, the cooks in the kitchen started loudly cleaning up, and using pungent chemicals.  They were just throwing every metal thing they could find into a metal receptacle on the floor.  Imagine how loud that would be when you are 4 feet away from it.  It didn't make for a very relaxing expierience, and certainly made us feel rushed, like they just wanted to get out of there.  On top of it they were using a strong smelling chemical to clean the fryer while there were guests in the restaurant.  The aroma of the boiling fryer did not complement out nice bottle of french rose.    When the check came my girlfriend was so disappointed with the expierience that I didn't want to make it worse by getting into a conversation about paying for the 6 clams we didn't get.  It's too bad that this night went this way, because we love the menu and open kitchen concept of B&G.  We will most likely not be returning, when there are so many other options like ICOB, and Select that do it right, and think about guest expierience.  All of the other restaurants in this group are great, and hope B&G can once live up to to Barbara's reputation at some point.    In closing, it would be a good idea for a restaurant to have an email address that links to a manager on their site.  If that was available, this review would have went straight to the restaurants inbox, instead of being written for all to see.
Got a Groupon with my mother for massage, facial, and manicure. Manicurist called out due to child care issues, massage therapist was late, and facial was so so. We won't be going back!
If you've never had real authentic Ethiopian food, you would say that this is good . However, if you have then you know that this is crap starting with the restaurant décor down to the food.  This is not good and I will check out other Ethiopian restaurants around the city.  Don't waste your time or money too commercial !
Have frequented this restaurant for a few years.  What was once consistently good food and friendly service has turned into a crap shoot over the last several months.  I contacted the Clackamas County health department after my last visit, which by the way, was my last visit.
Sat on the patio. Brought our own wine which we drank out of water goblets instead of proper wine glasses. Friendly but a bit slow service.   Food was ok. Green beans from a can was a big turn off, but most everything else was tasty. Especially enjoyed the dressing on the Aegian salad. $14 for the Shwarma plate, essentially a deconstructed gyro, seems too much. Constantly shooing flys off of our food, and the clear view of the very overflowing dumpster added a degree of yuckiness that was escalated when I picked up my handbag to leave, and found that it had been shat upon by a bird. I haven't used the bag since.
Honestly I don't know how this place has a rating higher than 1 star. Great place to go if you want to wait weeks upon weeks and never get an answer or any guidance because the staff and their underwriters are too busy vacationing to return calls or god forbid answer any questions.  We submitted everything for approval to the underwriter and after 3 weeks of waiting we still didn't have an answer. We also never got any response as to what we would need to do to get approved or what amount we could even be looking at. I have never seen a mortgage broker so lackadaisical. You are far better off going with a larger and more national company than a local one. A national company would have access to several banks not just a small local one. If I treated my customers like they do I would be out of business in no time!
I've placed my 1st order for real estate directional and yard signs from BuildASign and BOY OH BOY I must say, I'm none too happy with them!!  I placed my order last night after much frustration with their site because it would constantly freeze while I kept attempting to create my signs.  And to top it off, I noticed after I placed my order that they didn't apply the 50% off promo (offered to me via email) on my yard signs, only on my directionals.  The promo was the main reason i was placing my order with them in the first place!  I emailed them last night and called them twice this morning.  I received an automated email from them saying that someone would get back to me soon.  And this morning I called and was on hold for 22 minutes waiting to speak to one of their so called "Customer Love Team" members before I hung up and with the second call I put in my phone number so I would not lose my place in line and get a call back from them...well it's now almost 8pm pacific standard time so I guess their customer team ran out of love???   Now I'm just crossing my fingers and hoping that my signs arrive on time and without anymore glitches!
Service is terrible stay away, go to Hackney Auto instead!!!  I was a long term costumer at South Point because everyone was really nice and did my oil change pretty rapidly . But recently, South Point been going downhill, they got completely  new staff.   Supposedly my car is gonna blow up if I don't get all these repairs done on it. (Really pushy I might add), and trying to get tire rotations that I didn't need.   my AC broke, took it in, told me it just needed coolant, charged me $77 bucks (funny the service guy told me that he cut me a deal and was really supposed to be 100 bucks) Anyway, turns out my AC was still broken, come back the next day turns out that the real problem is my compressor they were gonna charge me 1,500 bucks for it. Are you kidding me, you guys charged me 77 bucks for coolant and its really my compressor?? You bunch of lazy servicemen!!! AHahaAH   I walked out. There is no freaking way I'm coming back when there just trying to push sales on you and are untrustworthy of the "repairs" you really need. SOUTH POINT NISSIAN YOU SUCK AND YOUR SERVICEMEN ARE UNTRUSTWORTHY!! Taking my $ somewhere else where they are friendlier and do the work for 1/3 of the cost!!
Stylist was Dana, she said she was new and she seemed sweet and friendly but she didn't listen to what I wanted, on top of that she made racist remarks about African Americans! I left completely unhappy and will never return! I had to go to a different salon so they could tone my hair! The salon physically was actually nice and clean and comfy but I would not recommend this place.
Don't get your haircut by Chelsea - she hardly cut my hair at all.  I asked for layers to build volume - she hardly cut anything, then put product in my hair to "create volume" - I don't use product in my hair ever.  Total waste of $50 - my hair looked the same when I left as when I walked in.
I thought this was a nice and upscale restaurant??? The decor and atmosphere is. Ice but the service was horrible!!!  We were told to sit anywhere we liked so we chose to sit close to the kitchen, it took about 10 minutes for someone to come and she took our drink order and we ordered salads. When the salads were delivered we didn't even have silverware and the server had to go and get some then she never came back to take our order for meals but we seen her cleaning up but we could not get her attention. Finally a male server came up and took our orders. We never got water refills. .
Yet again, ignored by this company, after being told I would get a check mailed to me.
had a cup of "SMALL" coffe and apple tart bill came to over $8.00. Called back the next day, not for money, but just curious. The man on the phone said tha apple tart was $5.75 OMG, I know real estate  & baking is expensive but that is just insulting.
We came in here once before for the AYCE dinner and had an ok experience which is why we returned for the AYCE lunch.  First of all, the menu didn't match the order sheet and when I asked the server, she said the menu is old and the sheet is correct.  Why not update the menu?  Second of all, not all the items we ordered were served.  When the server came to check to see if we were done, we informed her that we were still waiting on a few items.  She didn't say anything and walked away.  After waiting for another 10 minutes, we decided to just get the check.  The bill came and the total was $29.30.  We gave them $35.00 and the server just assumed that was the tip as well and didn't give us any change.  When we asked, she was super annoyed and brought back the change.  It's not cool to just assume how much I will be tipping.  You should always being back the change!!!  $5.70 on a $29.30 bill amounts to a 19% tip which based on the crappy service we received was definitely not worth it.  I'm definitely never coming back again.
I would like to expose what happened to me yesterday at Bcs Medford unit  I am Brazilian, I'm here in the US to study. I  would like to expose what happened to me yesterday Monday the 11th of May,at Bcs Medford unit  I  train every day in the unit, usually 2 times a day. I've always been very well received by all employees.  Yesterday I was doing spinning on a bicycle in the area of ​​aerobic exercise, and my phone rang. I AM aware of the rules and try to respect them all, but because it was something very important I had answer I knew it would be something very fast and urgent. As soon as I started the call, I was approached by a man accompanied by two other, without identifying himself, he asked me to hang up immediately, I couldn't understand everything he was saying because of my  English not being to good,I'm here just seven months, and I have difficulty understanding , but I asked him to please give me that a minute. He aggressively surprisingly, supported his arms on the device I was using in totally intimidating position! He continued to speak while I was on the phone, even though I  asked him to stop and repeated that needed a minute and did not speak English !!! Not happy he started talking loudly to me, partly shouting, accompanied by two other men who crossed their arms to me, exposing me to a situation of big  shame and humiliation,  I hang up the phone and was not able to finish my important call. When I hang up I told him that it would like speak with the gym  manager , to tell him  what happened, then he said it was the "DIRECTOR," and I, with language difficulties, even tried to say it did not agree with the form of his approach and I felt so bad about what happened he wanted me  to stop training. He said for me to follow him down to the reception because he was going to CANCEL MY PLAN IMMEDIATELY. I was in shock! I went down, not quite understanding what was happening, and upon arriving at the reception, he took my card in front of  about 10 people,noted the number of my application and asked me to leave the unit immediately !!!!  I never felt so humiliated in all my life, I always try to have a respectful attitude toward everyone, and I was so in a helpless situation, for failing to respond in English everything he said. Luckily my friend arrived in the unit at the time, she speaks English, and I asked her to help  me understand what was going on! When she started talking he wouldn't allow her to talk and she had to ask him to please be quiet so she can tell him my side of the story, but he wouldn't until she asked him to right in a note the reason for me to be canceling my plan  That's when he decided to SPEAK like a human should! And told her it was not necessary for me to cancel my plan...  I am very upset about this, I feel very bad to continue attending the unit, one of the things I like to do are my workouts. And I never thought I could feel so bad about a place that has always welcomed me very well  I asked the employee ID, his name is director Daniel Smith.   Come on think about what attitudes should I take, and I ask that the BSC to comment on posture and what happened. I believe that the company's policy is not to humiliate customers (especially those who can not defend them selfs when it comes to not speaking or understanding full English).
I called today at 3pm to ask how late they are open until for dinner and the guy says "can come in until 10 pm". I show up today at 9:10 pm with my young daughter and there is a closed sign on the door. I knocked and the guy comes and opens the door and says "we're closed". I told him I called him that same afternoon and he said they are open until 10 pm and he just laughed. Never coming back to such an unprofessional place.
Ordered fried chicken dinner. And it came to my house with 3 pieces of chicken on top a bed of fries. I'll stick to kfc next time.
I'm sad I have to give a low review because the pizza is actually pretty good. Very doughy and greasy and cheesy. The service is ridiculously bad. I let it go the first couple times and kept going back, but I won't be going back again. I think it's great that they employ young kids, but they should really train them to be polite. They have the most rude employees I think I've ever encountered. Melrose has so many pizza places. I'll spend my money at one where they aren't rude.
I had been getting my nails done at the same place for over 5 years and decided to try someplace new. Turns out this was a big mistake. Chose this place because of its location and that is all it has going for it. Pedicure lasted about 15 minutes with barely any leg massage which is always the best part. My fill was a complete nightmare. I was cut not once but twice by the drill. I have been getting fills for over 15 years and this has never happened to me. The woman did not even know it until I told her. All I got was "Sorry". Really??  Two of my fingers are bleeding and that's all I get. She didn't even inform anyone. This is completely unacceptable. I will be lucky if I don't get an infection. Will never go back there again and will report to the Board of Health if I get an infection.
Austin, oh Austin.... What has happened to you??? I'm was born and raised here in this great city, as was my father.. We were both born at St Davids and have always been so proud to call this place home.   This city has changed into a sad resemblance of its former self. My main complaint is the rainbow walkways that are being considered for the downtown area. I get it, I am all for equality and gay rights. But, this is an absolute eye sore, and will cause nothing  but a distraction and possible discriminatory behavior.
I wouldn't give a single star if that was an option. First, this place is so boring. There was ZERO energy here on a sat night. We sat outside which could be cool if your table wasn't in dirt. We had flip flops on and our feet were covered in dirt. The service was slow, the food was blah and the belly dancer was awful. I asked for sliced cucumbers for my hummus and the server told me they didn't have any...I asked how they made the tzaziki and he informed me they don't make it themselves. Ok so the food is not fresh nor made there and the atmosphere was dull yet they charge $17 for a small kebab plate.  I don't get it. What a shame cuz there are no Mediterranean restaurants in Austin and they could have something great! I have yet to find a restaurant in this city to brag about. Disappointment
I know alot of people are fans of SW airlines.  Personally I feel they are over-rated.  I have flown SW approx. 12 times in the past 6 years.   I have never had exceptional service..sometimes you get a smile, like as your getting off the plane. I One time i flew with my 6 month old son, who unfortunatly, spit-up all over me, mid-flight, after I fed him.  I stood up to use the front bathoom of the place, not knowing it was occupied.  A flight attendant came rushing at me and I was told I had to return to my seat, b/c 911 regulations state the front cock-pit can not be blocked by a passenger.    (Did I look like I was going to hi-jack a plane, with a 6-month old in my arms covered in baby vomit?)   However, I understand the policy, and apoligized, b/c I really didn't realize it was occupied.   She told me that I could use the back bathroom, but tht I had to return to my seat after.   She huffed and turned away from me, and rolled her eyes at the other flight attendant.   I was annoyed, but hey, we live in different times now.    I understand their strict policies, i didn't think it warrented her rudeness.    But, the last time I flew I was yelled at by a SW employee in the Orlando airport.  My husband was in the baggage claim office, b/c we were missing 1 piece of luggage.   I was standing outside the office with my 3 pieces of luggage a1 year-old in a stroller, and 3 year-old.  They were hungry, and tired.    My 3 year old- wanted to be with his Dad.  He ran away from me, and I ran after him, but I tripped over my luggage.  Yes, i am clumsy.   He opened the door and ran into the office before I could get him. Well, he almost pinched his finger on the door, and an Employee of SW held the door open for him.  I yelled thank-you to her and said "he's fast, I couldn't get to him in time."   She turned and glared at me.  She said He could have hurt himself in the door.   I just looked at her.  She then walked over to me, put her finger in my face, and again, said,  "you better watch your kids closley, what kind of mother let's her child get away from her? he could have hurt hemself."   I was shocked.  A woman next to me who witnessed it, actully said that it wasn't my fault, that I tried to go after him.    Her husband asked the employee if she had kids.  The SW employee looked at me and walked away.  She then went into the Baggage claim office and told another employee about what happened.  The whole time pointing at me.  I thought her behavior was terrible, and it's the last time i flew SW.
Fun to look. LOTS to look at. But, checkout takes FOREVER! And the $14 of fudge I bought, the lady said would be perfect for 3 weeks unrefrigerated; it's been 4 days and are now little bricks. Little hard bricks of sadness.
miss the train station location.  this is McStarbucks at its worst.  i've become a big Peet's fan.
There are literally only two good things about this place: the scallion pancakes and the fact that it's open really late. It's cheap but you can get much better food for a comparable price. Also, chicken and broccoli? More like a fuckton of broccoli swimming in a suspect "brown sauce" with maybe two quarter-sized pieces of squeaky, boiled chicken. Don't do it.
Food took almost two hours to arrive. When I called, they just said "sorry we have a new delivery service". When it did arrive, it was stone cold and of course no option to reheat the spring rolls as they were already soggy. Just unacceptable. Formerly regular customers immediately converted into "never again". Avoid.
They never have any open check stands. I always have to use self checkout which gives me issues and then I have to wait forever to get help.
Ok they delivered to the Hampton but they took about an hr. When I open the bag they didn't have napkins or utensils. The food was also bad. The peking ribs were too salty. The egg roll was actually a fried spring roll. The fried rice was plain and unevenly cooked.(lots of white spots) the wonton soup was plain. The only good thing I order from them was the Mongolian beef. The beef was super tender and flavorful.
We made a reservation . on arrival they took 20 minutes to check us in.The room we booked was no longer available for some reason and we didn't find this out until we see that the room has two small beds instead of one large bed. The staff did nothing to correct this problem .the staff all looked very inexperienced and had no customer service .ultimately  the experience sucked don't rent a room here
This used to be one of our favorites, but it has become a "no go" for our family.  Food quality has gone down, but it is honestly the service that has left us totally flabbergasted.  The final straw was going to dinner with friends who have severe food allergy and when he ordered something that included shellfish, the waiter could care less and the manager wouldn't come to the table - sending the hostess over instead.
Disconnected electric car charging stations for no reason! These are supposed to be public and active at all times but have neglected multiple request to turn stations back on!
We are on vacation so we decided for a quick bite to eat we'd stop at a known restaurant.  We knew it would be a long wait 45 mintues we were told.  We waited 75.  We asked to sit at a bar top table to get a few drinks, we were told no, however another group was allowed.  I tried to ask the hostess who gave me some serious attitude why.  Not to mention the reason for the long wait was reduced staff, I guess because 20 open tables and 5 members of the wait staff having lude conversations at the hostess station was more important.  I also know far to much about that hostess sex life then I wanted to...  Then she the proceeded to sit everyone else but us, even people that had arrived only 5 mintues ago.  We didn't get a waitress for 10 minutes who brought us our drinks with no alcohol.  I had to ask another waitress for the manager because our waitress never came back to check on us.  The manager knelt down beside me and started talking to me like I was a child.  Have you ever ordered that drink before?  Yes, actually I have it all the time in my home state.  Do you know we have a restriction on the amount of alcohol we serve?  I was so annoyed, I snapped, Yes and I know the difference between bourbon and ginger ale, oh and did you notice none of our drinks are garniahed?  After the manager looked very embaressed, they sent back our drinks and sent out new ones that were 90% alcohol.  My guess is they said shut him up, give him as much as he wants... Serving heavy pours is just as bad and no pours... I decided to to complain any further.  We ate, paid, tipped the waiterss, who honestly didn't deserve it, and left.  I think I'll stick to ma and pa places.  They have all treated us better.
Not a big fan. They never seem to have the dollar drafts they advertise about. The small dance floor upstairs gets crowded fast,
This is not the place it once was. Service is terrible and food is just okay.  The magic is gone and I don't know why.  After getting our food orders mixed up and then getting the order wrong, it happen two fridays in a round.  We won't go back till there is improvement in the service.  There are just to many other Mexican places to go. Don't settle. I hope things improve. Sorry
Bluehour definitely falls into the category of "Cool" places in Portland. We went there for lunch the other day for my company holiday party ... needless to say I wasn't that impressed.  The menu is overpriced and limited.  The service was terrible (our waiter apparently had only been there 2 weeks but was unable to answer ANY of our simple questions about the menu).   The food took  F O R E V E R ... and wasn't blow you out of the water good when it finally did come.  The varied music made the ambiance everything from french bistro to night club. OH and it plays VERY loudly in the bathrooms. Though the unisex bathroom thing - kinda cool I have to say.  They decided to "air" out the restaurant by leaving the front door open ... did I mention is was 40 degrees outside? When we asked if they could close it because we were chilled - the fashionable hostess said they were "airing out the restaurant" ... seriously?  On the upside they had yummy lemonade and pretty decor.  No need to spend my hard earned $$ there in the near future.
When some former colleagues told me we were meeting at the "Wave" for our little reunion I definitely pictured something else entirely. If by some odd chance you end up going here, please be warned your GPS will abandon you before you actually arrive and yes it is located behind a strip mall. Calling the Wave a dive bar is an insult to dive bars around the world. At some point in the night I was expecting Patrick Swayze from Roadhouse to walk through the door.  What you will find at the Wave (besides people who look like they were defeated by life) is very cheap beer, a friendly staff, pool tables, karaoke, and "drunk pizza".
I never post negative reviews but this location is terribly. There's always only one man at the register which means that there is always a wait. I waited 13 minutes in this store just to get a passport photo taken and then I waited an additional 10 minutes just to check out. And the place wasn't even that crowded. Get this guy some help. Please!
The food is good but the service is painfully illogically slow to be point where it doesn't make sense for working people to come here. And it's in a business park where are the intended audience are people who work in this building. The line is always slow and takes thirty mins to get through between the slow salad making process and then the backed up register (your salad can be ready then you wait ten more mins before you can pay) so today I thought i'd order online and just run down and pick it up as I had back to back meetings all day. I waited 15 minutes from ordering the salad to walk down and I still waited for over 10 minutes for it.   This place could be so great but they need to fix the customer experience. The lines make no sense (sandwiches and to gos are in a different spot) and the workflow for ordering and paying just doesn't make sense. This needs to be a fast option otherwise busy people in the surrounding buildings like myself will not continue to order.
let me start by saying the food is great.   let me finish by saying the costumer service is freaking awful. The person who took the order on the phone actually hung up on me.. "emma's pizza what do you want, click!"  When i called back the woman answering the phone just had no manners!  but other than that experience the food is great. Unfortunately environment is everything to me, so I will not be returning.
Really frustrating experience told 30 mins waited for 120 mins staff would not give us a clear picture of wait time or off an alternative group seating to get us in.  Would have liked any communication or some support rather than an overwhelming sense of "what ever, just wait or leave I really don't care"
Manfriend and I were absolutely giddy on our way here for dinner. I'd read just about every yelp review for this place--I could probably recite the menu from front to back since I'd looked it up so many times.   The manfriend's dad is in the wine business and wanted to treat us with some awesome food so we were to meet him and his wife for a 7pm reservation. We were there at 6:30, and needless to say: it was PACKED. A lovely bartender saw us trying to avoid traffic and immediately asked if she could get us anything. Two glasses of pinot noir coming right up! The bartenders did an amazing job keeping track of the order people came in so they could point them to seats as soon as one cleared up.  Manfriend's Poppa and Momma bear came promptly at 6:45 to check in, only to find the reservation was at 7:30 pm. Momma bear promptly pulled up a voicemail they'd left with her earlier in the morning to show us they'd reminded her it was 7. We were all excited though and continued to dodge the waitstaff as we waited for our new reservation.  Once finally seated, we ordered the brie and calamari for the table. The brie was a much smaller portion than I expected and buried underneath a mountain of arugula. It was a nice attempt, but all the toppings and dressings washed out the brie. The calamari was delicious--perfectly crisped and battered. The bread of course was to die for. The manager even came by with a plate of bolognese to apologize for the mess up. This was AMAZING!  After a bit of a wait (expected since it was crowded), our food came...and it just went downhill. Manfriend's sauce that the salmon sat in tasted like salsa. My medium-rare burger was actually well done. Momma bear's porkchop had a different side from the one she requested and was completely dried out. Poppa bear was also missing a side. We didn't bother waiting for corrections--we'd already been there for 2.5 hours just waiting from start till now. My burger probably would've been good, but I left half of it untouched. A well done burger just isn't a burger anymore. I ordered a drink instead....which also never came.  I was so horribly disappointed by the end of the meal. It's hard to stay mad at the staff since they're actually VERY sweet, but they just didn't handle our dinner service well at all.
El Chile is extremely over priced mexican food.  My Girlfriend and i decided to try to this place. Intially upon entering we were impressed with the decor. Very nice, very clean, and some demi-decent artwork. They had a painting of Ramses from Nacho Libre on the wall... contrived trite artwork.  Food was pretty ok Ive had much better mexican food at much much much more affordable prices. Granted the presentation was good but that doesn't make up for the cost.  Our waiter rarely visited our table and he also wasnt very helpful. He didnt even introduce himself.   My Gf ordered a Margarita at half off for Happy Hour for 5 dollars- otherwise it would have been 10 dollars. It was not very good at all. Which is weird considering all a Margarita is is lime juice and tequila.
I am still really REALLY mad about what happened to the amazing doctors that stated this practice.  However, I was really sick the other day and tried to go to 4 other places to get care, and N. Atlanta Urgent had an hour wait, CVS had a 2 hour wait, Emory was completely booked too.  So, I called here as a last resort and they did not have a wait. I went over, even though I was dreading it.  Jo was behind the desk, and she has always been so sweet!  HINT- someone offer her a job at another practice.  I do not know if she is looking, but she is awesome!).  I saw a nurse there who was really nice, but I don't think she even looked in my bloodshot eye and instead just put me on antibiotics.  The swelling went away, but my eye is still bothering me.  I will wait to hear from my regular doctor though.
Have a Honda EX5000 D diesel generator that stopped producing electricity. Spoke to the service dept described the model number, and what was wrong. Asked if they could fix this for me and they said sure bring it in and turnaround time is a week to 10 days. Told them that I have to bring it via barge from Gambier Island, then by truck to their location. After showing up the service dept the service guy asked where the gen set was. "Still in my truck, shall I drive it in to unload it closer to the service bay?" He said no that's Ok lets have a look at it in your truck which was still on the street.  "No we can't fix this, no parts available." We didn't even take a look at the unit except at the face plate of the Honda Great, $400 in the barge fee and they didn't even look it. What ever happened to "lets take a look at it and see what we can do." They suggested that I simply buy a new EU7000 gen set. Told him that my back up is a Honda EU 6500 and it drinks fuel compared to the diesel. Look elsewhere for service is all I can say.
Went here for drinks and bubble waffle.  Ordered the oreo bubble waffle but it didn't taste like anything except the icing sugar on top.  The drinks were ok, a bit pricey. Probably won't come back.
Worst customer service, avoid at all costs. Careless and rude staff. Never coming back!
YUM!!! I've just discovered this place and I am SO excited!! I love their options for us Veg. lovers and the quantity of food I get! So savory, so YUM!! I'm very much looking forward to trying more of the menu!!!  ... WELL SCRATCH THAT ^  Unfortunately, I found out that the owner of this establishment is extremely disrespectful to her employees. I don't support places like this.   Food's good if you don't care who's making it.
I went here because I was pinched for time and this is the nail salon closest to me. I got a pedicure and a gel manicure and TWO DAYS later my gel manicure started coming off. Not chipping, but completely coming off. I went into the nail salon and asked them if they could re-do my manicure and the lead nail technician even admitted that they should last for at least 10 days. I showed the nail technician I was working with and peeled the rest of the nails off so she could just re-do the nail polish. Then she says she is going to charge me and I talk to the lead nail technician and she asks me if I remember the name of the lady I worked with and I tell her I don't but if I saw her I could point her out. Then another random technician claims that I am lying and have no proof that I even got my nails done there. So I tell the lead technician that I know what day I came in and I even have the RECEIPT. She says that because I do not know the name of the lady who did my nails they can't re-do my nails for free. She doesn't even offer to look up my receipt or resolve my situation in any way so I walked out. WORST. CUSTOMER. SERVICE. EVER. I will never be returning to this place ever again. I can't believe a place of business would treat a paying customer like that.
Asked my server for a non-traditional Rye drink.  I Was informed that they can only make manhattans and old fashions. I ordered a Manhattan. Turns out even that was too ambitious. It had dry vermouth and a lime! Could not send it back because We were ignored by wait staff.
Our car was in service for a week. We have been calling all week to get at least some feedback and a plan of action. Nothing yet. Awful.
We went here on Mothers Day 2017. This is quite a complex. Several buildings with an outdoor stage etc.  We stopped here on the way to St.Augustine actually looking for an Asian buffet we couldn't locate. Its sort of confusing finding out where to enter and where the seating is. There was a Mothers day brunch in the next building but people kept coming in the restaurant looking for it. Not well marked. The staff was nice but not exceptional. I had a regular burger with lettuce and tomato. Most below average burger I ever had. The meat was bland and appeared more stated than grilled.
The window staff was completely rude...I asked for a receipt and she rolled her eyes at me...really.  That is a standard given with any purchase.  I asked for the manager and she was rude to him too...I will not visit this location again.
Service was slow and problematic. I ordered a moscato and ended up with a bubbly prosecco. When I asked if it was moscato, I was told yes. Then later when asked if I  didn't like my "prosecco" I finally got to the bottom of the problem. The food was ok and seemed a bit overpriced. It was so uneventful, I will not go into specifics.  My friends and I love to try different desserts and that is definitely lacking here. The music was also extremely loud... to the point of distracting us from conversation and having problems speaking with our server when he did come around.
We purchased a solar system fall 2013 with installation completed Jan. 2014. By June we realized we were not making the energy stated we would be making. We contacted them and was found to only be making 1/2 what was suppose to. This was fixed with no restitution for loss of revenue from January to June. Then come Feb. 2015, in our 4 year old house we had a roof leak. The roofer who installed the original roof stated vents on top of house needed to be replaced. It was noticed that solar panels were installed overtop of all the vents on one side of the house, that needed to be removed. We were told by multiple solar companies that solar panels should NEVER be installed over top of house vents, heat from the attic could harm the solar panels. We had to have Revolve solar out to remove the panels (we had to pay for this) and have the roofer fix the roof. What was suppose to be no more than 4 hours ran into 9 and have panels reinstalled once more our cost. Because vents had to be removed and roof reroofed. Then the attic was not vented enough and we had to install either ridge vent or a power active heat removal fan at our cost. We wound up installing a solar ventilation fan. But, we wound up spending a whole lot of money we should not have to.  We are happy we went solar but not so happy with service from Revolve. We had many phone calls not returned.
Sometimes I feel bad about giving bad reviews but this place is rough.  First of all, there is no ambiance/ decor/ atmosphere to speak of.  It is bleak.  I got a greek salad an I think 50% of it was way past its day.  What I had was probably the worst food I've ever had.  The people there are unfriendly.  I've heard some decent reviews of this place but my experience has soured it.
Very rude staff and manager, did not honor a reservation though we were actually early for our reserved time.
Location is great, but I went there a few weeks ago for a coffee and breakfast. The service was the worst I have ever received. Two people working, one girl was making coffee like she was in her own world, totally ignoring every customer in line. The other guy was back and forth to the back room also ignoring everyone. I waited 15 minutes for an iced coffee,, and an English muffin. Two people walked out while waiting in line for over 15 minutes. Too many other good places in the area to waste your time with this place, at least for breakfast.
Used to be okay, but the breakfasts have simply gotten too inconsistent.  After one too many times waiting too long and another serving of cold pancakes, we decided it wasn't worth the times they get it right.
I've had the same experience as Shivani, every time I go there I spend a lot of money and the car is never fixed properly.  Time for a new mechanic.  They just don't get the fact that when you spend that kind of money on a car you expect to be taken care of.  You shouldn't have to feel like they are doing you a favor by selling you a car!
Good atmosphere, ok food and way overpriced. A friend recommended this place for seafood so we decided to give it a try. While it was not terrible it left a lot to be desired. The most egregious wrong was the special "Crab Guacamole." We paid $15 for this special that turned out to be pre-packaged guacamole with some crab meat thrown on top. Come on!  Pay $3 for two avocados and a can of Rotel! I should have sent it back. The Key-lime pie was ok, but also over-priced. On the plus side the servers were very good at the bar and at the table. They were fun to talk with and took care of us. I was really on the edge between one and two stars on this place. In the end the low quality and steep price just puts this place about as low as you can go. I will not go back.
This location really disappointed me. Being a regular at the NYPD on idrive (also a franchise but different owners), this was a huge let down. My buffalo chicken pizza was thrown together, chicken not on every slice, and overall just bland. Which I imagine is hard to do with a pizza that should be really flavorful. I will take the drive for much better pizza rather than 20 dollar bland pizza.
What a horrible experience. We wanted to take our kids to listen to the band. Called ahead to confirm. They said seven, but it was actually 6. There was no band, just a one man show. Which is fine, but not what we drove 45 minutes for.
Not a good experience. I made an appointment online (hours in advance) for an oil change at 3pm. It then took them 2 hours to change the oil, despite the fact that there wasn't any other customers there. After the 2 hour wait, they came out and told me I need 3 new tires, in addition to other work, which would total to over $1,000. I only wanted an oil change, and furthermore, I had recently taken the car to a mechanic I trust who told me there were no repairs needed. I wouldn't trust this place, they are definitely out to get your money!!! Oh, and the oil change was $40... a bit steep.
Back story: My sister and her husband were married in March in NJ where they reside. Both wanted to come visit over the July 4th weekend and stay at the Crowne Plaza in Danvers and frolic in the Coco Key Water Resort in part because they're  kids at heart and because we assumed that the park would be perfect entertainment for my two kids ages 2 and 7. Let's start with the room at the Crowne Plaza: The room was nice enough. It had a king size bed and pull out couch and seemed quite clean.  The wallpaper was peeling a little and the carpet seemed a bit worn but other than the usual wear and tear one expects, it wasn't bad.  The air conditioner in the room at the Crowne Plaza, was on non-stop for the duration of their stay.  The thermometer reached into the 90's for most of the visit and maybe the high temp contributed BUT the ac worked intermittently for all 3 days of their stay.  Also, there was a weird odor emanating from the ac.  To be blunt, the air coming out of the ac smelled like terrible flatulence.  My sister and her husband didn't complain to the front desk and get a change of room  so I have no idea if this issue was restricted to their room or not.  All I know is that it smelled pretty bad and was not coming from anyone INSIDE of the room. FYI: The Crowne Plaza DOES NOT have it's own pool or gym. Guests are able to swim at the pool run by the gym who co-shares some of the hotel space.  For $5.00/hr a hotel guest can swim to their hearts delight... Another FYI: My sister and I had breakfast at the hotel restaurant which she billed to the room. Total cost of breakfast $233.00 and we are still dealing with the billing department to get this resolved...  CoCo Key Water Resort: Man this place was a let down.  I brought my 2 year old who was just too small to enjoy anything.  The din in the water park is constant and throbbing.  There's a small area all the way on the right of the water park,  that caters to small kids but was over run with bigger kids who couldn't play on the bigger slides but were clearly too big to play in the toddler area. In the toddler section, there are 3 smallish waterslides as well as water fountains and spouts.   The waterslides are for kids under the height of 48" and for a small guy like my 2 year old, not doable alone.  For my 7 year old, the kiddie area was boring -lots of toddlers screaming and playing is not fun for a "big kid" and is too much for a really little kid. The middle of the park is comprised of 2 largish waterslides -perfect for a 7 year old- and 3 smaller slides.  When I visited, one of the smaller waterslides was out of commission and the staff weren't doing a great job monitoring the ins and outs of the larger slides. My sister whisked a small child out of the way of one of the bigger slides when a child rocketed out of the slide at the bottom and almost took the child at the bottom out. Surrounding the middle area of waterslides is a lazy river. The lazy river is only 2.5 feet deep and the tube the rider sits in is pushed by some type of current around the circumference of the middle slide area. The lazy river was pleasant enough when we rode on it the second day but on the first day we were there, they didn't open it due to 3 hours worth of concurrent staff breaks that ran from 10am-1pm.   The last area of slides -actually just 1 slide- is a huge, 3 story indoor/ outdoor snake of a slide.  This slide looked like fun but my 7 year old was under the required 48" to ride.   The other couple parts of the park that bear noting were the 2 small indoor pool areas which are set up with basketball hoops and a sort of obstacle course and the outdoor/indoor adults only spa/hot tub area. These were ok however the hot tub area is not monitored by a lifeguard and though the rules clearly state that the hot tub is NOT to be used by anyone under the age of 18 due to health issues, we saw several kids go in it. A few more things:  Contrary to what the website boasts, there isn't a pool side bar where drinks get served to an adult while in the pool.  Also, the food is really overpriced and gross -that's for another longer review :) All in all, I wish we had gone to Canobie Lake or another outdoor water park which would have cost about the same amount.  $40 tickets for anyone over the age of 2, $4.25/swimmy diaper, $8.00 yucky pizza. Two thumbs down.
I have been spoiled by the Alamo Lakeline location.  Pros:  Service, Food // Cons:  Parking, Seating, Actual Theater  I wasn't too thrilled I couldn't leave my seat and return comfortably.  The 2 couples located at the end of our row were very slow and seemed annoyed when we arrived because they didn't want to get up.  Mind you, we arrived 20 minutes before our movie began so I'm not sure what their problem was.  One woman actually suggested since I was "smaller" I should go under the railing to get to and from my seat.  I had to politely tell her "I'm not doing that sh*t."  Overall, I was a little disappointed by this location and from what I've seen on other reviews, the "community tables" are only at this location and The Ritz.  Unless there's a movie I really want to see and it's only shown at South Lamar, I doubt I return.  I'll stick to my usual.  I'm still #TeamAlamoDH - just not a fan of the South Lamar location.
Will never rent from Budget again. Very long wait in line to get car and then very strong push to try and upcharge  insurance with agent seeming angry that I would not agree. Then had to trek over to the other terminal to pick up the car. Car itself was clean and comfortable but had warning  that it was overdue for oil change and kept getting low tire pressure warnings. Car return went smoothly. Was given info on use of toll box on windshield and immediately turned it off when first got into the car. Went through toll plazas and payed cash for tolls. One agent said my box had already registered the toll. (Did the others also see this and just pocket the cash I paid???) Checked and the box was indeed in the off position.  Now back at home and my credit card is being charged an additional sum for something, I assume tolls since they said they are charged separately.  Called and they say they have no record of that charge being made even though it is on my credit card listed as Budget. Fortunately I have receipts for the tolls I paid and will dispute with my  credit card.
I'm so bummed that I'm updating my former review.  I'm not sure what's happened here but a couple things seem to have went down hill.  I visited twice in the past week (my first time this year) and had lackluster gelato both times.  Tonight, we each ordered a scoop in cups and had to laugh as we walked out of the store.  I had a full scoop of pistachio and Joe only had like half a scoop of nutella.  Two different people scooped our gelato and clearly they have much different opinions about what constitutes a scoop.  Joe got seriously scammed, it was barely a children's scoop, if that.  Next, the flavour.  The pistachio was sweet but that was about it.  It didn't have any real taste.  The nutella was likewise sweet, but if I were blindfolded it could have been pistachio.    Now I no longer have a dependable gelato shop nearby.  Summer is going to suck this year.
My review is based solely on the service. Or lack thereof. Sadly, I cannot even remember what my date and I ate - although, I think it was pretty good.  Taking a step back: I was originally excited to experience Burnside Brewing after my friend sent me a pic of his pork chop and potatoes he had for dinner. It looked crazy-gourmet which took me by surprise b/c of the business name and he said he was impressed both w/taste and price. The joint itself is loaded w/personality. There's off-street parking. Dining both inside and out. And the joint was fairly hopping w/a variety of folk from hipster to families.  Our waitress was very friendly it's just that she was ooooh soooooo sloooooow.  And I wasn't going to say anything until I tried Smokehouse Tavern about a week later and experienced the same situation. Excellent food, fine establishment but very sub-par service! I sincerely hope this is not a trend. When I say our waitress was slow that includes our greeting, taking our order and apparently my biggest gripe of producing a check. She may have been the only server on, but any and all support staff should have been helping her more. It just seems a true shame that good to great food should be forgotten due to poor service.
My friends and I went to see a Janis Joplin tribute last evening and the performance itself was incredible.  This review has nothing to do with the performance.  The experience coming into the theater, however, is another story.  The men doing security as well as a few officers were extremely, extremely aggressive and hostile.  I have been to hundreds of rock shows, plays, speeches, etc. and I have never felt such a heightened state of alarm as these men yelled at us - a crowd made up mostly of middle-aged women - spoke down to us, made sarcastic comments if we asked questions, etc.  It was unnecessary and unpleasant to say the least.  It felt very much like a police state and there was absolutely no need for it at all.  I don't ever want to feel that way again.  We all paid for our tickets and are members of this community.  Why were we treated like this?  It made no sense and caused many people to feel panicked, as if something bad was about to go down.    It didn't help that we had balcony seats and we couldn't actually fit into them due to the narrow aisles.  If one were elderly, disabled, or over 5' tall, forget it.  My knees are completely screwed up today.  Those seats are dangerous and if there was a fire, those of us in the balcony would be dead.    These things are really unacceptable.  Please consider fixing these problems if you care at all about your patrons.  People before profits.
I've been here before but this visit (1/18/15) both me and a friend were disappointed. We were seated by a hostess who spoke not one word. We ordered breakfast (he had the Chilaquiles and I had a Garden Scrambler. We also ordered orange juice.  The orange juice was watery and had no pulp at all. It tasted more like orange drink and seemed to have an aftertaste. Definitely not something fresh squeezed. It was sweet and not good. We both pushed them aside.   The Chilaquiles sounded like the egg was on a tortilla, but instead was in a bowl with tortilla chips. It wasn't what either of us expected. Not bad, but not great. I think the menu stating the egg is on chips would help.   We noticed the food rating was 85.  Not horrible, but I would expect more from them.   At least our waiter was efficient and friendly. That was the best part of the visit. I hate to  sound like a whiner, but both of us decided this was a big let-down from what it used to be.
I have been living here for three years..and thankfully am moving out. I transferred into my lease and this was suppose to be a nice place to relocate after being in dorms...very wrong. within the three years, I have had plenty of issues. When i first moved in, the apartment was dirty and I had to have them come out and clean it after much debate. Oh and replace the sofa since it smelled of urine. But they wouldn't replace the chair in the living room that had holes in the fabric. Mind you I had already signed the lease before seeing this place and was now stuck. I experience a leaking dishwasher that took over 3months for them to replace while they took their time on deciding if to replace it completely or buy the replacement cap...after the 3months they just replaced it(I called about weekly because no one could tell me anything of what was going on). With that leaking dishwasher came wet kitchen floors that had to be replaced...which was half assed replaced and poorly done(made them come out two more times...never really got fixed..I actually glued tiles myself). I told off one girl in the office named Sheila because the maintenance staff were coming in the apartment unannounced and couldn't tell me what they were doing ( on the simple fact they can't speak english and also when i called they asked if they fixed the problem..I actually hadn't put in any maintenance requests)..she rudely hung up on me and I therefore had to call back and give a piece of my mind. When i got ahold of the manager and regional manager, all they did was apologize...somewhat... Besides those issues, I've had bug issues and had them have to come out to fix my toilet four times after it kept not flushing..mind you if you fix it the first time it should work..they actually didn't fix it right the first time...and took their time each time...i had to call back after putting maintenance request to see if it would be done. Whenever you put a maintenance request in, call back within an hour to see if it actually got put in, half the time they say they will but there will be no record of it later..(they actually dont put them in half the time). Most of the staff is lazy and can never seem to do their job. I was going to move out last year but couldnt get anyone to transfer lease with..sadly..so i was stuck. they have a short window of cancelling your lease so be careful. This past year, i had two new roomies and they had put too many people in a 3/3. they had accidentally put two people in one room and caused a dilemma where they had to find a spot for one of them and move her out after she had already unpacked. Pricing is fine and you get cable and trash paid. But dont expect much from here. if you do decide to move here, the only person who has been helpful since living here is one of the staff members Pilan. Otherwise you may get the run around and wrong info. Oh, and don't bother with the community supervisor..his name starts with a J...he's just a complete idiot. I've already told him off. Oh and if you go to the office, you may wait more than 20 minutes to be addressed sometimes...usually they have one person running the front and you will hear a bunch of people in the back laughing...clearly not working. Good luck!!!
I stayed here back in May 2014. My boyfriend and I were in town for his birthday and found the location and price were right for us. I realize that the reason for our dislike of the place may not resonate with everyone, but the customer service was just ridiculous. First of all, we stayed in a smoking room, not even by choice but because there was nothing else available. Anyway, we went with it mostly because my boyfriend has his medical marijuana card and figured at least he could smoke in the room with no trouble. At any rate his smoke made the place smell way better than when we walked in. Stale cigarettes and mildew? We wouldn't figure out until we got home, nearly a 5 hour drive south two days later that my credit card was charged an extra $200. When I called I was informed it was a smoking charge. My jaw dropped. I told the man on the phone we stayed in a smoking room, to which he replied with, "We know what was going on and that's illegal." I tried explaining the medical card but before I could finish he hung up on me. Yes, he HUNG UP. I've never encountered such poor customer service in my life. I made at least 5 attempts to call and speak to a manager and never received a clear answer on why or how I could be charged for smoking in a smoking room. When my boyfriend called, he was hung up on as well. To get this problem corrected I ended up calling my credit card company and they had to fight it for me. Two months later, the $200 charge was taken off my card! Take that Clarion! You are ignorant, prude jerks! Never again will I stay here and I recommend you don't either! They apparently think they can charge your card for whatever bs reasons they can come up with and not even have the nerve to tell you while you're still staying there
We recently moved to this neighborhood and decided to give this place a try. We went here for dinner. The taste was good and I was loving my food. My husband was sick, so he ordered the normal pesarattu instead of the masala pesarattu. After the long wait, he got the pesarattu with the masala. He politely called the waiter and said he had the wrong order. When the waiter went in and asked the lady who prepared the order, she was very RUDE and shouted "why cant they take out the masala and eat". We were shocked by the way the lady responded. The poor waiter apologized to us, but the lady did not even care to apologize for her behavior. Will never ever go back to this place.
When you are charging $16 for an entree and $3 for a naan...make sure to deliver a quality product. Crap entree with old pieces of chicken reheated...tikka masala tasted like some spices cooked in a lot of cream. Wouldn't recommend at all!
Well, this was another time we should have heeded the reviews of other Yelpers...  We really wanted to like this place, and as others have mentioned, the smoky aroma of the barbecued meat was so enticing we decided to give it a try.  SO disappointed! Beef ribs (2 of them) we're tough and had very little meat.  Hush puppies were dry and over-fried but the cornbread was decent.  Pork ribs (2 1/2 of those) we're also dry and gnarly.  Mac and cheese was cheesy, but the macaroni was all coagulated, and overall the dish lacked flavor.  As for the coleslaw, what in the world was that sickeningly sweet dressing?? Please add some vinegar, a bit if salt, some pepper, maybe some celery seeds...something to provide some flavor beyond the sweetness.  We left feeling like we were ripped off. Certainly didn't get our money's worth. Bottom line: if you're going to run a rib joint those had better be the best darn ribs in town if you want people to come back and/or recommend your place.
Ordered our food and asked if we could have our steak cooked through and we got a bad attitude. We were told we would receive it the way it was made for us whether it was what we wanted or not and they could not change it. When we sat down next to the cooking station to wait for our food we over heard the lady who took our order say we were too picky and talking about us to the expo. When we got our food, it was cold and the silver ware they gave us was so dirty we could see lipstick and food on it. We asked for new ones and got attitude once again and received dirty silverware once again. We ended up just leaving because we felt disrespected and couldn't get clean silverware.
I gave them two stars because TOM and  CHAD have always been very courteous and professional.  When  my son and I dropped off his car this morning to have the tires replaced and the oil changed, service advisor CHRIS  asked if he could take advantage of my son not needing the car back right away. My son, who is 18, said "no rush."I, on the other hand, said, "We need to pack tonight because you're leaving for college tomorrow morning". It is now 4:50 PM,  CHRIS just called my son and said the car would be ready by 7 PM. I was standing closer to CHRIS than my son was when I said "We have to pack tonight, you're leaving for school tomorrow". I don't know what part of that CHRIS did not understand.  When I called CHRIS back, and asked him why it was 7 PM, if he thought that was really reasonable, he said, "Well, your son said...", Completely ignoring what I told him. I asked CHRIS if he had college-age children, which he said, "No." I asked him if he thought It was reasonable to start packing at 7:30 at night when we got home from picking up  my son's car. He just kept going back to "Your son said it was no rush".  I am a reasonable person. We dropped the car off at 8:15 AM, I thought 3 PM would be great, 5 PM would be reasonable. 7 PM IS COMPLETELY UNACCEPTABLE. I didn't even realize Firestone was open till 7 PM.    I honestly don't know why my family keeps going back to Firestone. When we had my daughter's tires put on a few years back, they were bouncing all over the road and the service advisor at that time, told me it was because the steel rims were bent. I said it was because there was 5 to 7 weights on each tire.  It was the 5 to 7 weights. Once we had the tires replaced and re-balanced, We never had a problem with her car again.  When I went in for oil changes, they just didn't rotate the tires when I asked them to. And then when my tires got worn, they said, "We can't rotate them, we can only replace them now."  When I was shopping for tires to replace the ones that were not rotated, Firestone's quote for four new tires for my car were more expensive than the dealership.  Everyone knows the dealership is the most expensive.   I have written maybe two reviews on yelp.  I just don't think it's worth my time to tell people what I think. I am done with Firestone. I will never, ever go back to Firestone, not even to drop off a car.
First off, the food at Flipper's is awesome, but this location is severely in need of better trained people (this was second visit to this location).  My husband and I sat in a booth and a waitress took our order and returned with our drinks promptly.  We proceeded to wait close to an hour after receiving drinks for our appetizer at least, but nothing ever came.  After a good amount of time passed and no order, decided to go to the front register and get it take-out.  After waiting over an hour, paid for a pizza that was burnt and breadsticks that were also burnt with no sauce included.   Message to the cooks: Instead of making bird sounds, horse playing around in the back, why don't you try doing your job.  And to other Yelpers, I highly recommend Flipper's, just not this location, there are others in the area that are much more deserving of your time and hard earned money.
Can I give it negative stars I went there today around 1 with my sister and  when I asked to pack my own food they didn't let me so I allowed em to pack my food in the back i just got home and they dint pack us our food i got just my salad and the rest of my food gone and my sisters fish wich she barely touched gone we paid for a whole fish and we never even got it
I live across the street so it's really convenient, but tonight was my third time I went for dinner and I was again disappointed. To start, the restaurant was empty but it took 45 minutes for the food. Secondly, I had the roasted chicken ($23), which was cold and bleeding. I showed the waitress, she agreed and took it to the back to finish cooking. Meantime, the manager sent a message back via the waitress that all their chicken was done because it goes through a 22 hour cooking cycle (who cooks chicken that long?). So I finally get my chicken, bite into it, and there's no seasoning or flavor at all. At this point I ask for my $80 (yep, for a soda, appetizer, and salad for my date) check so I can go across the street to Mystic Station for a quality, flavorful meal. Previous experiences were similar so I doubt I'll be visiting again.  To be fair, I've had their Sunday brunch a couple times and it's been the best in the area.
Called Julian and explained that I needed tile removed and the mortar underneath for a smooth finish that could be resurfaced to a stained concrete finish in my kitchen.  Julian was quick to respond with a reasonable quote.  He walked me through the process and went over two people would be coming with a tile removal demolition hammer, a morter removal bit and a diamond tipped floor refinishing buffer with a vacuum attachment to keep dust down.  Imagine my surprise when the workman showed up with a tool rented from home depot and a mortar removal bit that didn't fit the tool.  He apologized but said he would make it work by just using the demolition bit but that it may damage the slab.  Really, not even willing to go get the right bit?  Also, he said the diamond tip buffer with vacuum was not something their company had.  Why then was this the process explained to me?  When calling Julian to explain that I would like to have what was originally communicated, he got very defensive and told me that no one in Austin could do what I was asking.  A horrible experience.
Decided to give this location a chance even with the reviews boy was that a mistake. I tried to do the build your own pizza but was told they didnt have red onions (one of the items i wanted) so left onions off. I was suprised when my salad arrived and low and behold it had red onions on it. My wife ordered fish and chips which should have been renamed mush and chips (horrible). When my pizza arrived i had to use napkins to soak up the grease. I dont like writing bad reviews however after leaving 3 messages for the owner, Eric, to call me with no luck i decided to. The managers i tried speaking with arent empowered to make decisions or offer any compensation.
The place is nice but it's definitely not worth $15 a day and far less $450 for 6 months. All the signs are made handwritten in office paper. There is no staff on  site besides the owner who is behind every mother or nanny asking them to clean up. I think for the price they should at least have one person there helping out. I have also been there a few times when there is no one around who work there. Definitely it's a good option but because there is no competition in the area the owners don't invest in improving the place.
This is the Burger King closest to my house. They remodeled so it looks nice but that has not help the service or the food.  Tonight, the service was very slow. The only had 3 people working there. We were told "she's new and still in training" about the cashier (same girl from last week who was slow). I wonder how much time they need to train.  The food was old, and cold. The fries were hard and my son's chicken nuggets were too hard to eat as well.
Hands down the worst hookah place I've ever been to.  It's basically just a room furnished with college dorm style sofas that were plagued with burn holes. Completely off putting. The bathroom was disgusting and the music was so loud you couldn't hold any sort of conversation. This is HOOKAH GONE WRONG! Smoking hookah should be done in a calm, chill, mellow atmosphere. The music should only be loud enough to know that it's there but not overpowering.  The place was packed on the Saturday night that a group of us went and there were only 2 wait staff. We waited quite a while for someone to attend or even acknowledge us.  They had Swat team looking dudes at the front doors  and inside the establishment- the need for security speaks for itself from this place.   Cheap on the coals- only gave us one for a large pipe so it wasn't getting hot enough. Definitely must avoid!!
I've had takeout here many times as its a block from my house but it keeps getting worse.  Now I am at a point where the convenience isn't enough to place and order.  Its not as bad as foodcourt sushi but its close at times.  Although the yam fries I really enjoy.  Last time the negitoro smelled off - thats even with all the green onion in it.    Maybe Kits sushi or Sushi Bella next time?  Depends how lazy I am.
I just ate there a few days ago. And I never want to go back there again.   The group I went with ordered four dishes. Place was kind of packed, but it took us about an hour to get our food, one at a time, which i didn't think was worthwhile considering the quality of food we got.  I don't exactly remember the names, but we ordered a noodle dish, sweet and sour pork, hot-braised chicken, and some beef dish.  The noodle dish was not bad, but the rest was not worth the price and time.  The sweet and sour pork was way overcooked. It was too crispy and even hard. The beef dish was too strong in its flavor and salty. And the  hot-braised chicken had no taste whatsoever. It just tasted like chicken with nothing on it.   Plus, the service was terrible. Our waitress did not bother to visit our table except to bring us our food, which was about an hour after we ordered, to bring the check. She did not visit once to check up on us. Not once. My friend who wanted a refill on water could not get it and ended up just drinking my water. And we were there for total of 2 and half hours.  There was also 18% gratuity, so we ended up paying about $17 per person. It was overall a disastrous experience.
Ten min wait for a party of two in a empty restaurant at 11:30 am on a Tuesday ? Taken to table with adult menus for me and my 3 year old. I had to grab a kid menu myself after waiting 10 min and no wait staff acknowledged us ( yet many walked by). No cutlery was supplied by wait staff. I had to go to wait station and grab my own. Once wait staff did arrive they were attentive and did a good job. Food was good and warm. Cleanliness four out of ten for just opening for the day. Restaurant appeared dirty from night before. Floor were dirty and bathroom floor was oily ( maybe a separate mop for restrooms and kitchen should be in order). I would say this location is in need of management overhaul as any other restaurant I have visited within the chain does a great job. This would be a great location for undercover boss!!
Very run down, smells terrible and extremely rude staff.  Pay a little extra and stay somewhere better, I wish I had!
I will not be back.   I came here this evening and ordered a steak chimichanga for take out. The texture of the rice was off and was not good. The chimichanga consisted of a fried flour tortilla filled with nothing but incredibly dry hunks of shredded beef--like shoe leather dry. If was, frankly, disgusting. Oh, and all of this cost $14 and change.   I should have known to walk away when the waitress handed me a menu that had clumps of salsa on it (some of which dripped onto my slacks). All I can say is gross--never again!
The bouncer at one door couldn't let us in since he swore that he has seen real California driver's license, and my friend had a fake id.  He obviously looked way youngger than us.   Okay.  then we went around through another door and got in with in a minute. well that was a REAL pointless rejection.
To add insult to injury, my nails have started coming off already and it's only been 4 days. After such a rude, unprofessional service, and after paying almost $100 for my manicure pedicure, it was such a poor job that it didn't even last a week! I'm struggling with whether to go back to let them fix the nails they have started to lift and the one that has completely been removed. On one level, I never want to set foot in that place again. On another level I feel conflicted about having spent so much money and not even having a job good enough to last more than 4 days!
Service was good but food not. Shrimp tacos had two little shrimp in each. They toasted the tortillas which made them rubbery.  Also husbands blacked mahi was big but the fish was very dark inside and dry. Very little curly fries on side.  Best thing to order is wings. Safe.
Staff is overbearing and seems more interested in signing you up for a credit card than helping you select the right jewelry.  It's clear that they are compensated more for these credit card sign-ups than they are for sales commission. Kay is a financing operation disguised as a jewelry store.
Very small, a little grimey but a decent enough college bar
Not enough staff, we reserved a party and instead of having our assigned person helping get our party setup we were handled at the front desk by the same employee trying to cash out all the walk ins.  This put our 6:30 party behind to the point that at 7 they were still trying to get our kids checked in.    This is a reoccurring event for us and our third time at this Rebounderz so we know how the parties are supposed to be handled and they definitely did not deliver.
Had an appointment scheduled with Hyde Park Appliance for 9 AM on Friday to come look at a broken dishwasher. Stayed home from work for the appointment, and they never showed up. Not only did they not show up, there was no call. I left multiple messages for Alex and they all went right to voicemail. This is one of the few rare times when I scheduled a service that had no reviews, I did so because they were so close by. I won't make that mistake again.
On my recent visit to Austin I revisited this restaurant, may I say the service and the food were just not that good. Tip look else where for good Indian food.
Avoid - wouldn't refund booking despite dire medical condition  While traveling to Orlando I heard bad news about my father's medical condition that demanded I visit him in hospital in the UK.  My office had booked and pre-paid a two night stay at the Westgate Lake Resort & Spa and despite being able to offer medical documentation of a terminal and imminently fatal condition, the hotel refused to refund my stay.    I understood the first night (that day) would not be refunded, but under the circumstances I could not believe their insistence to stick to a rigid and uncompromising policy for the second day.
Dealing with Amplify is like a very, very, very bad Twilight Zone trip.  I have had an experience with Amplify that was almost worse than the one I'm reviewing today.  However, a single rep who helped me on the phone gave me the willpower to give them one more shot in June, 2015.  Thank you Rachel. However, this latest experience today with Chris was beyond ridiculous.    Send me a private message if you'd like a link to a recording of my call with him.  First, I have had historic problems getting Amplify's online technology to work in my favor.  Very, very bad website, auto pay, etc. makes it almost impossible to work with them in a 2015 manner.    This wouldn't be a huge problem if I didn't spend huge amounts of time offline, traveling, life, etc. and had the time to babysit my monthly payment.   However, I don't so it is a major inconvenience and can be problematic coupled with the fact that their auto-pay systems don't work and they don't genuinely reach out to you until months later when they have the "late payment", lawyer up threat advantage.  Today, I called to catch up my payments AGAIN due to their technological failure to honor the auto-pay their own rep helped me set up in June.  After politely (listen to the call) asking Chris to escalate my call to somebody who cares, at a higher level, about the Amplify reputation, he took great offense (listen to the call), spent over a minute berating me for being late on my payments (listen to the call) and ultimately said to call their attorney and hung up on me.  I was blown away.  So were my co workers in the office who heard the call as it was on speaker phone, thus my recording....thank you Scott.  The fact is there are so many banks that have genuine care for their customers.  This is ABSOLUTELY NOT a bank you want to even consider given so many better options.  I will be scarred by the "Amplify Experience" forever!
The tea is good, but the operation is so slow. The wait time is unbelievable. It's like they can do only 1 drink per 5 minutes. So disappointed.
I was so stoked to go here, and so disappointed with the food.  The service was above and beyond, not a complaint at all.  But going to a gastromolecular restaurant, the expectations were high, and they didn't even come close to other restaurants.  Out of the 10 courses, I'd say 2 were excellent, but all others fell short.  Still totally bummed about this place.
Can someone tell me, what this whole hype is about all these 5 stars? Obviously they don't know what real pizza is about for everyone to say it's good pizza! My pizza tonight was burned, hardly any sauce, stingy mozzarella and no taste at all! I must say the only good thing about it was the dough. I must say this is not neopolitan pizza unless you  go to naples Italy and try the real taste. Not to mention expensive as hell for a single Margherita! My next stop is CIAO pizza in Chelsea heard lots of good comment p. They're next.
This place is garbage. I was here mid afternoon on a Saturday and there were only 2-3 others here at that time.  Dirty doesn't even begin to describe it.  Every table was littered with food, dishes, & other trash from the day.  There were huge dust bunnies under the slide and play ground equipment and other junk all over the floors (hair ties, paper pieces, a random sock, just other etc garbage all over the place).  The area for little ones under two is a joke, even for my 9mo old.  It is small with very little to offer, forcing is in to the bigger area where the real dirt and grime is.  Every little toy picked up has clearly not been cleaned in days, probably weeks or even months by the level of grime and stickiness involved.  Everything has a layer of filth covering it, from ride on & push toys, climbing thing, and the big balls.  Shall we talk about the bathroom?  A whole new level of gross.  The changing pad was a mixture of yellow, tan, & brown and no covers were available.  Shocker.  I packed up our things, bundled, and went to the neighboring store to 'shop' so I could use their clean restroom for myself and the diaper change.   I don't know how this place is still open, and especially how it has so many stars on here.  It is a whole new level is disgusting, and not real impressive otherwise.
We tried Exit for the first time with a bunch of friends and while it was fun, it has a lot of room for improvement. The theme of our experience was lack of directions from finding the location to the actual game.  For one thing, the address on the site doesn't direct you to the place. We were driving out from Chilliwack and were not familiar with the Richmond area and had to find the place ourselves using our reasoning since the GPS didn't guide us to it properly. We joked around about how this was the first puzzle to decipher - how to actually find the place.   Once we got in, the girl that was telling us the rules spoke way too quick and her directions were very unclear and confusing. We were booked for the Egypt room. For one thing, she told us we weren't supposed to touch the props and some of the main clues were hidden inside the props on the ground (in the skulls for example). Our group was quite confused and by the time we started to actually get a feel of things and figured out how things were supposed to work (in the 2nd room) like how  we could touch the props and that it was actually a pretty important part of the game - our time was up.   It was almost as if that was a strategy on part of the EXIT staff - to be as unclear as possible so as to leave you completely confused about how the game is supposed to be played, so you'd want to go again. That's why I gave it a 2 star. I feel like a much more clear and precise  directions would be helpful in making the game more fun. And maybe have the game be 1 hr instead of 45 min, so you really feel like you're getting your moneys worth.
I decided to give it another try...what a mistake!  Nothing has changed, the place is empty for a reason and same surly woman sets a horrible tone for the place.  Good News, however, Nero's Cafe has opened recently...right across the street!!!  Great atmosphere in the old Wellesley HIlls Train station...A much better option!
Every time I've gone to this location the place wasn't very full yet the service was slow. The food seemed extra greasy and the beer a little flat. The interior isn't appealing at all. Nothing cool about it really. I saw some people mention the outside dinning during the summer and the river view so if I go back someday maybe it will be this summer and I'll update the review then.
Empty dining room on a Thursday. Hostess sits me next to a crying baby. I ask if I could please sit somewhere else since the dining room is practically empty. She decided to sit me next to a bathroom!  Really?! I'm not a tourist either, guess I'll just have to take my business to chevys or chuys!!!
I had a horrible hair experience here. I had 4 years of growth cut off which was about 8 inches when I asked for 2. I have very thick hair and yes, I am picky. But this was my first hair cry since highschool. I'm 33. I should have never shut my eyes while she was cutting away at my head but I did, sadly. Normally it's very relaxing for me to have my hair done. Throughout the cut I could tell she was having a bad day by her demeanor. I had a picture and physically showed her the length I wanted off. I'm not sure why it went SO wrong. At the end when I was seeing the end result I was shocked and asked if she could flat iron it like the picture and she got MAD after I commented that it was much shorter than what I asked. She went across the room and literally slammed the flat iron down next to me so loud it made me jump. I actually started tearing up right there b/c she was making me feel so bad. I kept saying wow thats so short, mostly due to shock not to sound redundant... But all she sad was "yea but its still cute". I'm kinda like maybe its cute to you but its not what I asked for. This was before I even realized multiple strands were inches longer than the rest of my unlayered haircut. I was her last appointment and apparently she was in a hurry to get me out of there. I wasnt even willing to let her try and fix it and I also couldnt get my money back. Thankfully I found out where my old stylist was and she fixed it for me, however she agreed the cut was bad and extremely uneven.  I'd suggest not seeing their stylist Leah if you care anything about the way your hair turns out. I am not sure I could have communicated more clearly with a front/back picture and verbal "2 inches no more" off the length.
smallwares defines meh.    the fried kale does a disservice to kale, insults it, even.    and speaking of service, don't bother them.  they are busy busy busy with their little friends in the crowd.    sigh.  i had put a moratorium on bad food while on vacation, but this place ruined my streak.
Waited for over an hour for a table of 10. Was told by the hostess it would be 40 mins. Watched tons of other patrons, large parties, that came in after us get seated - these people did not have reservations - I know because they gave them those pagers that notifies you when your table is ready. Witnessing whole tables get filled with patrons that arrived after my party, when ours was waiting for over an hour is frustrating. The hostess (the obese woman, with terrible dyed black hair) was so rude when I asked how much longer it would be for a table (this is after waiting for an hour). She refused to provide a time frame for how much longer we would need to wait, kept reminding us that we were walk-in's with a large party as if we didn't know.  She then decides to ask us how many children vs. adults there were in the party, and then seats a huge party with no children that came in after my party. The worse part is that the hostess proceeds to talk negatively about us to another employee while we are standing right there in front of her!!!  When we complained to a manager, she suddenly was willing to accommodate us immediately. So folks, this is how you get a table here: 1. wait over an hour when the hostess tells you the wait is less; 2. when you ask how much longer it's going to be, the hostess will respond unprofessionally and rudely, and won't really do anything more than that; 3. complain to a manager who will magically have a table available on the fly. Showed up at 6:30 PM, gave up at 8 PM. After all that, we just decided to leave and not even eat.
The nurses are all rude. When you try to talk to them they act like you are bugging them from their gossiping. Every nurse i talked to was rude. But there was one that was beyond rude. Dark short hair, glasses, and the rudest person i have ever met at a hospital. I would never bring my children here, if they dont like working people they shouldnt be at a hospital. FIRE THAT DARK HAIRED WOMAN. She is beyond rude. I hate this place.
Wait time is ridiculous. Everyone else seems OK with that. Not me. Buffalo burger was bland. Service was bad. Gay/Bi bartender needs to learn to treat everyone equally. I got ignored. Reflected in her tip.
Horrible service. Many open tables in the joint and many more that had no customers, but weren't flipped from the previous customers. We were quoted 30 minutes and we sat for 45 with an update of 30 more. Tables were never being clean and the attitude was such of not caring about the customer, but hopefully waiting for the shift to end.
Let me start out with that this Petco is not every Petco. I am a tourist from Ohio and was only in Georgia for a few days and the Petco I normally go too is fantastic with knowledgeable staff that take great care of their animals (not just the fuzzy ones but the scales and finned ones too). This is the opposite of that place. So I stopped by just to see what a pet store this far from home has to offer. I love reptiles and fish and it is fun to see what everyone has and my reptile room has room for new tanks if I see a good deal on a reptile I want. I went in excited and ended up horrified at what I saw and witnessed from staff. The tanks were old which isn't the staffs fault and not a big deal I have seen old tanks like this taken care of well and look nice but they clearly didn't care to care about these tanks, algae and cyanobacteria abound with some tanks having incompatible fish shoved together. The icing came when I was at salt water and overheard the employee telling two customers that the fish they were looking at were damsels and I happen to look and see two SAILFIN TANGS! Not everyone may know salt water fish but there is a big difference between a tang and a damsel with the tang growing way way bigger. So what does someone do who knows more and can save a fish from being put into an improper home and saving a fishkeeper who doesn't know better a heartache? Politely point out that those aren't damsels but sailfin tangs and that get much bigger than a damsel would. And what does the employee do you wonder? Admits they aren't sure, maybe ask why I say that so they can learn and see what I see? Nope! She starts arguing with me very rudely! Says they are clearly and definitely damsels! So this back and forth continues and it starts to get heated and I'm at the point of pulling out my phone to show her what a sailfin tang looks like she can't deny it any more but my boyfriend pulls me away. I go to cool off a bit by going to the reptiles and hope the customers at least listen to me, especially since I said how I have been doing salt water and fish in general for years. What do I find? Not many reptiles those who are there being cared for, barely. I see leopard geckos and say how cute they are and the girl caring for them says that are weird and pulls one from under the carpet (which is a natural behavior) and proceeds to not set it down nicely but just tosses it. It is a living being for goodness sakes! Treat the poor thing with some care, even if you personally don't like it! I go back over to fish getting more and more disgusted with this place to find those customer getting both of the 'damsels' when tangs are very aggressive with the same species of tang. The employee comes back and says that 'other customer' (me) was right they are tangs and not damsels. And admits then that she knows little to nothing about salt water. Then why argue with me when I say how long I have been keeping aquariums? Why be selling animals you know nothing about?! This store disgusts me and makes me appreciate the one back home where the employees care and try to be as knowledgeable as possible for the sake of the animals. Petco, pay your people more so maybe they will care, hire people who care, or train them better (or better yet all three!) because this is why you get a bad name.
Sad to say I will be finding a new doctor. When I have a issue I come here and it's never fixed. I also saw Dr.Bley , It was hard for me to get a appointment because I just got laid off and no income. He prescribed me the wrong medication that did nothing for what I came in for instead I was left with a yeast infection I couldn't afford to cure for another 2 weeks due to money issues. I wasted hundreds of co-pays and who knows how much they get paid by our insurance but I know they at least came up a extra 10,000 off of me for doing nothing.
I didn't eat here but I did come here one night for a friend's 21st birthday party. I would never want to eat here! It was so hot and sticky upstairs and their were drunk people everywhere and then of course they had drunk Karaoke which oh gosh was terrible. I could not imagine even dreaming of eating in this place. The cool thing is the bartender took a birthday shot with me friends and I. We went downstairs where the bar was closed but carribean club was open. We had to go up and down the stairs to get a drink and on top of that the owner decided to come downstairs and watch a dance. What a JERK he decided to open the bar because we all wanted drinks and as I was taking two seconds to think of what I wanted to drink he said , " Hurry up we are closed here." I was thinking number one I didn't ask you to open it you were serving everyone else. Then he charged me like $20 bucks for two small small cups of hypnotiQ I was shocked!!! Never will I step my foot in here owner is so rude giving us dirty looks all night.
Horrible service on my friends birthday. Waited over an hour for drinks. Did not id..but food was ok
Id give this place no star if i could ... all i gotta say is WORST waitress EVERRRRRRRR.
I did not have a good experience at Fine Fit. I brought some of my dresses in for alterations after someone recommended me to go. I was disappointed that my dresses were worse than they were before anything was done to them. When I spoke to her, she sounded like she knew what I needed. However, when I went back to pick my dresses up, they were not what was discussed. I could not wear some of them again. I would not recommend this place to anyone I know.
So overrated!  It's cool to go once, or just go to Round Rock World famous Donuts.   I'll start with the fact that's is incredibly dirty inside here, from the bathroom to the tables, walls , and menus.   I don't usually eat sugar so everything should have been amazing, but no. Me and hubby split three donuts which ended up being one since two were so stale and old we threw them out. The only one worth eating was The Gay Bar. It was fresh and full of custard. The double chocolate and the sour cream cake donut seemed like they had been sitting out all day. We would have ordered other selections but most were out.   Once and done!  Can't believe there was such a long line. Plus most of the tables inside here had no chairs. The few that did have chairs were very dirty.   See you at Round Rock World Famous Donuts!
Crappy staff attitude. Botched order. Shitty location. Won't be back. Staff all look like work release.
Don't appreciate being skipped by 4 people while waitng on my boy and waiting for my haircut, first time here. Will not be back.
I have been to Fore a few times.... never a happy hour, I would like to try that. I have been reading a lot of negative reviews on service here, although my husband and I have never experienced bad service here at all. The only reason I give two stars to Fore is because I am not a fan of the food. We went there for burgers today, (which I rarely indulge in). They were very plain, nothing to wriite home about. On another visit, I had their salmon, which was overcooked, and not too enjoyable. If Fore just picked up things in the kitchen, I would give  it a happier review.
I went here on a friday and I beat the crowd. I was disappointed when I wasnt asked what kind of pedicure I wanted since there are options. I wanted a Tropical pedicure but the tech gave me a basic. The was no communication from the person doing my services and the whole place needs cleaned. I was sad to see so much dust on everything. We went to her nail table next so I could get gel polish done next. The table and all of the tables around us had dust, nail clippings and was just gross. I can say that i will not be returning due to the whole place needing cleaned. I didnt even see the tech clean the spa with Barbacide or anything for 10 minutes like they are suppose to.
I'm not sure there's a more romantic establishment than Sissy K's.  It's just fabulous.     Yes I'm being facetious, donkey!  Sissy's is constantly and consistantly the shadiest place I know in the Faneuil Hall area.  And for some reason, people line up for it all night long.  I guess it's the desire to  get spilled on and bust into a brawl late night after dancing on the super sweet dance floor upstairs while sipping bud lights out of white plastic cups.... Classy.  So what's good about this place? Uh, you'll definately have a memorable evening watchin this debachle.
DO NOT USE THIS COMPANY!  Like all the other reviewers, I had a groupon for light installation and have been waiting for the installer to arrive.  I have been calling the company all morning and there is no way to leave a message.  Now that I am on yelp, I see that I am in good company. What a horrible business!
Disappointing. Service was friendly and prompt but food wasn't good. Fried squid legs had good flavor but were tough and rubbery. Yakitori was bland and unremarkable. We got pork belly, chicken thigh, chicken skin, gizzard and short rib, none were great. The chicken skin one was especially disappointing, not crispy at all. The squid leg salad and gizzard yakitori were probably what we enjoyed the most. Overall unremarkable and we won't be back.
Forgettable. Great name with less flavor. The pork grinds appetizer was hard to eat. I couldn't eat half of it. The burger was normal. Nothing crazy. For $17 the hangry bison burger seems like a burger with mustard and hot sauce but nothing special. Completely unsatisfied.
I've had better service at waffle house. Overpriced, mediocre food and as a sushi fan I was overall underwhelmed.
If I were to rank this place on food alone, it's a solid 3.  The red velvet cupcake is probably a 4, but the rest is just mediocre.  If I rank this place on service alone, it would be a big fat ZERO!  What a disappointment!  I was so excited when this place opened, filling my head with fantasies of weekend strolls over to the neighborhood bakery for some good bread and pastries, or a sandwich. But I have never been able to get my order filled within 20 minutes even for the simplest purchases -- read, one croissant and a cupcake.  And mind you there were never more than 4 people in line in front of me.  But these people cannot knock out orders for the life of them!  I can't say the service people are full of attitude -- they're not really. They're just really, really, really slow.  I really don't know what their problem is.   If I rank the place on value, it would be a one star.  I will not purchase their sandwiches again.  I've bought plenty, paying more than 8 bucks a pop, keep hoping that one day, their brilliance will dawn on me. But I ran out of patience.    So, Bakeshop, as soon as I find a decent red velvet cupcake elsewhere, you and I are over.
I've had a good experience there before, but today unfortunately did not meet my previous expectations. After putting our names down, my friends and I were told we would be seated in 30 mins. We then decided to walk around to kill time, and when we came back, found out they had already called our name and moved on to the other customers. We told the hostess that we missed our name being called because they gave us a 30 minute wait, and she said she would move us back to the top of the list but never did. In all, we waited about 45 minutes before we all decided we had had enough. Too bad they missed our business because we were very hungry. Don't know if I will be back.
The manager is rude and unprofessional. They mixed up my sub with another person's sub. HORRIBLE EXPERIENCE!
I went to Dry Bar at Meatpacking and had the most wonderful experience! Everyone was so friendly, we were taken care of and my hair turned out just the way I wanted. The next weekend i went with my Maid of Honor to get our hair blown out at Back Bay before going to try on bridesmaid dresses. We walked in there was no one at the front desk and we waited for about 5 minutes until  the lady at the front desk came up to check us in (mind you she was in sweatpants and a hoodie-NOT professional). We got to our appointment 10 minutes early for our 10:45 apt. We were given our tea and coffee-no complaints there but not offered wine or champagne which I thought was customary. Come 10:55 we're still sitting waiting for our stylists. I go up to the front desk to ask when we're going to be seen and she was so disorganized. She didn't know who my stylist was. She said something along the lines of "well the stylist up there will be done in about 5 minutes and the girl who is doing your friend just got here so she'll be up shortly". We had to be somewhere at 11:30 mind you (I know we were cutting it close but we were seen 15-20 minutes late). I get taken downstairs to get my hair washed first. She didn't offer to take my coat or anything so I had my purse and parka piled on top of me while I hold my hot tea as she is washing my hair. I go upstairs to the station and the lady at the front desk asked my stylist to move over pretty rudely so my friend could sit next to me. We move 3 seats down and then 3 other girls take the seats next to me and my friend ends up sitting upstairs. We were happy with our hair and go down to pay and give our tips. I found my lady and handed it to her but my friends stylist was MIA. We asked the front desk lady if she could go grab her. 2 minutes later a lady comes upstairs asking if we were looking for her (it wasn't the correct stylist). The frontdesk lady STILL didn't know who did my friends hair so instead my friend walked up and downstairs to find her stylist. The only plus side was that we were happy with our hair and the reason I gave it 2 stars. VERY disappointed.
This was the worst experience ever at a doctors office and we didn't even see the doctor. The front staff was so shockingly terrible we are going to another city to get the procedure done.
I like my massage therapist, but don't like where she's working right now. It's a bit surf and turf - a lot of clients can come through and I'm guessing that's why you don't get the full amount of time you pay for.   I never had this issue, not with massage therapists anyway, in all the other places I've been to. Footworks Relaxology needs to allow more time between people or something to avoid this sort of thing from happening.  The first time, I overlooked it but this second and last time: I don't care how good the person is, you don't start late and end early. I will see my massage therapist if she ever moves to another setting, but not while she's here.
This place as really gone down hill.  I used to come once a week with a friend for several years.  Returned for first time after 6 months and was very disappointed.  Servers were not friendly.  People across from us got in fight over rules about wings.  They ran out of our favorite tequilla. The food was fair (we usually get steak salad, cheese sticks).  Just stunning how bad an experience it was.  Maybe new management or owner?? This long time customer will not return.
I am a longtime fan of Maudie's. Their cheese enchiladas cannot be beat. However, I tried something new for lunch yesterday & ate the chalupas. Meh. Around 11:00 last night, I began experiencing severe abdominal cramps. I was awake all night & was unable to eat all day today due to continuous cramping. I am so thankful that my toddler did not fall ill as well. Thank you for the food borne illness, Maudie's. You just lost a faithful customer.
Very very very very very rude.   I don't care if your food is good or not. You are first and foremost in the service industry.  The first time, I asked for a refill of water about 5 times and never received it, so I tipped them about 12%. Server had the balls to engage in a staring contest with me and declare that there was water in the cup (my friend's cup, and just a trickle). They then demanded for 15% tip until I put my foot down and said no. They threw me a LOT of shade as I left.  After a few months I decided to give them another chance. And that's when they grabbed my money off the table before I finished counting. That's the last straw.  The food is only okay.
The day we arrived, the room we were given had a piece of the main door lock broken off and laying on the doorstep as we walked in.  Additionally, there was a booger from someone's nose smeared on the wall next to one of the beds.  We asked to have our room changed, which was immediately taken care of for us.  Arriving in our new "booger free" room, we were looking forward to the situation improving, however, things started to get worse again quickly.  The corners of our bathroom looked dirty, like the accumulation of dirt and dust over time.  My youngest daughter found a piece of a old hotdog under one of the beds, as well as another child's missing shoe.  Why weren't these items cleaned before this room was deemed suitable for the next guests?  After already changing rooms once, this didn't feel like an isolated incident anymore.  Cleanliness was a problem at this hotel.    The next day our tv stopped working and we had to call to have it repaired.  Not a big issue, but given the other problems we experienced, it was just another added annoyance.  The second night of our stay, our youngest daughter had an accident in the bed.  We promptly called the front desk and made them aware of what happened.  They said they would note it and make sure housekeeping took care of it when they cleaned the room.  We left our room and didn't come back until the late afternoon.  When we checked the bed, it was made but still smelled of urine.  I called downstairs again and they sent housekeeping to our room.  After speaking with housekeeping they told us they only changed the top sheet of the bed with urine on it.  The plastic underneath the urine soaked sheet and all the other bedding were left the same.  When being notified that a bed has urine on it, isn't it normal practice to change ALL the bedding???  Apparently not at the Wyndham.    Lastly, when we decided to spend some time away from the room and visit the pool area, we were disturbed by the noise from the heavy construction.  We weren't able to relax the way we originally planned when first booking this trip.  The only bright spot of this experience was my wife's visit to the spa.  She has never had a massage before and this was her inaugural visit.  She said she enjoyed the facilities as well as the treatment very much.
2 stars despite the food being great. We waited 45 minutes after ordering without the waitress checking on us. There were only a couple other groups seated so we were sure why it was taking so long. We finally asked and we were told  by the chef that the ticket was never posted. We then waited 15 more minutes while the chef only then started our food. The waitress could've apologized when the chef told her she messed up but instead we didn't see her until our food came and she only gave a brief "sorry about the wait". I'd mostly let it go if there was any kind of discount offered. Very disappointing considering the food was really good and I'd love to go back otherwise.
They're upping the rake again. $7 max plus 2$. So bad for the poker community. The management doesn't give a shit about the players. It's pretty obvious, they're trying to kill poker.
If I could give 0 star I would. I took my kids here when I was moving them in to The Ballpark Apts. First off there was water all over the floor, we had to be really careful not to slip-accident waiting to happen. We placed our order and waited about 10 minutes got our food but  it was mixed up, spicy chicken with the wrong side, I asked for butter and honey for biscuits but he said they don't  offer it. Then we need a to go box so I stood at the counter for about 10 minutes, they saw me but would not come and help. Finally the Pepsi guy walked thru and I asked him to hand me a box. Extremely unprofessional and rude kids working here. Do not give them your business
Denmark charged me $14 for a shot of Fernet. You can get 10 shots of Fernet in the country of Denmark for $14. Not sure what this bar is trying to pull, but it's way out of touch. And its name makes absolutely no sense. Nothing Danish about this place.
Maybe my taste buds were off but I don't get the hype of this place?!! I came in on a busy Tuesday evening and ordered to go lamb, rice and cabbage. It came out faster than I was able to find my debit card! Which isn't a bad thing but umm okay. So after I saw the lamb I went back on my yelp app and said showed the lady taking orders that I wanted the lamb with the red sauce or what not. She told me I should have asked for that and normally they charge but she wouldn't this time! How about instead of treating this order like an in-and-out burger you take the time to ask more questions, especially being a first timer (yes she knew because I told her)!! She took it back to the kitchen and In 2 minutes I was out the door. Got home and the aroma already had me leery of eating! It was strong and pungent! Almost to the point of overwhelming (perhaps spoiled even) As for the rice and cabbage that's where the 2 stars stop! The lamb was underwhelming and a bit over cooked. I'm a medium to medium-well type chick and I get they don't accommodate to that extent,  but well done is a no-no!!! Also the red oil was seeping through my bag and got everywhere! Yea I won't be back but for a cheap dinner, I guess it was worth the try...Oh and I placed it in my fridge aiming to give it another shot the next day, I gagged trying to eat the leftovers!!!
The worst service ever received.  I don't know whether they don't care whether to see us there again but people at the counter are working with an attitude that is far more than unfriendly.  I have been going there for more than 10 years, but I was very disappointed by my 3 recent visits, and would consider not going back if I can.
This cafe sucks butt.... Really bad customer service will never drink from there again.
35 minute wait for tacos?! Plus they were out of chips! How does a tex-mex joint run out of chicks. El Milagro Totilla company is 5 minutes away...
Disappointed to have to come back and write this update, but people should be informed! Their food is expensive, but the quality is usually on par so I don't mind. I got a slice of their red velvet to go ($7.95 mind you for an average sized slice). I should have known it was a bad decision as it was the last slice left in the morning. Most stores have the courtesy and responsibility to throw away/discount day-olds but clearly Jaho does not take that seriously. The slice I got was stale, crusty and it had GONE BAD! Not sure what kind of quality checks they're doing or what training they're getting but it was horrendous. Stick to the coffee...don't get the food.
Grabbed a grilled chicken caesar salad on the way home and though the greens were fresh, the chicken was overcooked and bland.  Terribly overpriced too at $8.50.  I understand where the questionable sanitation comments are coming from now after seeing the lady handle the salad and my money with bare hands...
Live down the street from Zoe's for a year.  I have to say I did not miss much.  I ordered a salad that was the size of my hand.  Quantity quantity, QUALITY!  Just like Johnny's.  Now they leave you feeling full!  Won't be back I am afraid.....
Where to begin?  In the past several visits to Burtons, my experience has been a consistent 3-to-4-stars.  Not great, not bad... but certainly not last night.  it was like a cliff-dive.  My friend and I decided to go to Burtons to catch up and enjoy a nice dinner out.  When I politely asked how long a wait is for a party of two, the host (who wouldn't look me in the eye and was more concerned with looking at a couple in the bar) quoted the wait between 45 and 60 minutes.  No big deal for a Saturday night, right?  An hour and forty five minutes (that's 105 minutes for the mathematically challenged) and we were seated.  What's worse is the host had my cell phone number as a point of-reference - no phone call to say they were running late.  No manager to apologize, either.  Instead, the Harry Potter look-alike host, had the audacity to call my cell phone as we were standing in front of the host stand waiting for a table, glaring at him, while there was only one another party waiting for a table, too.  The food was okay - I had the bronzed salmon special that was just, "okay."  Dessert, the chocolate torte, was just "okay" but still a sweet treat.  Overall ... very turned off by the substandard service.  The restaurant experience begins and ends with the host; welcoming guests as they arrive and wishing them a good night and hopes they'll return as they leave.  If I'm going to spend money at a restaurant, I will spend it where I feel welcomed as compared to feeling like a burden.  Time for a new place to visit.
I was excited to try this place... however it fell in disappointment as their XLBs were juicy but lacking that flavor. Please do not get their tiny a$$ portion lunch special. I left hungry... I could've went for another lunch. Their desserts that come with the special weren't anything appealing.
Epic fail in every imaginable way 1) meat-cheap, flavorless, and grotesquely greasy 2) fries have no potato flavor and the crusty stuck on seasoning 3) Pepsi products 4) ridiculously overpriced-$20 out the door for lunch 5) bacon-undercooked and fatty.  Will return when it snows in Miami.
I got a sushi burrito and it was actually pretty good... but it was a taquito not a burrito so for 9 dollars I left hungry and unsatisfied and I got the veggie roll so there is really no excuse. If you want real sushi burritos check out Lets Roll PDX at the Rose City Food Park. They dont skimp, they cost less and you can also get beers at their outdoor beer garden. Save your money and get your dollars worth elsewhere. Unrelated but the bartender was also dismissive and rude. Never experienced that at the Rose City location.
From the undercooked beans to the Rice-a-Roni filling, I can't imagine a worse burrito.
I Went here a couple days ago.  Initially on entry it reminded me of the typical cheesy lobster place in every town.  The one a few cuts above Red Lobster, finish dining.  It being Portland I hoped it would surprise me.  It didn't.  Though prices are on par with the "best" restaurants in town the service was mediocre.  The surf and turf I ordered came in pieces.  The steak came first and seemed like it had been frozen as it was unevenly cooked cold and rare in the center when ordered medium and the lobster came out 10 minutes later over cooked and tough.    If you want a well prepared quality meal go almost anywhere else...
After getting dragged down to this market by my wife and kid, I got past paying $6 bucks for parking and $8 bucks a piece for admission, there i was, in the middle of this overpriced, boring and typical Vancouver venue!! Why does every fair in Vancouver think they can rip people off? OH!! Cause people in Vancouver accept that! Not me! I told the lady her market sucked and I wanted my money back! She wined and tried to sell me some bullshit about the Germans and free cider, I told her I'd take my money back so I could leave! She gave me half my admission back, better than none I guess? I would like to thank Mayor Moonbeam for this gem, keep up the bad work!!
Wouldn't even give them 1 star. The counter says open at 6:00am, and I am still sitting in lobby currently at 7:30am and no one has arrived at the counter. I have called Fox's customer service line and spoken with 2 different representatives, who claim they "have no idea what is going on" and then followed up with "someone should be there shortly. They are just running late"; that was 30 minutes ago. I also did a live chat with a representative who was no very helpful, but very nice. This place is a joke. I will be contacting whomever I possibly can to inform them of the HUGE 1 1/2 long inconvenience.   It is extremely embarrassing for this company, when the neighboring competitors' counters are apologizing for the lack of professionalism on Fox's part. Step your game up, Fox, and do a better job with hiring your employees. They are running your name into the ground with this irresponsibility of representation of the company, and lack of maturity to show up to work on time.
I don't get the hype. Yes they have interesting eccentric flavors but the donuts are way to dense and doe-y it's almost like they're wet and haven't dried yet.
Service is god awful.  Took me 45 minutes to get my sub.  I was in a hurry and after waiting 20 min, I asked for a refund so I could atleast leave the place without loosing money. The man who owns the place wouldn't give my refund. They're were some people who had been in there over an hour.  Decent sandwich but horrible horrible service.   Don't waste your time.
Just like franchise pizza but not as good, very Dominos-ish, Pizza Hut is better than this. Very salty meat. They don't have a real pizza oven, it's a conveyor belt type of oven (like Burger King makes hamburgers with but without the smoke flavor.) I visit Columbus often but I won't be back to this place, Wendy's would have been a better choice, at least it's cheap.
When I miss living in Birmingham, Alabama, I come here. Then I remember why I moved to Boston.
Order was filed up, no silverware or napkins into our room,this was supposed to be room service. They then made promises to make up for the lousy service, which they did not keep. Never again. Decent food, lousy service.
Terrible ...incredible view ...terrible staff...terrible food. Don't do it unless you are drunk and have no other place to go.
I feel a bit off writing this sort of review so early in the year when the mood and ambiance is supposed to be positive and optimistic, however, given that I feel that I have literally thrown away my money, I had to say something. It looks like my issues with POSH are similar to the yelper below who has had like issues with Group Deals and POSH.   Both myself and a friend purchased a Living Social group deal for Laser and Lash (One Year of Unlimited laser for $199). Awesome deal, right?  We were so excited.  I've always been a waxer and the idea of ridding myself of monthly $80+ appointments, potentially permanently, was very enticing. Unfortunately, I am beginning to think that Laser and Lash is simply fraudulent. Myself and my friend have BOTH called, emailed and left voicemails numerous (more than 9) times....only for NO response whatsoever.    It is one thing to have crappy customer service, however, it is another thing to be a complete fraud. If either myself or my friend don't hear from Laser and Lash in the next two days, we plan to not only ask Living Social for our money back, but file a complaint with the Better Business Bureau.
Not the best experience, after waiting for almost three weeks for my tires to arrive, they try to sell me tires a year and a half old,  i feel like i wasted my time  there.
I wasn't impressed at ALL. I spent $35 plus tip on a shellac manicure and left there very disappointed. First, there was only one tech on and the place was a disaster. I was sat down at a table where the person who was sitting before me left used disposable flip-flops and toe separators. Then, the women who did my nails did a horrible job shaping them and didn't even care to ask how I wanted them. My cuticles which were fine before I went were cut and the very next day I had more hang nails than ever before in my life. Finally, after sitting under the nail dryer (for those of you who have received shellacs know how drying they are to the hands) I wasn't even given hand lotion, let alone given a hand message. I will not be returning.
the rudeness and inefficiency are unbelievable. I recommend that you don't go to the downtown branch, try Watertown or any other. clerks are very rude. They will not process your papers if they don't like you or if you come from a different nationality. I was rejected at least 8 times even though I had all required documents with me. I went to Watertown RMV with the same documents and I was accepted! How surprising and annoying is that?? I would've given them a negative rating if Yelp had it. Seriously, people working there bring their attitude from their homes
I know this is McDonalds and I shouldn't have high expectations... but with McDonald's scale factored in this is still 1-star.    I don't frequent McDonald very often, but after a year I had a junk food craving.    DO NOT GO TO THIS ONE IF YOU CAN AVOID IT.  Lots of high school kids hang out here and they are rowdy.  I much prefer the old folk or home transitioning people.. at least they don't make noise.  I waited 15 min for an order. It seemed like they were really understaffed. I saw customers come in, wait 15 min. and then leave because they didn't even acknowledge them at the counter. The trash was overflowing.
Went last night for dinner, seekh kebab tasted baked , maybe I am wrong but portion was little for the price. Bihari kebab was chicken not bad but better tastes if it was beef. Nihari was ok but Nan were too thin and some parts not cooked properly.
Quite mediocre. The service was bland and the food was boring. And who makes pad thai with sweet and sour sauce?  They had a nice selection of rolls, but unfortunately the ones we ordered were less than stellar.  I will not be going back.
So we were forced into this Wendy's because every other (3) spot that we tried just wasn't working for whatever reason.  The heat wasn't working when we visited, and that made this a terrible place to eat.  Even the staff was in jackets with beanies.
I am so dissapointed with this place. We brought the family for dinner and it was not very crowded, which we were thankful for.  The ordering line moved slow. but finally we placed our orders. Fish tacos, grilled steak burrito and a cheese quesadilla for the kiddo. chips and guacamole for the table.  The toppings line was slow (even with a small crowd) and the only vegetable I was offered was lettuce, not even tomatoes. I tend to like fresh veggies on a nice burrito. the line was very disjointed and we were asked what our order was no less than 4 times. The staff clearly didnt know who's order was who's.  Fish tacos had the smallest sliver of fish on it and was not eligible for the toppings line. They were pretty much a lettuce and tomato taco. Although we were asked if we wanted salsa on it, and said yes. There was no salsa.  Quesadilla was .. well tortilla and cheese. no complaint from the little guy. but there were no kid friendly drink choices for kids except for water. Drink choices were very limited soda, drinks from the bar or water.  Guac was barely passable as avocado. not even a real avocado taste. Dont know how a previous reviewer said it was rich, it wasn't.  To top it all off? We sat down and took our first bites into cold food. not even mildly warm.  I wouldn't waste your time going here unless it is just for a beer and some chips/salsa.
I had an appointment, and still waited for my nail tech for 15 min. She didnt apoligize for being late either. Also she kept getting up and leaving. I  felt like I the client didnt even matter. So rude. Also 45.00 for full set pink and white. Ive never payed this much and been treated so poorly. Needless to say I wont be going back. Hope I can save someone out there , there hard earned income.
With customers from Mexico and an employee from Estonia. The Estonian had to get her passport to buy a drink; the Mexicans couldn't despite holding a US work visa in their passport.
My husband loves Italian food so when I suggested we go here he was for it. We then started to go every time we went to Columbus and it was always so good. The food is filling and there is a lot of it. However, they recently redid their menu and no longer offer bucca mio meals (individual) so that is a terrible turnoff. Otherwise crowded, loud and geared more towards a group looking to pass their dishes around the table.   The service is also spotty. Our last meal took 3 hours for 2 dishes but I won't even go there. spare yourself, there is better.
Ordered a house special pho. Broth was horribly heavy on MSG and beef was so over cooked that it was hard and chewy.   There is much better place nearby so I am not coming back.
Went in to cash a check written to me on an account at this bank. Was treated like a pariah because I don't have a Chase account (I use UFCU and BB&T). The snippy teller informed me I'd be assessed an $8 fee for cashing the check without holding an account. Very uncool. Was looking for a new bank for my very lucrative small business. This will not be it.
What a switch from the old days....Il Piatto used to be good.  Stopped in for an early dinner. Ordered 1 special of the evening, and a selection of items from the Happy hour menu. Things went downhill from there. The small starter salads were tasteless. The waitress stopped by to say that the kitchen was out of Penne pasta (at 5:30 P.M.?) and would we accept an alternative pasta.   The main course dishes arrived...the special we returned since the pork sausage was undercooked. The other two dishes (Gnochi, and "Penne ariabata"--made without Penne") were really not very good. We ate somewhere else on the way home, since we were both still very hungry! Can't recommend Il Piatto to anyone.
I just ordered online on Yelp and they called and cancelled my order. They refused to deliver because I am "way out of their area"! am exactly 1.8 miles away!. So irritating!
We were excited to visit because Mexican is our favorite cuisine and the decor and atmosphere seemed to foretell a great experience.  Unfortunately the opinion shared by the 3 individuals in my party was our entrees were a bland, flavorless, disappointment.  One member of our party had the poblano mole, another had the Texas bowl, and I had the Texas fajitas. Atlanta has so many venues for quality Mexican food, there is no reason to settle for this.
Got the pulled pork sandwich.  Two slabs of impossible to chew fat covered in sauce.  I was on a date. And it was taking me forever to chew, every time I took a bite.  So, I decided I would just eat the fries. As I have a fry in my hand, still chewing, the waitress drops the check at the table and says "Can I take that?"...   I'm thinking, "I am LITERALLY still eating and you are putting the check down and reaching for my plate?"  Since I am chewing, I just nod, disappointingly. She takes the plate.  Will not return.
Is it because this goodwill is downtown? Everything is so much more expensive than other goodwill stores.  Yes, they display quite nicely, but the products themselves are no different to any other goodwill. So why have prices of a second hand boutique store?
The workers were super nice, but the food was not so much. I had a really dry cupcake, moist but odd-tasting GF brownie, and a hard-as-rock GF cookie (which was also odd-tasting).  With there being so many other incredibly awesome bakeries, I don't see why I should go back here.
I saw a lot of great reviews for this place and went in on Valentines Day looking for some flowers for my girlfriend. She did not want your typical roses and when I explained this to the ladies at Amanda's I was told Gerber Daisies would be a good way to go. I don't really know much about flowers, but apparently I got taken to the cleaners.   $60 plus tax for a dozen of these things. I took them home and set them up in a vase with water...you know, like you do with flowers.  My girlfriend thought they were sweet and all, but she noticed some of them were damaged and were held up by wire wrapped around the stems. To make matters more awkward they were all dead only a couple days later.  I have since been told I should have ordered online and would have saved $20 - $30 AND gotten flowers that would have lasted at least up to five days post delivery.  Lesson learned I suppose!
I'm currently looking for a dining set so I thought I'd check out what MCM has to offer.  The store/showroom is across from each other in the New West Quay and had some nostalgic mid century items.  The owner was knowledgeable but a bit condescending.  When she found out I was only looking TO BUY 2-4 chairs, she told me she would NEVER split a set and waved her arms around in seeming random fashion to tell me she has individual dining chairs for sale somewhere in the store.  There are some beautiful pieces here but I think their refurbished furniture and reproductions are overpriced .  I don't think I'll come back to this store.
Just left after having lunch here and I will NEVER be back. More than half way through our meal one of the waitresses brought a plate of RAW meat and placed it in a table close to us. Raw meat! Out where your customers are eating a meal. The meat sat on the table for at least 20 minutes with customers walking by it. This is 100% a health code violation. I will never eat here again.
The reviews for this place astonish me. Maybe I've been on off days but I have been here twice in the last 3 years both times the same disappointment. Firstly lack of options makes me assume what is offered must be of quality but this just isn't true. Both times I received warm or should I say hot pearls in my tea that made the cup warm to even hold. I don't know of anyone ever wanting a hot sugary drink. The last time I threw my cup in the garbage just outside. This place is busy often with line ups. Probably because of its good location with lots of schools around. Teenagers are less picky on sweets often.
This place has foosball and shuffleboard. That is awesome. Good beer selection and the bar tender was super friendly.   But don't eat here. Super weird menu and nothing was even close to worth the price. I got the smoked meats plate of mystery meat (no one seemed to know what meats were included) for $12. It came with three small pieces of each the of meat. The flavor was okay, but it was served cold. Cold pork tenderloin and wild boar (eventually someone told me what the meats were) were weird and kind of gross, unless your into cold smoked meat. The smoked sea bass tasted just like beef jerky, if that gives you some idea of how over smoked it was.   I could only bring myself to eat one piece of each meat.
The portion size was smaller than I would've liked, and the food wasn't really distinguishable from other Thai like Madam Mam's.  That's not a bad thing. Madam Mam's is good.   What made this two star was, while mistakes happen, my dish was extremely spicy. I really love spicy food, I have a pretty high tolerance for it. But eating the dish (T1) was almost devoid of any enjoyment. It upset my stomach slightly.  What's WORSE, is that I'm almost positive I obtained food poisoning from eating this dish. It was the only meal I ate that day, and now I'm up at 5am writing this because of it. when it came back out, it was also quite spicy.   Probably won't be back, but I suppose it could be a fluke.
What has happened to Figs? We used to eat at the Charlestown restaurant every few weeks and always enjoyed it. Then we took a break for a few years and returned for the first time last weekend. The restaurant is filthy, the service was absurdly slow and sloppy and the food was miserable. The calamari, long a favorite of ours, was rubbery and almost flavorless. Our pizza, half Red Sox and half Bronx Bomber, was soggy, greasy and tasteless. Unless we hear of a major transformation, We won't be back again, even in a few years. Do yourself a favor. Skip Figs.
Have driven by for 2 years, finally decided to give it a try on a whim on Sunday night. "Greeted" by manager (obese bald man in white jacket) who was visibly and audibly rude and annoyed that we came without a reservation, although the place was quite empty. We were seated and server was nice but the food came out very slowly. Food itself was average, best part was the table Focaccia bread. Veal picatta was fine, bruschetta was totally soaked, wife barely touched her pasta, kids meal was very average cold pizza. Needless to say we will not whim to return again. Would leave the bald manager -1 star, server 4 stars, food 1 star, so final score of 2. When taken in context of other offerings on Washington St, keep on driving ....
Papi's is right near our house and we had been meaning to check it out for awhile.  We had heard good things...sadly we didn't experience them.  The highlight was the first thing we had, the Caribbean milkshake.  It was epic deliciousness.  After that, straight downhill.  I ordered a Papa Rellena for an appetizer. It was pretty bland.  We were excited about our entrees, ordered the daily special, ropa vieia, and a papi's specialty, masitas de puerco.  The ropa vieia was decent, nothing special.  Moist but oversalted.  But it was amazing compared to the masitas de puerco.  It was tough, dry, and bland.  Barely edible.    The service was slow and uninterested, actually sitting down at a table near us to text for 10 minutes, but he does get credit for noticing we barely touched the masitas, and he comped it.  I'd like to give Papi's another shot. But probably won't be back in a hurry.
Low grade sushi for cheap.  Experience: The wait can be long, but they expanded the place so now it moves.    Food: I used to think this was a great place for sushi, because the quality was tolerable and it was cheap.  However, now that I'm older I would rather pay a little more for good quality food.  I value quality over quantity now.  So depending on what you're looking for this may or may not be the place for you.  If you get the platters you get a decent amount for the price, but be aware that it's poor quality sushi.  I don't recommend the sashimi here for that reason.
Very dirty and old hotel.... everything was sticky and worn down.... and the breakfast was a joke... you can choose some bread or some Waffles .... the staff are friendly .... but overall definitely not a good experience... will not be back
I had a groupon (12 for 20) and decided to give it another go. However, the costs will come out to around 20 dollars per person. I ordered a beef combo and my friend had lamb. Both had very small meat portions and the veggies were just ok. Adding to that, I was very unsatisfied with the sauce bar option (no peanut butter sauce) and the spoons for the condiments were so tiny! It was not worth the price even WITH the groupon. I would recommend you to try 89 hot pot. About 26 dollars incl tip for UNLIMITED hot pot. I don't know how they're still in business tbh.
LONG WAIT!!!! Very difficult to check out even though we already had a reservation. Hidden and added fee. I WILL NEVER USE BUDGET AGAIN!!!
I may have gotten the fridge I was promised for the price agreed on but nothing else. I had to help delivery guy, Marco, to drop the fridge from the PU truck. If I hadn't been able to help him I'm not sure he could have done it himself. Then once installed the fridge was missing the butter tray door and fasteners to get the moulding on the front in place. I do not remember the latter appearing in the showroom so I think it was a bait and switch deal. I called twice and got a hold of the same guy and the first time he said he was too busy and the second time he promised to have someone out that day which never materialized. So in the end its probably better to spend an extra $300 to get a new fridge with a warranty and Austin $50 exchange rebate. Also on the receipt they gave me there was no company name, address or phone number. What does that tell you?
Small portions, small rolls. Rice is not properly cooked. Not enough ginger. Smells like piss inside
Me: "Hey, hubby...what do you want for dinner?"   Him: "Um...how about Thai?"    Me: "Huh...I was more in the mood for Italian...Well lookie here!  You can get pad thai, I can get pesto cavatappi at the same place! Ooh and Potstickers. Sold!"    Bad. Move. You'd think I'd have known better than to order anything from a place with Indonesian-esque, Italian-like, and Thai-ish dishes on the same menu.  This is mall food court cuisine without the mall.  Oversalted, under-sauced...just one big pot of "What's-the-point?"  And the pot stickers are *flat*.  Whoever heard of a flat potsticker?? Greasy panfied doughy noodles with a smidgen of indistinguishable ground meat and cabbage in the middle with a salty non-descript dipping sauce.  Yet another helping of what's-the-point.  We got it to go and I didn't pick it up, so i can't speak to the attitude of the staff.  But it wouldn't matter if they were the most gloriously friendly and welcoming people on earth.  There is wayyy too much good food in this town to bother with this pointlessness.  I'm out.
Trivia nights are cool but other than that this place is, yet again, an over priced over pretentious bar.  $13 just to walk through the door and $7.50 pints.  This place was in it's prime before the Dummy Donnelly group took it over. Get over yourself, Lamplighter.
Normally I would recommend people to restaurants in my Instagram but this place is a joke. If I could give , I would give a negative star because first the waiter didn't let my friend and I split meals. When I asked where in menu (in fine prints) said no sharing. He said they just don't allow. Fine, I gave the benefit of doubt because it could be cultural. By the time we was about to paid, he came over and said CASH ONLY. I was like what? Lucky, my friends and I had cash but we didn't see a sign at the front door said "CASH only".  When we left, I looked at their front door and they do accept credits cards!
When I walked in your restaurant I was expecting great service, and I received the worst in return. Maguly Sanchez was not only the rudest most  disrespectful employee I ever came to encounter but she then was rude to the gentleman behind me with specific dietary restrictions. First time coming to your establishment and I will not be back. She the had the nerve to call us customers names and assume we didn't know what she said. She should become a little more worldly and learn Spanish speakers don't all look the same.  She is a very unhappy and misguided person who needs to leave her personal problems with the people she has them with and not with customers. If it was not for your other employee who was great with helping me (Reno Cubides) it would have been a lot worst. She clearly has a problem with accepting money from customers. But no worries I won't ever spend any there again she has certainly guaranteed that!
Last week was the second time my coworkers and I called in our lunch order for pick up.  Both times the order was $60-$70, a nice amount of business for this restaurant.  Both times during the order we confirmed when the food would be ready (20 minutes).  The first time we were in the restaurant at the 20 minute mark ready to pick up, but our order hadn't even been started.  We waited another 20 minutes before everything was ready.  Disappointing!  The second time, we didn't leave our office until the 20 minute mark, giving them a buffer and ensuring our order would be ready as soon as we arrived.  Again, when we arrived our order hadn't even been started being made, this time 30 minutes after we ordered and 10 minutes after it had been promised.  We waited another 15-20 minutes for our order to be ready.  Not acceptable.  The meal itself was decent (perhaps because by the time we ate we were ravenous!) but not that great.  Factoring in the unacceptable wait and lack of apology with mediocre sushi, I don't expect to be back.  Definitely not recommended for take out.
The worst service ever!  This AT&T store has very, very poor customer service and they don't seem to care. I stopped in to review an overcharge on my bill and was put a "20-minute" waiting list. After an hour I asked what the hold up was and was told in a sarcastic manner that " you are not the only person waiting." I could see that and I could see from the look on other customer faces that we were all amazed at the lack of concern for customer time. They should have had twice as many employees on the floor to handle the needs of waiting customers. I came home without getting the help I needed. I'll never go back to this store and I wouldn't recommend it to anyone.
I haven't order food from you guys in Years and now I know why. My tacos sauce container was open and all over my food. The tacos were too burnt. My 5 yr old brother couldn't eat it.  Deliver took over 1 hour.
This review is in regards to my experience with Oak + Fort's online website, more specifically, their Customer Care department. I can sum it up in one word: nonexistent. I purchased a gift voucher online as a gift for my bridesmaid back on August 31st. I would have purchased it in person at their downtown Vancouver location, but as I had been busy with my wedding and I had flown in from out of town that week, I simply did not have the time. I thought I had saved myself so much time and effort by purchasing a gift certificate online. I couldn't have been more wrong.  They only accepted PayPal for payment, which wasn't a problem. I received the receipt for my payment right away, but it wasn't until September 9th (more than a week later) that I received an email from a Stephanie from Customer Care confirming who she was to send the voucher to. I responded on the same day, requesting that she send the voucher to my email address so that I could then forward it to its recipient. I never heard from anyone again. I sent another email on September 12 (nothing), and on September 17th I told them that if I didn't hear from them by the end of the week, I would file a dispute with PayPal to get my money back. Throughout this time, I attempted to phone Customer Care (no one responded) to deal with this issue. I also made sure that the gift voucher did not get lost in my (and the gift card's recipient's) email spam folder. I finally got so fed up, I went ahead and filed a dispute with PayPal on September 20th. One week later, Oak + Fort had still not responded to the dispute, so I escalated the dispute to a claim to get my money back.  It's a shame I've had such a horrible experience with Oak + Fort because I really am a fan of their clothing and aesthetic, along with their sister company, Loft82. But for a company with a continuously growing online presence (Facebook, Instagram), it's  frankly pathetic how bad their customer service department is. I even tried writing on their Facebook page in the hopes that SOMEONE would see and respond. It's unbelievable that they have no problems updating their Instagram and Facebook accounts daily, but no one can even be bothered to respond to messages in their Customer Care department. Even more, for something as simple as purchasing an online gift card where it is to be received by email (and not even through regular mail), it's inexcusable that it's taken this long without a reply. It's been over a month, and as of today I still have not heard a single word from the company since September 9th. I will provide an update if I ever end up hearing from them to see how they handle the situation.
The burgers were disappointing! I personally don't think the burger were worth the money. The place seems like a great concept, but definitely fell short of all the hype that I have read about.
Really disappointed by the recent financing fiasco. Their business hours are short and the online ordering system is closed until further notice. I had purchased a year membership and barely got any worth out of it before things went downhill. Since I tend to work late, I relied on their online ordering and delivery. I'm also typically unable to make their now-reduced business hours. I want to feel sympathetic but I can't deny that I felt like I wasted my money with the membership.
Ok, i tried this place for a third, and last, time. Here is why I wont go back. Ordered the Italian Sausage with linguini. When the dish arrives (Salsiccia con Pepperoni ), it is in a bowl sans linguini. I try a little, looking for linguini...it tastes very good, but no linguini. I finally flag down my server and explain the menu says with linguine (I actually had it pulled up on my cell phone). He looks perplexed and goes to get the menu. He then points out the menu and it doesnt mention linguini. Then I notice its in the antipasti section. I make him turn to the entree section, and wa la, there is my dish. He apologizes and says he will correct it. Now, at this point, I am ok with all this. Mistakes happen, even though I dont know why the dish is listed with the same name on the menu in two different places and why he would assume I want an antipasti as my entree, but he should have known the menu and clarified. But here is where it goes south...they bring out the dish, I eat, he brings the bill, and states they would only charge me for the antipasti. I didnt need them to do that, as I ate the entree, but nice gesture. When the bill comes, they charge me for the entree. I dont argue, I just want to leave (I had been there almost an hour). Then, about an hour after I get back to work, I have a bout of Veronas revenge...so after three mediocre meals here and gastroentestinal distress, I will not be returning. Shame too, as I use to eat at the Carabas that was at this location many many times.
our flight from ny to boston was cancelled, they made us wait over an hour in a baggage check line, nobody came out to address us, they didn't pay for anything, we were also charged another baggage fee on the way home the next day, I will never fly American again.
Good crepe and vietnemeesecoffee. Sadly, first time there from LA and my friends purse was stolen from this location. Keep your belongings next to you at all times. Some shady individuals roll through there.
I've been to this Smyrna location twice-both times for lunch.  The first time I enjoyed the buffalo wings pannini.  It was very good.  But this time I decided to try the chicken salad pannini.  It was horrible.  Chicken salad?  More like chicken paste.  The chicken appears to be ground up into a paste.  The Panini bread was cold when it got to my table.  I am glad I ordered a cup of gumbo or I would have starved.  Our waitress had to be hunted down to get some mayonnaise which I thought might help this chicken paste.  It did not.  The chicken salad is horrid and I would not recommend it.   The service today was not so great and our table was wobbly.
This company drives me nuts! It's a RECYCLING company in PORTLAND that still relies on paper invoices, and snail mail. No online bill pay, no payment over the phone by credit card, and no paperless options. It's the only bill I still have to pay the old-fashioned way. Grrrr.
Had takeout last night, chicken fingers weren't cooked and gross.  Crab Rangoon's tasted like they were made last week. Why can't you get good Chinese food in South Boston!!
Ugh this place.  I've gone here twice for private events, so have really only been in the downstairs part, but have been unimpressed overall.  Can't really nail down exactly what it is about Dillon's that rubs me wrong; maybe the pretentiousness of the place - high ceilings, boring decor, awkwardly dim lighting, just a lack of character I guess.  Seems like the bar is trying to be classier than it is, I guess; I felt out of place here and then realized I tend to feel out of place when a bar lacks as much funk as this one does.  Just not my scene (clientele-wise, too), really.  Drank beer which was fine, really just nothing to write home about.
Can I give zero stars? Hasn't yet bothered to inform our entire apartment building we are getting kicked out so they can "renovate" (new carpet and paint) and raise the rent 50%.  After I called a couple times for other reasons, the secretary mentioned it as a side note.  Amazing. Truly. Also the crews they have been sending to work on the building are quite questionable, clearly the cheapest in the region.  PBR for lunch, anyone?
I have no idea why I wanted to check it out but I was in Hilliard visiting some friends on a Friday night. It was little after midnight. As soon as I walked in, the two female patrons sitting at the bar turned their heads towards me, the new comer aka target (aka victim?), and I swear my eyes caught a light reflection of a front golden tooth of one of them. The happy thrilled grin on that face. "Am I going to be eaten alive here?" I wondered. I think there was another dude sitting at the other corner of the tiny bar. Best part there was no bartender at that point so he/she was either in the restroom or one of the tooth ferry ladies was tending. I gave another quick scan of the place to make sure it was not a crime scene of some sort and left. Saw a man standing at the door taking a smoke and he said "I'll be right with you".... Ahhh, so that solved the bartender puzzle. I told him ah thanks but I gotta get up early in the morning for work "Fat White Lie".
Certainly not what I expected. Time for a makeover at this hotel.  Room was large with a great view but also poorly lit with mostly  drab color everywhere. Windows were filthy. Furnishings were also a bit dated. Wifi was a challenging connection so finding things of local interest was especially tough as no guide to anything in the hotel or nearby could be found. Thank heavens for the Gideons. At least they did their job.  Hampton at least has an in-room guide that always tells me about the free breakfast, where I can get a pizza and other items of local interest.   Our stay came with a free continental breakfast. We arrived at the restaurant reception desk and were NEVER seated. We had to find staff and we were told we could just sit anywhere. After we realized that the continental breakfast was little more than toast we opted for the up charge buffet only to find NO PLATES. We solved this by sticking our heads into the kitchen and taking some off of a cart. We filled our plates and had a seat. Halfway through our meal we were finally asked if we would like some coffee.  Coffee was good. The fact that we were so poorly treated at 10:00 AM on a Sunday is unacceptable.   Like many downtown hotels this property is not cheap. Maybe it should be.
Both Zip lines were broken when we went; a fact they kept to themselves until after we had paid and gotten harnessed in. and they don't make it clear at all that there is a 60 minute time limit.
This review has nothing to do with the movie we saw, or the theater itself. It's a great facility, with nice reclining seats.   If you were ever planning on dining here, please eat elsewhere. My wife ordered the chicken tender meal, and I ordered fish and chips.   For $16 each meal, you get three chicken tenders, or three fish sticks. The pictures you see on the walls throughout the lobby of the theater are very misleading. They show a plate full of food, with six large chicken tenders, or six shrimp, whatever your protein choice may be. It's a 3" long chicken tender.
The food was great! People obviously come here for the meals. The Customer Service, great, too! Friendly, helpful. We were even offered a Senior Card for future discounts.  Negative why I didn't like about the restaurant: 1. Seats were taped up with duck tapes. 2. Ceiling has holes in it. 3. Cracked ceiling paint. 4. Cobwebs. 5. Toilets went on & on, no towels. no seat protector. 6. Where my husband was sitting, a bullet hole in the window @ eye level.  Badly in NEED of a remodel. Yes, I know, they opened in 1963, but I think it's time!
Walked in and an employee was sitting down feeding her face saying sit wherever you like.  We chose a seat inside. We were served our drinks pretty quick but it went down hill from there . Bottom line is the service and the food left alot to be desired.  The servers never came to check on us until we said excuse me mam.  When we expressed our concern to one of the servers her response was they have other customers.  Thought this was the same as the one on Sand Lake but I know now it is definitely not.  Asked for the owner and he wasn't there so they gave me a card.  Guess what, website on card doesn't exist.  Will never go back!  Awful!!
My wife and I attempted to eat here last night before the Jim James show at Stubb's (BTW amazing show) but were very disappointed by the experience.  First the positives, this is the first time I have been down here since this property was Jaime's.  The re-design is beautiful and it looks like they have an fantastic patio to sip drinks and people watch.  However, this is where the warm fuzzies go away.  We arrived at around 6 PM and even though the patio was pretty busy the inside seemed dead.  We asked the host how long the wait would be and he stated 45 minutes for inside, as we were conferring to decide if we were going to wait he walked away.  As we were talking I looked into the restaurant and saw at least 3-5 empty tables and then as I walked around looked into a second room and saw literally 15-20 more empty tables.  When the host returned we asked about all the empty tables and he said he could not seat us because they did not want to overload the kitchen.  I'm sorry but a 45 minute wait to sit at one of your 20+ empty tables is not acceptable.  Best of luck but we will not be one of your patrons.
Avoid this place!!  Worst Service Ever.  Called at 4:30 for delivery.  States 40 minutes for delivery.  Waited 1 hour and called.  Lady, who I could barely understand, stated: it's on its way.  45 minutes later, I called.  Lady stated "it's on its way."  She was unapologetic about wait and had nothing to say other than "our drivers have to go to many different neighborhoods in all parts of town."  But wait, you only have a 4 mile radius of delivery area.  Got my order 1 hour and 55 minutes after ordering.    80% of it was right.  Website says great customer service.  Not today.  No attempt to make it right.
Not a great experience and will not use them again.  Bought a Groupon so the price was good but beyond that, it was lackluster.  They showed up 1.5 hours early without any prior warning so once they called I had to rush home from work.  The girl did an okay job on the kitchen and bathroom but brought her vacuum up and didn't even vacuum.  She mopped 1/2 the floor but not near the main door (which is right in the living room) where all the salt was so there were still huge salt stains from the winter.  The Groupon was also for a 3 hour cleaning and they only stayed 2.5 hours, which would have left them a 1/2 hour to vacuum, so it's not like she ran out of time.    Will not be using again.
Out of sheer desparation I broke my own promise to myself "I'll never waste money here again during lunch!" and decided... OK - I've had medicore experiences here but I typically ordered the same thing. Maybe if I try something else I'll be pleasantly surprised.  WRONG.  One word: soggy.  What is with this place? It's a soggy mess. And not only is it a soggy mess... it was more than $10.00 for a sponge like sandwich, wet fries and a soda.  You're officially dead to me UFood.
I visited with my family last night.  Very AVERAGE Chinese food and service. Waitress was a small Chinese lady wearing glasses who provided very mediocre service throughout the process.  Tip was included, that is probably the reason why there was no effort on her part. Food, ordered various dishes dim sum to entrees.  Pork dumplings were deep fried versus pan fried, very greasy and filling was tasteless.  The best way to describe the orange chicken and other dishes is mall food court quality, if that. Hopefully, this review will help.
My boyfriend and I have been coming for Swahili at least once a month or something first few times it was really good, the past 3 times it has been an awful. The wait staff is rude, the main bar tender and the girl with pink hair, the foods gross and we will not be returning.
I live in the Rollingwood/Westlake area and have been hauling my clothes to Tip Top Dry Cleaners at 12th/Lamar for about 8 years. They consistently did an outstanding job (dry cleaning on premise vs factory).   Two years ago Tip Top was purchased by Reid's Cleaners and initially they kept track with Tip Top on quality so I moved to a location near my home on Bee Caves Rd.  Quality of workmanship has become all too predictable. Laundered shirts with puckered collars and seams; dry cleaned items with easy to remove spots still visible; loss of structure in dry cleaned items, etc. etc.  What prompted this review was my pick up two weeks ago of a wool Roxy coat (never dry cleaned, worn twice) that ruined the fabric and a Nordstrom purchased jacket/blazer that had the lining trailing behind it under the bag. The (very nice!) ladies in the Rollingwood store helped me remove the liner of the Nordstrom jacket with scissors. Aargh!  When I looked at the other Roxy plum coat it was as if someone had rolled it around in lint and dog hair. It was utterly ruined. It was a gift for my daughter which weeks before had tags on it and had **never** been dry cleaned.    The poor, great guy at the Reid's location on Bee Caves Rd was very kind and said I would be called, and another woman helpfully told me I would *not* be charged for the DO-OVER on the ruined coat but was for the original destruction, which I had already paid. Nice.  A man named Hector called twice but stick a fork in me. I'm done, and left searching for a quality dry cleaner in Austin.  I have never, in 25 years of living I
These people are the absolute worst! All they had to do was deliver a mattress....the truck broke down and i was told by the dispatch lady that she had no info and would get back to me well several hours later still no word i call back and she says they are about to close and haven't heard from the guys so we have to reschedule and she didnt have any info still and to call back in the morning!....WTF
Stop showing your damn commercials in Savannah nearest one is a hour away Damn i miss Atlanta
So I didn't want to highlight any stars because I'm giving this LOCATION ZERO STARS. I'd been told that the ice cream at JP Licks was SOOOOOO GOOOD BUT I will never end up being able to tell you if it is good or not because the customer service drove me away before I had a chance.  I went in and got stared at by a rude young man behind the counter. When I then ordered the cake batter ice cream, he then very very rudely said we don't have any. He then proceeded to stare at me some more and didn't offer any suggestions or help. The way he told me they were out of cake batter was so rude, I could barely focus on ordering anything else. I then asked if they had the oreo cake batter. He replied very rudely that they didn't have that which prompted me to ask what they did in fact have available.  He said everything else. So I then ordered the white coffee. He asked me if I'd had it before and I said no. He then TOLD ME I had to taste it before I ordered it. UHM EXCUSE ME!?! I'm the customer! I don't have to freaking taste it if I don't want to. BUT he didn't give me a choice. After tasting the ice cream, I told my boyfriend that we had to leave.   The guy was so rude I will NEVER EVER go back to JP Licks. ALSO, my company is sponsoring a spin-a-thon for the Jimmy Fund and I had considered asking JP Licks to be one of our smaller sponsors which would have provided them with a good bit of free publicity. Now I DEFINITELY WON'T ask them to participate. I don't want a company with such bad customer service aligned with my company. INSTEAD I WILL ASK COLDSTONE to be a sponsor. YEP JP LICKS you lost FREE PUBLICITY and a chance to associate yourself with a good cause.
With change in ownership the food has gone downhill. It's terrible and I won't be back.
My first review. Yippy! Been coming here for quite a while. Usually carry out because of the noise level in the dining room. Noticed in the last six months or so that food quality is going down hill big time. We used to really enjoy it. Worse though is the wait time to pick up our order. Never ready when promised. Even worse, extreme attitude from hostess and cashiers. Actually, just plain rude. We are not complainers and I understand that people have an off day but we will no longer pay to be treated that way.
The snow had wrecked my break pads and rotors, I took it in to Midas since they were open on a Saturday one year or so ago and they replaced all the breaks and rotors for about 800.00, sounds somewhat reasonable for all that work. I needed it done asap, so it was the only place I could go at the moment since my regular Mechanic was closed for the weekend.  And here I am, one year later, living in another state and having to REPLACE them because they were mounted wrong and therefore caused the same damage to happen again! All FOUR of them, another 750.00 to fix what they didn't do right.
So sad! Had meeting space rented with dinner. Food was just a bit warm sure not hot. They put tea out but no hot water. Room was very cold, we all had our coats on. One star because the room is clean and one because it's easy to find.
Friends who live/work near here suggested we stop here for lunch.  Upon arriving and the odor hitting me when we walked in, I knew something was afoot...  The table had just been cleaned, but was still sticky.  I saw the waitress who wiped it down and the rag she used looked like it came right out of my garage after working on the car, ugh...  My shoes were sticking to the carpet also, another sign this place is just overall dirty.  I went to wash my hands after touching the table and upon entering the bathroom was appaled by the smell of ammonia so strong it brought tears to my eyes.  Every item on the buffet looked overcooked, and it was, and what's with all the damn broccoli?  Not that I mind it, but in every other pan?  Poor excuse for a filler.  And the hot/sour soup was nothing more than brown liquid with an occasional mushroom or onion sliver in it... Overall the food just had a sickeningly sweet/burnt taste to it.  Even the rice and noodles were overcooked to the point of being inedible.  And as far as service... Taking my drink from the table to refill it, OH HELL NO!  Here I am 5 hours later, with a deep regret eating at this establishment. And my friends have been chastised for telling me it was "decent Chinese buffet food"
I had a dining room and living room set to donate. I spent money to rent a uhaul and drove the items to Saugus. The items were refused because they looked worn. The guy didn't even look at the dining room set at all which was used maybe a handful of times. He said they had too much merchandise in inventory and were refusing donations. I'm disappointed that I wasted money renting a truck to make a donation. Thankfully I found Savers who was very happy to accept the donation. I'll never attempt to donate to Sally's again.
My husband and I have never had been treated so badly in a hotel before.  I know the woman at the front counter couldn't solve our problem (no king rooms left and our rate didn't guarantee one), but the way she talked to us was so dismissive and rude it honestly shocked me. I guess they run into this issue a lot, with people booking through Hotwire, but the answer isn't to ignore people's questions and instead keep repeating in a robotic voice, "Credit card please?" Really, it comes down to basic politeness. A word of welcome, a smile, a perfunctory apology, chit chat, an offer of a map or restaurant rec--any of these things would have made it okay. Instead we were coldly sent off to a horrible little room in the South Tower.   I want to at least end on a positive note so I'll say the hotel location was excellent, just a couple blocks from the entertainment district. Next time we'll stay somewhere else, obviously, but nearby.
The prices left a bad taste in my mouth. I ordered one of the virgin drinks and ask for a little gin in it. I fully expected to pay more by adding alcohol. The virgin drink was $8 and they charged me TEN (!!!) additional to add the gin. This is highway robbery considering that the average price of the other cocktails on the menu was $14-$16. Very nice bar and the food looked great, but I can't bring myself to give them any more of my business after this experience.
Restaurant is closed....Was planning to go there for dinner last night, a Saturday, as Open Table was accepting reservations for the restaurant...got there and there was a "closed-thank you" sign on the door....
Overrated pizza. Racist staff. I have been to all pizza joints in East Boston and I have to say this is nothing special. That, mixed with the "we don't like your kind 'round here" attitude from the staff, is definitely a deal breaker for me.
We've been here several times so knew that the food would be fairly good American-style Italian. Not real good - but fairly good. Tonight was much the same, but the service was poor. This was our first Friday visit and the place was hoppin' so maybe that's the issue. The line was slow, the order was wrong, the bread was way overdone, we had to go ask for cutlery. Our waiter never returned to the table one time after delivering the wrong order.   It's decent food and a good price, but don't expect anyone to really care that you're there. Given that, I will still return - but not often.
MOLD EVERYWHERE!!! RUN! Walked in...lobby looks like a restaurant but a run down version....so..shitty. Staff was rude. Room  looked like a Motel 6. Small bathroom, room smells like farts, pillows felt like they were from the dollar store, no mini fridge, and walk ways on the 3rd floor feel like they are going to collapse (wood panels with carpet on top)!!  Don't believe the kid zone...its just a Walmart special. Not to mention you have the helicopter ride flys over every 20 minutes. Honestly, it was close to Epcot, CHEAP, and pool area was nice, which is why i am giving this 1 STAR ONLY. Besides that, negative 1 million stars.
We went there for lunch on 1/16/2016. It was not good at all. It seems to me Red Lobster continues to serve poor quality food at not so reasonable prices. I ordered the blackened catfish with a ceasur salad and rice pilaf.The salad dressing tasted like it was just poured out of a bottle. The rice reminded me of a box of Rice a Roni....probably was. The catfish was ok but a very small filet. The other person ordered a seafood pizza. It was extremely salty. Told the server and he just says ...sorry....and walks away. I remember over the past years when RL was good. Now it's all about cutting corners to increase profits. Darden should just realize maybe it's time to close Red Lobsters and move on. They know there have been problems over the recent years. I will not be back based on another poor experience with RL...it's not worth it.
Found a huge bug in my salad. Halfway through the salad I discovered this bug. I almost threw up. I found the leg first, then found it's huge black body. Ugh!
Arrived for Breakfast.  Waited forever even though there were several empty tables, understaffed?  Can't they do something with the awful door that THUMPS every time someone enters or leaves?? We waited on and then... we were passed over for a table!  Both of us were unimpressed.  The only thing warm on my plate was the scrambed eggs, the potatoes were cold, biscuit was like concrete and cold, even the bacon was cold!  Our waitress however was very good, pleasant attentive and without quibble removed the cold breakfast from the bill.  Would we return? No. Why don't they have real preserves instead of the "fruit puree"?
Bought a groupon the evening before, so I could get an oil change before a long drive I had scheduled for the next day. I mentioned the groupon when I pulled up, and the attendant barked at me immediately, asking when I purchased it. He then tells me (loudly and rudely) that he cannot honor it until 24 hours has passed, and that I should have known that.   I left and got a refund on the groupon. No way would I ever give them my business.
Review for weekend "brunch" only.  I've never tried their beers or other food but decided to stop in b/c all the other usual brunch places where packed.  The prices are really reasonable for their very limited brunch menu.    We were seated by the manager?..  he didn't give us any lunch menus... and never checked back in with us, actually, the whole time he looked like he was in a pissed off mood.    I ordered the french toast and it was good but I was disappointed by a number of small things, first, I ordered coffee and the cream came in those little individual servings like you'd get at a gas station, sort of lame for a restaurant, and the server brought it over in a handful... uhm.. ok...   Second, my friend asked for butter, same thing... little individual servings placed on the table in a handful.   I think our server was new, she was ok, but she couldn't close her mouth when doing things.. it made her look sort of ditzy, and the blond hair didn't help.  But seriously, bringing stuff over in handfuls sort of ruined the experience of dining out.   Lastly, the syrup for the french toast came in plastic take-out ketchup-sized black little cup containers...  I wasn't sure if I was supposed to eat there or take my food home!    All in all, the food was ok and it was fast for a Sunday brunch.
I was planning on staying here due to the close proximity of the two best venues in Austin to check out music. The Mohawk and Stubbs.  The Mohawk is probably the best venue it's size in the country.  The management of this hotel is complaining about the best part of the hotel which is it's proximity to the best music venues to the city council.  Those venues were around a lot longer than your hotel.  Don't see the apartments across the street complaining and they have been there a lot longer.  I will no longer frequent here or the Westin due to the management of each hotel complaining about the best reason to stay at each place.  They should have spent more money on soundproofing if they thought the music would affect how much business they would get.
Charged me $75 just to take a look at my car.  Recommended over $1400 worth of work so I took my car to Yost to get a second opinion.  Yost looked at my car for FREE and then fixed the problem for $210.
I agree with the rest of the reviews. Foodies was a mainstay of my weekends.   I gave the Rockhopper a couple of chances, hoping I'd enjoy the experience just as much.  My experiment with this place was short lived, however.  The owner was really rude every time I went in, and the staff just seemed miserable.  It was just bad energy in that place.  The service was very slow, and the food was not worth the wait.  I think that if the new owner want to salvage the biz, she's going to adjust her attitude and do some training and team building with the new staff.  BTW-You can now find me at the Muffin Shop or the Atomic on the weekends.
Very poor customer service, the cash register is kinda hidden behind a wall. It was my 1st time and I was asked if I wanted to order takeout I said yes, the woman walked away. Another woman walked in and around the corner and they took her order! I was like oh , u could have told me to order around the corner and not at the front desk area, which was the only area in sight. Have gone again service still lacking
At 7p, I walked in for a haircut, as the call ahead list was booked. The receptionist told me they weren't accepting any other patrons for the night. They don't close until 8p.  Receptionist didn't offer anything except to try the downtown location, which closed at 9p.
It says you close at midnight tonight. Attempted to enter at 11pm and you are closed. Bummer.
The Boyfriend and I have eaten here twice in the last 6 weeks.  The fries are really, really good.  Their cheeseburgers are okay. I'm spoiled by the great California places; In-N-Out, and Tommy's World Famous.  Frankly, The Big Carl at Carl's Jr., and even a Big Mac are better than these burgers.   How can they have so many toppings and sauces but no Thousand Island-like sauce???
I was told kitchen closes 15 minutes before restaurant closes. How does this make sense? I read good Yelp reviews so I decided to try picking up an order. I walked in and was told that the kitchen was closed. I've been to many restaurants and the kitchen typically doesn't close when the business is still "open." The man who informed me of this was already counting down the register, seemed as though he just wanted to leave early. Unfortunately I won't be trying their food now and would not recommend this business.
Food is average, selection was a disappointment. The reviews sounded like it was much more than a fast food burger joint. Over priced food and servers were slow, but did get the start of the food quickly had to wait forever for shake at 2 pm, no rush so would have expected much better service.
I just left this location to purchase a table. I walked around the entire store for about 30 minutes and not one sales person greeted me. There was a group of 4 salesmen standing in a circle chatting unconcerned about customers looking to spend money at there company and more interested in each other. After I found what I was looking for I waited for a sales person to come around. A lady helping another couple walked past me and did not say anything but looked unhappy to be there in the first place. I had to walk from the back of the store to the front to find another group talking and interrupt there conversation and asked verbatim, " who do I need to talk to about buying something?" A gentlemen finally asked me what I was looking for and looked up the product and told me it would take 6 weeks to order. I asked if they had delivery and he told me that it was $100. He told me my options were to pay for delivery or pick the product up at another location which was 30 minutes away but waiting 6 weeks was not an option. Going here was a complete waste of time.
My review that is under their alias 973 Commonwealth...  Maybe if you invested some time in getting good staff instead of worrying about what you are called I would be back.    no matter how many times you flip the name back and forth it's not going to change the fact that this place is ruined by recent management/ownership changes. I went into T's last month before a show at the Paradise. Like I have a million times before. Just needing a quick bite to eat and a couple of beverages.   The guy at the door could have been anyone. He wasn't terribly pleasant but wasn't awful. He wasn't a hostess he only checked our id's. We wandered into the "dining room" where there was a private party taking over most of the area, there were about 10-15 people there for this. Fine, we made our way to the table on the edge of the area not being used.  And then we sat.  And sat.  For 10 minutes.  Waitstaff walked by us, they cleaned the tables near us, they ignored us when we tried to get their attention.  We left. At this point after having wasted a good 15 minutes.
I went through the drive thru during this visit, so I don't know about the cleanliness of the inside of the restaurant,etc.  However, it took a while (I was asked to park) to get my order as I was told, "We're making it fresh."  But when I started munching on my meal moments later (yes, I am aware of the dangers of eating and driving and learned my lesson since I dropped a fry into the abyss that is between my car seats), it was lukewarm.  So, either they lied about my food being "made fresh" or my expectations of fresh = hot were too high.  I don't plan on returning to this Burger King anytime soon.
CHECK YOUR RECEIPT! I work close by and my co worker and I each order a chicken BLT salad 5 days a week there, their salads aren't cheap but they're good! It's always the same order grilled chicken BLT salad with no bacon and with goat cheese.They have occasionally messed up my order which is understandable because everyone makes mistakes. However the last 3 days they haven't been able to get my order correctly! They will charge me for the goat cheese I requested but they don't put it on the salad, and when I called in the girl told me that they were out of it but couldn't explain to me why they charged me for it nor did she offer me a refund for the item. The next day I'm over what had happened the last two times and i decided to give them another shot. For the third consecutive day they messed it up by putting bacon in the salad. I'm absolutely done, my co worker and I will take our 12 dollars each and buy lunch elsewhere.
Quick service, but overpriced for what it is and its ambiance. Not really a relaxing place, but this airport terminal has so few food options. Had the fried shrimp, which was good but not worth 23.99...
looks like new management; lots of updates to the physical place: new paint, new salsa bar, new neon menu. But now the food sucks. They've got daily specials at great prices, but...crappy fish tacos are crappy fish tacos whether they're $.99 or $2.99. These were crap. Frozen spongy fish, way over salted, mealy yuckiness. My fav pickled carrots and onions were lame. They're charging for the housemade, super salty chips now as well. Too many taco shacks on BuHi to settle for this!  NEXT!!!
Worst Cab company ever  Will never call them again The dispatcher lied by saying it will be there in 10 minutes. After an half wait I called again they said....it's been busy and will be there in a few minutes. 45 minutes later a third call and they said a few more minutes. At this point I gave up and called green cabs and they were at my door in 8 minutes. Why the Lies? I ask myself...and now  I say I will never ever call them again
The food was fine, but the atmosphere was strictly Kindercare. A toddler was running around the restaurant unsupervised screeching at the top of her lungs. When I spoke to the manager, he agreed that management has a responsibility to intervene when patrons are disturbing others. But he than added he would be hesitant to approach the parents in the event the child had a "speech impediment."
Sorry this is a no from us. Four of us dined here earlier in the week. Three people couldn't even eat their meals they were that bad. The soup tasted just like a bowl of warm cinnamon, the creamy chicken pasta had so much blue cheese it was inedible. Spaghetti bolognese wasn't too bad. Drinks were good, Moscow mule not served in a copper cup (that's just being picky). Espresso martinis were good. The decor reminded me of the lobby of a holiday inn express. Server was in training but really good.
First off I didn't even get to try the food.   I went into the restaurant and was met by a disgusting smell.  I stood there for several minutes and was not helped.  And most of the signage was not in English.   I Love all kinds of Asian food but these things added up to me walking out.   Just my experience.
DO NOT USE THIS COMPANY!!!  They are inexpensive becasue they hire young, irresponsible kids to move your valuables who don't care about your investments becasue it doesn't belong to them. They will destroy your stuff and per their sorry agreement and fine print, will pay only $.60/lb of damaged items.  Yes, they just destroyed a brand new $900, 55" TV (and dented a brand new dryer by standing on it) still in orginal box and the company reimbursed us $24.  This company is a joke and a scam.  I don't know how these owners go to sleep every night and feel good about themselves.  SICKENING-this should be illegal!
I was super excited to try this place but ended up not liking it as much as I thought I would. I'm glad I can say I tried it though. The donuts were way too sweet and stale. The cashier was pretty rude and the place was so humid. This is not a place I'd recommend to anyone.
DON'T.   Read the reviews, you are taking a big chance here. Very low stock of advertised cars - you will likely drive away with a Scion. OR, they will tell you that "you reserved a class, not a car"-very bad customer service, rude, and the only thing they will offer you are these rude clichés.  Reserving a 4 door Mercedes only got me a two door on standard car on arrival.  Overall, I wouldn't rent here because of the rudeness.   THERE IS NO SUCH THING AS EXPRESS HERE, throw away all the barcodes and prep work you did for a speedy transaction, these folks will not even establish eye contact with you when you walk in.
On 12/9/15 10:30am I came to this location and spoke to David. I told David that I have come in to get help with transferring about 12 pictures from my old phone to my new phone that T-Mobile has sent me and that I spoke with Jason the day before and that Jason said that would be easy to do just come on in.After telling David this he kept asking me over and over if I would like a free tablet. He also kept looking at his watch. So I asked him do you make commission and he said "A little bit "He never transferred the pictures and sent me home to do it on my computer. When you come in to this store you will notice that if you are not buying anything they will try to get rid of you as quick as they can so they can make the next sale.
Ok so it seems others are complaining about the service, but my girlfriend and I thought it was good... Other than that it was a miserable experience.  First we started with the calamari. Bland, even when dipped in the tasteless tomato sauce, and looked like they are from a cheap frozen bag.  Next up, for my girlfriend, the fried fluke special with truffle mashed potatoes, beans, and salad. Again, the salad, beans, and surprisingly the mashed potatoes, were incredibly bland. The fluke was dry and had close to no flavor.  For me, the salmon with spinach and bacon bits special. Spinach tasted like spinach but nothing special. The bacon, which is nearly impossible to make taste bad, sucked. The salmon had been cooked so long that skin on the bottom was burnt to the fish and couldn't be removed. Also, they topped it with a garnish of pickled fiddlehead ferns, which didn't mix well and was kind of gross.  Altogether the price came out to $75, which is a hell of a lot for really crappy food.  Overall? Never. Going. Back.
My family and I have been going there for a very long time and in the last few years the decline in food and service is so very disappointing.  My daughter ordered a steak dish med rare and when it came out it was very, very well done, so I asked for a new one and it came out looking like grisly greasy dog vomit.  Not kidding, I even took a picture of it and this is after waiting over an hour for our food.  I asked to speak to the manager who was and wondered what happened and if he could see how gross the steak was and he blew up on me.  He said he has vision problems and I apologized but he clearly had his glasses on and then he started screaming at us I again apologized for "offending" him but how would I know and pretty sure that is not my job to know.  All of our food was so horrible it made me very sad.  They need to get it together because it used to be a great place to eat and it feels like the owners just gave up.  Hope they get it together soon.
One of the better 24 hour pho places in the Burmaby area. Staff isn't too friendly but at least the food comes out fast. Good for groups.
1. No one greeted us at door. We waited 5 minutes , while their staff ignored us. 2. They sat us down on a table for 1. Meanwhile, a selfish woman was sitting at a table for 4 sipping her coffee and reading a magazine like it's a coffee shop. 3. Waited another 20 minutes and nothing. Others were getting helped, while we were completely ignored.  This was my first time here and I eat out a lot. You can count on never seeing me, my wife, and our friends here again
This is, unfortunately, my Safeway.  I live so close it would be dumb for me to not shop there.  However, after multiple disgusting experiences, its worth the walk down to Whole Foods in the Pearl.  The constant presence of beggars on the corners really becomes exhausting after awhile.    There is a smell in the store that at times has made me gag.  And, I have worked in the operating room and ER environment for 11 years.  That is saying something.  I purchased Parmesan cheese, and when I went to actually use it, that same day, I noticed it had expired 3 months ago.  Now, if I was at my grandmother's, who used to keep Cheerios that were so old there were little black bugs in it (sweetie,,,its fiber,,,,No Grandma,,,,those are bugs,,,,well sweetie,,,if you chew it quick and swallow, you won't taste them,,,,and yes,,,she was still talking about the cereal).  Customer Service would not exchange my Parmesan Cheese.    The selection for a lot of items are limited.  The staff is rarely friendly (although there is an older checker who is always super pleasant).  The check out lines are always ridiculous. The Starbucks inside is heaven for a new psychologist who is anxious to save the world.    They now have a gluten free section.  Too bad its unreasonably expensive.  I cannot wait for another competing market to open in this area, because they would get a lot of business.
Overpriced restaurant and poor service. The lobster bun costs $16 which is way over priced.  The soda comes with half glass of big ice cubics. I know the rent could be expensive near the mall, but seven lamps is ridiculously pricy compared to other restaurants in Lenox.
Wanted to try authentic Italian food, and was unimpressed. The place looked nice with a phantom gourmet sticker and so I was expecting food that was decent. The meatballs and spaghetti I got tasted like tomato mixed with water. I don't know what authentic Italian food is supposed to taste like but Olive Garden or Mall good shouldn't taste better. I might give it another shot one day, but I guess I'll see.
This review is for Juanita in customer service, and not the actual park Hello, I am a retired military veteran and have had trouble with the website in purchasing my tickets.  So i called customer service.  The first person couldn't help me, her name was Jewels, she then transferred me to her supervisor Juanita.  Juanita was the rudest, nastiest person i've ever talked to.  She kept wanting to get off the call, and then proceeded to hang up on me.  I asked her not to hang up, and she did anyway.  So i called back.  I ended up getting a hold of her again (although the young lady before her, who answered my call, was almost as rude as Juanita), Juanita would not give me her supervisor/bosses name, she said "i am the highest person in charge", and i asked her why did she hang up on me?  Guess what?  She hung up on me again!  Please let me find out who her boss is, and what you all plan on doing about this HUGE problem in customer relations.
Unless the chef is fired soon, this place has no chance of survival in the next six months.  The waiter, Leonard, was great. I also liked the kitschy interior.  The food was  bland. Some items weren't even fresh.   The first thing we were served was cold HEB sliced italian bread. If you are not going to bake your bread, then get some interesting bread and warm it up. This is one of the worst bread experiences I've had at a restaurant. I would recommend not even serving bread.   We got the house specialties at 20 bucks per entree.   The owner needs to go to Vespaio or  Asti's and see that you can get food, which is ten times better for a few bucks more.   I'm not trying to be cruel but the marinara at Olive Garden and Macaroni Grill is so much better. I would have rather eaten at either of these two places. I actually think Macaroni grill is pretty good. Verona's is not even half as good.   Really disappointing food that does not turn around quickly because of few clients. There was old iceberg in my salad. The crab cannelloni had not been prepped correctly and included fibrous parts of the artichoke.    I hope the restaurant that replaces this in the near future is better.
An ok place, staff are friendly but we were placed in an area that our server had with 2 large parties. Food came out at best warm and had to be sent back. Looks nice in presentation, fair in taste and a bit too salty.
Had I reviewed Shi Chi a week ago, they might have gotten 3 stars. However, after my experience this weekend, they were fully downgraded.  My husband and I decided to go there on Saturday night, thinking that we typically sit down easily there. Knowing it was Valentine's Day weekend, we called ahead and made resevations for 6:30pm for 2 people.  We arrived a couple minutes after 6:30 and were told it would be about 10 minutes. Our thinking was 'no big deal, it's busy.' Well, 35 minutes and a complaining stop to the host stand later, we were finally seated.   Then, we waited nearly 15 minutes to see a waitress. We considered leaving multuple times, but knew we'd have to wait all over again somewhere else. We stayed and were finally greeted by our chef.   The food was ok- about what you'd expect from a Japanese steak house. The hibachi dinners start with soup (broth with a few green onions and pieces of tofu) and salad (with ginger dressing and bacon bits). You also get a few pieces of shrimp appetizer, hibachi vegetables and rice (I always get the fried rice). I got the kobe (steak) and chicken, while my husband got steak and lobster with a thick, creamy sauce.   The best part is that dessert is included. You get your choice of vanilla ice cream or pineapple sherbert. Delicious way to end the meal!  I have been there a handful of times before and had good experiences, but this one was pretty awful. I doubt we'll be back anytime soon.
She was a sweetheart and very willing to know about any medical history.  If you are looking for a luxurious place, this is not the place for you.  It's a small room in a building.  She was very respectful and soft spoken.   As for the massage, if you don't like strong strokes, then she's perfect.  But if you like strong massages, she may not be the person to go see.  I favor more the stronger massage more since I have stress related tension that needs strong hands. The place needed to be a little bit cleaner. Someone needs to help her with the up keep.   As for me, I will continue to seek a person with a little stronger hand, but for others; she just maybe just right.
Marta sucks compared to just about every other citys transit. Make sure you leave very early if you need to be somewhere on time! Not very safe either. Does the job, but way to exspensive for this kind of service.
We were seated in 10 minutes. Then no one took our order no one even asked us what we wanted to drink and they aren't even that busy. TERRIBLE SERVICE!
I went in for an 80 minute prenatal massage.. I had really been looking forward to it because I've had a lot of stressful things going on and just wanted to decompress and get a couple spots worked on that have been bothering me. The front staff was great while I was there. However this is based off of my experience during massage. In my 80 minute massage the massage therapist talked 99% of the time (not even an exaggeration), and even though she worked on my back as requested, she did not work on my specific spots near my shoulder blades that I verbally told her had been bothering me (twice). I've (now) had two masssages ever so this was a big deal to me to spend that much money on one. To be honest when I left I cried in my car because this was not relaxing to me AT ALL when she literally talked just about the entire time. On top of that  my boyfriend had spent $60 on the gift certificate + I paid another $60 after I got there for a service that I wasn't happy with. I'm still having issues with the areas by my shoulder blades and to be honest don't feel any different from prior to having the massage (unlike my first one where I felt a lot of relief / this was done at a different business out of the area with my last pregnancy). I left feeling more stressed out than when I went in for the massage. If I go back, it would not be to this location. I wish I had read the yelp reviews prior to scheduling here. Disappointed is an understatement.
I'm actually kind of bummed that this place opened up and started taking a lot of great acts from some of the better venues in town, i.e. Paradise.   I've been to two shows here so far. Yes, the acoustics and general cleanliness are better than the Avalon, but those were the only positive changes I saw.   The security is way more uptight than they need to be. My friendly bouncer scrutinized my baggie of ibuprofen, tucked safely away in a side pocket. I had a friend who endured some embarrassment as her condoms were given the once-over. Is this necessary?  Beer and coat check are overpriced, as many have noted. The larger stage and new decor do not make up for this. Bring my peeps back to the Paradise please!!
First let me say I have never even been to the location, but after the treatment I got on the phone I will never set a foot in there. I made an appt on line was told I had to put my CC on file which was fine, but I guess since I didn't give it that day I got kicked out. When I called to give my card they had no record of my appt they guy on the phone was rude and not helpful at all. I told him it did not sound like he wanted to help me, so he hung up on me. So glad I found somewhere else.
I feel very conflicted writing this review. On one hand this place is pretty subpar even for Chinese takeout...  on the other, I am truly grateful for its existence. As far as I know, this might be the only place serving food in Davis past 2am on the weekend. Golden Light gets a large portion of its patronage from inebriated locals heading home from bars and looking for late night eats.   There isn't much I can describe that you guys haven't experienced before - you know what bad Chinese food is like. But after a night out, I will wait in line at this dingy place, and eat their crispy crab rangoons with a big fat smile on my face.   Hopefully Davis will have a couple of more late night options in the near future.
I've been wanting to try this place because we've lived in Austin for 4 yrs and have not found a really good Chinese place yet. My husband and I went during the week at dinner time, so we did not have the dim-sum, we ordered off the menu. I agree with the other posters on here that the wait staff needs to be a lot friendlier, they act like you are bothering them if you come to eat.  Also, they really need to scrub the place.  Cleanliness goes a long way in a restaurant. The appatizers were not good, the ribs were really gross and greasy. I don't think that they were anywhere near fresh. My dinner was the Sizzling Triple Crown.  Flavor was good, scallops very chewy.  My hubby had something different (can't remember the name), but he said it was pretty good. I will try it again sometime to see if I happened to be on a bad night.
It has been over a year since we have been here and now I remember why.  We took our son for his birthday and the evening and meal was a disaster.  I cannot remember it all but here are a few things.  There were four of us.  We ordered two appetizers and one was wrong, we were not given appetizer dishes.  Two of the four people were given the wrong entree.  There were a series of mix ups where the replacement entrees were wrong.  The two who received the correct entrees found them bad.  One ribeye steak ($32.00) ordered medium rare was almost raw.  The other order of chicken and tri-tip (ordered medium) was very rare and so tough the person could not eat two of the tri-tip slices.  In their defense they gave us two free glasses of wine and one dinner (that was brought after we finished) to take home.  So they were friendly and did try.  However the fact a birthday dinner did not go well, the attempts at makeup, did not suffice.  It will be a long time before we return.
Come here with cash. A lot of cash.  An overpriced average tea that doesn't take card.   I am in touch with my bubble tea and I won't be coming here again.   Disclaimer: I had a GINORMOUS expectation since I googled best bubble tea in Vancouver (home of amazing Asian food) and this place came first for 2014. Plus, I also had to drive 20 mins to get here from where I stay.  Boyfriend and I were on a chinese food pilgrimage in Vancouver. We live in Seattle so we are somewhat deprived of solid chinese food. After a long day of delicious chinese meals, we want to chase everything down with a perfect cup of bubble tea!  We ended up having hot milk tea with grass jelly and fresh persimmon drink with coconut jelly.  Neither is outstanding. They were good, but definitely not worth the 20 minute drive.   The reason it is a solid 2 star though is the place only takes cash.  Really? You only take cash? We only had $3 Canadian dollars on us. We were surprised that she didn't take card and definitely wanted to pay her for drinks we had ordered, so we asked if the owner would take US dollars.   She had a sheepish smile on and said yes but at par value.  I don't think we had much of a choice at that point.  Funny how that works, she wanted to save 5% credit card fee but found it completely acceptable to charge me 20%+ more for my drinks. I ended up paying US$9.75 for my two ok drinks.   I would have felt much better if the owner at least has a credit card option but charge 5% more for transaction under certain amount of dollars like other hole in a wall places.   Me no like getting jibbed :(
Limited choices, varying quality, pricey for what you get. Chicken lacked flavor, salmon ok. Best aspect was the dessert assortment.
BEWARE!! STAY AWAY at all costs!! Between my food experience and the interior of this place, I can't say enough bad things to sum this dump up. They have one disgusting washroom in the middle of the restaurant that looks like a gas station washroom which opens right into the dining area right beside where people are eating...nice smells coming out while you are eating I bet.   If I could give this place 0 stares believe me I would! I'm completely humiliated and shocked that I brought family from out of town to this place. Upon finishing our dinner, my husband noticed a disgusting dead FLY swimming on his plate in between his rice. I wanted to puke on the spot...what happened next was only more appalling.   I brought the plate up to the front where the manager seemed to be working. I told her what had happened and had the plate in my hand. Without her even looking at my plate her response was "It probably just flew onto your plate". I went into shock completely. No apology, no sympathy for their gross and unhygienic restaurant. The whole restaurant was staring as I told them to be ashamed of themselves. Absolutely horrid.
Joined last year for the 2 gyms one price year special. Went in one day and i was told to leave the gym because they "ended" the promotion because of some internal squables. Bad business!I would have been a member for life
Our first time to Austin and the rain kept us from doing some food truck traveling for dinner. We parked right outside Gus' and thought "if it's famous it has to be good". Unfortunately, it seems being from a town abundant with fried chicken back home that our standards were too high for this place. We were told "just FYI, our chicken is 6 spicy on a scale of 1 to 10." That translated to a 3 after we tasted it. All the spice is in the skin, not down in the meat. The baked beans were great! Of course there were about 3 spoonfuls as a side so it's best to ration them out during the meal. The price was cheap for Austin but I left even more disappointed after paying the check.
Worst customer service.  Have recently moved in to the area and been to this store a few times. On busy nights, don't expect to get waited on. We've been ignored twice in this store, and the staff is so unfriendly. The ice cream is okay. We tried to get a box of chocolates this evening, but after being ignored by both cashiers, we will not be going back. Go to Market Street Cafe, instead. They have the best milkshakes.
This is the worst Indian food I've ever had in my life... and I've eaten a lot of Indian food. I ordered the butter chicken. The sauce was good but the chicken itself was a bit bland. None of the flavour was in the chicken for some reason, just in the sauce. The 8 oz. serving was served in a cup. I feel like it was less than 8 oz. Anyway, you got very little butter chicken for $9. It came with rice or naan. The naan wasn't actually good. I'd prefer to stick to the places that actually cook their naan the traditional way (as opposed to rubbery microwaved pita bread). You know you're at a rip-off Indian takeout when you run out of curry before naan. I'm used to the opposite. Overall, small servings, bad naan, dried out and flavourless chicken. The only reason to eat here is if everything else around is closed and you don't like Chinese food (which is how I found myself here). I would avoid this place. You're better off at Pita Pit around the corner where you get more food for less money and it's pretty decent for fast food.
Expect to pay. Read the reviews.  Even with full coverage, the bill can surprise you.  They strongly suggested a specific test as part of a regular check up (we were billed for that). Based on this, informed us that another test was recommended (another amount tacked on to the bill) but had said that the actual lab test would be covered by medical. Settled the bill with the dentist and went home assuming it was squared.   Wrong. In the end, we were stuck with yet another bill from the lab.  Long story short, paid $$$  just for a 'check up' --didn't even get a cleaning.  It was a very very disappointing experience.  The staff are lovely people...but given the economic climate and the huge expense of healthcare, I wish they showed more thought and care for how these charges pile up and take precautions to double check that these are covered before recommending them.
I did not like the service or the food. We were a group of 5 people and nobody liked their food. The coffee was below average and the two hot tea we got came with not so hot water. Maybe we went n a bad day because this place has so many good reviews but it'll be a while before I can convince myself to give it another try.
The beer specials are pretty cool.  For a BBQ joint in Austin this place should be pretty far down on your list.  If you want some good wings and a beer this place is not bad.  For BBQ please go elsewhere
I took my 4 year old to this place thinking it would be a fun experience, far from it.  They tried to have her held down in the chair and putting a large block in her mouth to repair a cavity.  This was very scary to my child.  They also lied and told me that she had 3 cavities when she only had one.  I was very upset with how we were treated and left mid visit.  YOu are just a number here and they try to move you and and out.  I would never recommend this place to anyone.
I ordered the flounder dinner via a delivery service.  The flounder was heavily seasoned. All the other sides were loaded with sugar. The cole slaw, hushpuppies and tarter sauce. Yes, the tarter sauce contained sugar. What added insult to the situation was that  I had to pay extra for it. I only ate the flounder. Very disappointed after paying $11 plus a $5 delivery fee.
This place is good on quantity and presentation but the quality is very bland. The sashimi was very frozen which made my teeth very sensitive. The reason why they get a star rather than two is because the chicken teriyaki was horrible. If you can't make chicken teriyaki taste good then you shouldn't be in business. They were lucky we were starving. The service was junk too. Overall very disappointed.
I finally tracked someone down and they came out to the house only to tell me they were not able to sand and restain my floors as the previous sales person said they could (2 months ago!). So that visit was a bust. I wait another week (and he was 30 minutes late) and Rick L brings me out laminate samples to look at that he said could keep me around the $1400 I was looking to spend. So I pick one out and he send me an estimate 3 days later that it will be $2,300!!
I really want to like this place.  They have frozen yogurt (harder to find in DTX than you might think) and a ton of menu options. I've gone here a few times now and I feel like I'm always let down somewhere in the process.  The service is usually pretty bad.  You might have to wait to find someone to take your order and regardless of what time of day you're there, you will definitely be waiting for a while to get your order.   (My favorite thing to do is stand at the end of the counter, in front of the machine they use to track orders.  After 3 minutes your order turns red and flashes. It probably won't keep you entertained for the next 3 minutes, though.)  My experience with the food has been totally hit or miss.  I tried a teriyaki wrap and found it barely edible.  I'd recommend staying away from the wraps involving brown rice--super crunchy.  On the other hand, I had the portabello sandwich the other day and it was pretty good.  I know this place is supposed to be "healthy", but I would really like *some* slightly junk-food toppings on the frozen yogurt.  They have fruit (yum!), yogurt covered raisins (ick-I don't want yogurt ON my yogurt), and granola (meh).  Would some dark-chocolate chips kill them? The yogurt isn't bad, but I'd rather go to BerryLine.  Bottom line: Just get the fries. And no, I'm not calling them "unfries".
Be aware the April server charge extra tip to you after you paid even if you tip already..
This one's no bueno. You spend most of your time listen to Bill Paxton and Helen Hunt talk non-stop about the destructive power of tornadoes sprinkled in with footage from Twister... They do this in two separate sections. Sure, there's props from the show to see, but there's too much talking. Then it ends with a simulated tornado ripping through Small Town USA... It's a bit cheesy to be quite honest, especially after riding the Transformers 3D or Minion Mayhem rides. It's an OK ride if you're not into roller coasters or have kids who can't go on most rides... Otherwise not worth the Experience.
This will be a long winded story, but definitely worth the read if you are looking to get your bike fixed at this shop. This is just a rundown of my experience there.   Took my 650 bobber there back in early sept 2011 for a full motor rebuild. Took about 7 weeks to get the bike back, was quoted $2000 best case $2500 worst case. It ended up costing me $3000. Whatever, it is what it is. Got my bike back with 1 seat spring snapped off and faux oil tank busted off. Took that with a grain of salt and chalked it up to "shit happens". Rode my bike home and found that the bike pulled quite a bit with the clutch engaged. Had to adjust it properly myself to correct it. By now it's close to the end of October and the weather is shit so I winterized and parked it till march. Tried starting it, wouldn't idle, took it in and was told the carbs might be gummed up. Diagnoses; needed some minor carb adjustments not gummed. Got the bike back ran ok for a couple days, parked it for 2 weeks tried kicking it over and nothin. Took it back for a second time. Diagnosis: nothing wrong with the bike no work done on it, yet now it runs...fast forward to April, went out to the garage to fire up the bike nothing not even a sputter. Called the shop on a Thursday and was told it would be looked at on Tuesday. Almost 2 weeks later they finally look at the bike, guy tells me the carb had a "squished float". How does a float get squished? Especially when they had been the only people that have serviced these carbs since I had the bike. Anyways they replaced the floats and said they also had to adjust the timing plate 5 degrees. " good to go starts first kick!" I fire up the bike, starts first kick, WOW! Problem is it won't idle. I figure maybe it needs to warm up, I hold the throttle on for 5 mins, it still won't idle, screw It, I'm late for work now so I get on and ride it keeping the throttle open so it won't stall and drive it off the lot. The bike back fired like crazy and every time the rpm dropped down like stopping at a stop sign or light it would crap out, furious I went around the block and took it back. I told the shop employees  it still doesnt run worth shit and a coworker asked him "did u test ride it after u worked on it?" his reply was "no, I was just told to get the motor running"... So I guess it doesn't matter if the bike is rideable as long as it starts that's good enough for them. Furious again I was assured it would get dealt with for the next day. Received a phone call 2 hours later, the guy proceeded to apologize about the error and talked to me for about 5 or 10 mins how he had fixed the problem and the bike was good to go, at the very end of the conversation he began to say "I hope you're sitting down, but when I test drove your bike it has low clearance to the ground and the kickstand caught the ground and I dumped your bike".  I got the bike back after it was dumped and the bar end mirror was missing, side cover on the left side was scrapped up, muffler was scrapped and exhaust heat wrap was torn up in spots. Paul from motomethod was very apologetic and has since ordered in a new exhaust muffler for my bike and given me a new roll of exhaust wrap to replaced the damaged one. They also polished the scratches out of the engine cover. But unfortunately the bike still doesnt run properly. It starts up 3rd kick idles well but when I take it out for a ride it doesnt run very well.   This shop wasn't able to get my bike running properly after numerous attempts and unfortunately I have given up on them, I know the mechanics here are skilled and properly trained and they do good work and the endless line of bikes out back waiting to get worked on is proof enough but they just werent able to get my bike ruinning right. So I am currently looking for a new shop.
I eat in a LOT of airports, there's those run well and those not. This one is a disaster; servers that don't know which tables their working, no one working the host station (despite the "please wait to be seated" sign), customers getting upset because their food is taking too long, no one communicating the status of tables, wait times, etc.  I left two stars because the servers are trying to make the most of the mess ... while the manager seems to be useless and aloof. The place was slammed, which usually means all hands on deck, but Mr Manager made one appearance and then trundled off, never to be seen again.
I thought that the content was great but the delivery was too dry.  There was so much focus on the scientific proof that it left little room for the imagination.  The stories should have been able to stand on their own as interesting, darker bits of history.  This is definitely not a tour for skeptics.
The notion that this guy now has a 4* rating is mind blowing. The owner is a disgusting crook who knows nothing about cuisine or customer service   Today I purchased meat that was a year and half expired and when I returned it to him he argued that it was fresh even though it was expired because it was in a freezer, he refused to refund the item and said to pick another one except they were ALL expired.  I ate there once prior the food was bland, acidic and dry to the point that it made us sick.   The interior is crammed with tables without logic and the owner is a disgusting sleazy man.
Just ok. Ginger garlic rice had a strange fishy taste. Curries were simply sweet without any other flavors. Service was very, very slow. I don't know if we will try them again.
I live at 40 Boylston and it is AWFUL.  It should basically be a dorm for the awful Emerson undergrads because they treat it like one.  Besides the totally disrespectful slamming of doors and loud music and parties, they smoke pot and cigarettes constantly and the walls are so thin here it drifts in to my apartment.  There is nothing the management can do since they all do it in their apartments so I'm screwed.  DON'T LIVE HERE if you ever want to get a good nights sleep or don't like getting high in the hallways.
Don't waste your money. Delivery took 1 hour and 45 minutes. No surprise that the food was cold when it arrived. The burger tasted funky and I'm not sure how you can screw up chicken tenders, but they managed to do that as well. I just pitched the entire thing in the garbage.
The manager of this location so obviously doesn't know how to treat his clients.  First off, it was the FIFA World Cup. Guess what, you will need more staff than usual. Your frustration with the lack of staff shouldn't be reflected on your employees. The servers were great, but their manager -- not at all. Secondly, because of the lack of staff, there was a long queue with people waiting WHILE the world cup has already started. There were plenty of tables available, but not enough staff to take care of everything. When our turn to be seated finally came and the hostess/waitress was ready to take us to our table, the manager abruptly interrupted her, completely ignoring the fact that she was taking care of her clients. He didn't even apologize. Thirdly, there was no sound from the TVs outside. Dude, get a grip, it is the world cup. You should have done something about it beforehand. Our poor waiter was doing everything he could to help with the issue. But with a manager like that, nobody can really help. Fourthly, the tables outside were not put in a position where you could watch the TV. I moved my chair to be able to watch, and again, the manager, without any apologies whatsoever, passed by my chair almost pushing me off it. The food was all right. The atmosphere outside resembled a dingy old bar.  The only good thing from that place was the long haired waiter who was polite and nice.  Change your manager.
I don't have any idea why but my coffee was so bad I couldn't drink it. The same dark roast I order at other nearby locations and love yet so bad here. I thought it could be a one bad day thing so I gave it another try and got the same horrible results. When your morning starts with coffee you can't drink you are in for a long day. I can only guess that employees didn't make the coffee as ordered or else they are using water from Lake Apopka.
DIRTY DIRTY DIRTY. I'm talking dirty as in the smell of urine, scum feeling floors. So scummy they felt squishy and slippery.  The dirty diapers tossed on the floor near the pool and the poo filled diaper left in a changing room.  Where you order, everything was empty. No forks, napkins or even straws. Never ever, in my life time returning. The parking lot looked as if a carnival had just left town. Place was trashed. One and done for us.
I went to the breakfast buffet at the Mishawum Rd location.  They charged me $10 for the buffet and another $10 for a cheap, do-it-yourself, no frills waffle.  Total ripoff.  Usually, the waffle is part of the buffet.  Don't go.
Do not waste your money. It is a totally inconsistent service. I've had several no shows and been charged for services I never received. The cleaners that have come have been pretty terrible.
They rented me a car as per the terms of the contract with the insurance agency.  Towards the end of the allowed period, they called to say the insurance was not going to cover as much as they were initially said.  So I called the agency and had that cleared up.  The correct dates were entered into their computer.  So when I returned the car, I was a bit shocked that the price was twice as much as I thought it might be.  The manager said she would clear it up and it was common with certain insurers.  She would call and I could pay over phone.  She called when I was at work and unavailable.  I returned her call.  I was informed that she was in a meeting and maybe another agent could help.  Fine.  I told her I did not have a lot of time but I would call back at lunch.  Lunch time I called, she tells me the new lower price.  It still seems a bit high.  So I ask her to help me understand.  I implore her that I did not have a pen and paper handy so maybe she could go over it with me.  She balks.  I get almost no response.  I tell her that I could see this is going no where and that I would be in that evening to pay in person.  On the way to Enterprise I stop at home to clean up a bit.  I call. I am informed that I was no longer able to pay in person.  They would bill me.  Almost a month later I receive a bill.  That very day I send a check.  I photograph the check because reasons.  (this has been going on too long.)  A week later, today, I get a late notice.  I knew this would happen.  Now I have cancelled the check, which I am sure they will say they never received, impuning the US Mail.  I have payed electronically.  They are a credit wrecking machine.
All in all, I like Gastromania's food, but the serve and competence of the cooks leaves a lot to be desired.   I usually come here for lunch, and on several occasions they have straight up forgot to make my order. I go to the register, pay, and wait... and wait some more... and more. Go up to the register, and they tell me that they forgot to make my order. At first I took this as a one-time mistake, but this has happened multiple times. They've had to recook the entire order and I ended up missing my entire launch hour waiting in this cramped little restaurant. It was the owner himself who took my order... which only adds to the incompetence of this place.  Decent (although rather greasy) food, fair prices, but crap service. I work right down the block and have frequented Gatro Mania since they had the food cart on Quimby, but am tired of the incompetent service and do not plan on coming back.
Came here at 4 PM on a Saturday afternoon in January.  We went up to the third floor to do some bowling, and were told there was a waiting list.  So we headed over the bar, ordered a drink, and waited.  After 10 minutes, we got a bowling lane, shoes, and played 3 games.  The unfortunate part was that even though this place was busy, there was not a single server that came to get us drinks.  I ended up needing another drink, so while my friend went outside to smoke, I went to the bar to order two more drinks.  I waited probably 10 minutes to be served, and it wasn't busy.  They had one bartender for this huuuuge and long bar, and the cash register and MICROS machine was waaaay at the other end, where no one was sitting.  So, 10 minutes to get two drinks 4 PM on a Saturday.  Since it cost 25 bux for 2 of us to play 2 games, I would have expected things to work better.  Our lane broke down twice.  I had to walk all the way over to the busy desk to get help (there's no HELP ME button on the terminals there).  Many of the runner lights alongside the lanes were burnt out.    The whole thing was just sort of ghetto, considering this place charges a premium.  Bathroom was DISGUSTING.  It's 4 PM and there's no one there, how is that possible?  Just HIRE someone to be in charge of keeping it fresh... most of the stalls were hands-down *unusable*.  Grossssss....  Needs more staffing.  Even though this place is "prettier and sexier" than King's, I think I'll try King's again next time.  King's is more down to earth, and I've always had excellent service there, and I've been there about 10 times.
My rating is a little harsh becuase I am older than 22.  It was a fun spot when I was just out of college, but now I'd rather not have people step on my toes and spill drinks all over me.  The second floor balcony can be a good place with room to make your own fun.
First of all the 10 cent wings are small and gross, and they do not give you any celery.    Second you have to sit at the bar to get them, which is small and crowded.  And now they make everyone eating order a drink, which makes this deal not worth it.    Just skip this place and get wings at Spikes and drinks at Roads or someplace else.  Don't fill your body with junk.
Went back a few times and didn't see the bin of clothes where you can fill a bag for $20.  Not worth going if they permanently stopped keeping a box to rummage through.  All their regular priced clothes are overpriced...  Even some of their clearance sales seem to be overpriced.
If I sold Hummers for a living I'd hang out here to look for new customers...
Echoing what people have said before me... this place sucks. A cash only dive bar on Newbury St with a shitty beer selection that's generally full of  douchey dudes. Yeah, I feel like I'm beating a dead horse here.   Daisy's gets two stars instead of one because it's the only bar within a block of my place and there's generally attractive girls there. And it probably needs a self esteem boost.
I really wish I could review their food - it sounds delish! However, we waited and waited and waited and were never seated. I guess children aren't welcome at such a hip spot to dine. On a Sunday mid morning, we expected to wait to be seated at any eatery - but their first come first serve seating clearly doesn't apply to families. Many groups arriving after us we seated before we left, fed up with NO service. Very disappointed. We're happy to spread our money around, but never, ever again to Genie's.
Admittedly, I have been an avid user and not contributor of yelp and similar services.  My experience at Toscana prompted me to finally share!  I walked into Toscana Saturday morning and asked if they could do a pedicure.  They pleasantly assured me that they could, asked if I wanted coffee, etc.  This salon is not equipped to do pedicures.  The pedicure chairs are actually chairs that belong by pool - really, I mean it, they are lawn furniture.  While they do fit the kitschy Tuscan theme, you cannot sit all the way back in the chair and extend your leg across the pedicure basin without feeling like you are at the gym doing leg extensions.    And the pedicure basin - also very pretty but my size 7.5 narrow, feet barely fit into the basin, which is actually just a fancy, bathroom sink mounted to the ground.    Whoever designed the spa had a great vision but poor execution.  I was willing to look beyond all of this though (particularly since the very sweet, apologetic nail tech pulled a waiting area chair over for me to shift to which was more comfortable) until I  heard they had no nail dryer or quick dry spray.    While the nail tech apologized profusely (despite it obviously not being her fault), the receptionist immediately got an attitude with me.  She informed me that they were a day spa and I was there to relax so I should just wait there for five minutes and let my nails dry.  This was followed by a variety of other attitudimous execuses such as (A) "We don't really specialize in pedicures" and (B) "We don't use nail dryers or spray...most spas don't."    Again, the nail tech who did my pedicure was sweet and did a pretty good job.  However, this salon is new and it seems like they are still getting their act together.  If a salon is not properly equipped to provide a service, then tell your clients that rather than lying and doing a poor job.  The nail tech actually brought a hair dryer downstairs and dried my toes with it.  Still, my toe nails were smudged by the time I got home, and I fortunately had the same color polish at home and painted over them.    P.s. Their coffee sucks.
This burger king has gone down the drain, slow service and if you ask them for fresh fries and fresh of the grill burger they will not do so, I only give this place two stars because it has been around for years but  I would not be surprised if this location closes soon like other business near by (Arbys)  When I recently was there I went thru the drive thru and there was no cars and barely anyone inside.   I can say I have been coming to this location for almost 20 years and it has gone down big time.
DO NOT GO THERE! The worst hair salon I have ever been to. Bryan did a so called "Japanese hair straightening" on my hair a week ago. He promised my hair gonna be straight like using a flat iron so I agreed to pay 400 dollars flat (no extra charges). I've sat in his salon for more then 5 hours and was hoping and praying that my hair gonna look amazing as he described. When I wanted to pay for the service Bryan tried to sell me few hair products for an extra 60$, I agreed and gave him my debit card. Then he asked me what about a tip and said I HAVE TO pay him an extra 60$ tip. REALLY???? So I paid it and didn't take the products, he said I can buy the products myself as long as its organic and so I did. He also gave me a free (cheap) hair spray if I would write a good review on Yelp ( now you know where all the good reviews came from) 3 days after the treatment I washed my hair, used all of the products that Bryan told me to use and surprise surprise my hair looks like he never touched it, the same wavy hair that I've had before. I cant even explain how disappointed I was. So I went to see Bryan at the hair salon and asked him what happened to my hair? I paid 460$ so it can be straight!!!! He smiled and said I should have bought his products and if I want I can wait and he gonna wash my hair again and use his products. REALLY????  Anyway, I asked for my money back or some kind of a refund and he said "NO! You can wait and I will wash your hair". OK whatever. Dear Bryan, here is a REAL review, not a bought one. I will never come there again and i will tell all my friends and family to stay away too. Be carful ladies, this is not a hair straightening treatment and definitely not a Japanese one. He is just taking money for destroying your hair.
This place is the only in the area to charge for to-go orders. Not delivery. Just simple orders to go. This is business that otherwise they would miss out on completely. They claim it's because they have to pay for the containers, however other restaurants somehow manage to cover these costs. When we eat in the restaurant they provide free chips & salsa, free waters, plus pay for wait staff, A/C, dishwashing , etc and their standard menu prices seem to cover that. But somehow when it's to go, they have to charge more despite providing none of that. Not cool. Not mention, once they charged me $.25 per plate, another time it's a flat $1.34 for a similar order. Their reasoning between the two types of fees was ridiculous and they finally relented to the lesser charge. Nickle and diming your customers is not a way to build loyalty. I'm done with to-go orders from these guys.
This place is extremely busy. There is no organization during a lunch rush and when we went to pick up an order, there were people standing all around trying to pay while there was ONE cashier, taking phone orders AND ringing up people. Not sure if this is normal but it was not cool. She looked overwhelmed and did not give the best customer service. Also, the low score on the wall made me leerie but I had my food by then and hoped for the best. I know that sounds gross but oh well. And the counters smelled like old, mildew water. I cannot believe it smelled like that in there. When I did customer service in foods as a teenager or even when you clean your home, your suppose to change out the water. The food was really, really good but I will not go back because of the score, the stinking counter tops and the the lack of help they have. It was not appeasing and I hate to use this word, really ghetto. I live in Atlanta now so I know I have more options with soul food than this. Oh yeah, I did get a little sick from the food!
New Mexican restaurant in the neighborhood?  We had to give it a shot.  Unfortunately, the food is bad and the service is mediocre.  All for twice the cost of most other Mexican restaurants in the area.  I strongly recommend that you avoid wasting your time or money here.
I made two trips there, my first & my last.  The food is mediocre and they use chipped plates and no real ambiance.  I won't be back.
Nice Asian restaurant inside Disney Animal Kingdom. Full bar. I had the wonton soup which was OK, but could have had more flavor. The dim sum basket was barely warm and one might say it was actually cold. I sat at the bar and would have thought that my food would have been hot considering that it was not busy. This is not my first time here but it is my first review. I hope the next time I come back it will be better.
This place has really gone down hill on service, waitress, food prep/delivery. 7:30 AM on a FRI last week, entertaining a world traverler long time friend. We were the only other table of patrons in diner. Waitress very slow and unfriendly. Omlette was overcooked/dry. Toast was cold and no butter.Food was served with fork that had dried food from former patron! What else went on that I could not visibly see?! Had to ask twice for the pre-ordered cinnamon roll to go. When delivered I knew I should check it out-yep- upside down. When I had to 'again' waitress attention for a 'bag' for this' take out food', she gave me a look like I just arrived from Mars. Instead of a crisp white or brown clean crisp sack - what I got was a 'plastic bag' which was a very used/wrinkled twisted up brown grocery bag! Yuck! Something I would only have used to take my dog for a walk and use for this purpose. My Seattle friend wanted to eat in a local favorite spot. I gave her options of where to go - obviously she picked the wrong place. Would not advise going here. Not what it used to be for sure!
1.  Great view, especially late in the afternoon or at sunset. 2.  Food was overpriced, and taste/quality were entirely underwhelming. 3.  Service was OK, but not attentive, especially when not very busy. 4.  Went on a Living Social coupon - without that discount, I might have rated it even lower.
We used this mover service from moving our household stuff from Seattle to Sunnyvale. Our experience: 1. For the initial quote given to us, the person over the phone did not write down a major part of our items and therefore gave us what seemed to be a very good quote. We made the mistake of not checking the quote at any time until  the actual day of hte move. That is when we find out that our initial quote was not created correctly and teh value needs to go up by around $ 700. Not sure if this is a trick they play with every potential customer to gain new business.  2. There was no problem during the actual packing of stuff and it happened fairly smoothly. We gave the movers a tip of $ 80 which was very wrong -you will find out why in the next few lines.  3. Our stuff took a little longer than promised to arrive. Anyways, a 2 days delay is not that much of an issue so not deducting any points for this.  4. When the truck arrived in our city, we were told that the truck could not move in to our residential area until we paid them a long haul fees of $ 500. The exact delivery address had been given to the movers at the time of order creation and not a single mention of this was made at the time.   5. When the truck finally arrived in our area, we found that some of the boxes of other people marked as fragile were used as the base boxes for our  heavier stuff. We felt bad for the people who would have gotten their fragile items in a definitely undesirable state later on.  6. The stuff finally arrived at home. There were scratches on one table making it basically unusable for display. However, the rest of the limited furniture we got with us (dining table, chairs, one couch, TV table, bed stands, 2 beds and 2 mattresses) came in an ok state.  7. When we had unpacked every single thing, we found that one of my work laptops which I had put in to one of the boxes was missing. It was a tiny Toshiba laptop and was kept in a hard case suitcase which we forgot to lock. It was, however, between some clothes and not easily seen unless someone went through the stuff. So looks like someone opened the suitcase and had a quick rummage through the contents to find anything of value.  8. A 'coke' piggybank that we had picked up from World of Coca Cola in Atlanta and contained change probably worth around $ 80 was missing from the boxes. Some of the boxes that arrived had tears in them so it looks like it was very easy to remove.   We did not find or disvoer any other missing items but we just might discover more as we miss a thing and dont find it anywhere. One of the persons who had come to deliver the items in to our new house here mentioned that his partner had a court visit that they needed to make in time. Certainly felt a little intimidated by this piece of information. However, because of the rather rude behavior of these guys and also the extra $ 500 we had paid for the 'long haul', we decided no to tip these guys a cent. Bottomline -spend more money on movers and don't use these operators.
So today I called Shep's Midtown Ace, actually by accident, I thought I was calling Intown Ace Hardware on Highland whom I've been doing business with for years.  I didn't know that there was a Ace at 7th and Juniper and was pleased as I'm in the ares often.  I asked about a hard to find item which they had but only in a gift pack forcing me to but additional items if I was to get the item I wanted..  I agreed to pay the $99 dollars for the package on the phone and asked them to hold it.  I'm in business and I understand the concept.  If you have a hard to get item package it in a kit and force the sale of additional items and although I thought it to be a unscrupulous tactic I decided to give in and buy the forced package of 4 items to get the one item I want as a Christmas gift.  The item I wanted is a $39.99 item.  When I got there about 45 min after speaking to them I was greeted by Rick at the door and welcomed.  Very nice.  I explained what I had come for and he went into the back to get it, came out and rung it up at $119.96 / 129.56 with tax.  I politely explained that this was not the price I was quoted, that I didn't need or want the other items and said I'm happy  to pay the quoted price with a smile but to raise the price another $20 once I made the trip over in uptown traffic just to buy from them was not right really adding insult to injury as I'm already feeling a bit abused for having accepted the $99 deal.  He then went over an itemised list of the items and the total and said he was sorry I was misquoted and offered nothing else even though I said I really didn't want the other stuff. I'm one of those stupid people who holds out for the local business, small business, buy local ect but here is the perfect reason why the brick and mortar business is going away.  Its sad but true because I can trust the click button when a price is totaled in my cart.  No, "I'm sorry but its $20 more now" and if it did happen at least I did't waste a half hour in my car round trip.  A new business in today's business environment and this is how they kick it off.   I'll keep buying from my local Highland Hardware store and I'll pass these guys by.I'll attach a photo of the itemized receipt on my Facebook, Nextdoor and other reviews.  Cant find a way here.  I'm happy to provide anyone with this receipt information on request.  $25 for a hat that's worth maybe $5 at Target.  Again I agreed to be taken advantage of at $99.   Shame on you boys!
"BJ's".  Come on.  A worn out formerly funny cliche from the 1970s. "Brewhouse".  Liar liar pants on fire.  In a pinch, I hoped this would be a place for "Suburban Factory Food the Safe Mom".  Nope.  I would rather have spent my money at Chili's or McDonald's.  And with the size of the building, I was hoping too for at least a halfhearted effort to have beer served that was actually brewed on-site.  Nope.  Service was slow and borderline of poor, the portions were smaller than I expected, and the beer was good but overpriced.  The fried chicken --with a scant plop of gravy-- tasted similar to Chick-Fil-A so one star there.  From Wikipedia:  "The BJ's Restaurants Foundation is a 501(c)(3) nonprofit organization dedicated to support charities benefiting children's health care and education, with primary focus on the Cystic Fibrosis Foundation. "  So another star there.  =2 stars.  Moving on...
Horrible service, food, and wait times. Management at it's worst is the definition here, the head manager here did NOT care for the customer and maintains a dirty and slow work environment.
Having recently moved to Boston, I am still trying to find a salon best for me.  I tried Emerge again and liked my stylist, however, it was so disorganized.  I walked in thinking I would have a relaxing day having my hair cut.  NO!  There were more people in the salon than there were that day strolling Newbury Street.  I thought this place was high class - NO!  There was more "skin" and tatoos showing than on all of Newbury Street.  I thought for a moment that I had mixed up this salon with another.  This will not be the place that I make my mark.  I was totally apauled by the noise and the stylists - it was a zoo and totally unprofessional!!!!!!  Not a comfortable relaxing atmosphere.
My first visit to Guardian Games was disappointing... I will say that their collection is MASSIVE and that is quite impressive, so they get a second star for that. But the real reason for my low score was the way they handled Free RPG day. Now, I'm new to RPGs and non-video game gaming in general. So I was really looking forward to Free RPG day to get a taste of some new games. Well I get there and you get no choice of which of the FREE items you want unless you A) Participated in a game (which required reservations and a fee for a table) or B) spend $20 on merchandise. WTF? Isn't this FREE RPG Day, a day designed to help introduce people to new games for FREE? The only way to get something for free is to roll a D20 which is kinda fun in theory, but really sucked for me in reality. I rolled and got stuck with the choice I had already made at Red Castle, who's staff by the way was allowing all their patrons to simply pick their own free item, or ask them questions to help them make a selection. And my bf, rolled and got an item for a game we don't own (we were both hoping to get some new RPGs to try out and see if we liked). For being my first visit to the store, I was sorely disappointed and will just keep going back to Red Castle because there I actually felt like they gave a crap that I was new and wanted to help me discover new games.
Tonight I went through the drive thru and ordered the Cajun chicken and shrimp combo. It was to include tenders and a couple fried shrimp. When I got home my meal consisted of 3 chicken legs. At least they got my side coleslaw right. When I first rolled up I had to ask the guy if they were even open at 9 as lights were off. He then lit up the menu board. He insisted would get cocktail sauce with the meal for the shrimp. When pulled up to the window they said were out of cocktail sauce but would give me mustard. I called up there and manager didn't even care I received just drumsticks instead of tenders and shrimp. I've given this location 3-4 chances now and should have kinks knocked up by now but obviously haven't. I won't be back.
I live right around the corner on Magazine Street, and tend to avoid this CVS/side of the street in general due to its bum-tastic nature, but I decided to pop into the store today to pick up shampoo and give it another shot.  My experience there led me to the following conclusions:  1. I don't know how they stay in business 2. They should just close down this branch because of how poorly it represents the CVS brand, since their stores in other parts of the country are fine  More elaboration.... There are three "self check out" booths in the store, and there were three store employee working when I was there.  Not a single one was behind the actual counter to ring up customers, so I went to their self check out booth.  The first two I tried weren't working properly, so I asked one of the employees for help.  I noticed that another guy was having issues with his check out booth too, which made me wonder WHY don't they just have a person behind the regular counter if these machines don't work as they should??  Anyway, I got to the point where I had to pay, and the magnetic pen had been ripped off of the credit card reading device, so I asked how I was supposed to finish the payment.  A second employee huffed over, CLEARLY annoyed that she had to propel her ass over to do her job, and treated me like I was an idiot for not being able to figure out their machine that was broken.  I would highly recommend to anyone in Central Square that you just skip CVS, walk directly across the street to Walgreens where the employees are much nicer and 1000x more efficient.  That's where I will continue to vote with my feet for the rest of the year.
The setting was beautiful with a lovely view of the harbor. The food was good but the portion sizes were small. The wine seemed quite overpriced. The service was abysmal. The slowest we have seen in good restaurants in Boston. not recommended.
We saw the low reviews and decided to give Red Robbin a chance anyway. I figured they had worked out their kinks over the past several weeks. They have not. We ordered an appetizer that never came. When we mentioned that we hadn't received our appetizer our server said we wouldn't be charged for it. Well, yeah we never got it! It finally arrived about 3 minutes before we were finished with our meal and it wasn't correct to what we had ordered. Drinks were never refilled. The food we ordered was gross, greasy, small portions for the price. None of my husbands meal was correct. My son liked his meatballs. My daughters cheese pizza and fruit looked disgusting. We won't be returning.
The quality of the food seems to have deteriorated in my opinion. I used to really enjoy the dishes here - the chicken tikka masala, baigan bharta and bhindi masala were all very flavorful. But that must've been years ago. The last few times I went, the curries were a little flat. Much prefer the buffet lunch at India Pavillion and takeout from Surya instead. It's still one of few places I know that serve dosa though - while the dosa itself is nicely thin and crispy, the sambar and fillings fall a little short.
Inconsistency is the word that comes to mind when thinking of Lotus express. Tonight solidified the reason why I will NEVER order or visit this establishment again.   Prior to tonight I had ordered delivery from Lotus express 3 times. My orders took roughly 45minutes and the food was fine.   Tonight as I tried to place an order the woman decided that they no longer delivered to Medford (a 10 minute drive from the location). Why the sudden change? Very disappointed in this restaurant, it's inconsistency and poor customer service.
Issue with reservation was met with no help by front desk staff. Second manager no better; finally senior manager made an effort to dig deeper. Originally was told that we did not have a valid reservation and took they no responsibility - told hotel was sold out and nothing could be done. After 20 minutes reservations were found and rooms were available. Frustrating- no consumer focus. Unfortunately hotel rooms tired. Mildew in shower and not just a little; tile dirty. Bathroom door in need of paint. Light fixtures filthy and mirror flaking from the backside. I get that Disney area hotels are a bit of an assembly line, but there has to be better options.
The big ape looking woman is beyond rude.  If I could have punched her in her smart ass mouth and not go to jail, I would have.  I'm going to file a complaint with the city of Atlanta but this company has had a contract with the city for years, so pretty certain some ones getting a kick back or they would change.  Why do they make it so hard on people who have already had a very bad experience or their vehicle would not be there.  Please, someone should really take a look at what's going on here.  Collusion, kick backs, bid rigging, or whatever, it's not legal.  Pretty sure about that!!!
Perhaps we visited here on an off day, but I was unimpressed with Helser's, surprising after reading so many glowing Yelp reviews. The problems started with the service. Our waitress was rather brisk and not particularly attentive--in the course of a 45 minute brunch we were only checked on once aside from ordering and food being delivered, leading to empty water glasses. Such a transgression could be understandable if the place was packed, but with less than half the tables filled it was disappointing. One member of our party was vegan and made a few specific requests i.e. ordering just a side of potatoes--she received potato pancakes instead, which the waitress took back but did not offer to remedy. I had the pepper bacon and cheddar hash, which was pretty good but not phenomenal. While the ingredients were fresh and high-quality, it lacked a certain panache as well as originality and I found myself drowning it in salt, pepper, and ketchup. The brioche and chevre breakfast sandwich was eaten by another member of my party without negative comment. On the other hand, the oatmeal seemed to be comprised of raw oats with hot water poured over them, not soaked in water, leading to an inconsistent consistency and some crunchy oats. Additionally, the proportions of oatmeal to toppings was way off; halfway through the bowl there was only unappealing oatmeal remaining and no fruits to balance it out. Meh. I've experienced better.
Meh. I purchased a couch, loveseat, and chair from them. The couch and loveseat were delivered while I was home with my toddler and baby. (BTW you can't get a delivery time until the evening before so if you need to plan around work, you can't). I asked them if they could move my old couch about 10 feet to the garage and they said no for liability reasons (understandable). Then they said okay, we will move it if you give us $20 (thanks)... The three delivery drivers then huddled around me and asked if I could write about how great their service was on the invoice, as if I would say anything other than good job while they all stared at me.  The chair was out of stock and when it arrived we were told we could only pick it up at their warehouse all the way down by the airport, nearly an hour from my home. I feel like that could have been mentioned before we bought it...now to schlep my kids across town when it doesn't seem unreasonable to me to be able to pick up my furniture at the same place that I buy it at.  I am satisfied with the furniture that I received but plan to shop elsewhere next time I need something.
Stopped by because this was closer than my home clinic and I needed something quick that would fit into the workday. They get 2 stars for being relatively fast, but medical judgement quite questionable (I'm in medicine) unfortunately. More importantly, i waited over 20 minutes twice then 40 minutes on a third try to get in touch with the clinic for lab results which seems ridiculous but that's what happened! Would not recommend for anything where you would potentially need labs.
Dirtiest, filthiest, nastiest walmart I have EVEzr been to. No carts. No lid to the sanitary wipes. The isles were full of boxes, couldn't get through the isles with the cart. There were 9 employees outside sitting on the curb, some smoking. No carts!!!  Will not be back EVER!
The service is usually pretty good at this location, no complaints there...however I don't know how long this franchise will last!  They continue to reduce the portions of their food and expect people to pay for it.  I ordered the salmon and it clearly wasn't a decent portion to serve anyone, and I don't even eat that much.  I sent it back, but the manager said this is the size of all of them.  Which it was because my husband's was the same size.  I told her that the menu was misleading because it specifically says 'salmon served on top of vegetables'  meaning it was big enough to be on top of something...needless to say, I'm done with Applebees.  Too many bar and grills around for that.  I will start with going to Chili's instead.
The cake slices i purchased during my first visit were beyond stale.  Few weeks later, I purchased a cake on display. I should've known when the worker didn't give me the cake from the display but gave me a cake from the back - the cake was even further beyond stale.   "Fool me once, shame on you. Fool me.. you can't be fooled again." - W. Bush
I guess if we're going with what yelp says about the rating, this place gets a 2.  It's nice that it's open 24 hours.   However, like many reviews on here, I'd say that the service aspect of this place certainly needs improving, not to mention the quality of the product.  It does seem like it always takes a long time no matter how empty the restaurant is, but the thing that gets me is the inability to get my order to the kitchen and then get the kitchen to read and interpret the order correctly and then have the server make sure the order is correct.  I've given them a few chances because of the convenience but unfortunately they are, objectively, on the below average side when you take into account all that you get for all that you pay.  The value quotient just isn't there.
Why would I ever come in here? With the amazing, nearby Brockton Dollar Tree, less than 5 minutes away, why would ever come into uninviting community and this Dollar Tree's univiting storefront. I am not planning to return....  Employees on their cell phones, while lines are snaking through the candy aisle, out of stock shelves, and narrow aisles. Why would I (or anyone) put themselves into this hot-mess of a Dollar Tree? Ugh. 1 star.
Ordered the sloppy Jacques and the good news is, it arrived quickly. Bad news is the meat was lukewarm . The bread was a little dry/stale but perhaps that was on purpose?  The cheese was bland to the point I didn't notice it was even there.   One star for the simple, clean interior design. One star for not being too pretentious.
So much for my tuna burger. IT has started to suck now. I couldn't eat beyond two bites. Highly sad and disappointed! I loved this place.
Jillian's can be fun, bus so predictable. To me, it's where you go when you really have no other ideas on what to do. Yes the games are fun, but if you do the math, they are expensive! The pool tables are just pool tables, nothing special there. Never done the bowling, but i'd venture to guess you'd do better financially bowling elsewhere. The food is mediocre, the drinks overpriced, and the atmosphere kinda blah. Parking in the Lansdowne area is a pain in the neck, especially if there's a home Sox game. I agree with the other posters that it's a very college scene- if you're not an Undergrad, you might feel out of place here.
Well, the quality of the vape juice isn't in question, My fiance loves it.  However, I must just be used to friendlier people .. Because I stopped in to get my other half some juice and the gentleman behind the counter while I got what I needed definitely wasn't the kindest or most helpful. BUT maybe he was having an off day, I will give him the benefit of the doubt, I just likely won't be going back anytime soon.
The worst concert venue I have ever been to.  Walked up and bought tickets for a 11:30 show at 11:30, then attempted to walk in the venue. Was told we would have to wait 45 minutes outside (it was raining) and could not wait inside for the concert to start.  Attempted to reason with the security staff at the absurd request to wait outside, but was told we could not enter and told us to wait on the street.  Worst. Venue. Ever.
I used to love this place but recently quality and taste of kabobs here have recently gone down for some reason. Kabobs are either broken and burned or raw! And they always mess up your order.
On October 26, 2016 I was shopping at Babies R Us' with my son Jamison for his birthday party (he was turning 1 the next day). His foot somehow got stuck in the metal shopping cart. Other customers rushed over to help. We tried baby oil, vaseline, etc but nothing worked. After 30 minutes, the general manager came out with box cutters and cut him out of the cart. No one called 911 (I would have but I couldn't even reach my phone.. I was just holding my screaming baby). I rushed him to the ER as his foot was super swollen and he had just learned how to walk (ER bill was $100) then I contacted the General Manager who told me to reach out to the claims department. They told me to fill out some paperwork and send it back to them, which I did promptly. I asked if the paperwork needed to be notarized but didn't get a response til 3 business days later so I went ahead and paid an additional $35 to get notarized. The paperwork was long and extensive. Then I waited.. and waited.. and called and called. Left several voicemails to the claims adjuster AND NEVER HEARD BACK.. It's end of March 2017. THANKS FOR WASTING MY TIME AND NOT CARING ABOUT AN INCIDENT THAT MIGHT REALLY AFFECT YOU GUYS IN THE FUTURE. YOU SHOULD REALLY CONSIDER CHANGING YOUR CARTS TO PLASTIC AND ACTUALLY CARING ABOUT YOUR CUSTOMERS. THE FACT THAT YOU DID ABSOLUTELY NOTHING SHOWS YOU DON'T CARE AT ALL.
Let me start by saying that the dessert was good. However, the service was horrible, possibly the worst I've experienced in Portland. This is my first Yelp review ever, which shows how blown away I was by how bad the service was. First of all, my friends and I waited 20 minutes for a server to take our orders, despite there being at least a handful of empty tables. Then, when we got our check, the server automatically added a 20% gratuity to our bill. When I politely asked her about it, she said that it was because we had such a big group (4 people...really?) and that this policy was stated on the menu. My friends and I read over the menu a couple of times and saw nothing about automatic 20% gratuities for a party of FOUR, a very typical group size, if you ask me. No one had told us about this policy until we had already gotten the bill. The combination of the awful service and forcing my friends and I to pay a 20% tip when given the awful service, we would've tipped at most 15% made for a truly horrible experience. The food was good, but definitely not good enough to justify the overall experience. Will never come here again...complete waste of time.
Sadly i used to be a regular. Dropped in one night for some chicken teriyaki waited ten mins then walked home. The chicken I got was not even cooked! I couldn't even bite it. Totally bummed, this place was once great.
Stopped in for lunch and wasn't really impressed. Such a shame, bc it looks really cool from outside. The noodles were a bit mushy and broth a bit salty. The service was really good. I did see other people eating sushi, so maybe I chose the wrong dish. Plus it was expensive and not much of a selection. For a name like Chinatown you would think they would have more of a Chinese food selection. Not just noodle dishes and sushi.
I should have listened to the bad reviews, but I was desperate. My pro was a nice kid, but he was 40 minutes late for a 2-hour appointment that I couldn't extend. He also didn't have all the necessary supplies, used my paper towels, etc. - things you wouldn't expect from a service that provides any sort of training. I'm guessing they don't. I don't blame the pro at all - I think this company is disorganized and trying to make an easy buck.  After all this, the company had the gall to charge me full price, and I've been arguing with them for a week to refund me for AT LEAST the 40 minutes (why would I pay for even one minute of time that no one was there?!). A company that cares at all about customer service would have refunded the whole thing, no questions asked, rather than fight me on it.
Gave this place one star which i think is generous after our dining experience last night. We were seated and ordered apps drinks entree at the same time. It took about half an hour for our server to come by with our drinks. Even though it took very long - the drinks were at least tasty. We had to ask for more bread because we were so hungry. It was a little more than an hour before our appetizer came out - beef carpacio (prob spelled it wrong). It was well done and tasty. It was another 35-40 mins before we got our entree, one was seafood risotto and the other was fungi pizza.  We were seated at 7:40 and got our entree at about 9:10-15. At this point we about to walk out - the server was avoiding checking up on us because the food wasn't ready. When we got the food it was pretty bland and disappointing. I would not recommend this place unless you are purely going for a drink. The food is not worth the $$ and the service was disappointing.
Not worth the money or time invested! About 10% of the narration was local history, the other 90% was personal opinions and life stories from one of the narrators specifically. The gibberish ruined a perfectly beautiful afternoon on the water. I would not recommend this tour especially if you have children.
Saw that I could not place an order online, so I called to place a to- go order since the yelp page said that it would be available starting 8/27/17, the answer was that we don't take to go orders, you have to come in. The hostess directed me to the bar, where I waited 5 minutes before I could place my order. At that point, I put in a smaller order than what I had originally planned because I didn't have the best feeling about the place. It's a young staff, where the waitress chews gum and probably sees nothing wrong with that. When my order came the bartender put the plate of food in front of me and gave me a box for me to put it in and informed me that I have to box it myself at the bar because they are not set up to do to-go orders yet. So I had to throw in the pickled radish and chicken in the same box. I wonder why I had already tipped 15% for a to go order that I was boxing myself. As I grabbed the chicken to put in the box I noticed that it was not hot, strange for a fried chicken order. Ten minutes later, the bottom of the box started falling apart, like it was not designed for that purpose. The one good note is that the food tasted good. Not the best experience for my first visit.
I think this place has potential, but our experience was lacking. I ordered the special: sausage, gravy, and sweet potatoes. About 1/3 of the sweet potatoes were actually cooked, the rest were hard and raw. The sausage and gravy did have great flavor. We also got the ham and cheese which was just ok. Careful not to break tooth on the hard sugar crystals...we actually thought we ran into a piece of plastic on the first bite.   Servers seemed really unorganized which made the whole thing feel unprofessional.  There are so many great places in Portland we are sad we wasted a breakfast here.
I wanted to like this place.  It's a cool little spot to get a bite. Outdoor seating. Lots of people around.   But the food didn't have the depth of flavor I was hoping for.   Better spots to be found
Food was good but they nickel and dined us about everything. $1 extra for cheese on top of the French onion soup, $1 for extra condiments, etc. and the waiter didn't tell us ahead of time.
Definitely the worst dining experience we've had in a long time... Possibly our entire lives. We entered originally to face our fears (we live nearby, and always thought the sign looked sketchy) and give summer shack a chance to be good!  Big mistake, when we got inside the place just smelled terrible. My partner wanted to leave on the spot but like the fool I am I said "no, look, there are people here! It must be ok." I will be making up for that with her for the rest of my life.  The menu is absurdly overpriced. Seriously, expect north end pricing, or at least similar to legal sea foods, etc. lobster rolls were $24 I think which puts them really up there.   Appetites waning, we ended up ordering a shrimp salad, and griddled corn bread. The salad sounded fresh and cornbread is cornbread. Right? Wrong!!!! The salad was chopped up into tiny tiny pieces and the shrimp were microscopic. a few looked mangled like someone had bit them and spit them back. I dug in, hoping it was just a bad appearance, not necessarily bad food, but I could hardly get it down. The texture was grainy and the flavors were overpowering. The cornbread was thin, greasy, and soggy on the bottom.  I hope that this place does have some good food items that surprise people. We tried what we thought would be the safest things, and were left having to order Chinese afterward to get the bad taste out. We really really wanted to like this place, but it was utterly impossible.
This was my first and last visit to PF Chang's. We were given 3 x $50 gift certificates for this restaurant and we made our first takeout order on 12/31. When we arrived at the restaurant to pick up our order, it was complete chaos. There was a long line to pickup or place takeout orders. Although there were four PF employees standing around, they made no attempt to maintain order. After waiting for more than an hour, a unhappy customer gave up and cut in line. There were many very angry customers. I requested help multiple times from the staff to assist. They whispered into their radio and did nothing. A manager (Steve) came over after repeatedly requesting assistance. He took a look at the chaos and started to walk away. I asked him to return and handle the situation (which was getting ugly). He stood there and did absolutely nothing to restore order. When I complained, he asked me what I thought he should do. When I told him that he should ask customers to not cut in line, he told me not to tell him how to do his job. I think some additional training is necessary for Steve.  As for the food, it was very expensive and by the time I finally got it home, it was soggy and tasted like microwaved Chinese food. The portions were very small and the flavors were bland.
I will NEVER go to this place again.  My wife & I went there on Friday, November 19, 2010 intending to use a Morgan's Deal coupon ($10 for $20 worth of pizza).  After waiting for a table for over 30  minutes the manager informed us that our coupon was not good until the following Monday, even though it DID NOT SAY THAT ANYWHERE ON THE COUPON OR ON THE RESTRICTIONS!  I asked the manager if she would still honor the coupon b/c we had no way of knowing it was not good until Monday, but SHE REFUSED!!  It was extremely rude and unprofessional. This was after waiting outside for a table, in the cold, with our 2 week old baby for over 30 minutes!! My wife & I proceeded to take our business elsewhere & go eat dinner at Santa Rita Cafe. We had never been to Mangieri's Pizza Cafe & we will NEVER GO BACK!! While the food looked good, I will not be treated like that.  They do not deserve my money if they treat their customers like garbage. DO NOT GO TO THIS PLACE!! Customer service should still mean something!
Poor service! We had a waitress who had worked double shifts & just didn't feel up to working (she mentioned her double shift & how crazy busy it had been)  Ordered French fries only to be told they ran out. Then ordered corn bread- no corn bread. Then we ordered biscuits. When our food came out- we were told- no biscuits. Had to ask other people for items we needed. Funny thing is we were the third table being waited on in the building.  As Gary Williams says- cannot be multi-tasked because one will fail at one of the tasks. Smh
Avoid this place!!  My son injured his ankle on a Saturday playing basketball.  I took him to an urgent care and they were concerned that there may be a fracture rather than a standard sprain.  The Xrays were inconclusive.  We took his Xrays and iced the ankle on Sunday.  On Monday morning,  I called Austin Bone and Joint to schedule an appointment.  They scheduled an appointment on Monday at 2:00.  Although my son had a science test, I took him out of school for the appointment.  Before I got to the office, ABJ called to tell me that my son was scheduled with a doctor that does not see teenage patients and we would have to reschedule.   They set up an appointment for 4:30 on Tuesday (now almost 3 days after the injury).  On Tuesday morning, ABJ calls and says the the doctor has to the move the appointment to 1:30 instead.  But my son needed to make-up the science test that he missed on Monday due to ABJ's mistake.  The next appointment that they could offer me was Friday (6 days after his injury).   I declined and found a competent doctor.  I think this place was once a good practice, but I would avoid now.
It's been almost a year since my last review and still things are poorly run at Austin Studios.    First thing: The hangar's leak.  Hangar 2 (comically referred to as "stage 2") offices are poorly insulated and tend to leak profusely.  Just last week there was a big downpour in which 2 of the upstairs offices had heavy water leaks.  Downstairs, in one office, water had leaked through the wall onto the floor.  The hangar doors were also unable to block the onslaught of water.  After the producers of the show that is renting the space called AFS out on these facts, AFS piled a bunch of sandbags in front of the hangar doors to block the water from coming in.  That should work until those doors need to be opened again.  They still haven't dealt with bathroom issues.  One bathroom in Hangar 2 and another one quite a distance away at Hangar 5. Sure there are some in the red building, but unless the show you are working on has an office in there, there is no way you'll get into that building.    The soundproofing?  I wouldn't even call it that.  It's an old airplane hangar with some celotex on the walls.  It'll quiet most of the outside noise, save for planes, trucks and people talking.    The so-called grid they put in place on the ceilings?  Complete joke.  Why do you think most productions have cut holes in the ceiling to construct their own light grid? Because all-thread hangers are not useful.    I've worked off an on at Austin Studios for over 10 years now, and they have changed very little since then.  Of course AFS gave away the largest construction space available, to an outside company (Soundcheck) which means that Hangar 2 is the only shop worthy stage now available. That stage is poorly ventilated and is not heated or cooled at all.  Sad.  If you have everything pre-built and ready to install into one of their hangars, you'll be set.  If, instead, you are like every other production around, and you need shop space, good luck.  Without dedicated 220 lines and better power outlays, you'll be fighting a lot of tripped breakers.    I wouldn't bother turning on the monstrosity of an AC unit they have installed into stages 3 and 5, since it is poorly designed.  Why else would most productions rent an aggreko unit to help cool the non-insulated buildings.    AFS is really good about throwing lavish parties and courting Hollywood bigwigs.  If you happen to work on anything that is shooting there, you will most likely be shunned, or ignored. This could be a great place to film, if they would just listen to the people that work here rather than some out of touch consulting firm.
I've never been treated so poorly before. After sitting down at the bar, it took about 10 minutes for one of the bartenders to take my order as they were intentionally ignoring us. The bartender was a young, gay looking man in his late 20s with glasses. We were minding our own business eating a meal and drinking a few beers and this bartender repeatedly asked us to get the check - ie "please get out of here, you're not welcome" was the message. I guess 2 heterosexual guys in Patagonia jackets isn't what this place is targeting. This place is targeting the young metro crowd and obviously you are not welcome if you don't fit this profile even if you're just stopping in for some late night food. I'll never go here again and would fire this arrogant bartender if I owned this place.
I went here one evening during a week day with my cousin and had the worse experience EVER. The sushi rolls were less than mediocre and I cannot even begin to describe how awful the service was. With regards to the food, lets put it this way, I could have gone to T & T for their ready made sushi and come away feeling relatively satisfied with their selection of sushi rolls,  along with more money in my pocket. As for the service? The restaurant was practically empty and we had to wait for a long time for our food to be served. And don't even let me get started on our server.  What server?!?!? He was practically nonexistent. When we asked the "manager" for some more water he especially seemed annoyed that we asked him. WTH? I am generally a very good tipper and will usual tip 20%....this server was lucky that he even got a $2 tip from me! I will never EVER patronize this establishment again!
Horrible customer service always lasting an hour or more and constant unexplained monthly charges, and new packages added to my account without my consent -new customers just wait until you have had them for over a year. Check out other review sites (not DTV site reviews they are biased lies with only new customers giving any stars) before getting DTV my experience is a regular problem. Here is a start for you http://www.consumeraffairs.com/cable_tv/directv.htm  I have never had a company treat me this way and completely steal from me like this.
Avoid this Starbucks location at all costs! This is a franchise Marriott unit, but the line was insanely long. The staff does not seem to care about customer satisfaction at all.  Stay away unless you want to wait more than 40 minutes for your morning brew!
The venue has so much potential, but unfortunately falls flat.  The Good: 1. Great sound! It really is a great listening experience. 2. Ample seating for an outdoor amphitheater. 3. I have nothing else nice to say.  The Bad: 1. Parking! We paid more for parking to park in the closest lot. More than the already overpriced regular parking. We got there and the closest lot our ticket said we could park in was suddenly for VIP only. Our ticket said we could park there, but no. The next closest lot is not super close. 2. Getting out! What a traffic train wreck after every event (I've been to three). There's got to be a better way to streamline folks out. Even in the closest lot to the venue we still sat in 20 minutes of traffic to get out.  3. Food. Over priced, as expected. But what a woeful selection! The same bland food trucks at every event I attended last season. Why limit it to three or four trucks? Why not have 10+? Limited beer selection as well - this is Austin! Step it up! 4. Bathrooms. I only noticed 2-3 actual bathrooms. The first women's restrooms we came upon had, at minimum, 50 ladies in line waiting. Seriously? Either that or head over to port-a-John haven. I can't believe a venue of that caliber, a Formula 1 racetrack, has port-a-potties. Unacceptable. 5. No smoking? How about police that. People on both sides smoking through the entirety of a show just ruins it when you're a non-smoker. 6. Lawn. We had lawn seats once and I'll never do another event on the lawn. No blankets or low chairs? I've never seen a lawn where you can't bring a BLANKET to sit on! So it's basically sloped standing room only in the (sometimes) mud. No thanks - why would you pay for that? 7. Screens. Why so small? Disproportionately small for the size of your venue. Time to upgrade.  Unless my favorite act of all time comes I won't be going back to this venue. I expected some bumps when they first opened, but those should have been long fixed. The venue could have been just what Austin needed, but instead it falls way short of its potential. Look at a place like Pine Knob in Michigan. Take notes.
A Greek man goes into a Greek restaurant but refuses to eat... This is not a joke! This is probably one of the worst Greek restaurants I have been to. I was dragged in about a week ago by two friends saying they wanted to "go Greek". I tried to explain to them that I am Greek and I would never go there. Well they didn't listen. I only ordered 2 beers, refusing to eat. My friends however wanted to "try" things. The ambiance was terrible, the service looked bored and uninviting, but worst of all the food just might make you sick. Specifically, my friend ordered their gyro which is one of the biggest around. It is also probably the worst I've ever seen. It smelled of rotten lamb before it even got to the table. I was disgusted just smelling it. My friend could not eat it, and asked to have it switched out for chicken. They took his plate back, took 2 Greek potatoes out and then smothered the so called "chicken" with tzatziki sauce so it wouldn't smell. My friend took 3 bites, and had to excuse himself to throw up in the bathroom. I am not kidding. When they took his second un-eaten plate, they didn't even wonder what was wrong. Frankly they paid little attention to us even though there were only 2 other parties there. The best part of all this little adventure, we did not finish 1 full plate of food, 2 waters and two beers, and it totaled over $50. I don't know how these people are in business. Terrible food, mediocre service, bad location (you go outside to see a highway and all it's noise) and they ask you to pay $11 for a slice of cheese. Take it from a Greek, try something else, like Gyro Gyro in Dunwoody. They appreciate your business and use fresh ingredients. Get stuffed for 5 bucks. Good and cheap! The Greek way!
Stay away!  I went to Louisville Dental for many, many years when Dr. Lorenz owned it. Never a complaint. Great service and happy people working there. Very friendly and professional. Couldn't be better. Then I went in one day to find the practice had been sold. I had not been notified of this, but I gave it a try. My daughter and I went there for a year or two. Then one day Dr. Chuck Skinner told me I needed some work done. I was told what it would cost. I told the office person I simply could not afford it. (I did not have dental insurance.) Dr. Lorenz had given me some sort of discount in the past. So the lady told me to bring it up when I got the work done. So I did. That was a mistake. When I brought it up I was flat out told "no". That I could work with an agency and make payments to the agency. I felt set up. I would have looked around and compared prices had I known this would be the case. I do not think they operated in good faith.     Then I made the mistake of having my daughter go in for a checkup which was already scheduled. Dr. Chuck Skinner mentioned that she might have a problem with a filling she had gotten at Louisville Dental before it was sold. The filling had an overhang and bacteria might collect there. He said it would be good to have that corrected. I thought since Louisville Dental had done it wrong, Louisville Dental should correct it--at no charge. Nope!  Really?    They seem to be very interested in getting lots of money. Integrity is not high on their priority list. I find this quite interesting since Dr. Chuck Skinner used to advertise that he had gone on a mission for the LDS (Mormon) Church.   I do not know if he still advertises that.
The good... cheap lunch menu...   The annoying..   Dinner prices were tooo high for a place that is in need of a paint job, new decor, and all the other things that go with a high priced dinner meal.   Menu needs updating, new photos and better descriptors than mixed vegetables/????   Hint 86 the plastic table coverings....   No Internet???   Well, if lots of folks were there on the net they might spend money and or make the place look popular. I get it now....   Whatever people....
Short comments. The food is pretty okay, that's the reason why I give them two stars, but the service was really poor. Do expect to wait at least half longer than the waiter told you. I was told last time I could expect a table in 40 mins at 6:20 p.m. last Saturday, but it turned out until 8 p.m. were us settled. Then even our food and food of the people near me were served wrong once. I can't complain more about the service.  But the most frustrating thing the restaurant has done is to overcharge the meal through my credit card. It is just so annoying to find out that they place about 20% more of the fee I have agreed to pay on my bill (I wrote about 40 dollars on the check, but the transaction turns out to be more than 48 dollars on my credit card transaction statement). It is too disappointing, and I do not want to go to this restaurant anymore.
I haven't been to Boston Market in a long time, and after tonight's experience, I remember why. The customer service at this location is deplorable.  My friend & I ordered the 2 for $20 Deal they're promoting. My friend ordered Meatloaf, Stuffing, & Squash Casserole.  I ordered the Chicken Pot Pie.  The woman taking our order wasn't sure if the Pot Pie was included.  She asked someone on her headset and was told that it was... I told her what sides I wanted and she emphatically said it didn't come with sides. (This is from the person that didn't even know  the pot pie was included in the deal) I reminded her that the sign on the counter said "each Meal comes with a main course option, two classic sides and cornbread..." she said the pot pie never came with sides.  So, I ordered turkey instead with Squash Casserole & Sweet Potato Casserole.  She said it would take 10 minutes for the turkey.  I got my drink, unsweetened tea. I had to go back to the counter to get Sweet n' Low because there was none next to the fountain.  Another woman handed me Equal when I asked for Sweet n' Low.  She said that was the only sweetener they had (I stopped using Equal years ago when it was deemed the number 1 worst sweetener on the market) I drank Lemonade instead. I ate my sides while I waited for the turkey.  The sides were delicious.  My friend said the meatloaf was good.  As I was finishing the sides, a woman brought the turkey & gravy.  The turkey looked funny; nothing like "Roasted Turkey Breast" normally looks.  It was wet, it looked and tasted like it was boiled (see the picture).  It tasted awful even after soaking each piece with gravy.  I couldn't finish my meal.
They cheated us on the chicken and didn't give our takeout order the rice and beans. We ordered 1 1/2 chickens and they came without the white meat. You can't run a restaurant with only teenagers. Good food but service stinks.
I live 10 minutes from this location, 3 miles... I normally order a lot of food. I would say out of 5 times my pizza has only been made correctly once, when I order wings they're normally made right, but any other sides have been made wrong and my food always arrives warm to cold. I couldn't eat one of my sides once because they were cold and had hardened over and couldn't be reheated. There is no reason for my food to arrive cold when the store is so close by. Nor should it take an hour to deliver.
I've had great food and service here in the past.  Recently, though, I tried the blackened catfish etouffee, and I ended up moving the fish aside.  It was so strong tasting that I couldn't eat it.  The rest of the ingredients were great. This was the first time I've ever had a problem with the service.  It took three tries to get a drink refill, and the staff seemed to be having communication problems.  I will return because this is the only bad experience I've had out of many meals here.  But this time it was a great disappointment.
Hmmm, where should I start... Located in the hub of Boston University territory on Comm. Ave right next to the Paradise Club, T's Pub is a typical BU watering hole for college students. Their beer selection is pretty good, prices are fair, but take note - THEY DON'T ACCEPT CREDIT CARDS!!! This is the only bar in Boston that I know of that is cash only - seems  a bit shady to me, what do you think? Female cocktail staff are never in a good mood, they always seemed pissed off to be there, and this feeling resonates into the Karaoke host they have one night during the week who likes to diss singers in front of the entire crowd. I only visit this bar when other people want to go there, I never suggest it myself (I think you should take my lead on that one)....
Recommendations for this place were high.  On a late Sunday morning, you can expect a little bit of a wait. After a reasonable wait and then being corralled in like children from recess, we were then seated. The place was packed, but cozy.  Pros: Nice menu and a lot of options. Vegetarian/homemade/organic selections.  Cons: Service was extremely slow and not very friendly. They need to bring on additional waitstaff because you will end up holding your check for about 10-15 minutes and wait even longer to place your order. Don't plan on having your drinks refilled. Potatoes and other dishes that should be served hot were cold and pretty bland. Coffee was really watered down. These are the basics that should be nailed down by most restaurants and Bridges really missed the mark on the simple things.  All in all it seemed more hype than delivery.   It may have been a product of being busy, however there wasn't really anything worth going back for.
HORRIBLE ! Horrible! Service . It's owned by Indians and they're service is not friendly at all ! They snatched my card and rushed for me to pay so they can close. I only went thier because American deli was closed, and this is service I get . Never again.
I will never understand why places offer promotions and then can't keep up. I came here to this location for the first time because of the half price shake deal. Thought it was a great idea until I realized I wasn't going to be helped even after waiting a whooping 25 min. At first I thought it was the terminal we were using so we moved to a new one. Then still nothing. Then we found an employee and asked if the terminals were down or if they were busy. He said they were busy but he would get us next. Waiting an additional 10 min then left. If you cant keep up, don't promote. If you're understaffed, find people. Don't have your customers waiting 30 min for customer service. Terrible experience.
I dont even know when to begin. Lets start with the service, as soon as we walked in it was a complete mess. Floors were dirty, the wait staff was grumpy and rude. Especially for a Saturday i was really shocked. Hardly anyone was there and it was still a disaster. The bathroom was atrocious! I wouldnt let my worst enemy be caught dead in that bathroom. Genuinely disgusting. I dont even like doing reviews but after this expirience i was compelled too. The food was very sub par. My girlfriends chicken was partially undercooked and rubbery and my "boneless chicken fingers" was partially freezer burned. I mean really? Wtf?!?!... I will never, ever! Come back to this nasty place again. Even People from poverty stricken areas would take one look at this place and would rather stay hungry. Aweful. Just aweful.....
When my husband and I first discovered Mandola's a year ago it was great. Certainly not "fine dining" and-- like most of Austin's Italian restaurants--not wonderful cuisine, but it was fine and fun for the price.  They must have changed chefs or management, though, because 2 recent visits this summer were very disappointing. The menu has changed, eliminating our favorite fritto misto and cannelloni, and each time the food was overly salty.  Staff and service are nice and friendly, but be warned that it gets very noisy when there are a lot of families with young kids and the restaurant can get quite dirty.  We STILL need a great Italian restaurant  in Austin. (I'm from New York and have traveled fairly extensively in Europe so I'm admittedly a little picky!) Just wish this place was better... or at least as good as it used to be.
We have four "full-size" dogs and a cat, and for the past five years, we had treated our own yard (very successfully) with nematodes. This year, we had projects that limited our time, so we decided to hire out a company to treat our yard. Fleabusters came out in June and treated our yard with two packets (costing $151). A few weeks later, our yard (and dogs) had increased in the amount of fleas. I called them, only to be told they would gladly come out and treat it again... but for another $151. So, I'm to think this would be wise? Fleabusters would come out, use our water, sprinkle "invisible" bugs, and we should pay another $151??? No, thank you. Save your money. Go get a packet or two of nematodes at Bark'n Purr (off Burnet Rd), and do it yourself. We've NEVER had a problem with their product, and never had a flea infestation...until Fleabusters.
Downgrading my review of RBI because of recent experiences there that have been less-than-savory.    The clientele has gone from cool hipster/hippie/tattooed musician types to a$$hole suburbanites/west Austinites who know NOTHING about normal dog behavior and starting arguments/fights.  I saw a guy with his female companion bring the dog they LITERALLY just rescued from TLAC there.  the dog had that blue and white temporary leash on and was behaving very puppy-like, which means my dogs thought it was party time.  The guy had no clue about normal dog play (they were playing chase--no teeth showing/growling/etc.), and started a fight with me and my husband, saying we're the type of people who ruin the park for everyone (?!?!).  Ugh.  The parking situation is beyond horrendous now.  The cops ticket everybody who isn't parking in an assigned space.  They ticket people parked on Red Bud Lane.  They just plain ticket everyone.  And good luck finding a space--there are literally about 10-12 spaces and you circle around for 20+ minutes waiting for someone to leave.  And good luck trying to actually get it without getting cut off by some out-of-stater stealing it from you.  Also, the number of people bringing unneutered dogs is alarming.  It spikes the amount of aggressive dog incidents and makes things worse for everyone.  It's too bad. My husband and I have not been going more than once a month anymore.
I've never had my husband throw something in his mouth, stare at me wide eyed slowly spit it out onto the plate and grab my hand to leave like two characters in a bad horror movie.   First. This place was reccomended to us by his coworker who clearly stated afterwards shes not even a sushi fan. omgwhyyoudothistous.   Second I see the mixed reviews and just am wondering how the hell we came to this much of an unpopular opinion... since Yelp reviews have generally been correct for me.   We get there, there's a ton of people sitting and the place just seems... frenzied? I guess is the word for it. Hubby and I are seating around the cornerish of this belted table and we immediately see how the fish was not how fish should be if you're living next to an ocean. I picked up I dunno, 2 plates before realizing being polite should not risk food poisoning, and found each sushi/nigiri to be cold, bland, and fishy smelling. Not to mention the TONS of sauce or imitation crab to make it seem like theres substance when there's not.   also, the rice... if the rice is not good the staff probably don't give a crap if the fish is good.   yep. never going back.
For this hotel to be so nice, this Starbucks is terrible. They are so slow! This is a high traffic, high end hotel so it would make sense that it be staffed way better than it is. Line at 8:30am this morning is the photo I'm attaching. Not super crazy for a Starbucks, but super crazy to have waited 26 minutes. The workers' attitudes suck. More McDonald's attitudes, not what is expected at Starbucks. Hard pass!
Following the signing of my moving contract, the coordination of this move and the customer service provided by Berger has completely fallen apart.  I was provided false and incorrect information from Berger for everything from the required use of a shuttle to load my truck, to the number of movers loading my truck, to the time it would take them to load it.  Add to that the poor attitude of the truck driver, the fact that an item was left behind on the front lawn (placed there by the movers), and Berger's lack of action to resolve any of it, and I am an extremely dissatisfied customer.  The manager at this location has also not held up his end of the agreement in investigating my complaints in a timely manner. At this time, I have filed a complaint with the BBB, and am awaiting additional contact from Berger or the BBB regarding this move.
I feel like I just visited the Greek restaurant at Epcot Center.   The other 2 star reviews I see on here are pretty much spot on with how I feel.   For $59.90 for 2 people to have the meze tasting spread, the food is sure as fuck not worth it. With a $25 gift card, it still isn't even worth it. I am seriously unimpressed.   Note that this spread is stupid as hell if you do not at least get 2 $12 plates, 2 $10 plates, and 1 $7 plate. You save $.10 this way, but swap out any of those others for another $7 plate and you're better off ordering them one by one.  The spreads: I loved the htipiti one, at least I can figure that out from the menu, but the other spreads, I have no idea. The guy who brought them out didn't bother to waste his breath telling us what they were. My guess is one was eggplant and the other was the potato one, which just tasted like hummus.   For the plates zucchini fritters - I liked these, but damn that saffron yogurt was strong. For $7 for some little balls of fried shredded zucchini, you can make your own and not have to pay for the saffron.  calamari - my boyfriend ordered it, I won't touch it. He only ate half. He said it was the worst calamari he ever had. Usually he will eat something even if it's bad.   saganaki - it was okay. I've only had it one other time in my life and don't remember it.   lamb pie - this was the only thing I would order if I was forced to come back here.   lamb shank - somehow this lamb was awful compared to the lamb in the pie. The accompanying sauce did nothing to help it out.  The service sucked. I am sorry I did not wear my pearls and I don't have enough wrinkles on my face to warrant any attention from the people working here. There were long periods of time when my water glass was empty. The server was not very interested in explaining the menu beyond the fish. It gets really annoying when the people bringing food out play musical chairs with everything on the table and just leave the empty plates. Both tables on either side of us had all sorts of attention on them and there we are in the middle like we rolled in dirt and came in.  The ambiance sucks. While the whole like Hercules movie set looks cool, the closeness of tables does not work with Americans. I do not need to hear about Betty's latest botox session next to me. It really seems like a place to throw money at food and be seen. Not in a million years.  At least the valet guys were nice. And as someone who normally hates anyone touching her car, this is the greatest compliment I can bestow on someone. It even looked all important out front, unlike how I got to feel inside.  I feel like rebelling in my youth now and eating dollar hamburgers for a week.
The food was god awful.  Not very good service. Ordered the Curras molletes and I'm going to be honest- it was basically hot dog buns with wolf brand chili and cheese on top, baked.    I sent these back immediately.  I ordered the cochinita pibil.  I love cochinita pibil dishes, but I wasn't a fan.  It was a bit on the sour side for me.  Boyfriend ordered the special- basically a chimichanga.  Nothing special.  The avocado margarita was okay.    Overall it was too expensive, and it didn't sit well.
Not worth the cost. The kids didn't care for the spaghetti, and they usually love spaghetti. We, the adults, ordered the "jumbo" ravioli. It was 4 Chef Boyardee-sized raviolis each, and it was bland. The calamari was pretty good. But we paid over $60 for the meal including delivery, and Dominos would have been better and cheaper.
Bookhouse has amazing food (best fried chicken ever) and a great, always-changing beer selection. Unfortunately, the service is consistently awful.  I keep returning to Bookhouse hoping that I simply caught a server on a bad day last time, and maybe this time will be better. It never is. Especially when I am there with a group larger than two people, I feel as though I am inconveniencing the waitstaff with my presence. I find myself going out of MY way to be polite to the staff to try to make the situation less uncomfortable. This has happened four times now.  Last night about six of us were sat outside and waiting for one more guest to arrive, and our server wouldn't even let us order drinks. He said, "that's not how this works. You wait for everyone before you order with me." Are you kidding me? If that's the house rule, then don't let us sit down with an incomplete party. That would be perfectly fine. But it is NOT okay to have us seated and then deny us a drink order. And the way he said it, like he was scolding us for our bad manners. Oh, the irony.  I will not be coming back to Bookhouse. There are simply too many outstanding bars and restaurants in ATL for me to put up with acutely rude waitstaff. Such a shame... I'll really miss that fried chicken.
HORRIBLE!!!! Signed up to take a tour and in exchange they would give us discounted tickets to Universal Studios. Arrived for them only to tell us that we had to be shuttled to another property. This would have taken up our whole morning. I instead asked them to refund my money which they did not like. Woman at desk had a very bad attitude. DO NOT RECOMMEND DEALING WITH THEM. PAY FOR YOUR TICKETS. NOT WORTH THE HASSLE!!!
This is not a friendly place because the staff is very rude and untrained. This place just opened on 1/26/2017 so there's no excuse for tried, unhappy, rude employees. And the door greeters are extremely rude to the point that I turned around and "politely" walked out the door when I noticed the guy had a nasty attitude.
Place sucks. When you walk in and see a sign that says if you sit you commit its time to run for the door. No kids plates overpriced. Burgers were raw had to be sent back. It takes an act of god to get your check. I would think twice before you come here.
Pharmacy service at this location is abysmal.  Every time (EVERY TIME) I fill my prescription they tell me I have no refills left.  I then have to go through a game where they call my doctor, verify my prescription and then I am allowed to fill it.  Over half the time, they never call me back so I have to stalk them (takes about 5-6 phone calls every month) to see if I can pick up my meds.  Such a waste of time.  Everything else is pretty standard for a CVS (overpriced, generally).
- Keeps beating around the bush on the price of vehicle. - Gimmicky sales tactics. - unprofessional sales manager.
I want to like this place, I really do. It's in my neighborhood, it's open late, and I'm a busy college student. However, on two occasions they have messed up my order and I have firmly decided to not order from here anymore when it's late and I'm desperate. I'll stick with Sunrise, who actually takes into consideration my 23402394 questions about the animal products in their food, and doesn't drop little chicken surprises into my delicious spicy general tso's tofu.   Besides that, all of their food is a strange, unnatural color. I mean, yeah, it's Chinese food, there's variety - but neon red chili sauce? ORANGE lo mein?   Sorry No. 1, you certainly are not.
The restaurant looks very nice, I had high expectations for this place but it was a disappointment. I ordered ham eggs Benedict, the eggs were overcooked. Pricy for small portions. The coffee was good tho.  Service was OK
Do not call that number. It's fake. It leads to a motor club ad that wants you to sign up with them and never goes to BCBS
This company does not deserve even a 1 star rating. I filed a claim with HWA and Austin Star Services has been to my home twice over the past two weeks. The first time I was told a spider tripped the breaker. The following visit, a starter kit was installed however the breaker has continued to trip. It has tripped a total of 10 times today. The technician asked me not contact my warranty company with any additional problems but to call them directly. I called them yesterday. I was assured that I would receive a return phone call either last night or first thing this morning. At 5:30 this afternoon I called them again. I spoke to Jon, the owner. He stated that he was awaiting a phone call from HWA and would call me back by 8:30pm. At 6:40 I called HWA for a status update. HWA informed me that at 6:33 this evening, Jon called for the first time stating that my breaker was continuously breaking and that he had to do further diagnostics. I called Jon numerous times. Not until I left a message stating that I was being told conflicting stories and wanted to give him an opportunity to tell me what was going on before filing a complaint did he call me back. Jon continued to state that the delay was a result of waiting on direction from HWA. When asked directly if he had called HWA and informed them that the starter kit was not properly working, he answered no. When asked directly why HWA would call him with direction if they had not been made aware there was an issue with the unit, he apologized for any "miscommunication." He further stated that HWA told him that there was nothing that could be done for me until my compressor completely failed. I called HWA, I was told that no such thing was said. In fact, I was told that a continuously tripping breaker in the Texas heat is considered an emergency under their policy. When Jon was confronted with this information and asked the name of the person he spoke to directly, he stated that he spoke to "like 7 different people about it" but doesn't remember their names. Amazingly, none of these 7 people made any documentation regarding their conversations. Save yourself the trouble and call someone else.
I've been here twice for a facial. The first time was amazing, my skin looked great for a week after!  She used the "steam cleaner" on my face for quite a while and it helped immensely.  I was so pleased I went back... big mistake! The second time I asked about having my skin steam cleaned again, I told her how well my skin responded to it, and the girl said she would.  She did it for about 30 seconds and then asked me if I wanted a vitamin C mask saying it would really help clear up my skin.  Well of course I want anything that will clear up my skin.  So I said yes, and she was like ok that's another $15 and again told me how great my skin would look.  I said ok.   That was about a month ago.  My skin has never looked worse.  The mask she used caused my skin to get dry, bumpy, and blotchy.  I have asked other people about using a Vitamin C mask and they say its not at all a healthy thing to do to your skin.  My skin is stil blotchy and looks horrible and is not smooth or soft at all.  This was the opposite of what you want after a facial.  I feel like my skin will never feel as good as it did after the first facial.  I didn't appreciate that she didn't warn me about the side effects of the mask and just tried to upsell me.  I am giving two stars only because the first facial I had was really good.  I will not be returning here and hopefully one day my skin will return to being non-splotchy and smooth.
I belive that they used inferior glass. After a year, the windsheild is full of dings and is now once again cracked, and needs replacment.  I will not be using safelite again.
I'm giving the place a one star mainly because of the customer service here is terrible. I ordered delivery a few months back told the driver my door was located in the back (I don't have access to the front). He refused to come to the back even though I had already pre paid for the order with my credit card. So I walked down stairs signed for my food and gave the ungrateful driver 15% tips told him if he came to the back door I would've gave him 20%, I didn't mean to be rude I was giving him a pro tip on how to maximize his tips by giving the customer the best experience possible. He goes and swears at me with racial slurs and told me I couldn't get delivery here. I didn't post a review before but today I couldn't even order pick up! ( this was the last straw) The girl at the counter told my girlfriend that she had to come in person and pay for the order at the counter ... Like I was willing to give this place a second chance to change their ways but seems to me that management doesn't care about the customers. Their food is good but their customer service so so bad it turns me off from this place. Management needs to do something about this, this is unacceptable. I would give zero stars if it were an option.
Horrible experience. Ended up walking out and going somewhere else. NEVER again will I rent from Hertz because of this experience. An extremely RUDE person started to process my reservation - no eye contact, no conversation. Dude - if your life sucks, don't take it out on your CLIENTS!   I told the guy I've never had this kind of an issue before with their competition. Know what he told me? He said I should go back to them instead! So I did.   Also the parking lot is IMPOSSIBLE to navigate - no empty spaces for customers. HUH??  I went down the street, was greeted by really friendly staff who were happy to match the prices from hertz. Lesson learned.
I don't know if the older German lady is the owner but she has horrible customer service. She just glared at me and it was very uncomfortable. I had a social shopper voucher and when I mentioned this to her (before making my selection) she acted so annoyed by this value offering that she authorized in the first place. I bought this voucher under the pretence that this new location was offering a grand opening welcome special for new customers and I was hoping this could be my new dessert place since I live one block away. But her customer service soured my first impression plus the desserts aren't noteworthy. Too bad. If you work with a company like Groupon or Social Shopper you should never discount the service just the price.
I wanted to write an update that we were able to have our follow-up visit for free due to the misinformation the first vet gave us about the flea medication. Dr. Watson was much more informative, willing to listen and didn't try to push Banfield products or additional treatments that would be unnecessary.  I will return if I can choose Dr. Watson for all future appointments. That's the difficulty with Banfield... not all their services and vets are equal.  We also learned at our last visit. That while Banfield claims it is a Pet Hospital with emergency care, it refused to see or treat a dog that a woman brought in as it had just been hit by car. We suggested going down the street to another vet with a more personal approach and she did.  We will not consider Banfield for emergency services either.
It's my boyfriend's birthday and he loves breakfast, specifically waffles, so we decided to try a new place. Sadly, this is not a place we will be visiting again.  The Service: Took our order, never asked if we'd been there before so when it came time to pay we weren't sure if she took our money or if we were supposed to pay at the hostess area. Never came back and asked if we wanted a warm-up on our coffee or if we needed anything else. Brought the bill out at the same time she brought the food- never a good look. She did bring us an accurate order in a timely fashion. However, had she paid a bit more attention to us, she would have received a much better tip. We tend to tip 50% for great service. Also, we were going to grab some muffins to go but never had the chance to order or ask the server's opinions so ultimately, this place lost out on some money because of the service as well.   The Food: We tried French toast, eggs, Belgium waffle and bacon. Bacon and "eggs" (beaters) were incredibly greasy. My mouth is coated in oil. Waffle was cold and the French toast did taste good.   The Value: This is where they lose us as customers- the prices are insane. Almost $9 for a waffle? Almost $9 for 4 pieces of French toast? Bacon was precooked Oscar Meyer, and eggs were not real eggs. If an establishment is going to charge that much for a simple breakfast- that breakfast better be incredible. I will post a picture of our receipt for reference. $5 for a side of 4 slices of bacon is crazy considering you can buy a package of bacon for that.   The Atmosphere: Smelled of hazelnut coffee, cute little diner. Exactly the nostalgia diner feel.
It may be the beer talking Judy, but you've got a butt that won't quit. They've got those big chewy pretzels here they're all blthhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhhh   $45 DOLLARS FOR A HAIRCUT!!  GET OUTA HERE!!!!
Thanks for ruining my bachelorette dinner! I have waited years to write this review to cool down from the experience I had here. The old location was WAY better as was the old management. Why they moved and changed things up is beyond me because it seems they now want to flush their business down the toilet. I won't deeply elaborate on what happened to me because I do believe that you can catch a place on a bad night. However, the food is precooked and sits under a heating lamp. It comes to your table so quickly because of this butbits rather disgusting. A friend who recently dined here confirmed this exact suspicion.   I'll never eat here again in my life, not even for free. Thinking for a great tapas spot? Think about driving right past this place.
I just this Kroger, my time here.  I received the worst service. The cashier one was the trainee and the other was the trainer. To make a long story short. My turkey didn't have a sticker to scan so she sent someone to bring back one with a sticker. He took forever and brought back the wrong thing. The trainer asked if I wanted to purchase what I had and wait for him to bring back my item. I said no and this is taking too long. So I literally ran back to get my own item. She never applied for my inconvenience but she thanked Josh for bringing back the item after I ran back to get it. She was more concerned with Josh and the man behind me than me.  It was so disrespectful.
I have not been in a hotel that has no ice available for a long time. Room is dark, mostly cheap furniture. Laminate flooring throughout. It has a small kitchen area. No flat surface space to put things on. No place to put suitcases. Bed is good, shower is decent. Breakfast is a joke, oatmeal and granola bars. Coffee is good. No decor but seems safe.
Very disappointing customer service at the Lynn location.  Do not purchase a gift card at either Lynn or Winthrop restaurants until they fix the "glitch" that isn't  enabling them to read the balance on gift cards purchased at the other location.  They read a zero balance which is what happened to recipients of a $100 gift card that was purchased in Lynn but presented for use in Winthrop.  They don't know when the glitch will be fixed and feel that no apology is necessary.
I ordered a 3 meat combo to go: curry goat, brown stew chicken and oxtail. When I opened the container the meal looked like a plate of mush, which might have been ok if the food was tasty. My husband sampled a bit of everything from the container and said "this is the worst Jamaican food I've ever had."   The oxtail was dry and had a weird taste - kinda sweet and tangy. The curry goat, in my opinion was ok, The brown stew chicken was meh.  I will not be going back!
Dined here on a groupon & am I happy I didn't pay full price! I had the crab cake sandwich w/a strange slaw--only fair. Husband had mussels -- smallest ones ever seen & half were empty But the broth was plain terrible. Should have sent that back after 1 taste. Also noted, shrimp w/ Parmesan (should never be served w/ seafood) not the friendliest place either.
Food was good and somewhat innovative, but the ungracious atmosphere made it less enjoyable than it might have been. The staff seemed more interested in turning tables than offering a good dining experience.
Terrible unless you want to order something and eat in pitch darkness, try and then give up, and only hear butt jokes.
The woman working there was so incredibly rude. She made me wait a good five minutes and when I finally told her I wanted to pay she acted like she was really pissed and rambled on and on about out of town folks and never acknowledged me. She was so rough with the plants that I selected and threw them in a box. Finally, my friend told her bye and have a great day and she completely ignored him. I really wanted to throw the succulents on the ground and leave. What a complete ....
Terrible customer service experience via Foodler. An hour and a half after placing my order, and after making two calls, I was informed that no one was coming, but that I would need to contact Foodler myself to get a refund. Avoid this place like the plague.
I purchased an oil change package that included discounts for other services.  However, they had a reason why none of those discounts applied to my car as my car required repairs.  When asked about the labor discount, I was told each repair could not be broken down in order to have any labor taken off, though, the receipt had parts and labor seperated.  I was also surprised that their quotes on multiple items were the same as the dealership.  In fact, they asked more for one of repairs.
Great coffee however badly let down by the super slow service as constant errors with orders - I think my last 5 or 6 visits my coffee order has been wrong!
I was not impressed at all, except for the buffalo chicken nachos that a friend had and the authentic Irish accent on the waitress, who otherwise, was a terrible server.  We chose this pub only because Quincy Market was closed, where we could have gotten a great variety of food.    The waitress never brought us more water and I even had to go up to the bartender to ask for more.  I gave her a dollar tip, which was probably too much.  Also, they ran out of oysters, which sucked.  I had the Seafood Newburg, which was small and not memorable.   I won't be going back again.
Dishes were dirty, even after asking for clean dishes.  Food was terrible.  Fries and onion rings were burnt. Shrimp salad was disgusting.
My girlfriend walked here to get my hungover ass a delicious fucking breakfast sandwich this morning. She fucking walked. It's 2017 and she fucking walked her ass over to your hipster piece of shit establishment to get one of your overpriced breakfast sandwiches. Here's the complicated order she put in. Two bacon and egg breakfast sandwiches. She paid for them, it's on the receipt.  Guess what? No fucking bacon on either of these. I need that fucking bacon to soak up my scumminess. Even fucking dunk-my-nuts can handle two bacon egg and cheeses. Your cook deserves to be scolded, put his face on the hot griddle. Fuck you all.
This review comes from an experience two summers ago ... My friends and I call Comellas. No answer. We try several times before hopping in the car and driving over.  We arrive. We stand in a slooow line to order.  It's now ~40 minutes since I paid. If that's not ridiculous, the 2 customers previously behind me are already out the door.  We make a complaint. The girl argues with us and grabs her manager. The 'manager' is a middle-aged white bigot. Smiling, he says "If you don't like waiting then you should have called in." We did. So he laughs and says we're LYING and amongst a lot of other bullshit he actually calls my friend Amy a BALL BUSTER. What kind of business is this?  Even after this pointless back & forth I was asked on 3 separate occasions what my name was so they could check the order. The only 'apology' we got was from another girl who claimed that the reason we waited longer was because a to-go takes longer... 'Because they cut the pizza differently'? We insist, how so? She rolls her eyes and walks away.   There is a racist atmosphere at Comellas Westwood and it starts with management.
Gel manicure lasted 2 days. I was working so I called them 4 days after (gel is supposed to last 2 weeks ) the guy told me that is too late to get it fixed and was arguing with me. I told him that I spent $70 right there and as a first time customer I was not happy and that they will loose a client and he answered: ok bye. Great customer service! They have to much customers so they don't care about your business.
I was pretty disappointed at this place as a brunch option.  Portion sizes were small, so the price felt too high than the quality of the food we were served. The only tea they had was plain black tea, no hot chocolate - that was their biggest downfall for me. Service was average.
These people make me wish Yelp had zero-star ratings. I was in a difficult position of having to take an apartment sight unseen, and ever since then this company has been dismissive and unhelpful at every turn. They seem like a very convenient option because they dominate Craigslist, but they are NOT an advocate for you, only for their bottom line. Renting from them is one of the biggest mistakes of my life -- please don't follow in my footsteps.
I still can't believe I stepped into this restaurant and paid money for their food. Instant regret as we sat down and waited for the menu for 5 mins. The waitress comes to the table and asks us what we'd like to order... where's our DAMN menus? She takes another few minutes to finally bring it to us.  The interior looks rundown. Menus are falling apart. Tables are left uncleaned as guests leave.  We ordered peshwari naan, masala dosa and chicken tikka dosa. The only thing we enjoyed was the crispy dosa. Everything else was mediocre. Food wasn't even warm. Naan was definitely taken from the freezer. And are you kidding me... NO RAISINS in the peshwari naan?!?!  I would never come back to this unorganized mess of a restaurant. The waitress visits the table to fill water but don't ask if you need anything. My friend dropped his fork on the ground and they never came by with a new one. The cherry on top was when they brought the bill and it was for another table. Dosa Factory is a hot mess. WHYYY are they on Newbury Street?!
Not so Tight Tacos..  It pains me to leave a negative review for this place since my first experience with them was excellent. My trip yesterday, however, was a different story. I don't know if it's because the cooks were different this time around, but my favorite chorizo tacos were totally bland. Worse than that, the handmade tortillas were mushy, crumbly, and kept falling apart! I can usually put down taco after taco after taco but yesterday? I was struggling to finish my meal.
This location had to be staffed by the dumbest and slowest Wendy's employees in Columbus. Every time I have to use this location I'm stuck waiting ten minutes in a drive through and get stuck dealing with mush mouths who seemingly never used the sales terminal before. Such a beautiful building wasted on dummies.
This place was not welcoming. First a friend and I almost did an about face and march out of there because of the sad condition of shop but we were there so figured we'd give the nail salon a try. We came to relax and catch up over a mani/ pedi and was told talking, even quite conversation, wasn't permitted as to not disturb others. We were the only ones in the crusty place!! Done nail Nazi we won't be back.
Totally rip off!!! I paid double for extended my shoes. the worst part is no even change at all !!!!   I purchased a pair  stuart weitzman shoes online, it was little too tight. so I brought to the store if they can extend a bit . "Yes, We Can."  I paid $8 in front ( he said they always do) and he didn't give me a receipt . I thought it should be OK because he put a tag on the shoes. A week later I came back , a different Korean guy denialed the payment , so I have to paid again because I can not show him evidence that I already paid for it. " WHAT THE HECK?"  Are you kidding? He called other guy and he said he doesn't remember that I have paid. Then told me come back another day when he( the one charged my money)is there. NO, I dont have time to come back for the freaking confrontation.  Be aware of those guys, Robbers....
We ordered cleaning services through this company through a groupon.  Although the first gal showed up on time, our experience with the second cleaning was a disaster.  When she couldn't make it to the assigned time she rescheduled a time for the following day.  She did not show up.  When I called the company, they apologized and rescheduled for another cleaning lady to come out the following day.  There was a second no show.  When I called back in extreme frustration and anger, the representative told me that even though I had been rescheduled once and "no showed" twice, he would not be able to have someone else come out to the house until the following week.  We will NEVER do business with this company again and will urge all of our friends to do the same.
No seriously!!! They are a good food restaurant. However I feel like they over look customer service due to the fact that they have a high clientele.  Is almost as if are are thankful to be eating there rather than they that we choose them to take out family out to dinner at their establishment.  Waited in line to be seated first table open and the have it to the party that came after I did. The guy just said you can wait or you can leave. Seriously  thanks. I pursue to go up the street to el Tapatio.
Tried this new pizza tonight. We used the online ordering and it worked great and came in 30 min just like it said it would. We ordered the bbq pizza with the new bbq drizzle and cheddar crust. Sorry but it was not that great. Wasn't expecting much because it's Pizza Hut but with all the new commercials I expected it to be better than it used to be. Bbq sauce was way too sweet and meat tasted funny.
One of the worst restaurants I've ever been to. This location shouldn't even exist. There was multiple hairs in our food (mind you me and my family all have black hair and the hairs were blonde) and we were disrespected so much by the server. When asking for the manager, I heard the server call my friend a bitch to another server. This will be the first and last time coming here. STAY AWAY!!!
Only accepts cash and doesn't like you bringing your Starbucks
I went there to get sharp cheddar cheese and they were out.  Bought a few items and they rely far too heavily on the self-checkout lanes.  It's slower in self-check out when you have a bottle return coupon.  The lady that cashed in my coupon at the self-checkout was clearly missing a nut or bolt.  She greeted me inappropriately, was dressed in street clothes with no name tag and for a moment I had no idea she was an employee.  Called the next day to find out if the cheese had been re-stocked and was transferred to grocery and forgotten.  Called back and no one answered the phone.  Black Friday was a joke.  The check out lanes and many grocery aisles were blocked off with tape to keep people from shopping.  A huge portion of the grocery section was blocked off with an area for selling DVDs and CDs when the "sale" started.  The grocery section?  Really?  Ridiculous store.
I came to this place with many recommendations because I was craving so good Jamaican food. I regretfully had to give a 2 Star. I ordered jerk chicken and rice and peas with ox tail gravy, roti skin. The food was so damn spicy you could not TASTE SEASONING or NOTHING! I was already kind of surprised I was charge 3 extra dollars for white meat. I felt the food was over priced considering most Jamaican spots dinner is under $15 for chicken dishes. My roti was hard I was not able to eat that. I ended up going to by food somewhere else after I had spent $23.00 on 1 dinner with roti and beverage. I will never ever go back. The people inside was cool but being from nyc I know you don't have to make Jamaican food so spicy and it ends up with no flavor just HOT! It was a waste of money for me. I wish the food came with a warming label. Heartburn and Malax is a must. Washed down with a glass of milk. Smh to say I was disappointed is a understatement.
These people can't get an order right to save their lives. They bark so fast through the drive through they don't get your full order, and don't even ask if the order is correct. Which of course it's not. Then they don't even bother to fake a smile at the window. Super super rude. Don't bother coming here at all. Food tastes like trash anyway.
Response to Brian's responsr: Brian, you forgot to mention that you were verbally abusive as well and then REFUSED to take payment. Worst. Customer. Service. Ever.
Management here is awful and they need to train their staff, in particular their cashiers, better. I was being helped by a cashier who was clearly new (did not know about many things that VS offers). I bought a gift card but after my inputting my pin, she must not have completed the transaction and asked another cashier what happened. They both agreed that my payment did not go through and asked me to pay again. Being in a rush, I believed them (I thought, how could they mess up if a moneris receipt comes out after each payment? So they must be right) so I put my pin in again got my gift card and left. Turns out I was charged twice so I called the store the next day. The manager told me he would send this issue to head office and asked me to call back after the weekend if the refund doesn't show up. He was helpful, but a week later I called again cause nothing showed up.   This time I left my contact info with the manager because I figured they were busy so they could contact me once it's been figured out. Now a week later, still no call so I spoke with Janine(?). Worst experience here at VS. Of course I expressed my frustration as this was a mistake made by the cashiers, and I was told I would be helped by two different managers. After I'm finally able to tell her the whole story (as she interrupted me many times), she gives me the most sarcastic response "amazing, I'm so glad you've been having a great experience with us". None of this was my fault, it was the staffs mistake and I was being pleasant the first couple times I called. If you don't like giving the most basic customer service, don't work in retail.
Although the prices are reasonable, the sushi here is cheerfully cheap but unremarkable at best, and poorly constructed and flavorless at worst.  They don't have a brown rice option.  Today my kani roll fell apart during the 5 minute walk back from the mall because it wasn't rolled properly - it was a mess of rice, kani, and nori by the time I got back to my desk.   The lady at the cash register is pleasant enough, and they do have free samples every so often.  However, I didn't appreciate the manager and sushi "chefs" telling me "We see you here often" (I hadn't been there in 3 weeks so they probably had the wrong person), and then proceeding to ask questions about where I'm from.  Sorry, but I don't really feel like making friends when I'm rushing to get back to my desk - I just want my sushi.   Bottom line: acceptable, but not mind-blowingly awesome sushi.
Started out some p.t. here because it was convenient to my home.  Nothing helped and I even had a spasm while there, so I stopped going.  Months later I started  up somewhere different and within minutes had a diagnosis and relief.  Based on personal experience, I would proceed with caution.
I had dinner there last night with a couple friends, overall the food wasn't bad, it was pretty good and I wouldnt be writing this if I hadnt paid so much for the somewhat mediocre meal, if it only cost $10 I wouldn't be complaining, I just ordered one of their dinners and the total bill was almost $20, I didn't even get a drink. I guess upon leaving I just felt kind of ripped off cause I don't go out to eat that often and when I spend that much for dinner I really want it to be spectacular. The portions were rather small, the service was so so, not great but not horrible, same with the atmosphere. I wont be eating there again, I feel like I could get a better meal somewhere else for half the price.
This is the worst and slowest Starbucks in the state! You not only have to wait 15 minutes for them to give you your black coffee but it likely will come out with an ingredient you didn't ask for. Seems like there are plenty of people working behind the counter but it doesn't seem to matter, they couldn't be more disorganized or any slower.  I wanted to go back to the tip jar and take my tip out...
This place is great if you like paying $3.25 per adult to sit and watch your child play games.
Oh puhleeeeze...you know what really pisses me off about this place, aside from everything that was already mentioned?  First off, let me say that I am not opposed to spending $150+ on a pair of jeans (in fact, I am addicted to it)...but this place is a RIP-OFF.  It's TAKING ADVANTAGE of you, ladies!  I'm not talking about the designer jeans...I'm talking about those no-name $50 t-shirts and cheap looking crap that they try to sneak in between the designer labels.  I would give this place 0 stars if I could.
Nice establishment. Parking is rough. Like fish?  I hope so cause even general tso's tasted like it.  Waitress was very nice though.
I was SO DISAPPOINTED when I came here for lunch today.    I have been here many times over the years because their Ruben was the best thing next to being in NYC and their fries with the red onion gravy were just the most sinful calorie splurge.  I saved my calories all week and was so excited to come.  I didn't bother to check the reviews or the online menu because I didn't know that something was amiss.  I walked in, sat down and frowned at the menu.  What's this?  No Ruben?  No Poutine?  So I asked the waitress what had happened.  She said 2 things: first, they hired a new chef who had the brilliant idea to change the menu.  Second, they stopped importing the pastrami from NYC because the supplier was being shady or something.  I was set to leave but figured hey, I'll give it a try.  What a dumb idea.  We each started with the french onion soup which was warm and had the yummy bread and cheese, but man were they heavy-handed with the sherry or port of whatever they used.  It was definitely on the sweet side, but not enough to make me unhappy.  I then ordered the corned beef sandwich.  Now, when they say corned beef, I assume nice, thin slices of corned beef with some kind of acidic flavor to balance the fatty meat.  NOPE.  Not here.  The genius in the kitchen decided to serve chunks of fatty corned beef on a large roll, drenched in mayo and cheese.  It was like fat on fat on fat with no acidity to balance it out.  Did I mention the CHUNKS of fat on the meat?  Now, I like fat, don't get me wrong.  But this was just unappetizing.  The side salad that came with it was nice lettuce covered in salt and pepper and maybe a little vinegar and dressing.   The burger my lunch buddy had was almost as bad.  It was edible but looked like it came out of the prepared burgers you can get at Costco or Safeway or something.  Really, the only bright spot was the waitress who, seeing how unhappy I was, comped my sandwich.  Which was really nice of her.   Unless things change here again drastically, I'm not going back.  You shouldn't waste your time here either.
To be clear there is nothing actually bad about this place besides the coffee, the size of the shop and their clientele.  The staff was friendly and the service was quick.  The coffee was overpriced and sucked but still not my issue.  It was just what the place was that I really hated.  It wasn't a coffee shop.  It was a scene to be at and talk about your Instagram not to get a cup.  A very Portland experience.
Came here for breakfast, but it turned into brunch/lunch due to the wait. First off, somebody tried to cut in front of me when I was waiting patiently in line. If the manager didn't happen to come by and point out to the staff that I had been waiting first, the other party would have been seated before me. Once my boyfriend and I were seated, it took a long time for the meal to come out. Our waiter had kindly apologized in advance that our service would be slower than usual because he was managing multiple tables and covering for another staff member due to issues with taking break (aka work drama). I did appreciate this early information so we knew what to expect, but the wait turned out to be ridiculous, on top of getting my boyfriend's order wrong!  I had the Sticky Bun Pancake Breakfast with sausage. I enjoyed my fluffy, sweet pancakes. My boyfriend, on the other hand, did not completely enjoy his order.  He had the Steak Skewer and Eggs Skillet, and the steak was juicy and great, but he had specifically requested the mushrooms to be on the side because he hates mushrooms and was going to give them to me. He also requested toast for an additional 99 cents (as indicated on the menu), but the toast didn't arrive until he was practically done with his meal, AND he was charged $1.99 instead because the waiter said he put in the toast as a side after he had already ordered the skillet meal. Well, if the waiter wasn't so busy, my boyfriend would have been able to request the toast sooner, but we couldn't get his attention and had no idea it would result in an additional charge than indicated on the menu until we received the receipt, which took a long time to obtain too!   Here's what we had:   + Sticky Bun Pancake Breakfast: Cinnamon sauce and cream cheese icing drizzled over two buttermilk pancakes with glazed pecans cooked inside the pancakes, served with two eggs and hash browns, and choice of two strips of bacon or two sausage links ($7.99)  + Steak Skewer and Eggs Skillet: Grilled sirloin steak atop fire-roasted bell peppers, onions, mushrooms, and red-skinned potatoes, topped with a sweet bourbon sauce and two eggs ($10.29) - add toast for an additional 99 cents  Overall, the food was good, but the service was extremely slow. It's one thing to be a little slower than usual, but this was so slow that what should have been a quick, no-longer-than-an-hour meal to a two hour meal!
Terrible customer service/poorly trained staff. My 9 yr old emerged from his Laser mission visibly upset. I asked him what was wrong and he said his gun wasn't working correctly and wouldn't shoot. When I asked if he had told anyone, he said that he couldn't see any employees inside the maze and didn't know who to approach.  I walked to the desk, told an employee what happened and asked if he could play in the next available game for free. I was told no, since he hadn't reported it during the game there was nothing they could do about it. This was literally 5 minutes after the game had ended.   What a terrible response. Nothing you can do? A well trained staff would make the situation right. What did they think I was trying to do, cheat them out of eight dollars?    Since we had already purchased a later game, we did the next mission together. Both guns worked fine, so it wasn't operator error. That's the last dollar I'll spend there. There are plenty of fun things to do in the area.
The process was great until we paid. We felt after they received our money their customer service dropped drastically . We ordered our flooring we were told all supplies would be available. A few days before,day of install we found out they didn't have enough padding. Then another call saying they were going to borrow from another job. Twenty minutes before install they called and said they would not have enough to do our dinning room, and was not sure when they would get it in. They also told us it would take half a day, when it took full day even not finished. Not only did they not have enough padding to complete the dinning room they did not do our hall way. Even though we saw rolls of it at Menard's. At 6pm when I called our sales guy he said he was unsure when he would get the rest of supplies in. He said he would call us first thing Monday morning. He did not call, my husband had to call. At that time all he could say was I put an order in for Saturday. Did not hear anything else through the week until my husband had to call again. Rep  said sorry I thought I told you they will be there Saturday. After job was finished rep never called to make sure everything was okay, even after our customer service issues. The sad thing is, the rep knew we were going to use Rite Rug to carpet our upstairs. Pretty sure that won't be happening after our experience.
We went here last night based on mostly positive reviews. What a disappointment! Overpriced, crowded, poor service and tasteless food. Pass this one by!
How did they describe that terrible pizza on The Office? "Hot circles of garbage"? That's Pizza Oasis. Portland is a town with generally low standards for pizza, but this place takes the cake. The terrible, awful, cake. Mushy, bready crust, watery tomato sauce, low quality cheese, and heaps and heaps of generic, flavorless toppings. Avoid at all costs.
I was looking forward to visiting this restaurant and had a Groupon to make the experience hopefully worthwhile. We arrived for an 8:45 reservation, were greeted and seated. Initial impressions were impressive of the dinning room, view, and live music which is only in the bar. Once we were able to order, our initial choices of champagne and wine were not available. They had NO champagne for some reason and the other two bottles of wine we wanted they were also out of. The waiter gave us a better bottle at the lower price of the previous bottles we had wanted. That was nice and much appreciated. They were also out of a couple of the entrees. When we inquired about the sides that came with the entree and which ones we should order in addition to it we were not properly informed. We ordered sides of asparagus when mine actually came with it to begin with. The salads as starters were just OK, nothing special. The entrees were fine, but once again, nothing to rave about. My friend ordered the surf and turf, very little surf and a whole lot of sauce with her turf. I had the lamb which was unfortunately the tiniest entree of lamb I have ever had in my life. Overall, the food tasted fine and luckily the Groupon compensated for the overpriced meal. It reminded us a lot of Vegas and how it is mainly all show that doesn't exceed or even meet your expectations. It was an ok-nice 'one-time experience' but both of us agreed that we would have no reason to ever go back. There are too many other places that are a much better value for your money. We talked about how this place probably has a lot of one time customers who stay at the nearby hotels or maybe even some of the people who live near the waterfront area. I can't see anyone really wanting to go back to this place for what they charge.
This KFc is the wirst. They would not let me pay for extra cheese. How stupid. I was told there's no button on the register. I even spoke to the manager Marco. I wont spend my money at this KFC ever again. Just plain rude.
So, I just stopped into this place after lunch while I was walking home with my baby from Candler Park and walked right back out. I was approached by a waiter who told me I had to leave my stroller outside when I asked about where to sit. My baby was asleep in the stroller and only 2 tables were taken in the restaurant leaving plenty of room for my stroller. For this restaurant to be in a "family friendly neighborhood" this place surely isn't. I didn't even get to try the food and just moved to the area. Anyway, Fellini's across the street was so accommodating and the staff was so nice nice even with a lot of business.
Horrible experience. Saw pete's dragon. Good movie. But the middle half of the screen was blue and the door to the theatre squeaked loudly every time it was opened. When I asked an employee to speak to management, he said how can I help you, I told him our experience and he made no effort to apologize or make up for this. I'm extremely upset and will not be seeing anymore movies here.
Was here this past weekend while staying in Fenway and was super excited at first when i learned the draft beers were $5.50 and mixed drinks were $6 on a Saturday night!  We were watching sports and ordering dinner and my turkey burger was dry and the sweet mashed potatoes I got downright sucked.  I had a bite and let the rest go to the trash.  They were burned and not good at all.  We were still having a decent time though until we were about to leave after paying and my friends saw mice running in the kitchen.  GROSS!  I will not be going back there.  Ever.
For my honest opinion I give this place a one star why? Every time I come the service here is notoriously slow it took a waitress over 20 minutes just to get our drinks after our drinks we waited another 30 minutes just to get our order in. After that our meal came 45 min after. I also ordered the chips and Guacamole after I specifically asked the waitress I wanted it as an appetizer she brought the appetizer with the meal!! I ordered a strawberry margarita frozen she brought it to me with an attitude and after I told her that the margarita tasted like water the manager comes in and tells me that next time when I order a drink I'm going to have to keep the drink because they normally don't return the drinks therefore I just call to go order I definitely do not recommend this place to no one if they're looking for slow shitty service...
Since I live in the neighborhood, I really want this place to succeed. Beautiful space. The 1/4 chicken portion was small. Who thinks rotisserie chicken is tastier than roasted chicken? Not me. Why not add fried chicken to the menu, too? The French fries were lame and the slice of bread reminded me of a slice of store bought white bred with a little something in it. And If I want water to drink, don't make me drink it from a tiny plastic cup. Roasted beets were good, but they looked like they came out of a can with a dollup of goat cheese on it.... I can do that! Also, the price point is not something I am willing to pay very often. The manager needs to have confidence and act like she owns the place. Granted, it was the first day they opened and I'll give it another chance.
Over priced Over rated. Nice place but you paying to stand in line and wait to sign up. Then it's hours away to play.
Very unprofessional owner , and some staff!!I do not recommend this place. I tried this place a few times, and I won't go there any more. My gel nail polish came off after a couple of days and they charged me again to fix it ! I do not recommend this place at all!!!
No cars left despite my reservation.  Sad customer service--National you're better than this!
I went for a state inspection, after calling ahead to ensure that could be done, and that it was a good time of that day for that (10AM).    It took about 55 minutes for the full blown inspection, even though no car was in front of me.  Since I value a speedy inspection, this will be my last visit to Dave's.
The bar service sucks at this place No arguing that fact  The servers the have are overly solid. Nothing against them. Just the downstairs service. I've been there 6 times, since it's so close to my new apartment. And 4 times I just waited for over 10 mins then one of two bartenders noticed me there after serving everyone around me. 2 other times I just walked out after being ignored by that bar staff (they "bar" don't pay attention at all)  As of yesterday I'm done with that place. Get some bar staff that knows what they are doing and that knows how to build a clientele with the neighborhood. Once that happens, I will return myself  Thanks
The food is OVER Priced and is not fresh and the portions are very small as the waiters are car salesman... the managers don't even care why your returning your food
I end up ordering at this place at 1230am late night for hamburger sub and their shetastic fried dough balls. The order got here relatively on time, but guess what?! it doesnt matter because they messed up the order so its gonna take another 10 years to have them remake it. I ordered my hamburger sub with no cheese because I'm lactoseintolerance. They gave me the sub with tons of cheese melted, gushing out of the sub. The fried dough balls.... let's find a good description for it.....it's more like rubber gumball/chewy jawbreaker. The store is closed now and i got nothing remade. might as well rob me!   I think it's really careless and inconsiderate to make food not taking food order specifications not to mention food allergies. This is a complete waste of money and time, might as well use the money i wasted and toss it into the ocean.    when people order food just make it right. you dont mess it up and deliver this bs to ppl and assume ppl to accpet it like petfood. eat it the way its served.   sick life. you'll never be compared to any other restaurant. not even on the BK rank.
This place will destroy your faith in the human spirit and simple, social conventions like promises. Caliber pledges to complete an estimate by Tuesday; plan on receiving it on Friday. When vandals apparently scratched my car's hood, Caliber didn't detect it until delivering my car back to me. That delayed the return of my car by an additional two days -- after having gone without for nearly two weeks.  The bodywork on the car was fine. Caliber's customer service, however, needs steep improvement.
Terrible food. The salad is definitely not worth $10. Tried macaroni and cheese, and the clam chowder. Both tasted like they were out of a bag. Won't be returning.
Extremely overpriced because it is one of the only hotels on this side of town.  I stayed for a conference and had multiple issues with our air conditioning that they wouldn't fix and they didn't have additional rooms they could switch us to.  I emailed the hotel and didn't get a response back.  The benefits are it's right on Green line of the T and within walking distance of Fenway.  I would try to look into other options if you are in the area.
I wish I could give this restaurant zero stars, but unfortunately Yelp won't let me. I am drafting this review on the toilet (for the second time this evening), as Texas de Brazil gave me food poisoning. This place is a total rip off. Not only is their food ridiculously over-salted, so you'll drink more and eat less, but it tastes even worse coming back up! Most of the beef that came by was overcooked as well. I wish I would've taken my $50 and gone to a nice steakhouse where I could've had the exact cut of meat I wanted, cooked the way I wanted without so much salt!
I went there last night...we were outside on the patio, good view and ambiance, good food but so many Rats running around .. after a woman started to scream, I left !! It is not at all acceptable having rats in a dining area!
First off my family and I have been going to different Kobe establishments for years. We've always loved the food and showmanship that is provided. The first and last time I visit this particular location was by far the worst experience I've ever had. I went with friends and family for my birthday. We had reservations and still waited about 40 minutes to get sat.  After we were sat, I had about two sips of my cocktail from the bar left, and my boyfriend had already finished his beer, yet every other person at the table was asked what they wanted to drink except us. We were the only 20 something year olds, while the rest of our group was in their 40's. Salad and soup was already served and food was starting to be prepared before we could get our servers attention to bring us a couple glasses of water. The moment we had his attention we also asked for him to. bring us the check instead of separating it. As a server I know I would rather bring one check to one person rather than spilt it four ways. Half way through my meal I ran out of water and wanted a refill. Our server was no where to be found, and I was tempted to simply walk to the server station behind us and get it myself. Finally (after I was unable to eat any of my steak because I was so thirsty) the server came around and offered refills to the rest of our group, and then passed right by me even though I was trying to flag him down. He made eye contact with me and then looked away as if he didn't see me. I was obviously upset by this considering it was my birthday dinner and I couldn't even eat because I was too thirsty. He came back with the rest of our groups refills and I tried once again to get his attention, and he once again ignored me. I ate the rest of my meal upset and thirsty.  Finally it was time for our checks to be brought, and instead of one check like we had asked for he brought every couple a separate check. My boyfriend and I had to fight all of our guests for their checks, which could have been avoided if he had only listened to us the first time. I was left embarrassed, still thirsty, and upset. I've never had such terrible service. The food was good at least
Worst service ever of the 5 years I lived in ATX, and food wasn't even that great... there are better places for cajun food in Austin...
Worst service ever. Waiters could not care less, everything takes forever. I asked for a water and had to wait close to an hour. Watched numerous table that arrived after us get their food. When we Inquired the waiter said we should come on a Wednesday if we want better service cause it is slow then. (Not true by the way. The service is mostly always slow and inattentive) Not to mention he never once took initiative to check on us we had to flag him down every time. You'd think I would have learned with the water but when the food arrived they forgot the side of ranch, that was another three requests and 15 minutes later.  Go to roosters. Better in every way.
$17 for a thin sandwich and a drink?! It's not that good. Go down the street to Moxie for a sandwich 3 times the size (and it's not all bread, they pack on the fixins) and a better taste.   Sorry OSC, I tried. Just not worth it. And really surprising it's not. You sell a good game.
Honestly we had the worst Mexican food dinner we have ever experienced.   Waitress cheerful and quick...from there all downhill.   Ordered tableside to order Guacamole....waited and waited...then here comes a  big glob of guac in a bowl with the excuse that the new guy was slow and not used to making the guac...result was poor to fair tasting...and it was delivered at the same time as our meal.   Next the meal.  Super excited to see Chili Colorado ...  beef cubed in a spicy red sauce...what we got was completely dry chewy beef cubes with no seasoning or red sauce what so ever.   Just some kind of brown beef stew gravy with again no seasoning...no onion garlic or chili.    Server brought  check...said it would be faster for us to pay up front...she was busy.    On the way out to pay...repeatedly pushed aside by staff.   Daughter hated cuban sandwich...i had to agree...tasted off ...no box for us thank you Pros made.pretty.good tortillas ...not great but good  They have a lot of work to do
We had a long wait and there were a couple mix ups with the waiter - all totally acceptable. We love this restaurant and it wasn't a big deal.  The real problems started when the manager pulled up a chair at our table and wanted to talk to us about our experience. Again, I get it. However, she continued to probe us until everyone at our table got uncomfortable. Next, the waiter wasn't allowed to bring us our check because the manager was "bringing it over." We waited 45 minutes for the bill.  I love this place, but the manager made us so uncomfortable and I'm not sure we'll be back.
If I could rate this place 0 stars I would! How inconsistent and unprofessional! After reading several reviews, I decided to call and get more information. I was told that on Sundays I could just walk in and an appointment was not necessary. I "walked-in" at 5:10 and was told because I did not have an appointment that I could not be seen and that maybe I had a conversation problem! I asked to speak to a manager and the same woman who told me I had a conversation problem told me she was the manager. Aaawww man! The worst....don't beg people to take your money and go somewhere else!
DO NOT hire this bus company. They will rip you off. Christopher needs to learn how to run a business and he needs to learn about customer service. He took our money and left us stranded because he never showed up to pick us up. Completely unprofessional and rude!
I went there for the third time yesterday... Forgetting that each time I have gone, service at the bowling lanes is atrocious. My friend and I bowled a complete hour and not ONE SINGLE PERSON came up to ask us if we wanted drinks, food or anything. the people in the lane next to us had incredible service, but for some reason, no one wanted to come help us out. not even a glance over at us... we both wanted drinks and some food to snack on, and probably would have stayed even longer and payed for another hour if we had better service. You are not only missing out on revenue, but you're losing customers quickly. I like how convenient this location is to me, but I would rather go out of my way to Brunswick Zone because at least I know I will have consistent, and GOOD service. Again, this is my third time coming to this location, and each time, it was a hassle to get any type of service... I dont know if you are understaffed? they are not trained properly? either way, you should probably make a change. I would really like to come back and not have to basically beg for service. how ridiculous is that!? a full hour and not one "has anyone helped you?"... although it was blatantly clear, no one had... went to the pizza area just to get water... insane. really really frustrating. its such a great place, but with service this horrible, it is not worth it at all.
The food here is always good but the service is so bad it's not even worth the trip. They don't appreciate their customers and the host is always really rude. Loved this place but they have given me horrible service so many times and I will not keep spending my money here.
Prices have increased a lot in the last few months.  Prices use to be comparable to Red Cat but find that prices are a bit more now.   Not sure I would want to purchase unless it's during their sale in July or December.
Honestly disappointed in the entire experience today. This is my first time at this location but not to macaroni grill.   We decided on this a little bit later so it was an off peak time (around 1pm). The first impression was walking in to no one at the host stand or anyone else around. The bartender called out after a few minutes of just standing there looking around that someone will help us "soon". Eventually a woman who I could have assumed was the manager as she was dressed differently sat us.   We opened the menus to disgusting menus that have clearly not been cleaned, looked up and saw air vents and the ceiling to be completely covered in Black from not cleaning at all. So that seems to not be a priority for closing or they don't really care.   Our server took well over 5 min (closer to 10) to address our table and get us our drinks. It took so long between each visit by our server that we ate the entire bread before he could get drinks. He served one person her drinks but not the other 2 and upon asking for them ran back to get them. No one was ever checking on us and making us feel important. The server would check on the table next to us but not even turn around to ask if we were ok. Our drinks never got refilled. One of our group did the create your own pasta dish and 20 minutes AFTER we placed the order is when she got notified that they didn't have the pasta she ordered. TWENTY MINUTES!! When my ravioli dish came out the edges were dry and burnt. The whole experience was about 1.25 hours long (when there was only 2-3 other parties in the entire restaurant).     The only reason I gave 2 stars was because the garlic cream sauce was really good and they had good $2 mimosas.   I can honestly say I won't be back.
It took over 45 minutes to get my car once I arrived at the Sixt location in Orlando. Honestly, if the government wasn't paying for the car, I would have gone back to airport and rented from some other agency. There was one member of the staff who seemed like he just wanted to work on his spanish with the customer, completely disregarding the growing line of people. The staff were friendly, but it seemed clear that the process for renting a vehicle is cumbersome and not easy for the staff to understand intuitively. On the positive side, the vehicle was fine and the return was the complete opposite of the experience when I picked the car up. As far as the ambience is concerned, it had the appearance of a cheap disco and the music was really annoying. In my opinion, it doesn't have the appearance of a professional company and as it stands now, I won't be renting from Sixt again unless you can somehow reduce the 45+ minute wait time.
Lumineer's show.  The "HEB Lawn" area was so packed it was standing room only all the way to the back wall. There was no security monitoring the sole walkway at the back of the lawn, on which people were camping. Ingress and egress was impeded making for a very uncomfortable, and dangerous, situation. The situation was so bad I did not even stay for the show. Tickets were way oversold, in my opinion.
I have been living in the community of deep cove for 45 years. I find Buddhaful over priced and some of the staff extremely rude! Especially Maddy. It has turned me off going to have lunch or a smoothie at this place. Try another option in deep cove before going here. #visciousvegans
Worst chipotle ever! Dirty, bad balance of ingredients, and bad flavor. How is this possible??? Also, this one doesn't sell beer. I shouldnt have eaten the burrito......
Oh life is too short for the exquisite tortures of Downtown Disney. Middle of the week in October and parking was a nightmare. I'd rather put a pencil in my eye...  Went to the Ghirardelli store. LOVE the original in San Fran. This is like going to the SF version's closet with folks trying to exit the Titanic. The crowds were enough to make me confess anything. Wanted to go to the soda fountain, but gave up. Then went to the side just selling chocolate. I guess my competitive urges got the best of me. In reality, I could have just saved time, money, and blood pressure by going to a corner pharmacy chain to get the same thing.
The office ordered from here so to-go order quality was expected. Sandwich was soggy but edible. The fruit cup is nothing but honeydew and one piece of cantaloupe. Completely ridiculous. I expect mostly melon in a fruit cup if I'm ordering bar food, but this is unacceptable. This place couldn't even meet my already low expectations. No pickle included either! Cheapskates.  My co-workers also had issues with their orders. Turkey and Gouda sandwich with no gouda, Smoked turkey salad that had lunch meat thrown on top and was missing a hard boiled egg. Maybe check to make sure even the most basic components of each meal is included?
The only reason I gave this spot one star is because the staff was friendly.  If you want food that tastes like cardboard this is the place for you. I'm not sure if it's pre-made, or they don't know how to turn the grills on or what. If you want food that tastes like food move on.
Waited for an hour even with appointment! Doctor was kind of rude and unprofessional. Never suggest this place for eye exam or prescriptions
Called ahead and asked if they could rotate the tires on my Pilot, said they could.  After they changed my oil they let me know the could not rotate my tires but graciously would not charge me for it.  Unbelievable...
This place is horrible - got a French manicure and it was so uneven and messy, I may as we'll have done it myself with a blindfold on (it would probably look better). I asked the nail tech if she could please fix it and she made up an excuse and blamed it on me. I would give them zero stars if I could. DO NOT WASTE YOUR MONEY HERE
Horrible. * 40 minute wait. No big deal. Friday night.. Is Atlanta.. NBA Final on.  * Took 15 minutes for server to assist us. * 15 Minutes to get drinks * 30 Minutes to get wings * Beer Warm. First one and second one. Didn't drink either.  * Homeless people coming inside to beg for food and money * Restaurant visibly understaff  * Patrons sitting there not consuming and just watching game.
When I made an appointment as a new patient, the office manager told me that she would call my dental surgeon and general dentist to get the x-ray. I called three weeks later to make sure the x-ray has arrived before my appointment. The first worker in the office told me they did not have the x-ray. I was transferred to the office manager. Again the office manager told me they did not have my x-ray because my two dentists won't send the x-ray. I asked why nobody called me to notify me of the problem. The office manager said it was patient's responsibility to secure the x-ray. I told her that I had no problem with that if I had been informed. At that time, the office manager asked me to give her my two dentists' names and phone numbers so she would call them again.   I was very surprised that the office did not keep record of whom they contacted to get my x-ray. I asked the office manager why didn't they keep record of such thing. This is 10 minutes into the phone conversation, she told me they actually did receive the x-ray from my dental surgeon. I was even more surprised and I told her that they really should check my record before they told me (the office worker and the office manager) that my dentists won't send x-ray. The office manager told me "We are not the doctor and we do not see these things. And I am sorry you have such high expectation of us".   I would think they can see if there is x-ray or not in my file and expecting someone to do her job is not high expectation. This encounter left me speechless. I cancelled my appointment and asked if Dr. Rigby can call me so I can explain to him why he lost me as a new patient. The office manager told me Dr. Rigby does not make personal phone calls. I had to explain to her this would not have been a personal phone call. It is related to the dentist's business. I offered to go to the office to wait to talk to Dr. Rigby since the office manager told me the dentist won't call. The office manager told me I would not be allowed to talk to the dentist even if I stop by the office.   This is just extremely unbelievable with how I was handled!!
Good food. Full of UFC douchebags though. Very VERY choked that they wouldn't even book a reservation for my husband's surprise 30th birthday. I booked at St. James' Well where they actually threw me a bone and took care of it. Its good for lunch or a beer after work, but I would never go back for an event or anything that involved any work on their part. meh.
we have been to at least 7 different ale houses while traveling. The international drive location is sub par to the others. our server Luis seemed like he didn't want to be there this day. also I asked the person in charge of our area to put a fishing show on the tv near our table. there are mounted fish all around the place after all. he put on golf and came over to see if that is what I wanted I said no that's not fishing and golf stayed on the whole time we ate. my wife unwrapped her silverware and it was dirty, now the food.  we love the osso bocco this time it was over cooked and hard Luis did come and ask if it was ok we said fine because we had a plane to catch. I will go back but not to this location
the food cannot be catogorized as asian food. Worst ever. Bad&slow service and definitly overprice
Fake "mexican" food (again, picture me making air quotes), made by underpaid white people.  It's trying to be an upscale version of taco bell.  Totally gross.
I'm a fairly frequent traveler and have used parking spot the last dozen or so times. Every time I fly back in the evening (usually arrive around 7:30) there is a long wait to get picked up. The other companies have shuttles non stop - often multiple coming before the next PS shuttle. I'm done.
Not impressed. It took over an hour from sitting down and having our food brought to us. For an uncrowned restaurant on a Monday night, an hour seemed too long to wait.   Food was decent, but nothing special at all.  I had the bolognese with the toughest short rib meat I've ever had. Otherwise it was ok. BF had a steak, which was good, but it's accompanying potatoes and brussel sprouts had the life cooked out of them.   The shining star of the evening was the Orange olive oil cake. It was a little dry, but very tasty.   Bottom line is that we could have gone to Mandolas and spent half the cost, waited half the time and had much better food. Sad.
Dosa was good but extremely poor service. The folks were totally dis-organized. I don't know how  restaurants like these survive or get good ratings at yelp, tells me something not right with the ratings.  It took them 30 mins to get me Dosa. I also ordered some curry to go and after I was done with my food, it took them another 10 minutes to get the curry. Next time, I will try the new Dosa factory 2 blocks away.
My friends and I went here on New Years Eve and it was extremely below average. The tickets were over $60 a person which was already ridiculous but we did not get the party that we paid for at all. The food was disgusting and there were very little options, especially if you don't eat meat. The buffet was gone in under 15 minutes there was not nearly enough food as there should have bee. There also was not enough bartenders on staff and my boyfriend and I had to wait 10+ minutes just to get a drink. They really need to hire more bartenders to serve their customers because waiting that long for a drink is unacceptable. I would not tell anyone to go here to celebrate New Years Eve.
This place was great! Servers were nice and they had games like Jenna and Scramble to bring to your table. The reason I knocked off 3 stars is because my ice cream tasted like ice with chocolate chips in it, I was uber disappointed. Unfortunately since that was the main attraction, I don't think I'll be coming here again. I enjoy the concept though.
Horrible job all around. I paid for the full service which includes car wash, vacuuming, and wipe down of the interior. The automatic car wash was short. After I exited and pulled up at the vacuum spot I found that there was still soap on the back of my car. I asked the employee near the vacuums if they could wash it off and instead of using water he just dried it with a towel, leaving soap residue.   Three attendants then sprayed EVERY INCH of my interior with a bottle of light blue cleaning liquid: Leather seats, windows, dashboard, stereo electronics, floors, door jams, etc. Each worker had one cloth they used for all of their work, meaning that the seats are wiped with the same towel as your floor mats, windows, doors, exterior, etc. The insides of the door jams were wiped and then that grime was spread all over my car. My car was vacuumed without removing any of the floor mats. Therefore, I think you can guess what kind of job was done. My WeatherTech floor mats were left with PUDDLES of the mystery cleaner fluid on them.   I was charged for a mid-size vehicle because I have a compact SUV with a third row. However, my third row windows were not washed -- so what did I pay extra for?? Despite spraying the entire vehicle with the cleaning fluid the workers failed to wipe off a light streak of mud from a shoe that touched the inside of the driver's door.   To top it all off one of the workers caught his cleaning cloth on my SUV's rear window wiper and pulled the arm off - not the blade but the arm that holds the blade. I saw him do it and then look around nervously as he couldn't get it back on. When he indicated the car was done I went to inspect the wiper and found that he hadn't attached it back on and it was only being held by the pressure of the spring mechanism. If I had driven away like this and then used the wiper the arm would have come lose and become lost - a costly replacement I'm sure.   I left wondering what the hell the fluid was that was still shiny on my seats and still puddled on my mats. It didn't even have a pleasant cleaner scent. I'm concerned that it's application on leather seats may be damaging. I really wish I had never entered this car wash. I will never be back.
Best location for the patio- amazing view of the bay itself. But the food just kills the view.   I ordered a salmon benny and my friend ordered a burger. The bread for the benny was falling apart as I tried to slice through it. Literally falling into bread crumbs! First time ever happened. The sauce they put on the egg didn't taste good at all. Had to scrap off and only had the egg & salmon. Salmon was in ultra thin pieces, which you can see through the pieces under the sunny daylight. The dish also came with a lot of fruits and few hash browns.   My friend also ordered an Irish Coffee ($9) which didn't come with baileys. The additional bailey shot (another $9) didn't add much score to the odd taste.    The server dropped the fries while bringing two burgers to another table and asked a rhetorical question: You probably wanted fries with those, right? Luckily didn't happen on my table. Having to wait longer for fries would probably make me bang my head on the wall.   We came here an hour before the ferry trip. But our food came 35+ minutes after ordering. Took 15+ minutes to get the bill. It wasn't during a busy period at all, around 5-6 tables of less than 4 per table?   Needless to say, we missed our ferry. But luckily we didn't buy the tickets ahead of time.
HORRIBLY unethical. There was a billing error with one of my son's insurance. I talked to multiple people at the office who insisted that they did not make the mistake. Not only did they CANCEL both of my children's appointments but my other child (without a billing error) with special needs needs follow up on a procedure they performed. All over $50. I will never bring my children there ever again nor would I recommend it to anyone. How could they cancel appointments for children that are in need of dental attention?
Terrible service Servers walking around like zombies OR busy drinking their own coffee Coffee 4/5 stars - no refill unless you asked  Omelette - veggie. Potatoes, meh. Overfried. Eggs - rubbery. No seasoning. The cheese on top came off in a sheet of glop which I put aside Pancakes - only good was fluffy texture. They had an unnatural flavor, something very artificial and wrong in general  Almond French toast - no reminiscence of almond but cinnamon flavor good, sausage patty good per my 15 yo son, fried egg had hard yolks  Bathroom - dirty won't even go there The one in LO much better
nice trendy atmosphere,  BUT -- and this is after two successive visits -- incredibly poor and amateurish service...slow, inattentive,..had to desperately wave down waiter each time we needed something...First, sitting down, no one came for 10 minutes...after orders finally taken, 30 minutes before delivered...same need to wave down for a check, etc... Same treatment by different servers in each of two successive visits...WHERE DO THEY GET THESE PEOPLE? Sadly, finished with CL until new ownership or management.
I use to like this place but the last meal got me sick for a week. Avoid the pakoras like Ebola.
Meh. I've experienced better is dead on for Gigi's. I stopped in to grab a few cupcakes for Valentine's Day, and they weren't really impressive. If fact, they weren't even close to impressive.   The cake was dry and was lacking flavor, and I agree with one of the previous reviews that mentioned the amount of icing on these. Goodness!! As shameful as this is, I am the type of person who would grab a bite of icing out of the tub any day. It's by far my favorite part of most cakes and cupcakes, but oh my goodness. There was at least double the amount of icing needed to accommodate such a little cake. Aside from being entirely too much, the icing wasn't flavored well either.   I know there are tons of little cupcake bakeries popping up all over the place, so I'll be trying a different one the next time I need a treat.
TACKY AMBIANCE - POOR FOOD - POOR SERVICE  Although all 17 reviews thus far have been very positive (no 3-star, 2-star, or 1-star reviews), my GF and I had a poor experience which I relate below.  1. AMBIANCE - 2 STARS - Ernie's isn't at all quaint or charming. It has tacky things on the walls, and it's dark, depressing, and exceedingly cramped. It seats only 20 people, comprised of 12 people seated at tables and 8 people seated at the very tight counter.  In the table area, all of the tables are only 24 inches square, which provides far too little room to put food. There are only 3 tables for 2 people, and 3 tables abutting each other to seat a party of 6 people. Honestly, it's really much more of a place to get food to go, not a good place to sit and dine.  Indeed, this area is very uncomfortable, especially when other people come in just too order lunch to go. When this occurs, the commotion disturbs the peace of all the 12 seated patrons.  At the counter, the passageway behind the rotating stools is so narrow that you have to squeeze by sideways if you need to use the restroom.  2. OVERALL FOOD QUALITY - 2 STARS - I ate a Corned Beef Hash Omelet, Home Fries, and buttered Wheat Toast.  HASH OMELET - 1 STAR - The egg that enveloped the Hash tasted good, but the Hash itself tasted horrible and was inedible.  Pam, the Waitress/Owner, freely admitted that the Hash wasn't home-made, and I strongly suspect it came directly from a can, very similar to something made by Hormel. After just one bite, I scraped it away and ate nothing but the egg.  HOME FRIES - 2.5 STARS - Soft and tasteless.  The potatoes had been diced small, cooked soft inside and out (I'd have preferred a crispy outside) , but were almost tasteless. They had obviously been fried in tasteless Wesson Oil instead of a tasty oil such as bacon fat, no seasoning had been applied to the exterior, and no tasty additions like onions had been included.  WHEAT TOAST - 3.5 STARS - Standard fare bread. Nothing fancy or whole grain.  3. WAITRESS SERVICE - 2 STARS - Pam is definitely a nice woman with a nice personality, and I know she means well. However, her level of service needs to improve.  Pam placed my GF's pancake on my side of the cramped table, instead of on my GF's side. I believe that Pam did this because it was a convenient open spot. However, Pam could have easily spent a few seconds to rearrange the table slightly to make room for my GF's pancake on her own side. Instead, she left this task to us, which is more like a disservice than a service.  Also, when Pam brought us our first glasses of water, they came with ice. That was good. However, when Pam brought us our second glasses of water, they came with no ice. Instead, she asked us if we wanted ice by saying, "you don't need ice, do ya?" which was anything but the right thing to say or do.
Very noisy atmosphere and everything seems to be out of control. The burgers did not taste of good quality and had greasy buns. The bad dining room layout and design make the noise level almost hard to stand. They need to have all the employees running around take your order and get rid of the order at the counter process. They confused our order several times and consistently were apologizing to us and the tables around about "technical difficulties". They even give you vibrating wait coasters but they should just have flags with numbers on them because they serve no purpose. They need to get the concept right before opening to the public. I do not see this place doing well, it will be a one time event for most people.
Not the best place for Thai food... I ordered red curry with shrimp and chicken and it tasted too watered down. For $10, it came with only two pieces of shrimp and was small portion. I was hoping for a better experience because I've heard many good things about this place.
Placed order online for delivery, to be delivered to my work during my break. They called me but I missed the call (because I was at work). I called back, 7 times, but they would not answer. I waited 10 minutes and called again, and finally got an answer. They asked what apartment for delivery. I said its not an apt, is a business. She argued, I Google mapped, and that's an apartment building. No. It's not. Its kind of a famous landmark anyhow, but I'm certain about the address. Then she tells me they cant deliver because I didn't answer my phone to confirm the delivery. What????? Why does the restaurant participate in an online ordering and delivery app, if you have to use the phone anyway?
NIce space. Music is too loud, I couldn't hear myself talking. Coffee is bitter. Very expensive. Poor customer service. Unfriendly (hipster) atmosphere. No jack to plug my computer; chocolate croissant is a rip off, very little chocolate to be called a chocolate croissant or pain au chocolat. Chocolate should be set vertically & not horizontally (no need to go to France...check out some chocolate croissant pictures).This place is definitely a "Give me your money and get out." kinda of place.
AVOID AT ALL COST. A horrible experience with both service and food. We first walked in and the host did not even welcome us and wasn't showing much kindness when he led us to our table. Our waitress was as slow as a snail And we were her only table. They could of redeemed themselves with the food but the chicken was undercooked, salad wasn't fresh and the sandwiches looked like something you get from a bad bar restaurant. Best wishes to this place...
Unfortunately I cannot give Baraonda a great review. The service was horrible!  From the time we entered the door, to the hostess to the bar.  The staff was rude!  We even asked for the manager who had the same attitude.
Agero is the 3rd party company that my car insurance uses for their roadside assistance.  My stepson was in an accident last night and his car is probably totaled. It took this company 2 1/2 hours to get a tow truck to him.  Horrific service, I called 3 times to find out why they hadn't shown up yet.  The first time I called they said they didn't have the car or location info, which is bull because we gave it to them twice at this point. The next two times I called they just said "they have been dispatched and it will be 45 minutes....2 1/2 hours later they FINALLY showed up.  I filed a complaint with my insurance company and told them they need to use a different company for their roadside assistance.  I also told them about all the bad reviews they had online.  If they don't switch, I'll just call my own tow truck next time and hopefully my insurance company will reimburse me.  So much for paying extra for roadside assistance when its unreliable.
The subs are still *mostly* good.  Although when ordering "extra" pepper it would be nice if they realized that means just a few extra shakes instead of apparently opening the bottle and dumping it on.  Literally PILES and GLOBS of pepper on that sub, it was completely inedible.    I also had the experience of pulling into this location at the standard lunch hour and being totally cut-off and nearly crashed into by a woman one day who then pulled into the very front spot right in front of the door, but when she got out she walked towards the sidewalk on 117th.  When I got inside I mentioned it to the employee finishing our subs that this woman had taken a prime space and not come in and that her driving was reckless and rude.  The gal looked outside and said "Oh, thats the Owner.  She always parks there."  Uh... really?  Wow.  No consideration for your customers whatsoever... as management I have always made sure to leave those front spaces for customers and to be a little more courteous in my community.
We were recently in Columbus for a conference and wanted to try this restaurant for dinner. We arrived there early in the afternoon/evening and there was one other table seated in the dining room. From their yelp description we were led to believe we could get sandwiches. But when seated in the dining room there was a completely different menu. When we asked about the sandwiches we were told we needed to go to the TAP room.  They would NOT allow us to eat in the dining room. Now the food comes from the same kitchen and the TAP room was full. So they just lost business for the evening.  Too bad... we were all on expense accounts...
I will not return. The injera is terribly disappointing and the rest of the food doesn't make up for it.  I brought two friends here telling them how yummy Ethiopian food is, only to say after "Please don't judge Ethiopian food on this."
This is a long story I've cut very short and updated on August 24, 2011, 14 months after my treatment at Select Physical Therapy.  I visited Select Physical Therapy with a hand injury that was made much worse after my 2 visits with them.  My 1st visit was at the Austin Center Blvd location and my 2nd visit was at the Medical Parkway location.    In retrospect, before I had my first appointment, my injury was quickly healing on its own and my symptoms were very minor compared to now.  But I asked Select Physical Therapy if they were right for me since I was concerned about healing completely.  The therapist said "yes."  Things I needed to get done in my life were coming up soon and I figured faster healing would also be a plus if done carefully.    Briefly stated, I strictly followed home exercises that were given to me, but they have severely injured my hand and deeply traumatized my life much more than I can say here.  I communicated to their therapist that the exercise was painful, yet she encouraged me to continue them saying this is normal.  My hand is now completely unusable as even slight movements send excruciating pain, burning into my fingers  It has been 1 since 1 year since this appointment  and my hand is still very painful even after light work.   Though highly recommended by the manager at the Austin Center Blvd location, my appointment at the Medical Parkway location was truly uncomfortable and further damaging.  When I attempted the exercises given to me at Medical Parkway, that was the last straw for my hand.  About 5 seconds of this therapeutic exercise at my home ended with cumulative damage that had been done to my hand from the 1st appointment and I was on my own after that.  My 2nd therapist tried to defend my 1st therapist, at which I interrupted her and she appeared to change her position. She then said she had actually counseled the Jr. therapist.  I hope this positively helps their organizatiron, though I've certainly had no healing from this.  As of June 2010, I injured my right hand also shortly after my treatment at Select Physical Therapy.  This was done one month after my treatment as I wasn't able to use my left hand for several months.  As of now, after a required surgery and a stay at a psychiatric hospital, both my hands are still quite painful after light use, such as washing dishes or driving.
We were here for a wedding party tonight and the woman that works the front desk who refused to give us her name just forced us out yelling at us, telling us to " get the F**k out" and that " Jesus is going to save her someday and it doesn't f**king matter"  she told the bride to "step to her" like challenging her to punch her. Then locked us out of the hotel. Mind you this is all the first warning she is giving us, and we weren't even being out of control. All of us just standing around talking. A simple " We are closing this room, can you please go to your rooms" would have worked. This woman needs to be fired. I've never witnessed so much disrespect from a customer service employee ever.
It wasn't the worst I've had, and the flavour and toppings were decent, but I have to give two stars because it was not like snow shaved ice. The experience I had at Icepik was no different than what I've had at frozen yogurt places such as Yogenfrüz, Menchies, and Pinkberry. There was nothing that stood out, except for maybe the crowdedness of the place. Snow shaved ice should melt in your mouth and feel like eating snow, hence the name. However, as my friend pointed out, the shaved ice at Icepik feels like eating ice cream that has melted and been re-frozen: not disgusting, but not what you wanted and not what it should be.
Had the honour to be rejected as a customer tonight because an overweight asian guy saw fit to determine I appeared drunk...??  Been going there for 15 years plus - never seen someone as rude and confrontational as this guy.   Possibly a mixture of steroid use and excess pizza slices and donuts - don't know or care - will be going to the Cat and Fiddle from now on.
I am appalled by what happened at the restaurant on Saturday, the 29th of November 2014.  Having frequented Florentine Café many times before, my wife and I entered the restaurant to end the evening with cocktails.   We were not welcomed by anyone at the door, and proceeded to the bar. Unable to find a spot, we helped ourselves to an empty table opposite from the bar. There were many open tables and a number of occupied ones, and not being received by a hostess we seated ourselves.   Two minutes later a casually dressed waitress came to speak us. She merely said "you cannot sit here unless you want to eat something". Noticing her hostile attitude I immediately requested to speak to the manager to request of him to accommodate us. Having been to the restaurant a number of times I thought the manager would be understanding to accommodate us for two cocktails before we leave.  To our utter detriment and excruciating shock the manager came to our table and shouted "you can't drink here, get out, get out!". It was a caucasian male with dark hair and a beard, dressed in black pants and a black shirt.  Never has anything like this happened in my entire life, and at the very least I would like an apology from the waiter for embarrassing me in front of my wife and the other patrons.  If the person who came to chase us out of the restaurant is indeed the manager, I would urge the owners to find another one as such a level of inhumane conduct is no place for a restaurant.
My friend got there early and tried to get us a lane, and they said bowling was closed for a private party.  So, we decided to get on the list for a pool table, which there was an hour and half wait for.  When my boyfriend and I got there we couldn't get in because he was wearing workboots.  It was snowing out!  What do you expect men to wear on their feet in the snow?  There was a crowd of about 10 guys outside all with workboots on, on their cellphones, telling their friends they can't get in.  King's it is for bowling from now on!
Man after I wrote my online review the owner messaged me, not to apologize or ask if there was anything she could do to fix my experience but to make sure that I knew that the profile for Leepin Lizards on Yelp does state that they don't accept credit cards. Which, is true! But I thought that it was quite petty to point out that I should have known.
Not that bad but went there after they had opened and the Sushi was not ready... very odd. I have eaten at many Japanese places in the past and never have I seen a Japanese restaurant not have Sushi ready when open, 11:15 AM. Got the chicken over rice and veggies... not bad but a bit oily...had the dumplings and they were soggy. Ok was it cheap ... yes so I guess you get what you pay for. Too bad though as I and many friends go out as couples for Japanese food quite a bit and I don't think we will go here. So if they had Sushi I would have given three stars but when half your menu is unavailable when you are open that brings it down to two stars.
Not to sure about this place yet because I have only been in there like twice. The customer service is not all there like I thought it would be. It feels more like a Walmart marketplace store to me and that's my Opinion. The prices are a little high and I hate to say this but I had to talk myself in to even going inside this store. Yeah the building looks nice but the employees don't greet you like I thought they would. So please go inside and look for yourself.
We made it just before they closed at 7pm on a weekday. They were definitely in a rush to get people out. It wasn't too crowded. But I thought it was bad that they had ran out of stuff we didn't order like lemonade and coke but then when I ordered it they were out of okra to be fried. So I was disappointed! The cornbread you can pass on. It was dry and reminded me of that box cornbread mix from Martha White. The banana pudding they gave us free was gross; too sweet and taste mostly like bananas just mashed up. The fried fish whiting was cooked very well. The seasoning and batter used was good. Collard greens good. Potato salad was gross. Blackeyed peas were good.  Overall it was an experience and I would return for that fish.
HORRIBLE. We bought 2 passes with express passes. We went to 3 of the 8 haunted houses, they were all the same, they pushed the lines through without breaking up the groups so we saw where everyone was going to jump out and attempt to scare people. Nothing was scary because we knew what was coming. If they would give 15-30 seconds in between the groups so each group received the same experience it would have been okay. We then went to ride the mummy because the houses were lame and we got stuck on the mummy because it broke down. We received a ticket for one express pass, WE ALREADY BOUGHT EXPRESS PASSES, they didn't care. I've tried to contact the company for a refund or a partial refund because we left after being there for maybe 2 hours since it was super lame and they will not do anything for us. We use to go to Universal and Islands every year, we are from Denver, but we will not be returning because of this horrible customer service.
We ate here for lunch last Tuesday (5/5/2015) right when they opened in the afternoon. By the time our food came out, everyone seated around us had already eaten their lunches and departed. It was sadly no surprise that when we did get our food, it was cold.   My burger at least tasted good, but my husbands "crispy chicken" was bland. Our server always rushed by our table and seemed in a hurry if she did stop to ask us how everything was.   For some reason the manager seemed enthralled with talking to the table next to us but never checked in with us personally. We left a detailed comment card but never heard anything from it. Easily our most disappointing meal during our honeymoon at Disney.  They get one star because my tropical drink was at least good.
The first time I went here was with my friend. I got a Shellac. The lady clipped my cuticles too deep and I started to bleed. Other than that, I liked the overall result until about 3 days later. My nails don't grow fast so I know it wasn't me who was making the nails look old. My thumb started to have brownish cracking at the tip of it and then my middle finger. I didn't know what was causing it and hoped it was just my polish and not my real nail. Thank God it wasn't. 2/5 stars for this visit.  I continued to go to another place for a Shellac manicure. My nails were growing beautiful and strong, the manicures were flawless and last atleast 2 1/2 weeks.  Last week, my boyfriend took me out for a birthday morning run, whoop whoop lol! He took me to Z Nails to get a Shellac manicure. Although I vowed not to go here again, it was his treat & I didn't wanna make him feel like he made a bad choice . We walked in a little after it opened. We said we wanted Shellac & regular manicure clean up for him. The lady at 6 took me and started on my nails. I was hesitant. It was other workers in there and about. 2 customers getting pedis. One of the male workers walked in and my boyfriend asked could he do his manicure since it was no one waiting but him. He rudely said "I dnt do men nails" like wtf? Okaayy. It's literally cleaning up his cuticles and filing his nails down, but anyways. 3 minutes passed, another worker a lady came in. My bf asked her could she take him, she said no bcus she already had an appointment. Understandably but also rude mannered. Mind you, the only reason he's asking is bcus we were on a time limit before we left for our next spot. Anyways, the lady is still working on my nails, almost finished when some random customer walked in. She said she wanted to get whatever done to her nails. That is when the lady who so called had an appt. told her she could take her. Wtf? To say the least, we were pissed! So finally the lady is finished with me. My boyfriend gets in the chair. She starts to do his nails and before he gets his cuticles clipped, I see her wiped my clippings off and start in on his. I was disgusted. I told her could she get another one before she looked up, she nipped him and he started to bleed. Like so nasty, they are not practicing good infection control in that place.  At this point, we paid and left feeling not so satisfied. As of a few days after, his nails are starting to chip and are becoming brittle. My Shellac manicure is horrible! Once again I have the same problems, brown cracks, chipping polish, lacking luster commonly associated with this polish. I just dnt like this salon. I've had more than enough times to judge them and my opinion remains. Don't go here!   I know you are all wondering, lol, yes I had a wonderful birthday. Haha
Food is good but they have no consideration  for your time. Waiter was extremely rude. Told us that it was going to be up to an hour. When we checked on our order at one hour he said it was going to be another 20 minutes. We ordered appetizers and they never came out. Waiter said "oh we'll it is what it is". Don't go here unless you have 2-3 hours to burn!!!
I went to Salle  to look at their glasses.  I paid $80 for an exam.  Dr Kornman was ok but nothing special.  The computers were down and they said they did not have the means to give me a copy of the prescription but asked me to pay for it which I did on a paper credit card slip.  Not sure why they could not give me a written prescription but they said their printer was down and it would have been nice to know this before agreeing to the exam.   I was told they would email me a copy.  Several phone calls and three days later and no email with the script but they found time to send a photo of some glasses I might be interested in purchasing.  I called on Saturday to again ask for my prescription and spoke to Yvette who was very rude and hung up on me when I mentioned I did not think they understand customer service.  She offered no admission of their fault. They really do not understand customer service.   I will go elsewhere in the future.   Ms Kornman the optometrist should pay better attention to making sure the patient gets what they pay for and no apology makes them the last place I would recommend for glasses or eyecare in Atlanta.   Getting a copy of a prescription that I paid for should not be this difficult.  No excuse is acceptable.  Why would I spend thousands of dollars for glasses and get service that is worse than I can get at Walmart.  Attention to detail and customer service seem to be something this place is below average in their capacity to deliver.  Amateurs at customer service and I would say run like hell from a place that will hang up on you for speaking the truth.   At this point I will just go directly to Cartier for my new glasses.
Came here because they said it was the best Italian restaurant in town. Very disappointed the service was far from southern hospitality. Took about 5 min to get greeted from our server and when we got our entrees I had hair in my food !! Sever apologize and I think she was the Manager said sorry. No compensation or any other type of apology just a oops I'm sorry, here is your check.
Meh.  I was really excited to try this place after reading the reviews. There was a bit of a wait for brunch on Saturday, which was fine. We went and got a beer at the CBC across the way.   The decor inside is pretty cool. The space itself is very large. The menu was also pretty good. The food itself.....well........  I'll flat out admit, the fact I wasn't blown away like everyone else by Mamaleh's was because I've been to Zaftig's in Brookline. To date, they have the best Jewish food I've had. So it was hard not to compare the two. They were out of the meat knish, so I got the potato. I'm aware that a potato knish is not the most exciting thing, but it was severely underseasoned. I know how good knishes (even potato) can be, and mamaleh's completely missed. I also got the lox breakfast. For the price, I expected MUCH more. The quality itself was OK. Nothing to write home about, but the portions were small. I've had this same dish at a number of other places and usually leave full.  My wife got the "hot" pastrami sandwich. I put hot in quotes because it was cold when it arrived. Again, for $15 you would expect the sandwich come with fries, or a side or something. But no. The quality of the sandwich was OK again, but still nothing to write home about.  If this was the only Jewish deli I had ever been to, I would've liked it much more. But I know how good it can be, and Mamaleh's came close, but completely missed. They weren't so bad I wouldn't go back. I've had friends who enjoyed it quite a bit, but I'm definitely not running back or recommending it to any of my friends.
Fridays is a decent Resturant in terms the atmosphere an Décor but the food was horrible the cheese was burnt on my plate the chicken was dry an chewy I couldn't finish it, the silverware was cloudy an didn't look clean..I had to ask for plastic, the waitress was okay but the overall experience wasn't pleasant, I wouldn't return to dine there again.
I have gone here many times over a span of five years. I basically go here for convenience and it does "good enough" of cleaning my car exterior.  However I think it is time I move on to other car wash options. Today I received "The Works" car wash, which is the one option of the three I always choose. It's like "good, better, best" and this is the best wash you can purchase from them.  I had some dried up bird droppings on my windshield. Ran it through "The Works" and after the wash was competed, there were still a large amount of remnants. I went back to the front entrance and the employees didn't even bat an eye knowingly exactly why I came back for round two. They asked me to sign a piece of paper and allowed to receive "The Works" again. After the second run, there was still residue bird droppings left on my windshield.   At this point I had the revelation that they simply just don't do a good job. People get used to things, and I did here as well, but now it's time to move on... To cleaner washes.
If you or your children have allergies, I would not recommend this restaurant. They could have killed my mother. She is allergic to shrimp, crab and lobster. We ordered a scallop roll and when it came out, it did not look similar to the other times we had ordered it previously. They assured me it wasn't shellfish, knowing she was allergic as I had previously disclosed this to the waiter. Half way through eating it, I found a big piece of shrimp. We then had to go to the hospital. They insisted it was scallop when it clearly was not after the shrimp was found. In fact, the roll they brought out to us was nowhere to be found on the menu (some of the ingredients weren't listed anywhere on the menu). Since they seem to run out of ingredients a lot, they made up a roll to serve people after running out of a product. It's too dangerous to fool people and promise an ingredient is something that it's not. The lack of professionalism and honesty is why I'll never return, which is unfortunate because the food is really good. But if they can't keep up with supply chain and lie about what they serve you, it's too dangerous to try if you have severe food allergies.
Typically like this location but today the assistant manager had an attitude toward the guest in front of me and with a line 7 people waiting, moved slower than needed as if to be rude to them on purpose. Desiree was her name. Only noting in order to possibly help fix that going forward.
Had high hopes for this place, but these guys are like really pushy car salesman, asking too many questions. Couldn't just look around.
Long wait, small plate, food was blah. Will not be coming back too many options around the area. No rice or chicken shwarma. Price wise I'd get chipotle with guac 10 out of ten times instead of chicken with some bean soup and a couple pieces of lettuce with dressing.
Canned olives and flat flavor for everything else.  I did like the crust, but the toppings weren't worth the price.  When I can taste metal in the olives, something is wrong.  They use canned ingredients.  Massively disappointing.
There is nothing "Chill" about this place.  I rename it, "Snobby Winston".  Nevermind trying to get a seat (they are all taken by several "Reserved" paper signs) and no people, try to get an ounce of attention from the bartender if you are a female.  Near impossible that night.  After much begging and puppy dog eyes, I finally got to order a red wine of his choice.  He the proceeded to give me an oxidized wine which I immediately gave back, it was so horrid.  I thought it was just the smell.  Without apologizing, he gave me another glass of a different red wine which was equally horrid but probably opened within the last 48 hours, so that was a plus.  He asked me if I liked it, of course I told the truth (that I didn't, in a nice way).  He threw it out, told me that I didn't want wine that night and wouldn't serve me.  Guess I wasn't going to drink that after all?  Can I order something else without you taking it away?  Never been to a place where it's so difficult to buy booze.
So disappointed in customer service.   Was excited to meet Jamie and called and text to her following cut and color and no reply or call back.  Paid full price for cut and had to find a new stylist at another salon to shorten the length a little.
Why do I keep coming back? I guess it's because I love Thai food (even painfully boring Thai food) and I'm lazy (this is my 'hood). I would rate Beau Thai one star, but it gets two for the cutesy, creative name and the fact that I keep coming back for mediocrity.  I ALWAYS order the Pad Thai and I'm ALWAYS disappointed. It just lacks flavor. It does come with peanut sauce and that's not always a given with Pad Thai, so I guess that detail helps Beau Thai keep its two stars. But don't be lazy like me. You can do so much better for Thai.
Depends what you order.  Not a hot lobster that's for sure. Beer and steamed shellfish? Sure. Nice atmosphere.
Skip this place.  We went in on a Sunday night for a peaceful bite to eat.  But there was a small party or people partying like crazy across the room, and yelling and swearing at the top of their lungs.   While our server was nice, she acted like it was not her job to control the noise.   The whole experience was so unpleasant that we just walked out.   There is no way in heck that we have to go in there and listen to this behaviour when we are simply trying to give them business and have a nice time ourselves.  I heard talk of this one guy being some kind of regular.  If that's what the boss, manager or owner wants in his establishment, there are tons of other places for us to take our business. And we were regulars ourselves....   but no more.
The scenery and the attractions are on point. The place is amazing, and when you first walk in you will be blown away. I do hate that you can't access The Wizarding World of Harry Potter, but that's understandable, especially with the amount of alcohol that's flowing during this event.  The reason I'm only giving this two stars is how unfortunate the tickets are set up. If you don't get a fast pass, don't bother going.  We went on a THURSDAY at the beginning of October (nearly a month before Halloween). After paying nearly $100 per ticket, none of us wanted to pay the extra for fast pass figuring "we'll just go do the most popular stuff first, and deal with the lines." -- That's not how it works. If you don't get a fast pass, be prepared to feel like you've wasted your money. Out of our six hours in the park, I'd say we spent four of those waiting in line, fifteen minutes in attractions, and the rest of the time just wandering around drinking and admiring the scenery.  I should also note that there are so many people waiting to get in to attractions, that often the actors don't have time to reset the positions before the next group comes through, so you end up having certain "scenes" spoiled for you, and rarely end up getting scared.  I know the park is a huge business out to make money, but I can't help but feel like I was taken advantage of. What a let down.
Disappointing. After hearing a few friends rave about it and waiting patiently as the impressive crowds filed through, my expectations were pretty high. Then came the limp waffle with a few thimblefuls of fruit on top (I miss you Soundbites); I could count the amount of french fries on my son's plate (and it's not like they were steak fries); and the coffee was lukewarm and bitter. Top this all off with slow, irritable service and I doubt I'll give this place another chance. Given all the good reviews, I'm sure my experience was out of the norm, but when I want a great breakfast, I don't like to take chances.
Ordinarily, I don't review restaurants, but I feel compelled to do so for this place.  I was here in early December, and had a salmon dish, with some miso soup (it came with coconut jasmine rice, and my husband and I ordered chicken fried rice to share).  We ate at 6:30pm; later that night I went to McDonald's outside Downtown Disney (at about 11:30pm), and the next day I was VIOLENTLY ill.  Let's just say there was strong evidence this place was the problem (although I will be posting a review on the McDonald's location too, and I reported both places to the local health department).  Although I cannot say with 100% certainty that this meal was the culprit, I can say that because we had reservations at closing (and I don't understand why they allow this), we were treated as an after thought.  They were clearing tables all around us, and rushing us through the courses.  Ordinarily, this doesn't really bother me, but in combination with the violent illness, I can definitely see the kitchen staff wanting to get the heck home asap (again, why do they schedule people at & after closing???).  It took 2 full days of my vacation to recover.  I do not recommend risking this restaurant.
Went in at 9:22pm and was told that I could only do take out. There was only one person seated who was eating. The sign said they closed for 10pm.  Not good business if they turn people away because they don't feel like staying a little late to clean. My girlfriend and I only planned on getting a small pizza because we were hungry and wanted to be out of the cold. We will not be trying this place again.
I have one simple but important complaint. They have a tendency to run out of food at night. I just went there and they told me they were out of burgers. All they had was chicken and no lettuce. That's beyond horrible for a restaurant called Burger King. Skip this place. Don't go here.
This was first time eating here. I did carryout because I was on a short lunch break (I ordered online in advance). I waited around for 15 minutes before anyone even came to the counter where other takeout customers were also waiting.   The kitchen seemed well staffed, but the front of house seemed severely understaffed. There were 2 servers total (lunch rush). Each server came to grab something from the front counter but they never acknowledged any of us waiting, not even a smile or hello.   Finally someone came out with some orders. The woman in front of me had an incorrect order. The cashier seemed confused and walked back to the kitchen to see what happened. The woman seemed to have been waiting for a long time. She was so irritated she just left.   When I finally got my food, I got back to my office and the salad from my order was missing.   The food was decent, but this place needs some major work/training for front of house staff.
If you want to have gut wrenching, well, gut pain for your entire flight, definitely eat here before boarding. 7 hours later, still waiting for whatever this is to pass. the food didn't taste great on the way in either.
WORST CUSTOMER SERVICE EVER. I wish I could give it a lower score. I have eaten at this location several times. My past trips the food was average. This past week I ordered food to go. When I picked up my order I came home and discovered the order did not contain the chicken or ribs, just the sides. My wife called back and an employee said to come back for the food and I would also receive a refund. The employee said it was their responsibility to heck the food. When I arrived back at restaurant the manager said I could wait for them to recook my order or get a refund, but not both. I informed her an employee said we would get both she said she did not say this and she was the manager. WORST CUSTOMER SERVICE EVER. So two trips to that shopping center at rush hour and no food. Thank GOD the Krog Market down the street from our house was able to give me the food I ordered. I will never eat at Shanes again. And no one else should either.
Owner seems nice but very disorganized. Lost my paperwork, never called me with updates, had to keep calling him myself even after the car was finished. Work they did was ok, but it took them way too long. I wouldn't go back there.
The absolute worst service ever! The most incompetent employee ever! Took my vehicle in for a hitch instal with wiring for the brake likes and signals on my trailer and they almost got me killed. They failed to connect a wire that engages the trailer brakes and the trailer shoved my vehicle into the middle of an intersection. They have rewired the whole thing twice and the barkes lights and signals just stay on even if my vehicle is turned off. Went to the one here in Round Rock and they refused ti help me and said take it back to the Burnet store.
I am Irish born, bred and educated. This place has nothing to do with the Irish except for a some posters and limited Irish menu items. Worst of all, it allows smoking which is not allowed in any pub or restaurant in Ireland. The place stinks with cigarette smoke.   I ventured in here whan I was staying nearby at an Atlanta airport hotel. I was going to eat here but the smell put me off and I didn't want to feel that I was eating out of an ashtray. No wonder the place was empty. I am surprized that it is still in business. Go across the street to Ruby Tuesdays which is smoke free and is much, much cheaper beer and food wise.  John Byrne
Just sat at the bar at Bonchon for 10 minutes with employees checking out the first aid kit...no service...chicken is awesome but is clear why the place is empty.
What a rip-off. $10.00 for parking, another $ 11.00 entrance fee( 7 for me, 4 for my son.)  Since when do carnivals charge entrance fees?  Only went to play games( son does not like the rides) . 3 tokens avg per game( $1.00 per token). $3.00 for a small snow cone, $4.00 for a tart candy apple. We were going to get a cotton candy but at 6 tokens(6.00 a gab- said he** no. I should have said that about that whole evening and gone to the Dell Diamond carnival instead( did not know it was in town).  Lesson learned, never again. Spent a totoal of $53.00-Heres what we were abble to do: parking, entrance fee, 7 games, 1 small tart candy apple and one samll snow cone.  Save your money.
Worst Starbucks in 10 miles!  It's always dirty, there's no place to park, Baristas are extremely rude and self entitled, the drive through takes like 30 minutes and the lines inside are even worse! Did I mention it's always dirty? Employees never clean a table I know guests should clean after themselves but if a table is already dirty, they should at least wipe it down once a day. Trash is always full (I guess cleanup happens once a day) and there's never enough straws or napkins. Honestly it's a waste of a perfect spot, it's super cozy and nice but service, cleanliness, timing and temperature makes it the worse. Go to the mall, the movie theater or 3 miles north or east and save yourself the stress.
This is about event planning at the hotel, not staying there as a guest.  I went to a great event at Nine Zero a few years ago and thought it could be the perfect place for a fundraiser we were planning.  I emailed the person in charge of special events and hadn't heard back from her after 12 days so I stopped by the hotel and asked to set up an appointment with her.  After we met and exchanged emails, I asked her what the next steps were/when we should meet.  She didn't write back for three weeks, and only then to tell us she had given our space away.  It was unfortunate. Oh well.  We've had great success planning events at Technique Restaurant and OM Restaurant and Lounge.  I've also heard great things about the State Room and Turner Fisheries Restaurant and Bar.  Their event planners are really warm and helpful and quick to respond.  Good luck!
Service: poor Atmosphere: poor, loud, messy People: impatient  Never again.
On a friends recommendation we (party of 9) headed out on a rainy evening for some French cuisine. I guess my expectations were too high because the meal certainly fell flat for me. The presentation seemed sloppy and I had the worst seat at the table., The server kept leaning across me all night to serve to the person and the end of the table and not once did he say excuse me...NOT ONCE. Never even offered any fresh ground pepper. Awkward setup, with two rooms that are NOT joined....so we had to go outside and into the room next door to use the restrooms. The featured salad was the high light of the night with lots of dressing and huge chunks of bacon.
Like Lauren B. said, this was a horrible decision based on the weather, lack of other places nearby to walk to, and hunger. The hostess forgot about us/forgot to give us a beeper so we lost our first table. The waitress didn't come for about 10 minutes because we had drinks already and thought we were being taken care of. We didn't have knives on the table, but had 2 forks each.  My fries came out cold, they forgot a person's side order, messed up another person's order, and seemed like this was their first day. Scary thing was, though, that our waitress was training someone else who came up to us after the dessert and coffee were served (and still on our table) and she started to give us another table's dinner order.  I am not going back.
Their food is fantastic, some of the best Syrian (pita) bread I have ever had.  Unfortunately, their service is atrocious.  Expect delivery orders to take about an hour and a half or more.  Take out is equally as inefficient, as we've waited more than 30 minutes (on top of the 30 minutes they told us it would take).  They also very rarely get our orders right.  You wouldn't think that a Greek Salad could be messed up, but it almost always is.    I highly recommend the food, but only if you aren't in a hurry, and are fine receiving different food than you ordered.
Being cash only makes this place a hard sell. I happened by once when I did have some cash and found the donut toppings stale and tasteless. The donut part was good, but not enough for a return visit.
Taking 30-40 minutes every single time to deliver a sandwich right down the street is not even close to "freaky fast".   Update: This time it took over an hour to deliver my sandwich. I called to ask if it was on its way and they told me there was only one driver and hung up. If there is only one driver maybe the manager should have tried to have someone else cover or something. And also don't hang up on your customers when you are already delivering terrible service. If you can go to any Jimmy Johns do not choose this one!
From the moment I walked in, Christy only talked about her family's financial burden and health struggles. It was extremely awkward. She also had the appointment time wrong, so I had to wait 15 minutes for her to show up (open by appointment only). I went during the week for the summer special ($23 for a gel manicure) but was still charged $30. (She also charges $2 extra if you pay with a credit card instead of cash.) In terms of the actual manicure, it was pretty sloppy. She barely pushed back my cuticles, so the polish began peeling up after just a few days. There was a decent amount of polish on my skin that I had to take off afterwards. The place is very clean and she uses a new set of equipment on each customer, but overall, I was not impressed and I will definitely not be returning or recommending.
This place is spacious but so chaotic. They need more staff and more procedures. I like dave n busters much better!
The food was ok but the waiter we had was horrible! The worst service I have had in a very long time. We even spoke to management about it and they apologized and did absolutely nothing but send the same idiot waiter who (now had a lot of attitude) over to pay our bill.  I must say the other waiter in our section was awesome we just had the misfortune of having a incredibly bad waiter! The fact that management did nothing to try and make us happy is beyond me!  I work in the industry and always go above and beyond so I guess I expect the same when I go somewhere. It's to bad because it's has a pretty nice patio with fireplaces that our amazing. I will not go back to this place again.
VERY slow service, and I was one of the only people in the place. This location is close to my house so I go there, and almost always I walk away asking myself why didn't I go to another location. Wonderful renovation though...
This is my very first review ever but I wanted to warn other moms about the swim classes here.    I have a three year old son and no part of this has been a positive experience.  The pool is not set up to handle young children; my son slipped on their floor 5+ times in 15 minutes.  Although the classes can take up to three children, if one of them is not having a great day, there is no support to handle it. They should really only offer private classes if they are going to do classes at all. I have called multiple times to talk to someone about my challenges with our first real swim class and I've had to hunt people down, call several times and they still won't give me my money back. At best I'm getting a credit that I can use for another class that will expire in a few months. Needless to say: we do not want to go back and now I've just lost about $200. That money is a big deal to us. I've tried to handle this situation positively.  In short: parents pick somewhere else. They might be OK with 5+ year kids, but definitely not younger children.
I have been coming here for years and it's always the same self-serve service, nothing special. But my mom likes it here so I come with her. Today is the last time we'll be coming here thanks to the attached photo. How did you guys pass health inspection??
Mixed experiences, mostly negative. Have had 1 or 2 good meals here but in general SP has left a lot to be desired. Meal last night literally tasted purely of salt - amateur stuff. Ambitious food with poor execution is never a good mix.  Fine for a few pitchers/drinks - would go elsewhere to eat.
I ate at Hopdoddy on Congess.  The burger was good... just good.  Staff treated us like an number, as if we we're a complete waste of time.  The prices are high for what you get.  I would recommend going to Hopdoddy's but, not waiting in line to go to Hopdoddy's.  This is Austin... you could find a better burger, a more appreciative staff, and fairer price in a stones throw.
# To the Budget Traveler: FREE to go in if you see a show at the Velveeta room. Drinks are super cheap.  I went to the Velveeta Room, because I got a free ticket from Esther's Follies. Esther's Follies is the incredible comedy show and political satire next door. Perhaps I went on a poor night, but the Velveeta Room felt just average to me and the space was kind of small. Maybe after going to Esther's Follies and laughing until I couldn't breathe, the amateur comedians in the Velveeta room just couldn't beat Esther's Follies. Never the less I DO recommend this place if you go to Esther's follies. Take your FREE ticket and check out the comedian inside. If he/she is good then stay and have a drink. It would be a nice way to complete a night of music and comedy.   However, I went on a bad night and order a drink so I had to sit through several subpar comedians. If you come in with the free Esther's Follies ticket then don't order a drink right away, make sure that you like what you hear first. The space is also kind of small, so don't go there if you are not a big fan of small spaces.
Order online. Never got a confirmation. Waited around 10 minutes called restaurant to confirm order. First person who answer put my on hold, I asume had another person on line. Waited 15 minutes on the line and decided to hang up. Waited 10 more minutes called again, girl who answered after I told her I wanted to confirm my order that placed online told me they don't have that service. I told that yes they have and that I had already paid for my order, put me on hold to get a manager. The person who came to the phone ( by his tone of voice young male) answer the phone : " yeah , what happen?. I just started to laugh, couldn't believe what was happening. I thought maybe is just bend rough day for them, I used to work customer service so I understand. After I explain to him about my order he said that the order was already prepared and it was going to be delivered to my house. I got more confused because online said that they don't do delivery and I never told them my address. The answer that I got was :"I don't know, the pizza are here". The most amazing thing about this is that believe it or not ,I went to pick up the pizzas. I was craving this so much, the reviews and photos were very good that I went for it. Got to the counter to get my pizzas and yes my order was on the counter cold as ice. I requested if they can just heat them up a little for kids so they could eat in the car, they said no because the pizzas was already cut. I was so mad and upset, a million things running threw my mind on what to say and do. I just took a deep breath said:"It's ok, thank you". Took my pizzas walked out and threw them in the garbage. And for the cherry on the top I forgot that since I placed the order online I had already tipped $$ them.  :
Not impressed. Food selection was sparse for the price. Mongolian Grill was the best part of the food. Hot and Sour Soup was barely okay. The chili oil was pretty good though, and the iced tea was absolutely delicious.
We come here a lot and tonite has to be the worst service ever! I'm highly disappointed, everything seems very chaotic tonite and dis-functional . My daughter Mac and cheese came out cold. Our appetizer didn't come until 20 plus minutes after we ordered it... We have been here for an hour and 10 minutes ! This used to be out go to red robin  but the service here has gone down hill... I'm very disappointed especially as a loyal red robin fan
I had a terrible experience here. I went in alone (I.e.. without my husband) with my two toddler girls. The young woman at the counter said I could either sit on the side with full service or the side where I would order at the counter. I asked to sit in full service and for a high chair. She pointed to the back corner of the restaurant and said, "they are over there". I was carrying my 18 month old and had a 3 year old next to me. So I went to get my own high chair and as I'm walking back, she comes up to apologize. I assume it's for asking me to carry my own high chair, but it was because her manager said we could not sit on the side of the restaurant that had full service. She still didn't offer to help me with the high chair, and I put my two girls at a table while I went back up to the counter to order. The manager brought us our drinks and when I told him what happened he said, "he started t
This place blows. If you've ever wondered what happens if you do NOT make it to heaven, here is the answer. You have to spend eternity at Time Warner Cable!  I don't even have the care to take a pic for you readers out there. Let's just say...RUN!!!!!  And the one start, only bc Yelp doesn't allow 0-stars. Maybe consider the old school rabbit ears with aluminum foil. :)
DISHONEST SALESPEOPLE:  We purchased a pre-owned 2016 Honda CR-V, and did extensive research online prior to coming in to test drive it. The carfax report was clean, accident free, low mileage, only 1 previous owner (overall a great deal), and nowhere in the pictures or descriptions online did it mention or show damage to the exterior. When we test drove the vehicle, everything also looked new and clean, but it was raining, which may have glossed over the damage.   We picked the vehicle up two days later after the purchase and noticed a large scratch in the passenger rear along with a large dent (and when we looked back at the pictures online, we did notice a significant glare over the rear passenger door that made it difficult to see any damage). When we picked up the car, our salesperson disappeared, and his assistant just gave us the key and registration and told us we were all set. We requested a copy of the contracts we had signed during the purchase, and were told they would be sent to us in the mail within 30 days, even though we were initially told we would have the copies in hand when picking up the car. We left that day with the intention of taking it in to our trusted mechanic to ensure we weren't sold anything faulty, and to ask their advice on how to buff out the dent and scratch.   Unfortunately, our mechanic showed us that the dent was significant enough that it would let in air and water and would ultimately damage the interior, so required a door replacement. We brought it back to the dealer right away, demanded they replace the rear passenger door, provide us with a rental to drive in the mean time, and give us the copy of contracts signed that we should have already received.   Herb Chambers Sales Manager agreed to meet these requirements, as it was the right thing to do, but only after extensive interrogation and insinuations that we had done the damage ourselves, as nobody on their team "noticed" it before they sold it to us. Regardless of the fact that they are replacing the door free of cost, we should have never been sold a vehicle in this condition. What we thought was minor cosmetic damage was actually significant and required extensive repair, and it's a waste of our time to have to go through this when we were not informed of any damage during the sale. It was an extremely dishonest thing to do. What's more, our mechanic found evidence that they had tried to cover up the scratch with a Sharpie marker!   We were grossly taken advantage of during this sale, and we will never be taking our business back to this dealership. We hoped that at a larger dealership, they would have been more honest with us, but it's clear now why they tried to speed the sale and car pickup. I would never recommend this dealership to anyone.   If you are looking into any pre-owned vehicles here, look elsewhere, or demand inspection outside the dealership beforehand, because it's clear their mechanical team tried to cover up the damage. We are taking before pictures now, because we do not trust them to replace the door without damaging something else.   We feel very taken advantage of, and are extremely dissatisfied with their service.  UPDATE:  We were told our vehicle would be ready for pick up on Friday, 5/19, "mid-morning". We arrived at 3pm to be told our vehicle was not yet ready. We did not receive any phone call from the service center ahead of time indicating the vehicle was not ready, so it was a waste of our time to travel to the dealership during a heavy traffic hour. We returned the rental this afternoon with Enterprise, and they almost charged us $42.50 because the dealership also told them our vehicle would be ready by Friday and we would drop the rental off by Friday at noon. Thankfully, Enterprise seemed to be quite familiar with Herb Chamber Honda in Boston's incompetence and quickly reversed the charge and billed it to the dealership.   We have never been so frustrated and disappointed with a significant purchase, and we will never take our business here again. We would like our complaints addressed by having the corporate office do something to change the way business is done in the Honda Boston dealership. Check the reviews online; we are only one of many who have had difficulties with this particular dealership, and the General Manager does not respond to any negative reviews- he only responds to the positive. Again, we are extremely dissatisfied with our service and will never be doing business with Herb Chambers again.   If any further issues happen with this vehicle, we will be returning it and asking for a full refund, as this is simply not worth our time and frustration.
We love Black Sheep bakery goodies which we always get from Farmers Market which doesn't compare to our "almost brunch" experience. I said "almost" because it didn't happen.  We walked in there and the place was empty on Sunday morning. We looked at the menu and decided on Biscuits & Gravy. We ordered at the counter and the lady behind the counter told us that they don't have any cook that day. So we can't get Biscuits & Gravy.   Considering we drove all the way from SW to NE just to get Vegan biscuits & gravy, it was a disappointment. Lesson learned, call ahead and ask what they have available. I still don't understand how they can run a restaurant without a cook.
Another great Brighton neighborhood bar.  It's more locals than college kids.  They have live music on the weekends and this bar got a million times better with the no smoking rule.  The waitstaff is always friendly.  The food is often overcooked, but the steak tips are a good choice.  The mussels are great!  The outdoor patio outback is small but nice to grab a bite on a Saturday afternoon.
This is food for the brain, not for the palette. Intellectually stimulating, not sensual.
This was the first proper cupcakery that I had been too, despite being born and raised in Boston.  My friend and I stopped here on a whim and I found it to be more cute than good.  They had a crazy selection of cupcakes, which was awesome.  However, the cupcake that I got wasn't nearly as appeasing.  It reminded me of something I could get a Stop & Shop's bakery section.  The cake itself was a bit dry and there was way too much frosting on the top.  It was an absolute mess to eat.  We couldn't eat it inside because there was just not enough seating, but I think that if we could have it would have made less of a mess.  It's more cute than good, in my opinion.  There are much better cupcakeries out there in the city.  This one was a bit pricey as well.
Absolute worst customer service! Used these idiots for 9 years just bec. I didn't have the time to look elsewhere. What a HUGE mistake. Finally when it comes time to renew I get the run around. Felt like I was dealing with a used care salesman. Now I see why ADT has a 2* avg.   Is there a 0 star?
Used to be a go-to spot. The people who work there have changed. The woman at the counter always gets things wrong and claims it was you and not her. She always seems overwhelmed and bothered by the customer. The preparation and delivery take forever. I used to order from there all the time and now I try not order from there unless it's a last resort.
If you are looking for good tasting food that is cooked properly and served well, then this is not the place for you.  Not sure what has happened since they first opened other then the quality of the preparation and actual taste degrading severely.  Its really unfortunate that this place could not fill the void left behind by Cafe Luigis.  I would not waste your money or time on this place, the food is cheap and you barely get what you pay for.  Hopefully they will close down soon and give another a place a shot at serving decent Italian fare.  I realize this is a chain so I'm would be hesitant to try any of the other establishments.
I got french tip UV nails and they turned out okay. Kind of a sloppy job, left many spots uncovered and bubbles. The place smells really strong of nail polish, and the nail artist was kind of rude, she tried persuading me into getting something I didn't want so be careful with that. My nails were left way too short, the acrylic falling off my nail and really wide. I had called in about how much the nails were going to be an they said 20, but when I got there it turned out to be 35, I got nothing extra so I was pretty annoyed by that. My friend came and got her nails done also and her nail artist was really sweet but didn't do a good job either. I will never go back, not worth the 35$ at all.
We had Massey's 3 years ago, didn't like it then and decided to give a another try tonight.  I was not impressed with the $28.00 price but when it comes to a "quick dinner" you expect to pay more.  We can typicall get a meal from other places from $15-$20.  We ordered a MED pineapple/ham pizza and a pep/muchroom stromboli. Anyway, I was not impressed with the lack of sause, thin 1x5 in slices, limp pizza.  Every time I would pick up a piece, all of the pineapple would fall off!! Very annoying, the ham looked old and lacked taste.  The stromboli on the other hand was better.( I do not eat stromboli on a regular basis)  For $28.00 I'd expect lots of left overs.  There are maybe two pieces.(hard to tell what a piece is becuase they are cut soooo thin, like strips of bacon)  We'll stick to our Papa John's and splurge of Bellacino's
On 3/13/12 10:30pm  After telling my server my food order was incorrect  and missing my friends entire order cause the server forgot to punch it into the computer.   I was greeted by the door man who's first words to me where "Im the guy who beats people up and throws people out. What's the problem here".  After he said that  I was completely intimidated and scared to be there.  I was never rude or out of line with the server. It was very loud in the establishment due to the loud music. So I had to talk loud to the server.   Nothing ever got resolved I paid for my food I didn't even eat and left the establishment. I would never recommend going to Doc Feelgoods. Their door guy was totally out of line for what he did.   I tried to contact the owner and just got the run around.
What to do when your in Midtown Atlanta on a sunday nightt? Well if you can't find anything else then def hit up JR's it has your normal bar food (wings, burgers,salads etc) the beer selection is ok and they have a few tv's to watch the game.  The wings weren't that flavorful but after a few pitchers how much does it really matter.  The wait staff was very friendly and they do try really hard.
Convenient location for work, so likely I'll return.  Aside from that it's a simple tavern offering simple tavern food.   Folks were nice the place was good size and they had a nice patio area with lots of seating.
Dining floor area and bathrooms are disgusting, service was hit and miss with one couple waiting an hour to be served, and food was mediocre at best. I realize this is a fast food chain, however I was very dissapointed to see that my burgers looked like the scrapings off of the grill.  Not going back for sure!
Warm beer. Check. Expensive Beer. Check. Saltiest pizza I've ever had. Check.   That said - the bowling itself wasn't awful - but really I'm not quite sure how they could have messed that up. They have nice couches near the lanes with tables for your warm beer and salty pizza. Nice tv's above the lane display the score.  Also important to note parking in this area is difficult. I was there for a company outing. I go to Boston often, but if you are in this area during the week and there is no Sox game... It will be tough.   I wasn't impressed...
If you want to listen to teenagers brag about their sexual encounters the night before or listen to the relaxing sounds of speaker blaring rap music pump through the parking lots filled with crappy civics or the animalistic bikers that literally bark at you if happen to walk by them in anything but a snow suit then this beach is the place for you! (Sarcasm intensifies) Charming, clean and people sure are friendly! Unfortunately it's too convenient to let the general public stop people from going.
When I was young, I used to sell cookie dough as a fundraiser and I remember paying myself in the end just to eat a tub of it.  LOL.  So when I saw that there was a store for cookie dough, imagine how excited I was!  I probably was more hooked on sugar back when I was little because I got sick of eating it after three bites.  Although we ordered two flavors, we were able to finish the first cup but ended up throwing the other one away.  It was way too sweet to finish it.
I emailed Beckie as she requested on 5/15 as she requested to try to resolve my bad experience and as of today August 4, she has not emailed me back.  I will not ever visit this place again.
Copeland's. I love you. I hate you. Stop toying with my emotions.  Figure out your identity. You're supposed to be an upscale New Orleans restaurant started by the guy who has given us Popeye's Chicken (thank you!) but you keep flailing about trying to be something you're not. If you're not going to be a New Orleans restaurant, tell me so we can break up.  I love the Blackened Pork Laboucherie. Then it's off the menu. Then it's back on. Then off again. I'd take this over any steak on their menu, but I can't order it consistently.  I loved this location, but I haven't been back since they tried their nightclub thing. The last time I went with a group of friends, we waited forever for bad drinks (usually the drinks are great, the bartenders skilled) and when they arrived a DJ started to set up massive speakers and was working through a sound check. We paid for the undrinkable drinks and left before placing an order. Then we drove to the (now closed) North Point location.   Now you tease me again. I hear you have a lunch buffet. A friend and I were lamenting the loss of the North Point lunch buffet, and here you come teasing me again. Are you just going to break my heart again? Am I just going to step into it again, knowing I'll probably get hurt?
The food is normally pretty good; I like the good old fashioned spaghetti and meatballs, and enjoy the pizza (although the dough could be more like pizza dough) and normally enjoy the mozzarella stix.  However, tonight I got a pizza and stix, and was very disappointed.  The stix were made of some "version" of cheese, but it was the consistency of warm Brie - disgusting!  And then I realized there was a similar consistency to the cheese on the pizza.  All smooth and creamy.  I don't know what the heck they were using today, or if they plan on continuing to use this  nasty material.  I will need to find out before I ever order anything with cheese from them again!!
Pretty decent sushi actually. It's funny - I used to love sushi, but my taste buds have recently changed, and I now I really don't find them that appetizing. I only discovered this when I came here the last time, but I remember that the first time I came here years ago, I thought the sushi wasn't half bad.
We had a family function this last weekend, and we picked up $800 worth of food from Bobs. We got a tray of steak tips over rice. The tips were dry and tough. We also got a tray of chicken stir fry all though it tasted ok it just didnt seem fresh. A tray of eggplant rollatini which they gave to us with no red sauce they came dry. So we made our own sauce. We shouldnt of bothered the rollatinis were horrible. A few trays of a mix of finger sandwiches with only 8 on each that were steal and tasted like crap. The salads were very good. Overall feel like we overpaid and it wasnt good. A bad combo
NO go some where else any where else there is a jack in the box not to far. unless you want your diet to be lard fat and corn
Worst. Service. Ever.  One time I went here for my birthday with four other people.  They ordered burgers and I ordered the fish.  After 45 minutes of our waiter totally ignoring us (and us dehydrating in the August heat with no offers to refill our drinks) he came over to us to "apologize" that it was taking so long and proceeded to blame it on me for ordering fish.  I corrected him and let him know that I cook fish everyday and talapia takes 10 minutes tops to cook, so I know it wasn't the fish holding up the order.  He then offered to make it up to me by offering me a complimentary dessert for my birthday, for which I thanked him but informed him I was allergic to dairy and wouldn't be able to take him up on his offer.  I counteroffered w/ a free drink instead and he said "oh yeah, I'll bring you a BIG bloody mary."  So I excused him for blaming the birthday girl for the delay in the food but then became enraged to see that he actually CHARGED me for the "free" bloody mary...and charged me DOUBLE for it being a "BIG" bloody mary.  Happy Birthday!!  Another time during Pride, we stopped here for some pre-Pride action.  The place was surprisingly empty for the Friday before the festivities, so we thought we lucked out and would get fast service.  Wrong we were!!!  We sat at a table for what seemed like an hour but was probably twenty or so minutes w/ waiter after waiter walking by us and ignoring us.  We tried to make eye contact several times to no avail so we finally displayed our discontent by filling up their sugar containers w/ the ketchup and mustard left on the table, and then we left vowing to never eat at Joe's again...that was several years ago and I still refuse to eat there, even if they were giving the food away the service would still suck balls.
I hate giving bad reviews, but I feel it's my civic duty to warn the public about this place. Beware - it's a long one.   Having HAD to visit the spa three times now  - I stupidly bought way too many Indulge Living vouchers - I feel completely confident in my single star rating. The single star is basically a pat on the back for maintaining a clean & hygienic facility.   On my three visits, I had a deep tissue and two lymphatic drainage massages (in that order). For my deep tissue massage I asked for Walter, who came highly recommended by a friend. What I got the day of was a brush off excuse from front desk that they'd switched my therapist to a small Chinese woman who gave me a sub-par massage.   For my first lymphatic massage I again requested Walter and yet again received a small Asian lady and no explanations for the switch. This time the massage was just plain awful. At one point my masseuse climbed on to my back and started using her FEET to press into my leg muscles. Gross!   After that you'd think I'd never come back. Unfortunately, I had two more vouchers so convinced a friend to come with me and give the place one last chance. This time I called ahead and spoke to a lady who explained that I'd previously experienced the "Chinese" method for lymphatic massage, and my friend's experience  with Walter was the gentler "Western" method. She assured me that on this visit I would be assigned someone who was versed in the Western method.   I showed up on the day with my friend and we were assigned separate rooms. A soft spoken European girl showed me to my room and left me so I could strip down and get under the sheets. Good start. So what happens as I'm mid-strip and topless? A small Chinese woman suddenly barges into the room without knocking! Apparently she's to be my "new masseuse" as the owner had reassigned the European girl to my friend. And from there it only got worse....  After lying down on the massage table, for almost ten minutes the lady kept going in and out of the room and digging into some black bag she had for various bottles of stuff. At one point she opened the door and hit me right in the head, and yes it left a bruise the next day. The massage that occurred when it finally commenced can only be described as one of the worst and most uncomfortable experiences of my life.   The lady spent half the time literally straddling my back, again feet were used, and my disclosure about a shoulder injury was completely ignored as she jabbed her elbows into it. But the WORST part was when she proceeded to pull my arms backwards until my bare chest was lifted from the table and completely exposed. Google "Yoga Bow Pose" and tell me that's not weird especially when the girl is TOPLESS. At that point I almost lost it, but the lady got off me and started cleaning up. Just as I thought I'd escaped, she launched one last attack - spraying me with various bottles of weird scented tonic until my hair was literally soaked with the stuff.   All of this occurred in the midst of a ridiculous amount of noise coming from reception. Mr.Front Desk had a visitor who felt the need to share her cheesy flirtations and hyena laugh with all the spa guests. Even my friend who was lucky enough to land one of the rooms at the end of the hall could hear her. Sent my girl out twice to complain - zero difference.  As a result of my experience at swan spa, I now refuse to buy massage vouchers from those deal sites. I pay full price to go somewhere reputable with certified massage therapists that actually know what they're doing.
First time here, was really looking forward to it. Heard really good things about it.  First, don't let the name fool you, it's mostly seafood. I was expecting a delicious pork belly, pork shoulder, spare ribs, or something along the lines.   Second, make sure you don't go there before a major Holiday, they seem to run out of everything. They did not have the beer I wanted and they did not have the dish I wanted. Finally settle of the Steak Frites, great presentation but NO BUENO!! My guest and I both ordered our steak medium, it was rare at best, fries were super soggy.   Our server was great, but totally disappointed with the food!!!!!
I placed an order through GrubHub for a roast beef sandwich and an onion ring, cooked well done. When my order came the onion rings were greasy, soggy and falling apart. The entire bag was soaked in grease! When I contacted Grubhub to let them know, they contacted the restaurant and asked that they refund me for my order. The "manager" told them they would not refund my order, nor would they fix the issue by bringing me edible food. This place is disgusting and I will never provide them my business again. In addition, I will make sure I submit a review on any review site that I can to ensure that no one is treated this way by this company again
This Safeway is a war zone. Avoid if possible.   There is a plethora of homeless, drugged out both inside and outside. Hardly any selection and long lines with funky smells.
Don't go on Monday night. Steak sandwich,our reason for going ,was dry as a bone. Onion rings burned. That said the service was excellent. Spaghetti meals seemed ok. 4adults, 2 sandwiches,2 spaghetti meals, 1drink,1 salad,1app.,2 ff upgrades with 10$tip....62$us.
I was here with my bridesmaids couple days before my wedding. The girl who did my nails had major attitude issue and was very impatient and rude doing mine. I had small rhinestones on some my nails but most of it came off after 3 days when the mail technician told it it would last at least 7 days. Then my thumb started chipping. A day later, my pointing figure which I had extension on completely came off. Basically I needed to redo my nails within a week and half. Ive been to cheaper salons and they all last WAY longer than 1.5 weeks. I will definitely not be coming back o this salon, especially not for the price they charge and the snobby attitude this nail technician has.
My girlfriend and I went to Parish Cafe about two hours ago. We didn't really know where we wanted to eat after spending a half hour perusing various Back Bay menus. We eventually settled in here. My woman is a pseudo vegetarian (no red meat, but likes chicken), so I'm surprised she agreed to eat here since there is pig on every sandwich save one. Our waitress was quite friendly and patient, giving us extra time to decide on our meals. I eventually ordered Rowdy's Famous Chicken Sandwich and a Coke, while my lady friend ordered the Zuni Roll (without bacon) and a Coke. The first thing we loved about our sandwiches was the bread. It was very fresh, different, and delicious. There, however, was not a second thing we loved about our sandwiches. It ended with the bread. I found mine to be very plain, basically just a baked chicken sandwich. My girl could not find the vegetables on her sandwich, although the menu description promised there would be some. The service was good as we were asked if we wanted refills on our Cokes three times, even though our glasses were still half full. I did remark that the Coca-Cola tasted like ass. It was not syrupy enough, no sweetness at all. We finally finished our sandwiches but we didn't want to leave so we each asked for another Coke. They  smiled and salivated, although at the time we didn't know why. Then we got THE BILL. $10.00 for 4 Cokes! WTF! OMG! Are they serious? They charge $2.50 per crappy Coke. I was/am still flabbergasted. I can't even mention the word Coke to my counterpart as she hits me when I do. So after the bill and tip, our "cheap" sandwich date costs us a whopping $38.00. Unacceptable. I feel that they should warn us unassuming consumers that they are about to rip us off with expensive mediocre liquid confection before they fetch our beverages. I guarantee I will be passing a 2 liter over the patio fence next time, if there is a next time, which there won't be. And oh by the way, about twenty minutes later, I lost my sandwich in The North Face bathroom. The End.
Very bad services. Ruined our trip to San Francisco. Tiny van that runs very infrequently to get you from the airport to their far-off rental site. That alone took 40 minutes. Plus 1 hour+ waiting on their site to get the car with decidedly unapologetic staff to boot. In a dark irony, it takes German grit and perseverance to deal with the company. By the way, their customer service hotline goes to Germany. Brush up on your German for any complaint. Eventually after an almost two-hour wait, we ended up with a vehicle other than the one we reserved. The vehicle was in very bad condition, with dirt everywhere on the body. Not sure how any legitimate company would present a vehicle in this condition to any customer. Too upset to have taken a picture of the vehicle just to get the ridiculousness of this experience on record.
Wow! What a rip off. Worst business I have ever came across. Last year I got an out of province inspection because it was initially cheep but ended up costing over 1000. After I found out they gouged the heck out of me.  Also, I went to Honda recently and they told me whoever fixed my car last really did a crappy job and ended up effecting other stuff. Honda even told me to take it back to them to show them. When I went back they wasted my time and just B.S. me. Brian the owner/boss is such a jerk and even tried to swindle me into paying to fix what they broke. LOL. I would never go back.
What was suppose to be a 45 min - 1 hour wait, ended up being 2 hours. It's not like I came at a busy time. My car was supposedly started on as soon as it was dropped off. An hour and a half within my wait time I asked my advisor how much longer the wait would be and he estimated a 10 min wait. I'll give them a star for tending to my needs as soon as I pulled up. Needless to say, I won't be back.
Tzatziki with shawarma??   Garlic sauce when you ask for it tastes like garlic mayo, not good.
Still just as bad as before. Dreadfully slow service. The red sauce still has a weird bitter flavor. Let's not mention that they microwave their food.... disgusting.
Sorry, but this is not a comment on the food.  My wife and I arrived there last night around 7:00 and the place was about half full.  We were accompanied by my 91 year old mother.  We asked for a table for 5 and asked to sit quickly as my mom has trouble standing/walking/getting up after sitting (you get it).    The waitress asked where were the others in our party.  I explained that my daughter and son were 2 minutes away.  We were told "you cannot be seated until all the members of your party are here".   I discreetly pointed at my mom and looked at the waitress as if to say "really?".  She said "you can sit here and wait" and pointed to the bench in the hall.  Now, trust that I understand corporate policies and the need for them.   And that I understand bad employees and/or bad training of employees.   But seriously, Steak and Shake has better manners. And I now understand that this restaurant does not want my business.
I visited this restaurant with some colleagues since we are in Orlando for a work conference. The environment seems fun with loud music and dancing. However, the food and service were mediocre at best.  I ordered a souvlaki platter with gyro, and the food was good, but very much felt like it was something I could've gotten at a food court for $5 instead of at a sit-down restaurant for $15. It wasn't quite what I expected - more just a gyro wrap with fries rather than a "platter" per se. Nothing was bad about it, but really there's also nothing positive to say either. The gyro came with fries covered in grated cheese, which was good. I also sampled my friend's lemon pork, which was tasty. Grilled pork often comes out dry, but this one was not.  I do feel like commenting, though, that service felt lacking. Given it was the evening of New Years Day, and I appreciate people working so I can eat, but it often felt like our server favored another table over ours. We ordered two sides of tzatziki sauce and asked for more water, but ten minutes later we were still waiting. We had to ask about it again, and the server insisted he had previously sent out the tzatziki. He brought it out quickly with some extra pita, and we asked for more water again, since our cups were still empty. Even getting our server's attention was a challenge as he quickly passed us each time without even looking our direction. I wonder if the poor service was due to our group being entirely ethnic minorities (2 Asian, 1 Latino, 3 Black, 1 Middle Eastern...the other table that seemed to be favored did not have any.) I don't know and can't know for sure.  Our dinner was fine, but very average. I would not return to this restaurant as it seemed there are many others around to choose from instead.
I have lived in Boston for a year and have wanted to check this off the list.  Totally a waste of time.  Even the waiter said this is a tourist trap.  The food is sub par and can be very expensive.  You will not be satisfied with your meal when the bill comes.  You can get fresh seafood tons of places nearby for a better deal.
Flyer and website don't mention that tours are only offered on the hour. I had to wait 50+ minutes for the next tour since I arrived right after the full hour.
We ask to place our walk up order after waiting for ever car to go through the drive through. Then we proceeded to wait after four cars went to the drive-through and for other walk ups picked their food up, and they order their food after ours. And finally half of our food that to us cold. As well as noticing the cook had a cigarette behind her ear.
I always WANT to like the Summer Shack, but I am consistently underwhelmed.  Last night we had the sangria (too sweet and no sign of alcohol although the waiter assured us it was in there), flavorless lobster roll and fried oysters.  Very nice raw cherry stone clams and good beer choices, however.  Legal Seafood is consistently much, much better for a similar price.
Decided to try this place because it had decent reveiews on fb and features a Sunday buffet. I was kind of disappointed. The food was seasoned well especially green beans and the catfish. I wish there would have been shrimp on the line. However, I tried the smothered porkchop and it had more bones than meat.The lighting was bad, there was only one person serving the buffet at the time I went thru.  The buffet table did not appear to be on to keep the food warm so my food ranged from warm to luke warm. They kept running out of food and there was a wait for things like fried chicken and cornbread so I never got to try those. Thought dessert came with the buffet  but couldn't tell if there was any on the line. Lastly, i saw one of the ladies wash tongs in a hand wash sink near the buffet that already had a plate in it. Then she proceeded to  wipe gives with a towel that was hanging over a fan. The last two were seen whwn I went through the line a second time. I really wish my experience would've been better. I am fairly new to Austin and looking for a good seafood place to go to.
Charcuterie Plate: Perfectly good on two visits; Cheese Plate: Likewise; Smorgasbord: Ample, and the addition of a little salad is a nice touch, but while it had good flavor, it was more like an adorable garnish.  Ambience: Good, rustic, pleasant.  'Tomato BIsque:' While 'bisque' used to mean a specific thing, and still does in some quarters, I have come to accept that it now means any kind of pureed, creamy soup. And I have heartily enjoyed many a tomato or root-vegetable 'bisque' since this semantic shift overtook menus. This was not one of those times.   The soup was lumpy and watery, not creamy or pureed. I will assume, since this is Portland, that they used fresh tomatoes instead of canned, but if the sole constituents of a dish are tomatoes and water, I would argue it doesn't matter much which you use, and that the result is not a soup, let alone a 'bisque.' I like tomatoes, and I like water, but whether it is a sauce, soup, cream soup, confit, compote, or tomato margarita you aim to make, the terrifying reality is that you will need more than those two ingredients, and one of the elements you will need is time.  As this is the sole soup on the menu, its thundering crappiness is yet the more lamentable. This is a soup that in its vacuity and its ponderous, gaping want of substance, could have stripped even Beckett of his otherwise insuperable will to live.  Similarly I was reckless enough to order the 'special' grilled cheese off the specials board. It was indeed special in its singular lack of uniformly-applied cheese and the other special ingredients. To wit, half the sandwich contained the special filling, while the other half gaped at me, rent and bare on the plate like the flat doughy buttocks of a passed-out middle-aged demimondaine in some or other Lautrec I have not seen and do not wish to.   Half of a Grilled Cheese Sandwich contained no cheese! - which may be shocking and hard to fathom for those who do not believe it is this life that is the actual Hell and that it is only afterwards we all get to pet unicorns and bunnies in the sky with Beckett and Unamuno. But, that crushing truth notwithstanding, the fact is that when I previously have - in this life, not the next sublime one - ordered a grilled cheese, special or otherwise, in nearly all previous circumstances, the cheese portion has generally been uniformly applied to a minimum of 75/80 percent. coverage. Additionally, in past encounters  with this species I have noted that the general practice seems to be that some sort of lipid (butter, oil, margarine: I really don't care!) is applied to the outside, upon which the whole is set upon heat for some time and then turned, with the obvious effect of heating the sandwich from two sides with a heat conductant on either, thereby melting the innards. I regret to say the sandwich, while gently heated, had no oil of any sort applied, and that the cheese (on the half with cheese) remained staunchly unmelted.
Absolutely terrible experience since the new ownership took over, the building is old and run down and the customer service has been horrendous. Very rarely is the phone answered when you call. I have now had a massage taken from my back log because it was tried to move but they did not get the voicemail in time to move it so they still charged me for it. I ALSO just showed up for a 5 pm appt and the entire place is closed! No notice of cancelled appt. My only thought is they finally went out of business. The turnover of the masseuses alone is evidence that they do not like to work here. Do yourself a big favor and go ANY where else.
Friendly staff, nice atmosphere, well-presented salad, and delicious french fries.  I just wish Kitchen offered more vegan options, like so many other restaurants do these days! Maybe a tofu scramble or vegetarian sausage for breakfast?
I have tried many ramen places my whole life. I think Danbo ramen is ok and a bit disappointed in my opinion. Beside the size and amount that you get, the flavor is average and it was my first time feeling that I don't want to finish the meal. Most of the strong palette was just garlic taste which I think that's why people like it. However, I would be honest and suggest that other places are better.
It was delicious overall, but it feels like they put msg in their condiments. The msg taste after the meal was terrible; it was still there after litres of water. I don't know if they really put msg in their food, but this is just what I've experienced.
Sorry guys. I love shake shack but am really frustrated that the taste of shake shack in New York City is so different than the one outside of NYC. The beef is not juicy and it's just not tasty. We were pretty disappointed , but the service was great
First time and last time. Red sauce was very runny, and the pasta was cold. Caesar salad was drenched in salad dressing and cheese, and someone in the kitchen had a heavy hand with the garlic. Save your money.
It seems as if this place could learn a bit from other coops in other places! they could start by:  1.  having a system by their bulk items where you could weight and demarcate your containers...instead of having to be charged for theirs even if you brought your own. 2.  Participate in the Bicycle Benefits program 3.  Get as much local produce as they can...lacking in that aspect. 4. a public restroom would be a nice addition 5. having worker owners!  i guess that if you never are lacking anything it's difficult for positive growth!
We enjoyed the french fries, of course, but the beer-battered fried green beans were...meh. We were left wishing we had tried the avocado fries instead. There was nothing special about my grilled salmon, nor about the service (or lack thereof). Our friends suggested we try the wom kim's pudding for dessert. It was like so many other peach cobblers. We tried a taste of their dark chocolate cake, which was by far the better choice.
Wow so disgusting in my tummy, we are here last night and the people couldn't have been less into it. They were all so sad and slow. PF Changs more like PF Bad.
Over the last month, I've frequented the ponce city market, and I have to say, this one fell short. The bar was high as I love Superica and Bone Garden Cantina.   First, on a not so busy Sunday evening we were seated and more than a few minutes later, our server appeared with water. Drinks are pretty hard to order as they don't have grey goose, crown royal, Jack Daniels, mojitos, or Moscow mules so we ended up with sub par margaritas.   The queso fundido was a brick compared to Superica. Next the small tacos at $3-$5 each were good, but they make Bartaco's tacos look huge. Order at least 4 to have a chance to conquer an appetite.   I ordered the burrito priced at $9 and included no meat. It was actually very good and a normal portion for hungry people.   All in all I decided that with all the options for authentic Mexican + the ponce city market venue, I wouldn't be visiting this place again.
I'm going to havevto disagree  here. I walk in, the restaurant  Is a mess,  the food is mediocre  and I can only have water as the soda machine  Is not working,  very  dissatisfied,  employees  walking  out the bathroom  with out washing their  hands, and handling the chicken  wings
This place is total CRAP. The venison is poorly cooked. Service is neutral at best. 2 meal credits is total cabash. Not a single good thing. No ice water. Dessert is even boring. A true African meal of sticks and meal worms has to be better.
This buffet is probably the worse buffet I have ever gone too. It has very little choices, they do not have my favorite sweet n sour chicken :(  The white rice was almost gone.  The family I went to loved the place though.  I will not go back myself. I am very picky
Pho Boi certainly LOOKS better than Pho Hoa, the restaurant it replaced, but the food is dreadful compared to the old place. If you are looking for anything like the awesome pho they used to serve here, keep driving down Kingsway, because it's not here.  I tried a few different dishes. The spring rolls I got were extremely flaky, and the sauce tasted like water and added nothing to the rolls. Then came my pho. The beef slices were alright. I ordered an apparently spicy dish but the soup didn't taste like anything, let alone spicy. I tried adding some extra sauce to get something out of it, but alas, no taste was to be found within these noodles. Overall, very bland.  The service is pretty decent. Our food was delivered fairly fast, the staff was nice and polite. Like I said, the place looks much better than before. The new staff renovated the restaurant and now it feels like being on the inside of an orange.  Avoid this place, it's not worth your time and/or money.
Unreliable. Mechanics are moody, chick at front counter is a twat. Phone calls and emails are never returned, and when they say 'we'll call you when you're bike is ready', you might as well just wait a few hours and then show up.  Honestly, I don't know how this place stays in business....  people are desperate I guess and they are conveniently located close to downtown. Yeah, that's it.  I used to have friendly service years ago, but something has changed in the last year. I hate to say it but I think it's the chick at the counter. She just doesn't give a damn.
Food was alright...quality was OK.. I was done eating by the time my wife got her meal..... No apology.. Was just told that kitchen lost her order and they will get it in... I know things happen... But on the second visit... Service was still lacking....
DO NOT USE THESE GUYS!!!!! Michael Gorenstein is a thieving, malicious little prick who will try everything to take your money. AVOID AT ALL COSTS! Just to give you an idea of his modus operandi, he tried to get me to sign a broker's fee contract for an apartment that was no longer available. Just google his name and you'll find a criminal record out of Cambridge. DO NOT trust anything this guy says. He is a shady con artist masquerading as a shady realtor.
Let it be known that I love Mandolas. I lived on 45th street and went to the location at the Triangle at least twice a month and anytime a guest wanted good Italian food. When I moved out to HWY 71 I was super excited to see another location close by. I went tonight, and I was very let down.  I went with my fiance and his brother, and we all shared a table number. I paid my $21 for eggplant parmigina and Merlot and waited for my food. My fiance's brother's food came quickly, shortly followed by my fiance's. I figured my food would be there soon, no biggie. I was wrong. Bread wasn't even available to me until 20 min after sitting down. The boys shared their food with me and we continued waiting. When they finally brought my food, after I had watched people seated way after us receive their food, the server tried to not even acknowledge that it was extremely late. I had to point out the fact that the rest of my party had already finished eating. He apologized, took the food away, and took it off my bill.   I was never approached by a manager, and I never ate dinner. My fiance and his brother had delicious food, the bread was overbaked, and I am hoping that it is better when I try again. If it is, I'll update this review. It may be worth the drive to go to another location.
MEH!  Over-hyped and over-reviewed.  My BLAND meal wasn't worth the effort.
I was very much looking forward to this class on my Monday morning off. However, even after arriving 30 minutes early, I was unable to locate the studio. There are no signs or markers. There was no contact number to be found. I was forced to cancel the class last minute and receive the $20 fee. Needless to say, I began my morning frustrated instead of relaxed like I had planned.
Formerly a favorite, but first service and now cleanliness has fallen badly.  Like most of the reviewers here, I formerly enjoyed Azul Tequila very much. I visited weekly or biweekly to enjoy their menu's intriguing balance of traditional TexMex and deeper-in-Mexico dishes. However, in the last six months or so, they've slipped badly.  Service has deteriorated to the point that waiters don't even bother to wait for the answer to the question, "How is everything? Need anything?" Instead, the last two times I've dined, the waiter threw out the question as if dropping an envelope in a mailbox, and then KEPT WALKING without waiting for an answer. I had to flag down the waiter on his way back to make a request (another napkin, simple stuff like that.)  Now table cleanliness has deteriorated to the point that I wonder about kitchen conditions. On my last visit, when the restaurant was not busy at all, the waiter filled in for the host to seat me, and led me to a booth. He took my order for tea and walked off, not noticing or caring that both the table and the bench seat were littered with crumbs. I called back the waiter, who wiped the seat, then plopped the menu down on the filthy table and actually scattered the table crumbs back onto the seat! Not noticing or not caring, he walked off again.   So I walked out without saying another word.  I'll be back, Azul Tequila, but you have two strikes against you now. The next visit may be my last.
I forgot to pay my bill because I was out of town. I come back, discover everything is black, call nstar. It is 4:00am. Of course, no one is in the office but alas! An automated voice message tells me that I can choose to pay the bill automatically over the phone! Im saved!  Oh wait. The numbers arent adding up. They want me to put 50% down as a down payment and then another 25% a month for....6 months???  There is no option to pay the bill in full. If i want to pay now, i would owe hundreds of dollars in interest alone.  Nstar does this on purpose becuase they know you are desperate to get your power back on. It even says on the website that the benefit of choosing a payment plan is that they will send a signal to get them to turn on your power as soon as possible. Except it seems like according to these reviews they wont get here for at least several days.  Eff nstar. Boston is deregulated, im going elsewhere for my energy.
Eek, where to start! Perhaps my experience was just a fluke, I'd like to think so given the great ratings this establishment has. I will preface this by saying that I don't mind spending a sizable amount of money on an above average meal, and I always lean toward quality over quantity.  Pricing wasn't necessarily the issue here. What I had an issue with was the price of the meal, combined with the fact that two out of the six dishes ordered were inedible. The remaining dishes were average at best. The salads were ordered came on a plate the size of a large saucer. The lettuce was chopped so finely.. I can't even describe it, it was rather odd. The chicken on top was overcooked and dry. We barely touched them. The corn we ordered was so overcooked, it basically felt like we were chewing on plastic. The fish was decent, but I was slightly shocked at the size given the pricing. Again, I believe in quality over quantity, but here I felt like I received low quality food for a very high price. The best part about our experience was the amazing waitress. She did everything should could to make us happy, but hey, she wasn't cooking so she could only do so much. She received a great tip for her efforts, but I doubt we will be back.
Lord,  do not be in a hurry if you go here on the weekend and don't expect vegan anything. I went there for lunch on sunday and it took a ridiculous amount of time to get a yogurt parfait and an omelette. Now I understand a busy weekend place don't get me wrong but when I saw 2 plates come out and the waitresses start grubbing it  before ours came out I was like ok..clearly customer service is not a priority some days. And the vegan options are slim to none. I am not vegan but like healthier options..this is portland afterall...meh
I had a small roast beef sandwich a small onion rings and a small drink and it was over $16 ! The sandwich was OK the roll was a little doughy. Food was average.  I could have had a steak dinner for $ 16. It was way overpriced.
Advertises all you can drink Wednesday nights for $10 starting at 10pm. Except that's doesn't include beer. And the main room / DJ doesn't start until 11pm. Oh, and parking is $5.  Number of other people here? 0. Likelihood I'll be coming back? 0.
Service wasn't great and the food wasn't all that great either. I had a fajita special and shrimp was hard and needed flavor. I've been to many seafood restaurants would not recommend this one.
TERRIFIC FOOD!!!!   Absolutely horrible customer service. The driver was nice.  I ordered beef fried rice and crab rangoons on Tuesday the 3rd March, 2015, and I loved it!!!   But then, the very next day I ordered chicken fried rice with plans of rating them 5 stars on yelp and the driver brought my order(20 min late)....yet, it was the wrong order. I ran downstairs to inform the guy, who was very cool. Said I could keep the food, and I would still be getting my chicken fried rice.   Well, after waiting for the chicken fried, time flew by with no food and no one reaching out. So I called, and talked to whoever answered the phone, trying to explain what happened, and his response was quite rude. Said he never agreed to anything, and treated me like I was just someone out to get a free meal which is hilarious because I even commented about how I love their food.   He said he'd have to charge me to get my order right, wasn't even trying to correct the mistake they made, so me being hungry and happy to pay for the food I said fine.  Well......THE FOOD NEVER FUCKING CAME AND I'm furious.   It's SOOOO good, but someone working there is a fucking prick and I hope he sees this.   I just wanted you to replace my food, dick. That's how the food business works, I work in a foodtruck myself and if we get something wrong we replace it no problem.
i am flummoxed.   fresh =/= something made twelve hours ago and "kept in a cooler".   a manager standing in a drive thru window with crossed arms suggesting I stop ordering the sandwich if stale food is not what I, paying customer, expect to receive. and then continuing to stand there with crossed arms while his employees stand behind him and several moments pass before he returns to whatever bridge he patrols and I am given my sandwich and leave =/= the  "it was our pleasure serving you" tagline at the bottom of the receipt nor the "Corporate Purpose of Chick-fil-A, Inc" ("have a positive influence on all who come in contact with Chick-fil-A", as per the company's website.   it does explain the now hiring billboard in the window.
Somebody was vaping marijuana throughout the movie. The smell would hit me every 2-5 minutes. I finally got up and told employees and they sent somebody to check but I guess he didn't find who was vaping or just warned them and didn't follow up because it continued throughout the rest of the movie. The smell is offensive to me and not to mention, marijuana is illegal. The price of tickets here is definitely good and I thought, since I wasn't planning on eating, I could forgo my usual Alamo Drafthouses, but I was wrong. Pay the extra money to go to a theater that will take your complaints seriously and put an end to problems like illegal activity in the theatre.
Wow that's all I can say. My friend made the reservation and I thought everything went smooth. The villa was old but cute. When we entered the villa everything was perfect until I saw I a little roach on the bed on top of the villa. I let it go because I didn't think anything of it. We got there on a Thursday and we left on Saturday. Unfortunately I forgot my wallet with $400 in it and my social security card, worst mistake I have done. On my way back home I noticed it but it was 9pm so the front desk was closed so I called on Sunday at 8am. I was on hold for 36 minutes then they answered and told me that it was Sunday and everyone was off? UM OK?  I had to call back today, Monday, I called at 8am no one answered. I understand that they are probably busy with all this Halloween stuff going on but I was just trying to get my wallet back.  After calling multiple times I decided to ask for a manager. The manager Miriam was extremely rude, she yelled at me like I was shit. I tried being nice and keep my cool because I understand she probably gets a lot of phones calls about stupid stuff but I paid a lot of money so stay in that villa and I only want my wallet back at this point I didn't even want the money just my wallet. anyways I guess they didn't know who cleaned the house, or the cellphone for the house keeping, the manager (if that is what you can call her) said that" I was very impatient and I needed to back off for a couple of hours ". im pretty sure if anyone looses their wallet, they are going to keep calling until they find it. im 100% sure that the cleaning lady has it but hey ill never probably get it back so please don't leave anything at the villas, customer service sucks and they should get new managers.
My friend totally hyped this place up but I wasn't impressed at all. My experience was just average nothing more nothing less. The mimosa was pretty good. Their menu items are creative. Not your typical brunch. I'm a simple person so I just got pancakes and home fries. The waiter brought my food to me and I had to ask for syrup. Then she only brought me one small cup with an inadequate amount. When I asked for more she said they were out. She was able to find me a little more after I asked twice. After all of that my food was way over priced. I won't be willingly going back.
My wife and I stopped in for a quick meal on a Tuesday night at 9:30. The place had 2 tables going. We sat in booths and were told to order quickly as the kitchen was closing (no problem).  Our booth was across from no less than 6 other booths and tables filled with food from un-bussed tables (big problem). To our shock, waiter after waiter walked by table after table and cleared nothing. The food was awful. We sent back a glass of wine that had smelled like vinegar. The bartender made a point of telling the waiter that it was a brand new opened bottle instead of simply pouring a good glass and leaving it at that. The bar had staff yucking it up loudly instead of cleaning. This place seriously lacks real management. Where's Gordon Ramsey when you need him? Good luck to all who dare tread here!
My girlfriend and I walked in tonight (sunday), an hour and a half before they closed. The service was ridiculously rushed. The waitress came over and asked as soon as we sat down if we know what we wanted to eat. After we asked for more time she let a minute pass before coming back. We quickly decided on sushi, shrimp and chicken.   The soup and salad came out at least a minute after and MY GOD was it the worst soup I have ever had. It had 0 flavor and had stale vegetables. The salad was probably the only thing I would pay for at the restaurant; it was tasty and had fresh lettuce.  The sushi came out quick enough where we knew it was pre-made. Not only was it pre-made and warm, but it was majority avocado. No crab to be found in our california roll.   Next the chef came out. He seemed clearly disinterested in us and just wanted to finish as soon as possible. The rice tasted like burnt over cooked egg and stale rice. The noodles tasted frozen. The shrimp only was edible after dunking it in the sauces provided. The teriyaki chicken had 0 flavor and the vegetables were not cooked all the way through. The chef cooked it all within a 5-10 minute span, which is no wonder why nothing had any flavor. He finished cooking, didn't say a word, and walked away.   All of this for 48 dollars? I felt so bad for my girlfriend. She was so excited for japanese food and was disappointed in the end. We left 0 tip.
Don't sit in the patio because there is a rat, which I presume that lives there, under the holes of the old wood floor and I think the waitress got really mad that we don't like rats "the rat is in the patio, outside the restaurant, there is nothing we can do about it  - don't kill him, he is an animal " - I couldn't eat no more so okay, if you like it, you sit outside.
Went on a Thursday night around 8:30pm. We were the only ones there.... sketchy. Literally, no one else. Immediately I looked at the health score- 84.  Sooo, decided just to split a pitcher of one of their higher dollar mixed margaritas. NO alcohol, none, couldn't taste a thing except sugar.  It was almost $30 for the pitcher with no booze in it.  On top of that, why screw us over on booze when we are the only ones inside the restaurant on a night and time that should be poppin. Probably would have ordered food after being a tad bit boozed up, but that didn't even come close to happening there. We left unhappy and went next door to Felinis pizza.    One good thing was that at Twisted Taco our table waiter was real nice.
This by far has the be the worst guest service experience I've ever had at a Captain D. I visit the restaurant around 9:30 went through the drive through was told only side items they had were fries and okra. No breadsticks or No lobster roll sandwiches, a total waste of my time. Took so long for drive thru line to move so went inside to pick my food up and pay what i received which i have a picture of was nothing like the advertisement. The manager Will was very rude and inconsiderate. There were several ppl complaining and he did nothing to remedy the situation besides lock the front doors 5 min earlier. I ask what was his name and he responded with a "what". I will never visit this location because of the quality of food i received and the manager Will actions tonight.
Just don't go people.  Horrible wait time, horrible service and horrible drinks ever-time we've come here. Don't go
I have lived at Marquis Briarcliff for about 6 months. My opinion might be different or very similar to a lot of different residents. Many residents in this apartment complex has been robbed of our belongings while we were at home or at work. I understand these things happen in the city but it has happened multiple times (the people above us got robbed at gunpoint) and the corporate office will not do anything to resolve it. I still feel very uncomfortable living here and paranoid about being robbed again. For the money that we are paying 1600 a month for a 2 bed 2 bath I would rather live across the street at Stone Creek or anywhere else than Marquis Briarcliff.   The only pro that I would say is the residents are very nice, its quiet, and the maintenance staff is very professional and sweet. (Charles and Tony)   The office isn't really helpful in resolving any issues that you might have, no one is ever in the office to resolve anything anyways. They have 2 people (Jim and Bethoni) working and they always seem to be away.
Probably the most unfriendly welcome I have ever received while dropping my Prius off for service.  Nevermind that I gave them my business when I bought the car here and only get it services here.  Also walked around looking to check out the RAV4, couldn't find it and wasn't approached or greeted by a single person.  Guess they don't care that I'm on the market for a new car.
I had quit going for a couple years as the quality of the food just wasn't the same as when I started coming here.  Thought I'd give them a try again and see if things got any better.  This was about a month ago and forgot to update my review.  The hot and sour soup used to be so good but not anymore.  The entrees were okay, but the clincher making this my last stop ever was the fact that they took the bar-b-que pork away.  That was pretty much my main reason for ever coming here as it used to be excellent.  So, with another price hike and the removal or quality of my favorite items on the downslide it's time to say adios.
The doughnuts are awesome! Great vegan selection for my wife, the music, although, completely sucks and is WAAAYYY to loud to talk or even think. May take home, will never stay and eat again.
I don't usually write reviews but this place deserves one... and not for the right reasons. I have read reviews about how crowded this Starbucks gets and the lack of seats so I decided to bypass these issues by putting in a mobile order for pick up. To my complete and utter surprise on not one, not two, but three occasions this place has managed to give me the wrong order for the same drink. On all three occasions, I have ordered a Honey Citrus Mint tea. This tea comes sweetened with Jade Citrus Mint Tea and Peach Tranquility Herbal Tea, made with steamed lemonade. The barista on all three occasions gave me Mint Tea bags with hot water not expecting me to notice. So in addition to not having a seat when you go to Starbucks, waiting in line forever, don't be surprised when(not if ) the baristas here spoil your order by taking cheap shortcuts.
Convenient location this bank has going for itself here and for regular teller related transactions I would rate it not 5 stars only because of the excruciatingly long lines we very frequently have to endure, while "higher ups" up front are twiddling their fingers so, for simple teller transactions only a mediocre 2 1/2-3 out of 5.  However, if you have small business that requires officer assistance do yourself a favor and try someone else.    Service personally experienced at this location is piss-poor to put it mildly, please allow me to expand a bit;    This excessively fee-happy banking institution has developed me into a bona-fide masochist because I have been with for more than 30 years w/both personal as well as small business accounts so there's an awful lot of pain & suffering that's been endured especially at this particular location and at the hands of unprofessional & extremely incompetent "higher ups" notable possible exception here is top dog "Kevin" new manager, who tries to help w/issues albeit w/only 50-50 success rate.   Two weeks ago I called the bank asking for the boss to be informed by "Virginia" that he was busy w/customer and to just stand by, he'd get to me right after;   Well, call was made at 3:55 just before closing, so not having anything else to do other than driving to Rozzie from Boston turned phone's external speaker on and started the journey back to home-base navigating through downtown & J-way. 45' later & while still on hold, pulled up outside the bank & although I was let in to discuss issue w/"Kevin" who in fact gave his email address as best method of contact and "Virginia" who was still there offering an apology for forgetfulness?   I could see if this was the 1st, 2nd or 3rd screw-up, there are so many painful & unacceptable instances however, that I don't want to subject any possible readers to repetitive ineptness.  Finally and to put a closure to this ongoing saga, emailed "Kevin" couple of days later on a different altogether issue, think I should've sent it via smoke signal as its still unanswered.   Think it's high time to sever the umbilical cord at least w/this highly dysfunctional branch.
They don't call me the Taco Mac-Daddy for nothing! Just kidding, lol! but in all seriousness my wings were cold when they came and our guac was brown.  The service took really long as well.  Just an all around non-optimal experience.
Beer's good but think twice about getting more than one growler.  Tried to bring one back for my $5 deposit and was told "state law" doesn't allow them to.  Really - the two guys down the expressway give deposits back.
Asked for a blueberry muffin. Got a raspberry muffin.  An honest mistake, but the muffin also had a big chunk of what looked like either an apple or a pear in it. Not sure as I didn't want to eat whatever it was.
This is the only place I can think of that the service is so bad I will never, ever go back. My bf and I don't ask for much, and are ALWAYS nice to servers (nothing tackier than someone being rude to the waitstaff). I have been here probably 6 times. 1 time had good service, 1 time mediocre, and 4 of the times had HORRIBLE service.  I used to really like their brunch and fries, although once or twice the yolks on my eggs benedict were hard (yuck!), and twice I have ordered cheese sauce with my half order of fries and they have forgotten it. The last time I went, my bf and I ordered fries with cheese sauce side that was forgotten. Our server didn't come back and check on us (and I think he literally had one other table besides us) that we just started eating the fries without it. No biggie. My bf mentions to him when he finally comes back that we did not get the cheese sauce, so we wouldn't be charged for it. Our server says "awww man shit!!" and walks away. He doesn't apologize, or ask if we still want it. Then he does not say a single word to us the rest of the time. No joke! He acted like he was mad at us or something. I was having a really bad day and it made me feel worse.  I have also had problems not getting drinks and not getting refills on drinks. I'm glad to read that others on here have had the same problems with the servers acting as if you are inconveniencing them by being there, because I was almost taking it personally.
Alas, weep for the real McCormick & Schmick's is Gone Forever! Ate there for lunch and was surprised that the quality had dropped like a rock while the prices had skyrocketed. Ordered cod sandwiches and got two small pre-frozen and breaded pieces on cole slaw and a piece of lettuce on a tasteless bun. Of all the places in Portland, the town of great restaurants, we made the mistake of stopping here thinking that it was still good. Great wait staff and bar tender but the restaurant also had filthy restrooms; a sure sign of decline. Great view, drinks are OK but high priced. Too Bad, Farewell to a great restaurant.
I am one of Bijou Cafe's biggest supporters but after todays fiasco I'm adding it to the "banned" list. My husband and I were seated around 11:30 and placed our orders by 11:40. We sat in the middle of the dining room for nearly an hour while our waitress ignored us and two sets of patrons at each table around us had been served, eaten and paid.  Our waters were filled every 15 minutes but not once did our waitress even look at us, nor address why our food was taking so long. We both ordered the two egg dishes, the simplest and easiest things to make on the menu. Closing in on the 50 minute mark my husband got the waitress' attention and said, "Excuse me I was just wondering if our food..." and he was abruptly cut off as she said "an order is up in the kitchen!"  We had wanted to ask if our food had been started because if not, we were going to cut our losses and go somewhere else. Turns out it was our orders that were up, she slapped them down on the table, again without making eye contact or apologizing for the wait. She then dropped off our bill 30 seconds later.  I just don't understand the rude service. My husband and I were more than courteous, we didn't even ask her for one thing until an hour later when we were wondering where our food was. All she needed to do was address the situation rather than completely ignore it. I am typically a 20% tipper and have only NOT tipped twice in my life, this was one of those times.  I have noticed that the service is quickly going downhill. I am not sure what happened to the very friendly host/waiter that used to work there, he was awesome.
We tried this place a few times shortly after they opened a few years ago and it was not very good.  I had a groupon and decided to give it another chance.  Pro/con list:  Pros: - plenty of parking - Waitress and employees are all friendly. - location is good. - Hot sake is good.  Cons: - okdol bi bim bap (hot in a stone pot) is not very good.  It is missing the egg cracked on top.  I'm not sure if that is a new health code thing but the taste of the mix is not there. - Sushi was marginal.  - Ordered a $22 beef BBQ dish.  We cooked it perfectly at the table but the meat was low quality, tough and chewy.  Flavor was OK. - Miso soup was marginal.  It seems like this place could be better if they got a new chef or just upped their game.  I would prefer Le's in the Atrium mall for Asian food in the neigborhood.  I will say that my 10 year old daughter liked this place and she would give it 4 stars.
After a long day at work and waiting for almost an hour for delivery, the last thing I wanted was to get something completely different than what I ordered. Awesome.
I know that they just opened and are still training their employees, so I'll come back sometime and see if they have improved, but here is my experience from the other day. My fiancé, roommate and I went through the drive through and made an order. When we pulled up we told the blonde girl at the window that we would like to split it onto two cards. "You guys are killing me" she says to us, and the manager comes up to help her figure out how to split the order. I hear him say "we don't do that" but they continue to try figuring this out without saying a word to us. After a little while she hands us our cards and she says "I think it worked." She forgot the water that we ordered so I reminded her about that and we went to go park and eat. They didn't give us any spoons to eat our mashed potatoes so we had to eat it with our fingers, and then later we checked our bank statements to make sure it was accurate. Our roommate was over charged for her food so she'll have to call the bank which is a pain in the ass. The girls attitude was very unprofessional, I work in food service so I am generally pretty understanding but she definitely could work on her customer service skills.
What a waste of a great spot. The bar downstairs is pretty cool but the outside patio is the pits. The food is pricey and not worth it. If you want a place to go to get a beer and people watch this is the place other than that keep movin and you wouldn't be disappointed
Old facility with unengaging staff. Locker rooms are smelly and relatively dirty. Equipment is becoming dated.  I'll not renew unless there are improvements.
Tried this place out today and wow this is the worst Thai food this side of California.   The basil Thai rice is plain with no flavor just ungodly hot with veggies and shrimp.  I don't mind the heat but give me some flavor with the rice.  Just plain jane jasmine rice.  Never again.  I should've known better though.  I was hungry as hell too!
Food was better when the big owner guy and his wife(?) were around.  Now you order a sandwich without mayo/cream and you find that the preparers don't fully follow the orders and you get a little of what you stated you don't want in the sandwiches.  This is even with the tattoed dude writing down exactly what you said.   In short, the attention to detail in the prep of meals has lowered.
For months we have tried to overlook the horrendous service of this place! Tonight, I tried to order three times and the guy hanged up on me. When I tried to talk to the manager the person on the phone was rude and unapologetic. Go next door to Effie's kitchen to support local business . They have great food and awesome service
Yeah, Meh is the perfect word to describe Johnny D's.  Went for a friend's birthday.  We figured it would be the perfect place to go since we usually go out in Boston, and Davis Square is a good change of pace.  So the deal was...reggae night...$10 cover and $12 minimum food order per person.  The reggae band was good, as well as the acoustics of the room.  The decor was a bit college dorm...red lights strung around, and glow in the dark stars and planets on the ceiling.  Grades are out on the mixed drinks and food.  F  Food...I had fish tacos, which were just okay.  The rice was dry.  Everyone had the same complaint about their drinks.  All different drinks, all weak.  We ended up just drinking vodka on the rocks, since you can't screw it up.  Possibly, one too many, as my friend and I decided it was a good idea to have a headstand contest on the ride home in my friend's back seat.  So yeah, you can't mess up the vodka.  I forget our waitress' name, but she was attentive and very nice.  Fun time with the fabulous group I was with.  I would recommend passing on dinner, going somewhere else for drinks, then coming in for the band.
Store owner was texting away on her phone and minimally acknowledged my husband and I as we walked in. Shop was completely empty, clothing is of the 1970s Elton john variety and marked up to obscene prices. Definitely recommend this special store owner watch a few YouTube videos on how to interface with other human beings, or call the professional cuddlers for a cuddle session and cuddle the grouchy goop out of her. Ick, why run a business when you aren't going to be present and appreciative  of your patrons.
visited this past weekend and the majority of the flowers were dead. this place is more like a disorganized jungle than a botanical garden. tried to take some pictures in the gardens, but nothing looked pretty. when we were exiting, we saw a small lily pond in the parking lot with lots of dragonflies as well as lots of other pretty flowers around the parking area.   in a nutshell: save your $2 per person admissions and just enjoy the area AROUND the garden bc it's prettier than the inside.  p.s. this is mosquito central.
The food here was ok, I was really excited at the prospect of a gourmet grilled cheese place but I was sadly let down. The service was terrible, they refused to put ice in their soda machine even though it was making all of their beverages flat, and it was really slow for how few people were in the restaurant. Pretty disappointed in Chedd's..
Ordered a couple sandwiches and some sides online.  Online ordering site (caviar) had tots on the menu but they are not available at this location.  No big deal.  Got a call from the delivery guy who put me on the phone with someone at Bunk.  I asked if I could get a refund for the side that was not available...guy on the phone said ok and passed the phone back to the delivery guy.  However, I overheard the Bunk employee call me "hostile"...  Wow...next time make sure the phone is hung up before you talk about the customer.  Sandwiches were amazing!  Service?  Not so much...hence the low rating.  Maybe I'll give them another chance.  Maybe not...  If I do, I'll go to them so there won't be any perceived "hostility" if I have any questions.
I honestly don't understand why this place is so popular.  The food is very poor by any standard, and very expensive.  There are so many better places for Chinese food near by.  Honestly, just look inside and you'll see that most of their customers are non-asian -- I think that should just tip you off about what kind of food they serve.  Plus it's expensive!
Flies in my water, slow service and food tasted like frozen... Enough said! I had to take my parents to another tea place, it was THAT bad.
I've been to Burnside Brewing Co three times now. I've never been super impressed with the food or the service, but the beer is good and the atmosphere is fun, so whatever. I'll go if it's suggested.   A few weeks ago we got a group of about 6 people together to celebrate two co-workers who were moving onto new careers and we were looking forward to having a nice evening.  Service was terrible. Our server consistently forgot to bring things to us, including water. We asked several times for more and watched her as she chatted with other servers and staff, completely ignoring us. We finally walked up and grabbed the water ourselves, which obviously pissed her off because she was rude and short with us for the rest of the night.   Drinks and orders were confused. Our server brought us wrong drinks and plates of food were brought to our table that we didn't order. When we would try to figure out what was causing all the confusion she was short with us and made it seem like it was our fault we were getting wrong orders and drinks. She never apologized for any of the mistakes or offered to make it right.   When she brought us our check she stood at our table watching us, as if she was waiting for us to hurry up and pay. When we asked her to give us a few minutes she stomped off.   Very unprofessional service. It's unfortunate that one server has left such a bad taste in our mouths. I doubt any of us will be back.
Worst Chinese food I've ever had. Never coming here again. The waitress is nice but the food isn't worth the cost and the food tastes stale.
We had dinner at Tabla twice while staying for our vacation on Islands of Adventure. We had ordered vegetarian dishes and they tasted good both times. Although one of the dish was not cooked properly and we had to get it replaced. A few things that I did not like about Tabla - Ambience is very average, Music is very loud and selection of Bollywood songs was bad, Service is really poor. When I was ordering, the waiter did not write anything down and then botched up the order. Instead of Bhindi Masala, got me Masala Chai. He wasn't even apologetic and was laughing it away.   Both times, my experience of dining here was ruined by either improper cooking or bad service. Otherwise, the food taste was good.   So don't go here for the experience at all. Don't know about Non-vegetarian dishes but they might be good too.
I went with my family that was in town visiting on November 22, 2015. We were a group if 7 and we waited for a table which I understood but then after getting seated it took 20 minutes to get drinks, the 2 shakes that where order took almost 45 minutes to get. Then after an 1 hour I question the server a few times and the manager to see when the food would be out. Finally they bring the food out and it is cold. The only chicken sandwich that was order was made incorrectly. We sent back the chicken sandwich because the stuff that was asked to be removed was due to food allergies. They take it back switch the bread and bring it right back out still with the seeds and juice from the tomatoes all over the check and mayo still on the lettuce. By this time the rest of the group had finished eating so we said forget. They bring out the bill the chicken sandwich is still on it. So the manager tells me after being their for almost 1 1/2 hours will I guess I can remove the chicken sandwich since you didn't get it. I called Corp sitting in the location was advised that I would receive a all back in 2bus days here we are 2 weeks later and still no word. Shows how much the company or store cares.
Rode in Cab #43.  The cab was in such poor condition that it nearly made me vomit.  The vibration cruising down the highway was enough to jar my internal organs loose.  Surprised I didn't hurl from motion sickness.  If I had, I wonder if he would have had the nerve to charge me the $100 cleanup fee.  Do some basic maintenance on your taxi.  This kind of vibration is the result of major, major, major deferred maintenance.  Makes me wonder if it is even safe to ride in cars like that.
very bad customer service. Upon checking in I asked if there was shuttle to the convention center, I was told no - just start walking that way (with a finger point) Turn out there is a shuttle for $2!  The rooms were just ok for the price, very expensive. The cab drivers that are summoned by the hotel were incredibly rude and had a HUGE issue providing any reciepts.  Never again.
Drive thru is awful. Most of the time we end up going inside but that's no better. Twice we have gotten sausage egg McMuffins with no egg. Once got sausage egg McMuffin with no sausage. Once got sausage egg McMuffin with Canadian ham. Threw that one away. Always get the pancakes right tho.
How old is that fish?  What is that?  Fish?  Not sure, is it chopped up and mixed with Thousand Island dressing?    This should not be considered Sushi.  The rice is dry, the Nori crackles.  We went here based on several reviews that the food was good, disregarding the comments about service.  The service while not great, was much better than the food.    According the Google Junai translates to "In the Tree".  That seems apt, the fish must have been in a tree for days before they serve it.  I had Masago (flying fish roe) It was dry...bone dry.  I think they are reconstituting  dried fish?  It is really that bad and I would rather be up in a tree than eat here again.
Bourgeois coffee for the Cambridge elite. Don't know how to make an Americano. Too bright and clean to be trusted. Will need a ciggie after.
NEVER AGAIN! So sick of hearing about how great this place is. The pizza is decent ny style only. Thats it.  Do people in austin ever experience the rest of the world around them?  After waiting 30 minutes for a slice of pepperoni that i didnt want reheated in the first place, i will not be returning... $3.50 for a slice i never got, $1.50 for a soda i left on the counter in frustration, and $1.50 for a tip for service i never got....and not even an offer to correct the situation.  This place is for tourists...and they can have it
For the 3rd time at Black Bear Diner they have seated people ahead of me. I waited 30 mins for a seat and 4 parties... 2-3 people in each seated ahead of me. A older white couple who sat next to me at the entrance waited 10 mins and were seated ahead of me. That was it. Is this racially motivated or what? Screw you Black Bear Diner! I'll take my business elsewhere.
Cosi is pretty bad, but I still come here at least once a week.  Why? I have no idea, lack of the ability to come up with anything else healthy and quick in the area.  The salads are way over priced, unfresh,a nd bland for hte most part.  The sandwiches are a little better, but nothing amazing.  Everybody comes for the bread, but if you eat it, you've pretty much negated the fact that you at a salad for lunch FATTY!  ;0
I'm glad to finally live so close to an HEB, but I have to say, customer service is tanking at this location.   Checkers are usually chatting with other employees throughout the entire checkout, cussing nonchalantly while my younger sister is patiently standing by my side. No manners! They hardly even ask about the WOW items anymore. I don't even want to consider buying 5 candy bars for a dollar now.  Baggers are NONEXISTENT. About half the time I bag my own groceries.  I'm not snobby, ya know? But for as long as I can remember, going to HEB with my mother since I was a wee, the cashiers were so nice!!! Customer service is truly becoming a joke. Nobody likes their job!  Oh, btw, this one older dude, who is always handing out samples of some sort, told me I looked like a martian. Yeah... okay.  Oh! One more thing... it's only open till 1 am. Lame!
Let me start by saying I am a Panera fan  however this location is bad. The staff are inexperienced and goofing off the entire time I was there which was about 2 hours from 2 till 4. The dining room and restrooms were dirty.  I ordered broccoli cheddar soup and Napa chicken salad sandwich the food tasted fine but there was no care in the way it was served. Soup all over the plate. I will not be going back to this location.
If it could give this dealership a zero star review I absolutely would. My personal experience with this particular dealership has been a nightmare. I bought a 2009 GMC Acadia  in January of 2014. Within 2 days the vehicle started  to kick when accelerating. I called Carmax to get my car serviced within the 5 days so that if the car needed returning, I could still do so. Welp, the girl on the phone told me they were too busy to bring the car in and then proceeded to say, " I dont know what to tell you", when I spoke up about needing to get my car in within the 5 days. Since that call, I have brought my car into Carmax about 6 or 7 times for the same problem, which is most likely the transmission since it went out on me after i was told by their service department that everything was fixed. I literally brought it in for a reverse transmission problem and they didnt even review the reverse transmission (still paid deductible btw). It was transferred to the GMC dealership where they found the reverse transmission problem.  The REAL kicker was when the new service manager asked me to bring in the vehicle for a test drive, etc to show them what i meant when i experience the kicking. Well, i couldn't get the kick to happen on the test drive so I left the vehicle with the service department for them to try to recreate the problem. *please note I had already sent Carmax a demand letter to which the store manager did not respond and that is why the service manager requested the test drive* WHEN I PICKED UP THE VEHICLE THEY DIDNT EVEN HAVE THE MAIN COMPLAINT ON THEIR INSPECTION CHECKLIST!!!!  So the entire week the vehicle was there, no one was recreating the problem correctly.  So imagine my surprise when legal department decides to write a letter to settle the dispute. Perfectly fine by me. So now i go to return my vehicle and pick up a check. But of course, it's not available. I have to wait 2-3 days for it. 3 days later, GUESS WHAT?! I have to wait some more!!!!  I am still dumbfounded by how much has gone wrong with this company. There is zero communication between people and nothing anyone says is actually what happens. The only people that i can write good things about are the sales people. I felt very comfortable with them and very knowledgeable. I personally will never buy from them again, but I think my overall experience is of the few and far between. I know many people who love Carmax and only buy their cars from them.
The service was god awful. Took 30 min increments for our waitress to see us, let alone refill our waters. They would not give us the wing deal even though we had a Party of 5, bought 3 apps, 5 meals and 12 drinks. All because we weren't sitting "at the bar".  Then the manager refused to place 2 high chairs at "a bar table" when we were willing to move too accommodate the wing deal rules.   Then our check had an extra meal charged to it. Glad we checked since we ordered so much anyway. Honestly it was their loss because all 5 of us go out to bars to eat every Tuesday and Saturday after our basketball games in Boston. We usually do repeat bar visits to our favorites year around, as well as company outings at our favorite pubs.  Save your money and time on this one and dine in.
My second time here..im still filipino by heart so i really love filipino foods,the first time i came i was with friends we ordered so much foods from pansit to sisig to lumpia etc i have no complain with the taste all of those dishes were good...  My recent visit there's sudden twist of everything it was sunday and a bit busy..the lady behind the till talks so much and somewhat very unprofessional,the service that day was horrible,despite most of the foods i wish to order were not available the service was really bad,i ended up having asado siopao and the palabok i ordered a togo of sizzling bangus but at the end it wasnt available.....would you believed i had my food for almost 8 minutes and i dont have single utensil and napkin...i end up grabbing it bymyself.,the lady and the cook were both busy,they apologizes to every customer anyways..but still not the best service from filipinos.  I dont have complain with the taste of the foods only the service..small eatery maybe can only house lessthan 15 person at a time...street parking,noise level is loud well you know us filipinos when we are together we socialize very well and talk loud etc......  They accept cash and debit card only ...  Well honestly even the service is bad i gezz ill visit again ..wanna try other dishes in the menu....
Should have heeded the Yelp reviews.  Worst car buying experience ever.  The salesman tried to get me to shake on a monthly payment that included every single warranty available without telling me.  I asked him why the monthly payment I calculated online was so much lower, and only then did he tell me it included all the warranties.    I should have walked away then, but I really wanted the vehicle (Hybrid Toyota Highlander).  I got them to throw in all-weather mats as they wouldn't give much on the price (again, should have walked away).      When I came in the next day to get the all-weather mats, they made me pay $50 because they didn't know I wanted mats for the back area.  $50?  Talk about nickel and diming a customer.  Two weeks later I found the same car at Royal Moore Toyota with less miles for about $5k cheaper. That's quite a difference.   After a month, the car's electrical system failed on me while I was driving, forcing me to pull over to the side of the road with my pregnant wife and requiring the car to be towed.  They fixed the problem (at least no problems so far) but I have lost a lot of confidence in the vehicle.    I've recently had an issue with the key and have been calling them for about 2 weeks and never getting a return call.  Worst customer service ever.  First Toyota I've ever owned, and although I like the car, I will probably never buy a Toyota again because of this dealership.
Good 'ole T-Mac. Consistent and reliable, and that's what I like most about it. I've been eating at this establishment for years, and I really love their consistency between locations.   On this last occasion, we came in before I worked an event in the area. I skipped lunch earlier because I was working, and needed good food fast. Plus, boyfriend wanted to watch the football game, and T-Mac definitely has enough screens to choose from.  I ordered the Sante Fe Wrap, which I've had before but not since they redid the menu. I didn't read the description correctly, and it came out with a ton of rice inside the wrap. And it was really thick, fluffy rice at that. I had to scrape a lot out because it became too starchy too quickly. But overall it was good and I ended up full before going to work.  Boyfriend got the wings, like he usually does. Another perk about T-Mac is they're really nice about letting you split sauces, even on small orders. And, this location has pretty good fry cooking techniques. The last location we went to, by Phillips Arena, gave us soggy fries.  My main complaint with the experience was the fact that I didn't get the hard cider I wanted; this is more on the POS/management side than an issue with our server. I asked for a seasonal Woodchuck, and the server brought me the traditional Amber instead. When we brought this to her attention, she said they don't sell a lot of the seasonal and it's not in the walk-in. So they don't have a button for it. So... why have it on the beer list if there's not a way for the server to ring it in correctly and for the bartender to pull the correct drink? Doesn't make sense. I wish I had brought it up to the manager while I was there.  Overall it's not a bad place. Good for watching sports and drinking a ton of different beers.
Just ate from this place and the customer service is terrible. Some orders didn't come as we asked and several foods we didn't even ordered were served. There is also one server with blue plastic gloves that was especially rude, snatching the ordering paper from us and smacking it back onto our table when clearly they made a mistake with out order.
This was my first time ever trying Flippers and I was excited because I heard some good things about it but I am genuinely annoyed at how big of a rip off it was.   I got the penne Mac and cheese and added prosciutto for $2.99 more for a total of about $15. The container was no where near full, probably about 2/3 full and way less than I expected and the amount of prosciutto I got was literally the length of my finger. I could get a much bigger plate of something similar for less at any typical Italian restaurant.   The bread sticks were bathing in grease and were nothing special, it was literally like eating a hot piece of white wonder bread posing as a bread stick. I feel disappointed and ripped off when it comes to Flippers.
Yuck. Yuck. Yuck.  Greasy. Nasty. Dirty.   Big piece of chicken petrified under our table.  Stay away.  We looked long and hard for some dish we could eat but only found nasty, greasy, semi-warm glop.  The fried rice looked and tasted like it had been there for days.  We ate a few bites of a few things then ran like hell.  A terrible 15 minute meal, if it could be called that.    The floors were filthy, the seats dirty and torn.  Run far and fast from this place.  The worst of the worst.
When you read a critical review among a sea of positive reviews, your first impression is the reviewer in question is nitpicking or simply crazy. I can assure you that I am neither. Rather I am surprised this hotel has received such strong praise. Overa6ll, I would not recommend this hotel. This does not resemble the service and quality of rooms found in the New York Waldorf among others. As one reviewer said: "It's a Waldorf in name only" and I agree with this.   First, our room was hot. And not just the room, the entire hallway outside was warm as if you were standing outside. Our thermostat was deliberately set so that you could not lower it below 68 degrees. And even at 68 degrees, it felt more like it was 75 degrees. When we complained to the front desk, the technician arrived and removed this restriction so that you could set it to 62 degrees. We set the unit at 62 degrees and the unit could not go below 67 which felt like 74-75. It was clear from our standpoint, that the thermostat was clearly off and the A/C unit was not efficient. This is what I would expect from a motel and not a supposed 5 star hotel.   Another reviewer cited a leaking shower. That was our experience as well. The caulking on the base of the shower was loose and water soaked the floor after our shower.   Another reviewer cited the questionable size of their King bed claiming it was a Queen size bed. This was our experience as well. The bed was small and it clearly was not a King size bed in our opinion.   Many reviewers cited the pool as being a plus. I find that hard to believe. The pools were standard square pools that can be found in any 2 or 3 star hotel. Actually, the pool at the conjoined Hilton had a much nicer pool. The Hilton pool had a lazy river with a nice long snake like shape with a beautiful layout.   This leads me to my second point. The Hilton Bonnet Creek Resort is attached to the Waldorf Astoria (in case you were not aware of this).  The Bonnet Creek was a much nicer hotel in our opinion. It's lobby was larger and more gallant. It had a much more festive Christmas decoration and a livelier ambience. We originally booked with the Bonnet Creek, but they oversold their rooms so they moved us to the Waldorf as an "courtesy upgrade" We read between the lines and insisted we would prefer to stay at the Bonnet Creek but no such luck, they had no rooms left.  It was fairly obvious that most people preferred to stay at the Hilton than the Waldorf and you can understand why.    So what was good about the hotel? The service was fantastic. Everyone was polite and friendly. The hotel is new so it is very contemporary. The water pressure in the shower was outstanding. The shower amenities were Salvatore Fergamo. A blue ray player was included in the room. The sheets smelled clean and the bed was well made.  The floors were quiet as well. The guests seem to be fairly classy and there were no loud and obnoxious people which can make a stay less enjoyable.   In conclusion, if you are going to pay $400 dollars per night, you are better off spending that type of money at the Four Seasons, Ritz Carleton or one of the more upscale DIsney resorts like the Contemporary IMHO
We used to LOVE this place!  However, due to change of ownership I guess?  They have gone WAY downhill.  It's a great loss to us, and too many, many other people, I'm sure!
I think this place gives me diarrhea. That is not saying much, because if you really stink about it, most fast food joints, and even restaurants, are wont to give you intestinal problems. .. I'm getting older and thinking about these things. I want more control over my poopy. Seriously, test it out, the next time you eat at "your favorite neighborhood pizza place" or Chinese place or whatever. My advice to you: Do what I did and find a man who can cook-
My husband and I went to the Mediterranean Grill yesterday.  I had the Combination Platter, he had the Shishkabob plate.  The tab for 2 was $22.  Food was good, but not to die for.  The meat on the Combination plate included one lamb kabob, which was excellent, a grilled piece of meat  which I'm guessing was beef which was tasty and some gyro meat which was yucky.  It was too salty, overprocessed, gelatinous ...yuck.    It was served with salad of iceberg lettuce, tomatoes and cucumbers, pretty basic but the tatziki sauce that accompanied it was very good.  all this was served over luke warm  rice which was mediocre.    Would I go back?  Not in a hurry.
Ew.  Boston's decent bars are generally either sketchy but cheap and ridiculously fun for the college crowd or really trendy and overpriced for the local yuppies (which could include college students...).  Whiskey's is neither.  It's just... kinda gross.  Free tortilla chips if you're drinking after 11.  Something about serving food with all the liquor.
Not my favorite spot..  ive been there on 3 seperate occasions. Each just as bad as the last. Flavor selection was okay, but ive definitely been other places with triple the amount of choices. Customer service was the worst ive ever had. Just a bunch, more like 1 or 2, teenagers just there to get a paycheck. No smile, no "hello how are you?" , nothing. And prices? Outta this world. I think the whole price by weight thing is crazy anyways. $7+ for one frozen yogurt? Nope im good.
I ordered dinner here last Tuesday and I'm still waiting on it.  Horrible service and the kitchen staff cook at the same pace as senior citizens having sex...not fast.
I'll give you the down low on the real 97 Estoria. Every time I come here there's either someone puking on the floor or doing coke off the sink in the bathroom. A musician recently got shot in the parking lot after playing a show, too. This place is sketch as a mofo, and the "ambiance" isn't worth a bullet in the face... However, place is cool when the sun is still out. Burgers are off the chain and I love a place you can smoke in.
This place has okay food, but the staff always seems miserable.  There is one guy who is always in the kitchen and I swear he doesn't like me.  And I don't get it.  What did I do?  Order food?  Support your business?  If I didn't live across the street I would never have gone there more than once.  I still try to avoid, but not a ton of options in the area.
Ordered carry out green curry and it looked great. Unfortunately it was packed in a brown bag with the lid unsealed, which busted open and spilled all over me. Despite patiently explaining the situation to the server, the manager wouldn't come out to speak to me. Her staff offered to give me half off (Only after blaming me for how I must have been carrying it). Unbelievable.
Worst customer service ever. Wouldn't recommend this place to my worst enemy. They need to invest in better associates and customer service training.  I have spent over $4000 in the last 6 months and I wish I could return everything . I went into return something. It seems like every time I go to return or exchange something there is an issue. They never have a problem taking my money though . I waited in line for about 15 minutes. I waited very patiently. I decided to go get what I wanted to exchange. When I got back, the cashier Simone was sitting on cash desk as if there was nothing to do. She proceeded to process my return with no apology or anything. I had asked was there anyone who could have helped me earlier and she said no meanwhile there were about 8 other walking around doing nothing. I said what about the manager, she said he's the manager duh he doesn't ring people up .I worked in retail management over 13 years so this statement was very puzzling. I told her I didn't have the receipt, but it was bought off my registry. She did some things in the computer and told me I had closed my  registry out and she couldn't find it. She had to give me the lowest price. I explained to her I had no idea what she was talking about, I hadn't done anything with the registry besides starting it. She said you used your discount and gift card . I had clue what she was talking about. She called someone else up, and somehow my registry mysteriously reappeared with no apology or anything. I told Simone she had been rude this entire experience and she turned to me and said I had been Rude too. I asked for the manager,which he was no assistance. Simone continued to argue with the me with the manager standing there. I was in utter disbelief . On top of that I had purchased a nose Frida previously. There was a piece missing . She processed the exchange same item and told me I owed her $5. What, there was a piece missing. Needless to say they made it an even exchange but upon checking my bag, she gave the same exact one that I had brought back. I told her error and she went back to investigate as if I were lying. At this point do you think I got an apology...yeah right just death stares while I talked to the manager. The only thing the  manager was concerned about was me purchasing the items in my cart. I will never return here and I pass the word on to everyone here in Atlanta.
The 2 stars is for this specific location. Tin Drum overall is a pretty good fast food restaurant. I work near here and often order pickup for lunch, and the food is somewhat decent aside from them forgetting to add certain ingredients from time to time. This last time was the last straw, and I will probably not return to this location. I ordered the basil fried rice and although they added the teriyaki sauce I requested which was nice the whole meal was terrible. They drowned the rice in the teriyaki sauce but the worst part was how burnt the food was. I tried to make due but every bite had a strong taste of charcoal! My guess is they cooked this way earlier and wanted to reheat it by throwing it back on the grill which they obviously are not cleaning regularly. Had to throw most of it away.
This is probably one of the worst Chinese buffets that I have visited. The food was typical Chinese food except it was very oily. It was barely tolerable. The sushi was decent. The service was mediocre. Our server brought our drinks and we didn't see him again. Our plates piled up and our drinks were never refilled. Another server did eventually come to clean our table, but by that time we were ready to leave. We will not be visiting again.
First time I ever visited Engine House it was a very busy night after the parade in Salem. I could completely understand (to an extent) how my simple order of a slice of pepperoni pizza could get lost among my friend's orders, as well as the swarm of other people's. After waiting 15 minutes and watching the rest of my group who ordered after me get their food, I asked one of the cashiers about my order. It was brought out to me momentarily, ice cold and covered in grease. I ignored it because the place was so busy and figured it was a fluke thing.  Second time coming here will be the last. A friend and I showed up at 9:45 on a Tuesday looking for something quick. He got a beer and two slices of pizza (which is actually half a pizza in their book) and I ordered cheese fries. Well, I'm lucky he ordered those slices, because even though the place was virtually empty aside from us two, I waited over 20 minutes for my fries and had to ask the girl working the front about them. I made the mistake of only saying, "Hey, I ordered some fries a while ago," instead of specifying cheese fries, thinking she would remember or at least have my slip since I was the last person she took an order from. I ended up only getting plain fries. I didn't feel like causing an issue and simply left.   Aside from the horrible service, the fries were good. But don't bother going here if you like competent staff who can remember your order.
I call in to ask a few questions before i even step foot into the office, i'm sure the dentist is great but who ever answered the phone was extremely rude and did not answer any my questions, she replied "we don't that that here, what you need do is to get on duh internet and type in Orthodontist, You welcome" and hung up. just from the way she answered the phone i would not like to go into the office.
This place is absolutely terrible.   I'll start off by stating that management is terrible and services are just as bad. Even the guy that checks you in talks about the workers as "kuckleheads," and having to check all their work because they're constantly making mistakes.   The bullet points:  - I ordered tires online and had them delivered here.  - Tracking said they were delivered, so I called the next morning to make an appointment to have them installed. They said they couldn't find them anywhere, so to call back in the afternoon when the night shift guy was in. I needed them installed that day, and they said it wouldn't be an issue.  - I went in in the afternoon, and they said they still couldn't find them. That maybe I shipped them to the wrong Firestone. Eventually, they let me walk into the shop to look for them and they were literally the first stack of tires sitting on the floor when I walked in. - At that point, they said they could no longer install them that day because "corporate" told them to close early (I think it was a holiday the next day).  - To make up for the inconvenience, they'd do the installation for half price, and provide me with free rotation and balancing for life. This was confirmed by the manager.  - I go back the next day they are open, manager checks me in and gives me the discount on the installation, but is charging me for the lifetime rotation and balancing. I asked him why they were charging me for the rotations, and he said they're free when I come back. I told him, "it's not free if I"m paying for it now." And he just kept saying, "it's free when you come back." When I reminded him what he and his associate had confirmed the day before, he got angry and said, "I'm already giving you a discount, I'm not giving you anything for free." As if I was asking or demanding it as opposed to it simply being what they offered me the day before. - I said fine, just do the installation and that's all I'll pay for. Took a couple hours, and I left. Less than twenty miles later, my tire pressure warning goes off and I have to go back to the shop to see what the problem was.  - I walk in and the manager asks how he can help me as if he's never seen me before in his life. I told him the problem and he asked for my keys, and then completely ignored me. He gave my keys to someone else and didn't say I word, so I followed them out to my car. The shop manager and a mechanic came out and the first thing he says to the manager was, "remember I was telling you the air pump isn't working right? The gauge is messed up." So apparently they had over inflated my tires, known it was an issue, told a manager who did nothing, and neither one of them manually checked the tires with a different gauge to make sure they were inflated properly. So instead of my brand new tires being properly inflated to 34 psi, they were at 49 psi. They let the air out and just said I'd be good to go after wasting more than half of my day.   Don't go here.
I ordered my sweetheart swizzle bouquet on Monday November 9, 2016 around 1 pm . It didn't show up to the recipients house till about 7:44 pm granted I understand they were busy and had a lot of orders to get out but by the time it got there they didn't pick it up from their concierge till about 9 pm , just a little disappointed on the delivery time. What really makes me angry is the fact I spent over 60.00 on the small white chocolate covered strawberry hints the fact and picture and DESCRIPTION!! On the advertised item it says "swizzle" (chocolate swizzles on the white chocolate ) tell me why as I looked at them today and they were completely just white chocolate covered and NO chocolate swizzles. I literally thought to myself did I just pay to have strawberries dipped I could have done that in fondue myself, no I paid for edible Arrangments signature craft of design and cuteness ,but instead the strawberries looked sad and boring as if it were carelessly dipped . I was embarrassed by how they looked for my recipient  , the taste was fresh but as far as how it was presented very dissatisfied.
thier only a couple of words tell any customers ,who wants bad food over priced bad food and over rated services ,who are thier own time not your,so good luck
I'm mystified by all the good reviews. The portions were insanely tiny (and pricey) with way too much mayo. The atmosphere feels sterile and generic in a mall like way. The only redeeming thing was the service which was quick and friendly. I won't be going back.
Today was my 3rd and last visit to this place. I ordered  a Beer and to my surprise  I got Mug  all stained with red lipstick ,I brought the Issue  to an employee  attention , I later learned his name was Mike. He took care of it and treated  me to a Beer . I ordered  a soup and it was  stone cold , I told the waiter Kevin .. I think that was his name  and he took it  back ; mind you restaurant  was only occupied  by Us and one other couple . I drank 2 Beers before the soup made its way thru 4 sets of hands , yes 4 people in the kitchen all talking about the soup and no one but Mike seemed to care ,  he bent over  backwards  apologizing  for some other staff members  mistake. Who is to blame,? The kitchen  staff or the server? It was more than  obvious  that the soup was cold and if the server  was doing his job he would have noticed the cold bowl and if the kitchen staff understood that while cooking is in there job description ,   going out for dinner is a treat . Little  is to say that spite Mikes efforts  to make it up to us We will never go back.
My friend and I had been to this place twice before and everything went well. Today after we finish shopping at Macy's we decide to stop by to grab lunch. we walked in and sat down. It took about 7 minutes before a waitress came over with a menu and asked to take our drink order. After we got our drinks we sat for about 20 minute and no one came over to take our food order. The whole time we sat there i notice a waitress going around taking orders for other people. I went to talk to the guy at the bar about the situation. I wish I knew his name but anyway, he told me that we should have walk to the bar and order our food. Then I asked him how come everyone else get to order from their seat but we have to walk to the bar to order, plus no one told us that when we walked in. he reply was, well i am telling you now. My friend and I just paid for our drinks and left.   Now, I hate to bring race to this situation  but the one thing i notice was that everyone else at the restaurant was white with the exception of my friend and I. Maybe this has nothing to do with race , just an idiot they hired as a bar attender. I wanted to say more to this guy but decide not to because I didn't want be viewed as the angry black man.   But one thing I know is that I will never step foot in the place again and i will discourage anyone I know from going there. I am going to try to get in touch with the manager to voice out my frustration.
Got pad thai and some vegetable dish take out. I asked for three pad thai not to be so sweet but to be tangy. What I got was inedible bland noodle and boiled chicken.  Horrible. The vegetable dish was good. When I ordered the person barely spoke english and I couldn't understand them. Makes it hard to order obviously. Normally the pad thai is just ok, little better than average. Pisses me off when the people these businesses put on the phone to communicate with you can't speak the language of the country they are in  (English obviously)or their accent is so bad that I have to keep shouting what, what and don't even know what I'm ordering. What a waste of money all because of their stupidity. I will not order again. There had got to be a place with more respect for its customers. I threw the pad thai out it was so bad.
As far as car rental agencies go, this place leaves a lot to be desired. I wanted to save a few bucks, so I used hotwire.com to get a dirt cheap rate on a car for 4 days. Most car rental places are very customer centric, as they operate in a competitive industry. Unfortunately, this was not the case with Thrifty. Upon walking in to get my car, I knew it wasn't going to go well. No one greeted me. It was as though I was putting them out for me to get help. Then there wasn't initially a car ready. Even though I booked a reservation a few days before, it was as though my presence to pick up a car at the designated time was a surprise to them. They finally got a car for me, and it hadn't been cleaned. It needed a good vacuuming and other general cleaning. As if things couldn't get any worse, when I tried to leave their location, the man at the security gate who normally looks at your contract and opens the gate told me that there some paperwork missing. I put the car in reverse and went back in, and the guy who set me up with the car had to speak to him to allow me to leave. No one even apologized for the inconvenience. Absolutely no idea as to what customer service entails! Anyway, I think you get the picture. This place really sucks. The only reason I gave it 2 stars rather than just 1 was due to the very low rate I paid for the car.
they suck so bad so patchy and one of my eyes came out awful so they look uneven. lashes on one eye are waaay too short and the other eye are way too long. they suck and were awful
Why does everyone and their Mom find this place a decent place to eat! It's always the place my out of town friends & family want to go to after I pick them up at PDX.   This location is the worst! I have been here probably no less than 10 times (Not my choice!). Every time I go they are not too busy and every time my food takes 45 minutes or longer to get. Even when all I do is order a salad!   Their excuse always is "we are short staffed." The Management really needs help here. I have returned my food twice for being cold and another time because they gave us someone else's order! And they never refill drinks or ask if everything is alright (probably because they know you will say NO!).  I wish I could say I will never go back, but I am sure my time will be wasted again at this joint. Buffalo Wild Wings across the street is just as terrible. I just want my friends & family happy, so Red Robin is just lucky they are a popular chain known everywhere, so they will stay open no matter what kind of shitty food & service they give. ;(
Overcooked food. I understand that Disney restaurants are overpriced to begin with but this place is not worth your money. Service was forced, but waiter tried very hard so have to give him points for that. Have to admit that the Tuna nachos were great, but everything else was below average.
My friend bought 3 massages for my birthday in April. I made an appointment & when I showed up was asked for an actual gift card which I never received. I spoke with someone who informed me that the massages expired and "unfortunately" someone looked up the wrong account... so basically they take people's money & don't give them the services. 2nd bad experience with this company & I am not impressed. Their mistake should be fixed by them. I shouldn't be the one to pay for an employees mistake.
If you like sushi, go elsewhere. Bland, boring and way overpriced.  The gyoza were fair. The Hamachi Kama was the one very good dish we had. The unagi was served cold - that's a sin.  The bigger sin is that I asked first if it was freshly grilled and served hot and was told yes. The anago was cold - refrigerator cold.  The wasabi tuna roll?  Boring and came right out of a cooler.  We had a few other things - none of them worth a mention for good or bad.  We left, went to Trader Joe's, bought some food and went home and ate a real meal.  Bluefin is a waste of time and money.
Terrible service, I literally had to go to the bar to get a pitcher water bc the waitress never gave us our drinks. We had a reservation at 1pm didn't get our food until 2:35. It was so loud that you had to yell your order. So that mightve added to the confusion when my friend asked for sunny side up eggs, the waitress clarified, and after almost an hour when he got his food he got scrambled eggs.   If you feel like eating brunch in the middle of the club with frantically inept service then go there. Otherwise, I'd probably eat elsewhere.  I will say the music selection was good (just too loud) and the food was decent (if you actually got your correct order, and in a decent amount of time). Hence the 2 stars instead of just 1.
Bubble World was one of the, if not, the first real popular bubble tea establishment around the city. Unfortunately, other bubble tea shops have surpassed them in both quality and value (Bubble World does not use the stamp cards anymore, too bad). We'd only come back if we were absolutely craving bubble tea and nothing else was open.
This gym has a great set up but the lack of airconditioning in the summer is brutal and they don't seem to care about it.  The staff isn't the most friendly but given the options (limited as it is) it is worth a go.
I love this Whole Foods because it is the personification of life in Boston: bitter competition with too many people for overpriced resources.  Treat yourself to their parking lot - especially on the weekend - I dare you.   #CursedOutByAMomInARangeRoverInFrontOfHerChild
I was happy to see a new restaurant open up in East Andrews finally, but Bar Americano was a massive disappointment. The interior of this place looks great - it doesn't resemble the wine bar at all - but unfortunately the service and drinks do not hold up. First off, there was no beer...said they ran out the night before. Hm. The menu lists about 10 beers on tap, but there were none. They also list 4 or 5 bottled beers - none of those either. You ran out of beer on a Thursday and not prepared for a Friday? The cocktails we ordered were VERY small and quite terrible. An Old Fasioned isn't that hard, but this one was sub par. It was like this was the first day they were open. They need to get their shit together. Probably won't be back any time soon.
Maggianos refused to serve us family style. There were 5 of is out of a party of 15 that wanted family style. They refused. I understand that they don't want the rest of the party taking advantage... But the rest of our group had already ordered. I spoke the to the manager he have us some bogus excuse about "inventory" if the 5 of is were at a separate table it would have been the same thing. So much for a "family style" resturaunt. STAY AWAY false advertisement!!! Menu states 4 or more for family style no fine print or exception to to the rule!
They should call this the Yuk and Yukkier.  Really hated the what ever kind if goop they served today what ever it was it wasn't Asian. Do yourself a favor and pack a sandwich. The shows are great but the food at the parks have a lot to be desired.
This would be a three star review, but the service was so freakin' bad I had to knock off 2 stars.  First, even with plenty of open tables, we had to wait. When we were seated, two men were seated a few minutes after us. We waited.  And we waited.  And we waited.  And then? The men who were seated after us got their water and their orders taken! Lucky them!  And we waited.  And we waited.  And someone brought us water.  And then someone took our order. An appetizer and two bowls of Pho.  And we waited.  And we waited.  And we waited.  And the guys next to us got their food! Yay! So happy for them, seriously, so happy.  And we waited.  And we waited.  And we got our Pho! So happy! Yay! Except the pho was mediocre. The broth was weak, missing that complex depth of flavor I love so much.  The meat is already in the soup, and even though I prefer to put it in myself, it came out cooked nicely with a nice red center. However, when I ate it, the broth didn't seem to have gotten hot enough to give a warm red center to the meat. Is that why I don't feel so well right now? I don't know, but I wonder.  Oh yeah, we were still waiting for that appetizer.  And we waited.  And finally someone came out to let us know that it would still be a while for our appetizers.  We were more than halfway finished with our Pho.  So we said 86 the ap please. And get Gordon Ramsey here, STAT.
We went there on Feb. 13th for dinner. It's about 6 o'clock and not fully full at that time. Food came so slow and services were not attentive. We waited for our team to come, waited for food to came and sent 1.30 hours for waiting simple 4 dishes. Prices are overpriced for many dishes in my opinion. May not come back.
This is one of the hardest things to write that I can remember.  I had been a patient of Capitol Pain for years.  Meeting Dr. Schocket was a breath of fresh air.  The wait was long, but after meeting him I understood why.  He was smart, concerned, understanding, and willing to spend the time to find a fix for my pain.  There were some flare ups now and then, but overall my pain was managed. Fast forward a couple of years.  I had started seeing his PA.  She was a good PA.  The handoff was horrible.  I didn't know that I was going to stop seeing  Dr. Schocket.  It happened, I adapted, didn't love it, but it was OK. Now to this last year.  Capitol Pain has been going through some major growing pains.  Two new doctors, additional PA's, etc.  I had become disenchanted from my original experience, but this was a doctor's office.  My health was their primary concern right?  So I was willing to deal with it. That was until my financial situation changed drastically 7 months ago.  Unfortunately, I had been on a high dose of a narcotic medication for years.  The first few months were hard paying their hefty uninsured office visit fee, but I managed it.  Over the last few months it had become more difficult.  The staff was great, but Dr. Schocket had a policy, if I can't pay I can't come in to get my next month's prescription for the narcotic medication he put me on and was physically dependent on for over 3 years.  They do not have a financial aid associate in their office.  They are very happy to send information over to organizations or drug companies that do recognize financial need, but for God sake do not ask them to discount their fee during your financial crisis, it won't happen.  At my last visit, I had the money to pay for my office visit (compromising my utility bills).  When I got there, I asked the very nice receptionist if I could pay less and go on a payment plan over the next few months for the difference.  Side note:  I had issues with paying my bill the previous months.  After truly extraordinary efforts from my PA, discussing every possible option we came up with a game plan that would buy me a little time to get my office visit payment together.  During that creative prescriptioning, she mentioned that I could ask for my next visit to be separated on a payment plan and would let the billing department know that I would be requesting that.  Back to that next visit.  The receptionist did not have the authority to discount my visit, but indicated that Dr. Schocket had let people pay a portion of it.  So she went to get approval.  Dr. Schocket said no.  Pay it all or don't get seen, don't get my prescriptions, too bad so sad. So, my last communications with Capitol Pain Institute ensued this month.  I saved my money to insure I had my office visit covered this time, but there were other hurdles with my car trying to get to my appointment.  When I straightened all of that out I called to reschedule.  I was told that in order to schedule a new appointment I was going to have to pay the full fee for my missed appointment.  Point of note, I had been on the phone with their office 3 separate times the date of my appointment keeping them apprised of my car situation.  Not to mention that they were asking me to come in early because the doctor needed to leave early that day.  That was it.  I decided to call the PA and ask for medication to detox off of the pain medications that were holding me hostage to this unrecognizable physician's office.  They granted my request.  I ask what to expect and was told to take the medication for nausea and the medication for sweats and tremors.  After a few days I would be fine and that was it.  WRONG! The detoxification process I went through was torture.  It was worse than any therapies I went through to battle cancer including multiple chemotherapies, radiation, and surgeries!  I was alone which was dangerous.  A fact that was never asked by Capitol Pain.  And as of today I have not received a single follow up phone call from their office.  It breaks my heart to write this review.  Scan through some.  The older the review the better..  They need to get back to that.  To stop putting the dollar before the patient, hire a financial counselor, offer the possibility of exit strategies with chronic pain patients, or at least try.  Dr. Schocket needs to rediscover the compassion for his patients over his desire to earn money. Once I emerged from the pits of at home detoxification, I have no pain.  The pain that I "thought" I was experiencing over the last few years was withdrawal from the medication.  As happy as I am with my pain free, clear headed life, I am very disappointed that there was not any discussions over the last 3 years about trying to stop taking the medication to see where things were at.  For those reading this review, clearly you are in a bad place and need a pain manager.  There was a time Dr. Schocket was the doctor I would recommend.  For now, run.
Doesn't even deserve a one star. Horrible service. Was in the building for an hour before we even got our food. I had to go up to the bar and asked to be waited on. TWICE. I've never written a yelp review before. But I am so disgusted with this establishment that I had to.
This location could have easily taken my situation and made it better...making me a happy customer and not lose $ on my deal.  No such luck...this location is as incompetent as many other Enterprise locations.  I had rented an Enterprise car from Logan airport for 2 full weeks, but a couple days into the rental, the indicator light comes on that says the car has less than 5% oil life in the car.  Knowing I would be driving the car for 2 more weeks, and traveling extensively out-of-state, I do the responsible thing...I check w/ the airport location on which "neighborhood locations" (closer to where I would be staying) I could go to to trade out for a different car.  Several calls ("just ignore it", "there are no locations that have cars available", "they're closed for the holidays until next week") later, I finally get to Woburn location on a day that I should have been spending with my family.  They ask me if I want to wait for the oil to be changed...excuse me?!?  I'm not spending my vacation waiting for my car to be serviced...just switch out the car and send me on my way!!!  I put up a stink and chew out the poor service clerk behind the desk, since it's the airport location's fault that I'm in here in the first place.  He finally agrees to give me a replacement car.  OK, this is more like it but I really didn't want to get mean to get service...anyway, I drive away and to my destination...when I get there, I realize the poor service clerk I was feeling sorry for had kept my driver's license.  I drive all the way back, have to wait for the staffer to get off the phone, to get my license back...no more sympathy for this guy- I hate him and have a feeling he did it on purpose.  In total, probably lost 2 hours of my day dealing w/ this Enterprise location.  I decide to deal w/ the airport location in getting compensated for my troubles...all in all, I rented from Enterprise b/c the rates are cheaper, so I got what I paid for...mediocre service all around.
A few years ago Flip Burger 'Boutique' (really, boutique?) was a novel concept. These days, with the vast array of burger spots, Flip Burger is one of several choices. Has Richard Blais the 'creative director', been creative with this concept? Yes. Without a doubt. But this is a burger place and the only thing creative about it is the fact Flip Burger has led you to believe you need to pay exorbitant prices for a 'grass-fed' tiny little burger with 'exotic' toppings like kimchi (which isn't all that exotic) while sitting with tattooed hipsters in white plastic booths which resemble something out of James Bond's Octopussy.   The space is well designed. Food quality is erratic. Service, even during off peak hours: spotty. Price point: Pricey.
Can I give a half star?  This bar is pathetic.  It has dollar drafts of cheep beers that gets young college people in the door.  Its just people that don't know anywhere else to go.  It's always dirty and disgusting.    For mixed drinks they are measured to one shot and are in plastic cups.  And they are charging around $7 for a mixed drink.  Mixed drinks are more than one shot, and they use the smallest plastic cups they can find.  FYI: Please bring a paper bag for girls you meet there and a flask to spice up your "water cups."  The owners should be ashamed that they are so cheap and are willing to let their bar have dirt in clear sight, literally everywhere.  A thanks for giving college kids a smelly dirty place for them to think is cool.  This bar totally lowers the expectations of a Nightlife experience.  People go here, if they don't know any better.  Complacency doesn't deserve rewards.  People throw out stars at this bar because they are 21 and have been to, oh, random guess: 3 bars lifetime. .
A perfect example that looks and decor aren't everything. Despite all the flashy cars outside and the amazing interior and ambiance, the food and service of Slate are comparable to your local Outback Steakhouse.  I am sure you are thinking that I am being extreme comparing a high concept farm to table restaurant to that of a fake Australian chain restaurant but it is simply a fact.  To start, the restaurant itself is absolutely beautiful and very well designed.  It has a great ambiance to it and I loved the setup of Slate.  Unfortunately this is where things stopped being good and our first impression of the interior faded away as we sat down to begin our dining experience.  Now to be fair, they were busy and everyone was running around.  We did go on a Saturday night and based on the cars outside this was definitely a popular destination for those who were seeking an "upscale" dining experience.   However, no matter how busy a restaurant and its staff may be, there is no excuse that it takes 20 minutes just to get a coke.  I don't remember the servers name but he seemed to have literally forgotten about us at one point.  He was pleasant and asked us if we wanted drinks. I wanted a coke and my girlfriend an alcoholic beverage.  Now I get that her drink needed to made but still could have gotten my coke sooner than 20 minutes.  It is bad enough they don't even give you Ice Water but to have the appetizer arrive before our drinks was ridiculous. We had the calamari which was pretty solid but when you are drinking lukewarm water with it, it takes away from the pleasure of the meal.   We eventually did get our drinks and waited patiently for the food.  She had flat iron steak and I had the Ribs.  Her steak came out cold as did her side order of asparagus. It wasn't bad but just cold. My ribs were solid (think Outback or any local BBQ restaurant) and the french fries were excellent.   If you are looking for some amazing french fries than Slate is the place to be. For some decent food, you can do better. Again, I don't think the food was bad. However the price of the establishment really demands that the food taste above and beyond what one can get at a corporate chain restaurant. You can taste the difference when you go to certain upscale restaurants. At Slate you can't and that is the problem.
To give you a idea how bad the service was here, they played the same song on repeat for the entire 40 minutes we were in there. The two teenage waitresses just sit in the back on their phones and giggle instead of taking care of their tables. The food was alright actually but the service was so bad Ill never be back.
Never again. We picked up a suit after 4 days.  We realized once we got home that it had not been cleaned up... Same smell, same stain. And of course we paid for it. Please don't go. If you do make sure you check everything at pick up.
Love the food but they take forever to make your sandwich and their customer service is awful.  They seemingly lost my order even though I was the only customer when I walked up.  After the 4 people after me got their food I asked about my sandwich and they said "oh, I don't know what happened to that" and tried to give me someone else's sandwich.  I had ordered some customizations to mine, so they remade it and barely even apologized for the inconvenience, or for the 20 minutes I waited before realizing my food wasn't coming out.
Things Not to do When You Become a "Grownup" .  1. Wait on line for more than 2 minutes to go to a bar. Unless the drinks have diamonds at the bottom of every glass.  2. Wait on line behind tourists, under 21's, entry level employees and people who are there to bump into you and spill your drink.  3. Listen or care about "rules" at a bar. Like, no buying more than one drink unless they can see who you are buying it for  or "You can't stand there."  4. You don't go anywhere where you can't sit if you want to or move if you want, or order a drink if you want to. Why the crowd? There aren't any other Mexican Irish bars in Boston? No Julio McTavish's? No Jesus O'Malley's? How about Patrick Rodriguez'z?  God I hope Not.
I've lived in Philly for 40 years and was pleasantly surprised when Yelping my way through Orlando, to see the good reviews on LaSpadas. I've had cheesesteaks all over the Philly area and would rank the Florida LaSpada as a solid 6.5 on 1-10 scale. But I must bring up one sad point. It may have been the filthiest steak joint I was ever in. Bathroom was crazy bad, and the dining area was not much better. Come on boys. Break open the old Lestoil and Comet once a year at least. Yo.
Getting through was okay, the only thing I have to complain about with the cruise port itself is that they only have one person taking your luggage... If you are planning going on the Norwegian Dawn do not do it, we were first and last time cruisers. They work their employees like slaves, and the boat is filled with drinks and little kids. On the way out I was taken back by how rude one of the cops was to my family member as we crossed the street he cat called her and called her "baby".  If you are looking at reviews for this I am assuming you are planning a cruise, if you love to drink and don't like watching your kids this cruise is for you. I could go on and on about how I have bruises the size of golf balls on my stomach from being kicked by little kids or how the food is cafeteria food and it's the same thing every single day, but I think you get the just of it.
First instinct was wow this place is big and has a great menu. Very expensive but great atmosphere. The table was sticky, seats were dirty. Waitress was very informative however extremely slow. Got our appetizer, it was delicious. Then the food came out. My mom's shrimp scampy was so Spicy it was unedable, my dads chicken fried steak looked looked like it was fried in cold oil because it was dripping and my chicken Alfredo has super hard noodles. The manager came and tried to correct the situation however we were quite done with the night. Expected more out of a nice restaurant like that.
What in the world happened?  Their new concept was a big let down for us.  We are big fans of Tony Romas and were looking forward to meeting some friends there for ribs.  As others have pointed out the concept has changed.  What this meant for us is the menu is different... it seems pared down without as many options.   On the positive side, the wait staff were outstanding and very helpful.  The inside of the place looks nice and has a nice feel.     Unfortunately, the negative side is the food.  The ribs were horrible.  Very dry and leathery with only a little sauce.  No sauce bottles on the table anymore.  You know when you overcook pork and it gets that dry stringy texture... yeah, that was our ribs.   My wife ordered brussel sprouts and she literally couldn't eat them...and she loves Brussel Sprouts.... six bucks for inedible brussel sprouts.  Our fries were cold, too.   Ugh.   For appetizers we tried the scallops and box of onions.  The box of onions were good and I'd order them again.  The scallops were not my thing as they had a very strong flavored melted cheese on them that overwhelmed those beautiful scallops.  By the way, I loved how they served the scallop in the half shell... but that cheese covering ruined them.  So, great service, good atmosphere... now if they could just learn to serve the great food Tony Romas used to serve...
Ok I agree with the first reviewer you don't go to this place for pizza.  I am new to the neighborhood and was walking around the Square around dinnertime and decided to stop in and get one.  First it took forever.  Second it was tasteless. Maybe this place has good Mexican food (I don't know) but never going back for pizza.  Makes me wonder where the other reviewers have been eating pizza if they consider this good.
Cold food..... Ordered take out as I work in the battery. It wasn't ready when I got there so I waited but had to get back to work. As I was leaving the lady came running out saying they just brought it up. I got my items. The spicy tuna roll was azing the only reason for 2 stars. The lamb burger having just been brought out of the kitchen was cold my fries cold and soggy had to put them in my fryer. As for the burger itself was bland and flavorless. Step it guys!
I've been here many times and the service is always bad. I only keep going back because the owners are from my hometown St. Louis. Today I went for brunch and after being sat my server never came and it wasn't explained to me at all how the buffet works. I thought maybe I get the food first and then pay, so we went to the buffet and we're told that we needed to see our server first, when I told them the server never came and that I had been waiting 30 minutes, they were almost rude and told me I needed to see the hostess. I asked another waitress if she could help me and she said she was too busy. I left of course and that will be the last time I ever go there. Great place but service sucks.
Wow, I been to a few aquariums and this one was pretty awful. I opted to go here instead of the museums and should've just not went to this either. I thought there would be more displays to see but there wasn't. Penguins weren't even on site or the seals. It was a disappointment. Like other reviewers mentioned some of the tanks are quite cramped. It was also warm at some areas which is not good. Nevertheless, that $40 Canadian dollars entry fee was not worth it. Their gift shop was wack too... get it together. Use Monterey bay aquarium as reference for better displays..
Disclaimer: I came here and got take out late at night on a Monday when I got back from work. Just reviewing the food:  I got the Jack Burger. It was pretty overcooked, and had weird "bacon". Also, not enough of the JD sauce. The curly fries/onion rings were good though.
Known to not the employees! Very unprofessional cars are not cleaned. Not a good honest company!!! Look for another way of transportation.
Went on New Years Eve 2016. Before even entering I hated the place. The bouncer was being fondled by a girl who he later claimed was his sister. My group of 5 people could barely make it to the bar. We eventually made it to the other side of the restaurant and did not get anything because the bar was so crowded. Eventually we left through a second door that wasn't even being guarded and like 5 people went in this second door without being carded. The service looked terrible and the atmosphere was awful.
The general manager jennifer larned proceeded to get mad on the phone with me and call me a Nigger repeatedly. Called the other office and demanded talk to the person in charge above her. was tolded she can do whatever she wants since shes the GM,they refuse to tell me who I could contact above her and hung up. Would not EVER recommend going to this place unless you want to be treated extremely respectfully and have rasist slurs thrown at you.
I got my nails done yesterday : signature gel service for nails and regular pedicure.   I also add some gems for my fingers with extra fees.  Yet, as you can see in the pics that i post with this review,  Almost all top coat for my nails are ripped off and somehow one gem attached on my nail is gone.   Again, i went their shop yesterday. Yes, "yesterday".  From last night until right now all of this things have happened.   I think i don't need to say a lot of things since the pics will  definitely do. Besides the ripped top coats and gem, my cuticles are so rough and messy.   I paid $90 with tips.   For this price, I never expected this poor quality like no one would do.   This place has a nice interior, but that's it.   Again, see the pics of my nails rn.   Definitely, they needs someone who really knows how to do nails bc this is the place where ppl actually pay for their nails beautifully get done.   This is serious.
We have several chain restaurants near our home in North Austin. We have used their online or telephone ordering for curbside service and have been mostly happy. We thought we'd try Red Robin, as we heard their burgers were good. We placed our order between 7:30-7:45p in hopes of having those burgers before it got too late. We figured since it was past traditional dinner rush, it wouldn't be too long a wait to get our order.  I arrived at curbside and called the number posted on the sign. The employee told me the order would be right out. After over 10 min, I phoned back to ask if it was indeed out shortly. They asked again who I was, and told me they'd have to check. Again, I was told it'd be right out. After nearly 10 more minutes they brought the order out and I drove home. It took much longer than anticipated, but we were happy to have the order. After arriving home we had completely the wrong order, not one item in the bag matched what we'd ordered. I drove back to the restaurant to simultaneously be met at the counter with a frustrated customer who was informed that I had taken her order. She expressed frustration at me (as though I wanted her burger with pineapple on it. Eww).   I spoke with the manager. Yet, after another substantial wait, received the order. I arrived home after 9p and the burgers went right into the refrigerator. It was simply too late, close to bedtime to eat a heavy burger.  As I rewarm the burger today with guacamole that has now browned and lettuce that may have once been not wilted, the description of the burger quality doesn't match what is sitting on my plate. Perhaps they more closely match when you can eat it right after it's prepared.   In summary, we were not happy with the experience and we wouldn't recommend the restaurant for you either. There are simply too many good choices in Austin Texas to endure substandard service.
This was really pretty poor. Upon entry An angry cave troll initially scared us away with her club ...but we had not been to Chang's in so long we resisted our urge to run. (I know that's harsh but it was really bad - every Hostess was unfriendly to the point of being mean) to be fair the place was a mad house but no excuse to be scowling and letting it be known they are not happy to have more customers.    Once seated, things did not get much better until our clearly overworked waitress came to greet us with a full arm of Martini's she even took our order bedrinked and managed to be sweet - it was impressive which is why the extra star.   My food was awesome Kung Pow Scallops spicy and warm - however that was the only good dish out of the 6 we received. Rest were cold and bland -   Get it together Grouch!
We have been to this restaurant a few times for happy hour and other events  and liked it - but this review is specifically for the last time I went as it totally ruined my experiences here!   Before last times visit I would have given this pace a solid 4 stars. The seafood was ok but mostly because the happy hour is very very good. Lots of choice for drinks and great appies- most under $6. Great value for a trendy place.   Last time we came here it was a different story..   we booked in for happy hour for my friends stagette so we could come for some drinks and appies before going elsewhere for dinner. I had called a week prior to reserve a table and was told by the manager Omar that we couldn't reserve for happy hour. I was disappointed and my friend then decided to call again a couple days later and she succeeded in reserving for 5 for happy hour... not sure what the disconnect was but it was a different manager who took her reservation.   Anyways we arrived for happy hour on the day of her stagette excited and ready to eat and drink and be merry - and were seated with no issues in the dining room. The sever was super nice and she helped us order right away etc. When our tuna appies came (we ordered 2 different kinds), 2 of us girls at the table noticed they smelled kind of off... very very fishy and we all tried a piece of one of the Dishes. It was inedible and tasted rotten. We eat tuna a lot (all of us) and definitely know what "off" and not fresh smells like. We then sent it back and told her that it was super fishy and smelly. She obliged and was very apologetic. She took the dishes off our bill right away no questions.   My friend - who was the bride- wanted to order some oysters that were on the happy hour menu and we talked to our server about the risk of the virus circulating around BC in oysters. She assured us that ALL of wild tales oysters are tested thoroughly before they come into their restaurant and that we had nothing to worry about. We had some oysters. They tasted great and then we went on with our night. All was fine and dandy until the next day in the earlier afternoon when all of us girls who had tried the tuna and oysters became violently ill- throwing up and other things associated with food poisoning..... I won't get into more details lol   I called the next day and let the manager Omar know about what had happened. I told him only the girls who had the tuna and oysters had become ill and the illness was consistent with food poisoning. He immediately became defensive and told me that no one else had called and MANY MANY people had had the tuna and oysters with no complaints that night. He said he would call the Heath board and report it and he took my information down so he could call me back etc.   I never received an apology, nor a call back, nor any condolences for what had happened.   Very unimpressed with the level of service.   Will not be returning nor will my friends.
Sherman group is a second rate organization that is trying to become a "luxury" brand. Although Greystar had their challenges, service with a smile was not one of them. Aside from the lackluster customer service, you'll also experience at least a 15 minute wait to cross over the Wm Cannon/ 35 intersection- so dont EVER be in a hurry; there is only one exit from the community.  Dont be deceived by the pretty grounds, and move in special, you'll be dissatisfied. With all the challenges one experiences during a work week, they should not have to come to their home and be dissatisfied with their home managers.  Just food for thought.
I normally give restaurants the benefit of the doubt. however in this case no way. I ordered shrimp egg foo young with shrimp fried rice along with shrimp spring rolls (in case you didn't see I like shrimp) picked up my order got home and tried to eat what should have been good food. the first thing I noticed was the smell of bad fish. cut the egg fy to find under cooked and bad slimy shrimp. the rice faired no better and no chance the same for the spring roll. all had the same foul smell and texture. called and told them what the problem was and I was told sorry that it was the oil which they were going to change after closing. she then proceeded to say the next time I came in the food would be better. I asked but what about the food I received that evening. I was then told again that the next time the food would be better. I again asked what about the food I just received. I was again told sorry but there was nothing they could do about it. but please come back another time and the food would be better. I took the food back and again the same response that the food would be better but again there was nothing they could do about the present order not even remake or refund or credit towards my future order. I did leave my complete order there when I left. sorry for being s long winded but beware of a restaurant that does not care about the quality and for sure their their customer service. really doesn't deserve the one star rating. by the way I am a certified chef with over 20 years in the industry so my observations are not without merit.
I bought a couch and a love seat from Lazy Boy for my formal living room. No one uses the couches. I have had them for only two years and there seems to be a flaw in the fabric on the couch. A piece of the fabric is pulling up pretty bad and I'm afraid it will turn into a hole.  Since the couch is only two years old and looks brand new due to not being used I figured Lazy Boy would stand behind there product. They sure won't! I called both the store and corporate office and they pointed out that they will only stand behind their furniture for one year. They were also quick to point out that I didn't purchase the extended warranty. I pointed out that it seems to be a defect in the fabric and they don't care. I would not recommend buying from Lazy boy unless you plan on buying new couches every year.
I went to Chez Vincent with a party of 8 and had one of the worst dining experiences I've had in years.  The food was mediocre at best, the management was arrogant and condescending, but the waiter service was good (she was doing her best given the complete lack of support by her management).  Just to be clear through this whole story, the waiter service (I can't remember her name, she was French) was as perfect as it could be given the circumstances.  She did her absolute best even though her management completely unprepared for the evening.  We went during Magical Dining month, so we did expect the restaurant to be busier than usual, so we had reservations for 8.  When we arrived, it was much less busy than expected.  We were seated immediately.  Great!  That's where the fun ended.  We were informed that there was a rehearsal dinner taking place at Hannibal's on the Square (apparently owned by Chez Vincent owners) and that the kitchen was backed up.  Not a big deal I thought, we'll have more drinks, however "backed up" was the understatement of the night.  It took over an hour after ordering to get our appetizer.  Another hour after that to get our main course.  After my friend and I were fed up, we made our issues known to the manager.  His response was "Well, we do have a rehearsal dinner going, but as you can see, this place is very popular".  Typed words do no justice to the level of condescension in his voice.  I am not concerned with how popular your restaurant is.  You as the manager should have known that you're completely incapable of handling the wedding party and standard dinner service at the same time, but instead you tried to make a few extra bucks.  The lack of experience showed.  So another 30 minutes has past since the main meal (that's 2.5 hours now since we've ordered) while we're waiting for the dessert, and that was enough.  We said, forget it, give us the check.  We're done.  The check was the only thing that was done with any punctuality.   But you're saying, maybe the food makes up for that, right?  No.  No it does not.  It was bland, very boring in both presentation and creativity, and had seemingly very little effort.  I had a pork tenderloin, steamed vegetables, and mashed potatoes.  That's a very simple meal that I didn't expect a world of flavor out of, but it somehow made me think of a frozen meal.  The meat was lukewarm and bland.  The steams veggies were alright, not great. And the mashed potatoes had chunks and was flat out cold.  As in, stuck in the fridge cold.  The summation, I will not be going back, ever.  I brought a group of out of town friends here and it ruined the entire night through the poor service but also since we wasted 3 hours of our night here.
This is the most discriminating nightclub in the city of Boston! Witnessed and was victim to race and class discrimination both by owner and unprofessional bouncers. Do not recommend a place that condones such behavior! We were just out to have a good time!
I visited the Iconic and over-hyped Austin location on 10/11/15. I arrived early as their Facebook page stated the shop would open at 6pm. I arrived literally at 6:20pm to find the Voodoo staff very pleasant and a donut shop with interesting and inviting Décor. There was no line and I walked straight up to the counter to place my cash only order for fried goodies. I will say this place is simply a case of GREAT marketing . NO FOLKS, these Donuts are not worth waiting thirty minutes to an hour for and I found none of the products enjoyable to say the least. I have actually had better donuts at the local HEB after they have been sitting out all day. I selected a full dozen options none were quite impressive and my selections ran the gamut from raised to cake and filled to fritter. Starting off with the signature "Voodoo Doll" was indeed clever, but with far too much frosting and a filling with raspberry high fructose corn syrup which tasted as artificial as it comes, I was happy to feed the rest to the birds. The Maple Bacon Bar was far superior to the Doll, however it was no better than versions elsewhere (and not even close to the Maple Bacon at GOURDOUGHS) and thus this one was fed to the birds as well. Moving to the more obscure selections purchased was the "ODB" - a VERY yeasty donut with thick chocolate artificial frosting, crushed Oreo's, and a drizzle of peanut butter. This Donut was very heavy and overly doughy and not pleasant and def not worth the stomach space.  Next, I moved to the "Memphis Mafia" I'll simply say that this fritter alone should be a SIN. As great sounding as it may be, this nearly 1lb combination of fried dough, sugar, cinnamon, bananas, peanut butter, chocolate icing, peanuts, and chocolate chips was the worst fritter I have ever experienced. This fritter tasted like old oil and artificial ingredients. Clearly Voodoo does not care about the quality of ingredients they use.  In short, Voodoo makes very heavy yeasty donuts which are more like biscuits with crazy topping combinations. The dough is not very sweet and the glaze is very thin and non- apparent. The location is perfect as all the late night 6th St Bar patrons can stumble in and have very low grade donuts, but will be too drunk to remember the horrible tasting experience. For custom made to order, hot Donuts stick with GOURDOUGHS. I really don't see this place lasting very long in this city with this quality of product.
Great selection of health-food meal replacement bars.  Something seemed to change some time ago and the cleanliness and image dropped off.
Where to begin.... Never having Comcast again!! (despite their monopoly on everything)... absolute worst customer service out of any company I've ever worked with. Will straight up never call you back and act like you're wrong when they over- and double-charge EVERY SINGLE MONTH.  1. Were five hours late to installation, and, as promised, gave us free Showtime for 4 months after that. Charged us EVERY month for it and would have to call and get it cleared up 2. They do not refund... only give you a credit on your next bill. Thanks. 3. Would constantly charge for things we didn't use... movies we never rented, on demand shows we never bought, channels we didn't have. Again, never refunded, just credited the account 4. Half the channels didn't work and every person we called to come fix it said there was nothing they could do 5. Started adding $40 to the bill after four months which we were NOT informed of beforehand  Overall: slow internet, bad cable (many channels didn't work), too expensive, overcharged for NOTHING, and terrible, terrible, terrible customer service. Do not recommend at all.
If you are walking down the street in The Domain, you will likely see all the other bars and restaurants busy.  Lavaca street bar will likely have plenty of room.  It will have room because the service sucks.  We were at a table and could not even SEE any wait staff's, at 6:30 on a Friday!.  The staff is more interested in their tattoos and nose rings than delivering good service.  Skip this place.
We dined at Coast last evening, second time for dinner and two previous lunches. I remain unmoved by this Vancouver "hot-spot". The noise level is unbearable, certainly not he restaurant for a romantic evening. Open kitchen format and high ceilings don't help. The service was professional, however, our waiter was always selling. I asked for a wine recommendation he suggested a $94.00 dollar bottle. let me say that I know something about wines and you don't need to spend that kind of dough.  This place likes to flip tables, so don't plan on a lingering dinner. They had us in and out within the hour, even with my stall tactics.  There are other restaurants in Vancouver that serve excellent seafood and have a hot ambience and I will pass a few along next time.
Super odd experience.  After spending an hour in the lounge and talking fairly in depth with the 'hostess" about our home experience (we have a 10 year old indoor-outdoor male cat), we were given an application to fill out in an attempt to adopt a kitten (which was recommended, given our home circumstances). We were told that PAWS typically approves applications within 10-15 minutes so we decided to loiter in the neighborhood with a walk thru Oakland Cemetery. After 45 minutes or so, no call so we checked back in with Java Cats. No news. So we proceeded home. To make an annyoing story short, our application was denied -- BECAUSE WE HAVE AN INDOOR/OUTDOOR CAT.  So, fine, I get it that there were concerns over leukemia, HIV, etc.  Valid concerns - not disputing the reason why. I am disputing THE PROCESS. Why not just cut to the chase? The fact that we have an indoor/outdoor cat was offered up from the very get go to the hostess -- and WRITTEN ON THE APPLICATION.  Please, in today's world, TIME is incredibly valuable, and positive energy is priceless. My time (and theirs) was wasted, and both my and son and I were truly let down. Java Cats and PAWS, y'all need to rethink a couple of things.....
The sushi is not great, the menu is limited compared to other sushi train restaurants, and while the price is not too expensive it is not cheap.  However, the location is great for me and it is fast!  I have always experienced good service, just wish they would have more options in their menu.
Couldn't get served. Showed up at 830pm, put in for a party of 6. Hostess took my number and said it would be about 2 hours. Came back at 10pm and hostess acted surprised and tried to talk us into leaving despite 3 open tables. We sat and waited. By 1030 two groups of 5 and three groups of four walked in and were seated right away despite no reservations. 1045 hostess comes up and says we can't wait in the restaurant for fire safety reason. I asked to speak to a supervisor who tried to brush us off. Eventually offered to make a reservation for the next day but insisted it had to be before 7pm. Brought out a blank reservation book and took my number again.   This is the second time this has happened. I wouldn't recommend this place.
A pricy and low quality food! Got kashk e bademjun, barg and lamb kabab and got so disappointed!
One of the Employees stole my debit card ! management had my card not even 10 mins later one of the 3 employees that clocked out stole it !! Crazy this is a restaurant!! We are suppose to trust employees to run are cards to buy food not run off with them !! Police are here doing a investigation don't come here !! Still don't know who took it you may be the next victim!!
The worst expensive birthday lunch ever.  Moronic waiter. Never asked "how is everything? Can I get you anything else? Coffee? How about a desert  menu ?"  We had to ask to have table wiped down after desert was served.  We asked for manager who said "here's my card, it has my number when you come back next time." Sorry not coming back.  "Why not?" Beyond disappointing service that's why ? "What can I do to have you come back?" The fact he had to ask.  He finally comped our ice cream and glass of wine.  Thanks for ruining my bday lunch.
The food was pretty good but my waitress was lame.   I ordered a drink during happy hour, 10 minutes later ordered food, 15 minutes later the food came (from a server in the kitchen, not my waitress), still no drink. The waitress pretty much ignored us until we were almost done with our food.  Almost finished with our food, the waitress, "did you need anything else?".  Me, "is my drink still in the works?".  Waitress, "did you order a drink?".  Wow, really?  My order really wasn't that hard...
[see update below original post]  I'm so disappointed in the folks at Clark Lewis I don't quite know what to do but not return.   Here's what happened: I've been in Portland since 2001 and have rarely (and never like this) had occasion to think I'm being discriminated against because of race. People in Portland are generally nice, attentive, and, if not blind to race, certainly not discriminatory. But tonight at Clark Lewis I sat for a total of 23 minutes (entered and sat at 4:55 and left at 5:18) while the waiter walked past and around me and never once asked if I wanted a drink or if I'd like to order--though he certainly did ask those questions of the tables to my right and left. I have not been so angry while in Portland. For a while I tried to figure out if I was being overly sensitive. And then for some while I tried to figure out what the issue might be because I'm loath to call racism or racist. They're harsh, unforgiving words. And even after leaving, I went home and called a friend and ran the scenario by her just to check (sometimes we do need to check-in with level-headed friends). But I can't call it other than racially-driven bad behavior because the ONLY difference between me and the other clients is that I'm black. To make matters worse, when I, having walked to the front of the place, asked for the manager, the young woman, who I later learned is not actually the manager, said, "I'm sorry" and "I'll talk to him," but couldn't muster a more succinct or sufficient response. I suppose she may have been stunned to inaction. That's possible. But it was a fairly puny response.   I do not support, at the worst, racists, at the best, unconscious discrimination, which is what I experienced tonight at Clark Lewis' Happy Hour. I don't care how good the food is or how great the environs. And it makes me sad that I can't frequent this place again.   [update:]  Since last night, both the assistant manager (she's the person with whom I spoke) and the owner contacted me to apologize. The assistant manager extended an invitation to me to come experience ClarkLewis as it's meant to be, which I will not take them up on because it's not my intention to be fawned over but rather to simply be treated equally. The owner expressed his deep concern and articulated their zero tolerance policy. I am appreciative of their quick responses and hope that future diners will not have the same--or even a slightly approximate--experience.
Every now and again somebody I don't want to offend by saying "no" drags me to this place.  Gloopy food, too sweet and too much cornstarch, with little taste.  It's Chinese for the timid and tastebudless.
Horrible service overall. Slow. Unprofessional. Rude. I expected better from management and they're just as bad as the servers. Won't be returning to this place.
I went here on a Sunday night hoping for a killer experience that didn't really happen.  I will say that the food is pretty tasty. All in all my friend and I shared the beet salad which was refreshing, the duck confit with parsnip and orange confit (my favorite dish we tried), the gnocchi (meh.. it was in a broth I didn't care for), and the meatball grinder which was pretty scrumptious. For dessert we had the lemon parfait, yum.  My issue here is service... or shall I say lack there of. Our server was pretty much non existent and when he was there I felt like I had to quickly spit out what I wanted since it seemed each time he was just hauling ass to get to the other tables he had... they seemed under staffed. I appreciate when a server takes a moment to talk about what they like on the menu and shed a little light on what is good there... nope none of that here.  There are so many reliable and fantastic restaurants in Atlanta... i'm sorry to say that I don't think i'll be back or encourage anyone to dine here.
New owner (or just a man who is always behind the counter) is extremely shady and annoying when it comes to price calculation. Went there three times in the last six weeks, ordered the same two scoops sundae ice cream with same toppings identical to banana split version. Price I got was always different, getting bigger every time. Today he acted like the toppings are something outrages and charged me $1.5 dollars more than the banana split ice cream. I told him that it doesn't make sense, cause bana split one has all the same ice cream choises and toppings, plus another scoop of ice cream and the banana itself. The answer was that I should ve got banana split instead ( I intentially didn't want it, cause it's too big). What an ungly stupid prick!
I used to frequent this place often before both locations were shut down out of the blue.  Recently came back and found that they should have stayed closed. Very rude front desk staff. My 50 minute massage was only 35 minutes because the therapist was running behind and the facial was more of a 50 minute sales pitch to buy products. There has always been a high turnover in staff. I think that says a lot about management/owners. As for clothing, it seems like a lot of the same stuff is always there while the staff is always turning over. Not good.
I placed an order at this restaurant through Foodler at 7pm, and it's 9:15 and I still don't have my food.  They called me around 8:10 and told me my order had been missed because their fax machine had been malfunctioning.  I told them I still wanted my food, and it's now an hour later and I still have no food.  No discount was offered.
I've had a lot of sausage in my day (wink, wink).  Schmidt's has a lot going for it: great atmosphere, German Village location, gargantuan cream puffs.  But it's not enough to make up for so-so food, namely the sausage.  Now if you are a person who doesn't get a lot of sausage (wink, wink), you might rate it higher.
Not much "in stock" as far as furniture.  Not very friendly either. Will shop online and elsewhere.
Ordered a large dark combo, and the chickens were swimming in oil. There were so much oil that even after the toast on the bottom was soaked, the basket was filled with it. Same with my coworker's basket as well. Others got the sandwiches, and they were okay.
On the corner of Colonial and Dean Rd in Orlando sits a fairly new dog park called Downey Dog Park. It's been there for five to six years and is not very large in size. It's also not in the best area.  This park is big enough if you have a small dog who needs some space to run around, but if you have a bigger dog you're better off going to one of the other choice dog parks in the area. A good majority of the dogs that come here are pit bulls and other "dangerous" breeds, which is what makes this park unappealing to most who know about it.  Mulch covers the ground and a dark green fence keeps the dogs confined. There are benches and chairs for the owners to sit on while their pet plays, but are usually overtaken by the dogs. Like most parks, the hours are restricted and posted on the front gate. And, as is usual, you must pick up after your pet.  Overall, if you can, I would avoid this dog park and find a bigger, cleaner one for your pet to play and run around in.
I decided to give this establishment another chance but they've proven again that they do not value their customers. Even the manager, Jose, lacks customer service skills. I understand you've hired teens to work here, but maybe they should invest in training these teens who don't know any better.   Everything here is so disorganized! It was chaos before we got a bowling lane, then we waited another 32 minutes just to get a server. Food took an hour and came out cold and bland. We complained to Jose and he apologized half-heatedly and gave us $10 off our $148 tab. His whole demeanor was nonchalant.   My kids wanted to redeem their tickets. Another chaotic moment. The staff at the counter were rude and disorganized. Kids, who don't know any better, like coming here (it's actually a great concept), but since I'm the one spending money, I will not be coming back. I'll go somewhere else where I and my money are appreciated.
I spent a literal 15 minutes waiting in line for some curly fries on a Sunday afternoon at 3pm with 2 cars in front of me. When I got to the window the lady asked me what I had. If you're a fast food restaurant isn't that the point? You know. To be fast? Go to McDonalds instead.
Don't like this place. I went a couple of times, pedi was ok, but the ladies seem arrogant and I can tell they are talking smack. Just made it uncomfortable. Rather give my money to someone who appreciates it
I had a hot dog. the worst part was the sausage was from oscar mayer and they didn't make it. I think i can have a better hot dog at home from a  better sausage than oscar mayer.
Oh boy, had I wished I didn't ignore all the warning signs about this place. My friends and I had just finished playing in a dodgeball tournament at OSU and were hungry, so we went for a bite to eat. It was "rush hour" in the restaurant world and every place was packed, with the exception of good ol' Cluck-u-chicken. Literally, there was nobody there (this was warning sign number 1). Completely ignoring the fact that nobody was eating there and there were flies everywhere in the restaurant, we decided to go in anyway.   Holy mother of God, what a mistake we made.   We walked into cluck-u and nobody was at the counter to take our order (warning sign number 2). We looked at the menu for at least a good five minutes before (presumably) the only employee working comes out from behind the counter to take our order. We all order and then go grab a table. While we're waiting on our food one of my friends went to the restroom to wash his hands. He comes out of the restroom pale, and when we ask him what's wrong, he says the restroom smells like death and he almost vomited (warning sign number 3... when they don't even bother to clean the areas that you see, imagine what the kitchen looks like). I also go to the rest room to wash my hands and I can certainly confirm, there must've been a dead body stashed somewhere in there. There were also a good amount of empty beer cans in the trash can.   Anyway, getting to the actual food, I'm not sure I've ever had worse hot-wings in my life. They had a mushy-breading on them, and it wasn't mushy because the sauce made it that way, no, it was mushy because the oil they were fried in wasn't hot enough. I ordered the sauce on my wings the second-hottest that they had. However when I tasted my wings, the sauce wasn't hot at all. It had more of a sweet flavor to it, which was an incredible disappointment, because, well, I like my wings hot. If I wanted sweet sauce, I would've got to a Chinese place and ordered sweet and sour chicken.   All in all, this was undoubtedly the worst restaurant I've ever been to, hands down. I will never be returning. Ever. I think I'd rather like my dog's own scrotum then eat here again.
This place is nasty, please save your money. I got my drink in a dirty glass. Wait stuff are rude and don't want to be there, management isn't any better. The bathroom floor is sticky, nasty and stinky. And the wait is ridiculous, I called to get a table I was told 15 minutes I told them I will be there in 20 minutes okay got there and still had to wait. Got our table 30 minutes later they brought our drinks in a dirty class food plate look like the put it in a someone's else's left over plate. I ordered traditional buffalo wings why did my plate had boneless wings in the bottom with BBQ sauce on my plate instead of buffalo. I ask for my pretzel unsalted salt all over the plates. Glass being thrown at wait stuff so lots of broken glasses. This place is trash.
Alaska Airlines operates via Skywest on certain short-haul flights. We were not able to book ANY seats on this flight because the seats are "assigned at the gate", according to the website. Well, that's not true - we were somehow assigned the worst seats on the aircraft yesterday. Last row, non-reclining, and right at the toilet, so the fragrance was terrible. Fortunately, the flight was only about an hour, but I'm really disappointed in the Alaska/Skywest seat-assigning process, particularly on an $800 flight. This won't happen again.
Didn't love it. :/ Went with a group of four so got a good selection to sample, all pretty lackluster in some way or another. The general issue of this place claiming to be "Tex Mex" allows them to get away with replacing traditional ingredients with their Americanized cousins, which doesn't necessarily equal good nor healthy in today's world. My fish tacos were seated among oversized tortillas so I felt like I was eating mouthfuls of bread with nothing else until midway down. Also why not corn for fish tacos instead of flour tortillas?  Eh. Waitress was a lil bit bitchy, that's ok, we liked her anyway. The beans and rice that came with my tacos was nizzasty. The rice was hard and overcooked like I got what stuck to the sides of the rice cooker rather than them turning the rice regularly. The beans were dry too, not fun.  Eh. Some weird TexMex spring rolls. If I promise to remember the Alamo can I forget about these?  Eh. Some super crazy nachos that didn't have enough toppings for the chips. It doesn't cost that much more and leaves your customers with a good impression if they don't feel like they overpaid.  The atmosphere was playful and artsy in a Chris Angel/biker/banker fashion sensibility. Just not a cool or fun experience, we all left a little grumpy because of our food I hate to say. That speaks volumes. That's not cool dudes.
Can I give it less stars? How can a restaurant NOT have a washroom? And then ..order yourself? U  ot stay home and cook then?  We left and won't go back!
My first time here, and I dont like it. Atmosphere is ok, I do like the balcony but the service is slow. We asked for tobacco sauce for the Tuna Tartare, and we didnt get it until 20 minutes later. The mussels are salty. The asparagus are dried and skinny. The price is definately not justified with the food quality.
What is it with Greek restaurants and marble floors and mirrors?   The food was disgusting. The pasta portion was GINORMOUS-- enough for 4 people. I could tell that "authentic" Greek pastries and appetizers were from the freezer. Lots of crying babies, bad hummus, and fake food.   Ugh. I went with my Greek friend and she agrees.
The wife and I came in, knowing it would be expensive (not sure how people were surprised by that), for a special occasion. We went on a weeknight and the place was quiet and empty, so we were able to sit at the chef's table and watch everything being made while enjoying a tasty cocktail. We both did the 7 course meal, and ordered the duck, for more money, as our entree. Two ladies stumbled in after us, drunk and talking loudly about how they had been at backbar and the bartender convinced them to stumble over here and drink more and order the 5 course meal. Our food came out slowly and was quite tasty but the amount of time between plates was borderline ridiculous. Then it was time for our entree. So we waited. Then we waited some more. Then I noticed the ladies next to us finished their plates that were right before their entrees. Then we waited some more. Did I mention we waited a while? Then I watched them serve the duck entree to the ladies next to us (yes they had ordered it as well). Then our waiter came over and said "yeah...we accidentally served your entree to them, it will be a bit longer". By the time our food came out, we were amazed at how hungry we were and how long it took. From start to finish, this meal clocked in at over 3 hours. Our entree was served to someone who came in after us, maybe because they were friendly with the bartender?  That rant aside, all 7 courses were tasty and we had no real complaints about the food part. The servings were tiny so spreading them out so much really wasn't enjoyable. There is no reason it should have taken so long and the pretentious feeling of the place really make us question if we would bother going back.
The food here is very tasty , the atmosphere is cozy and warm. We took our young daughters out to dinner they sat us next to a couple who ended up making out at the table during their dessert. It was kind of uncomfortable the waiter tried to make up for it by giving us a bottle of sparkling water but no one ever spoke to the couple to tone it down. My husband and I ordered the cod dish it was extremely small maybe a 1/4 pd of cod for $27.00. I complained to the manager about the size of the cod he told me to "look on the bright side I now had room for dessert" I did not like this comment so I did not order dessert. My daughters got the salmon burger and the quinoa burger they were both tasty. I also ordered the roasted beet salad with smoked kale chips but could barely find a Kale chip on the plate. This place would be better if the portion sizes were bigger  the taste was there just not the size. Probabbly won't go back. I would have been happier if they spoke to the couple next to us to stop making out and if they offered us a free dessert to make up for the extremely small cod. It would have been great to just get an appropriate size of cod to begin with.
I have lived in Atlanta for 25 years now and am Indian so I understand there are Indian restaurants of all caliber, but I can assure you this place is not worth the price. I hear they have a lunch buffet which is relatively affordable, so maybe that's worth checking out. Otherwise, it ends up being $$ per person and trust me, there is so much better in Atlanta. I prefer Cafe Bombay and/or The Palace. The taste is bland, the Naan is not of tandoor taste, and overall the selection is ok. I'm trying to be fair, but there is nothing redeeming about the place. I also feel like the service is ok. Every time I forget how much I dislike this place and get a hankering for Indian in the Dunwoody area, I always come back. I always leave angry for spending WAY too much money on low quality food.
Horrible horrible experience. The realtors were unhelpful, refused to give me a copy of my credit report and raised their voices at me. I highly recommend going somewhere (anywhere) else.   There are numerous other rental realtor close by who are friendly, kind and very helpful. Do not make the same mistake I made and walk in the door.
Extremely slow and don't know the difference between Taro and Thai iced tea. Staff seemed to not care at all.
Getting into the park is a nightmare! No organization or people to control the crowd. Staff upon entry seemed miserable. Dirty and smelly bathrooms. I recommend leaving the park well before it closes. Again, no organization. We were stuck like a herd of cattle for over an hour.
Had no Orange Juice,  The country fried steak had no breading.  Kids meal was Late, No nuggets, gave regular chicken. They let us know after the plate came out.  Looks like it is Under staffed.  Worst Denny's we have ever been to.  Please send chef Ramsey to fix them.  The food actually was cooked good.
This is a local mexican place with cheap food and is always jammed so full you cant get a table.  They have a Monday night trivia and people plant themselves there all night.  They turned away 3 parties of 5 or more monday night which is crazy.  They should just close the place when they do that.   And forget about trying to get in when college starts up, they accept the local university meal card so it turns in to a college hangout.  The good news is we instead went to Casa Corona in Marblehead and that was excellent, so that will be our new Mexican place from now on.
I was in town for business, and my boss took me to this place for dinner on the first night.  I was excited about the concept, and the craziest dish totally caught my eye, and I decided to just go for it.  The Schlesinger:  Warm banana nut bread served open faced with melted Monterey Jack cheese and thinly sliced ham. Sided with a banana mango chutney and purple cabbage slaw.  Sounds enticing for an adventurous eater, no?  NO.  Just no.  It did not work at all.  To be fair, the banana bread itself was quite yummy... but it just did NOT work with the cheese or ham.  And definitely did not work with the chutney, which was extremely over-spiced and overpowered the delicate flavor of the banana bread.  The cabbage salad was pretty good.  But when I was done, it occured to me that I had just eaten banana bread for dinner and immediately start craving something savory.  Like green beans.  I had a bite of my coworker's sandwich (I *think* it was the Mistral?) and it was deeeelicious.  I still regret my dinner choice and it was a month ago.  Bummer.  I would try again if I return to Boston.
I liked the game, I've played these games before at Escape Rooms in Houston and Austin. Although we didn't solve the puzzle because there was only 3 of us, I enjoyed it. My only complaint and the only thing that would have made the game more fun is the host. Her name was Sarah, every time we would ask for a clue, her tone was really unattractive and it made me feel like she was treating us like we were dumb. Her tone didn't make me feel comfortable, and the fact is that she constantly asked the same questions over and over to offer the clue when we said we didn't know. Over all, I like the concept and I like the game but I'm all about customer service and if you don't enjoy your job, it's time to find a new one. And for that, I will not be returning, I'll be giving my business to Escape Room for my next puzzle game experience.
5 stars for having the perfect Halloween costume [flapper girl] in the window display AND a friggin' swexy dress on the mannequin right next to it.  Negative 5,000 stars for not putting the items in the window display on sale until 2.5 weeks later.
I have gone to various Chipotle restaurants, and by far the quality of this location is the worse.  I always order the same thing. A steak Burrito bowl, extra steak and Guacamole.  The last time have of my steak was chunks of fat, but I decided to give them another chance, thinking the May have had a bad day. Today I ordered the same thing, and the steak was overdone and extremely salty.  If I am going to spend on the extras and spend $14 on a Burrito bowl, I would expect a little better quality.
This has to be the worst Tim Horton I have ever been in, it starts with extremely poor lighting in the parking lot outside the main entrance. The cigarette butts around the front door are disgusting all this before you are inside. I made the unfortunate decision to order the new chipotle steak wrap, it appeared half full and was very soggy. I do like Tim Horton and their food "but" I wound not go to this location again.
Very unprofessional. They did a sloppy job on my manicure. Did not bother to properly take off excess nail polish from my fingers. The manicure was rushed. The nail polish was globbly on my nails. Woman who did my nails was unpleasant. Never coming back.
Just left Santarpio's in Peabody for lunch. I've been to the East Boston location so many times and I love love love the pizza and the staff there. With that said, the Peabody location had the absolute worst service I've had at a restaurant. For a while we were the only ones there for lunch and the waitress still ignored us. We saw her 3 times, once to order the pizzas, once to check in after we were basically done with our pizza and get us one refill on drinks and then we ended up getting the hostess to get her to get our bill because we had waited so long to get her attention. She didn't make eye contact our way once the whole time and when she came for our bill she had the most condescending attitude I've ever heard. I've never complained at a restaurant or written a bad review, but it was so bad and rude I had to!   I definitely won't be going back to this location and makes me think twice about supporting the other location too. Very disappointing.
Not what I expected. My tour guide confessed that it was his first day and that explains his hurried style and inability to control the crowd. Clearly, he thought we traveled all the way out there just for the free beer. Not really.   Would have preferred it a bit more hands-on, and less like a frat boy shouting at my mom across a gym. Oh well. At least the beer was good.
So disappointing. I used to be a regular here and today reminds me of why I'm not anymore. The food just isn't good anymore. My "cooked to order" pizza and wings were both cold and dry as all hell. Warmed over to order is more like it. The only thing that came out hot was the appetizer which was brought out at the same time as the rest of the food.
Customer service is quite literally non-existent in this restaurant. Not subpar or mediocre, just non-existent. I had been here a few times and the food is decent and inexpensive ($9-10 for pho), but the service is abysmal - I had difficulty flagging down a waiter to place an order, nobody bothered to check on us after the food was delivered, and we had to ask twice for our tea to be refilled. We wanted to order more during the meal but nobody seemed to care so we decided against it. Had this been my first time here, I would also be confused as to where to pay because no one informed me that I have to go up to the front, or even how much my bill was. Needless to say, zero tip. Why should I pay for service I did not receive? Next time I will go to the food court - same shit with a little friendlier customer service.
The atmosphere is nice. The service is good. The price is surprisingly reasonable. The food is not very good. I'd say there's a lot that they could do to improve it. I'd describe this as American food. Lots of bread and pasta; not a vegetable in sight. It's great if you like being fat.
austin missed connection - m4chorizotaco  I saw you the last time I was here, about a week ago. You had those little fried potato shreds on you, like mini crispy french fries, and I'd never seen that before on a taco. My friend let me take a bite of you and you were delicious. I swore I'd return to have you all to myself.  But this morning, I ordered you by your name, "house chorizo taco," and a few minutes later someone brought me a different taco. It wasn't you. This one had tortilla chips in him and sounded gross. I tried to explain the mistake to the woman who brought me this gross taco (sorry if he's a friend of yours, but all I want is you) and she didn't seem to believe me, or to care that I existed. (I don't know if she's ever met you, but you probably don't want to meet her if you get the chance. She seemed cold and a bit vacant.)  She did agree, however, with some reluctance after three attempts, to bring me what I wanted. What I wanted was you, chorizo taco, with your crispy mini french fry pieces, you beautiful thing.  But the cold woman returned, slipping me some detestable sibling of yours onto my table. It was, technically, a "chorizo taco," because it was a tortilla filled with chorizo meat. But if this were the taco I desired I would have ordered the "make-your-own taco, with chorizo and nothing else taco," which isn't even explicitly on the menu.  I miss you. I miss your delicious. Unfortunately, the cold woman was too horrible and I will never return. Plus, the place that owns you has such horrible lighting, and sitting outside is nice sometimes but there are way too many grackles. Plus, the coffee sucks.   I only ever came here for you, house chorizo taco. But the rude service this morning was just ridiculous.
The food here was mediocre at best. At first glance, the menu prices should indicate quality. This was not the case. There is a lot of filler on the plates in the iceberg/cabbage/tomato/corn mix.   The plates appear to be sloppily thrown together. Maybe it was an off night. Maybe they weren't on their A-Game. Numerous menu items were unavailable and the waiter came back three times on three consecutive orders. Either way, I will not be coming back and wouldn't recommend it either. The tastes were bland.   The pricing seems purely based on location with no reflection on quality. Austin taxes may be to blame.
My beautiful date picked this restaurant from experience (Boca Raton) so I was looking forward to a great dining experience. Started with their Spinach Artichoke Dip ($11) . Nice, creamy and tasted fine but nothing screaming better than any other places I've had this dip. For my main course I chose their Double Bone-In Pork Chops ($20) seasoned and topped with sweet pineapple chili sauce. Our server said it was a hidden gem. And ask if I wanted it medium or well done. I said specifically, soft, moist and pinkish.   When my plate came, my mouth started to water, I took photos and was all smiles...until I tried to cut it and saw all the grainy meat falling into tiny pieces...all dried out :(  I gave it a chance and took a bite. Not only was it dry but the pork had a funky taste. I'm SUPER disappointed at this point. Called our server and ordered what my wife had, their Rotisserie Chicken & St.Louis BBQ Ribs ($24). Great service at this point as they had my new order out in 5mins.  We had Key Lime Pie ($7) & Bread Pudding ($7) for dessert. Both were good.  One more thing, when we were about to pay I noticed they forgot(?) to take off the BAD pork chops from the bill. I had to point it out.
Yeah, the bank vault seating is cool, and the cafe is nice and big, but this place is just not that great.  My first complaint is that the aforementioned large square footage of Bloc 11 is totally misused.  There aren't many places to sit in the main part of the cafe.  In back, there are two bank vaults to sit in; one has subway-style seating so you're facing the strangers sitting across from you and have nowhere to rest your book or food, and the other one is a tiny dank pit with no power outlets.  There's another back room with a fireplace and only two tables.  If you sit directly next to the fireplace, your face will burn off.  Trust me, I've been there.  Other problems include slow service and lack of free wifi.  Drinks are small, especially considering what you pay for them.  The bathrooms are clean but boring.  Wheelchair accessibility seems decent, except for the back rooms.  This place is open late, which is nice because the only other cafe option in Union (the superior Sherman) closes at 7.    Overall, I only go to the Bloc 11 to grab a beverage when the Sherman is closed.  If they amend the poor seating plan and light a fire under the employees' collective asses (alternate use for the fireplace?) to speed up the service, perhaps my ire will decrease.  Until then, see you at the Sherman!
I went with a small group of friends for lunch. The star description is right - Meh. I've experienced better. We all started with clam chowder. Served lukewarm and with maybe one clam split between our cups. I would avoid this if I ever found myself here again. I had grilled oysters with salad. The oysters were serviceable, the salad dumped right out of a bag onto the same plate.  One of my companions complained about the thick, heavy amount of grease on her fish and chips. The server was defensive and raised her voice but did end up taking care of the problem. Still it was a bit off putting. We split a dessert which again, was serviceable, but nothing special. I guess if you live in the neighborhood and want to take the time and money to figure out their hits and misses, it could be worth going more then once. Definitely NOT worth a special trip.
You're paying a minimum of $20 to stare at a highway, grass, a lake, and a bunch of hotels. I can't believe anyone actually buys this garbage. This is Central Florida, not somewhere scenic.
Did not like the service, checked twice for id, was not able to change the gratuity, did not accept the cake I baked for my friend's birthday, over priced and very small portions
Meh, indeed.  Even with a Groupon, I will no longer be tempted by Hyde Park Bar & Grill. I'm sad to write this review, because I've been eating here for a long time. There have been slips before over the years -- once, when the chicken salad was actually spoiled at the Duval location, and once at the Westgate location when we could witness the goings-on in the kitchen and my boyfriend had to report what we saw to management. (You don't want to know.) Still, I returned, again and again. I remember when the crab cakes weren't on the menu, and I loved them so much.   At any rate -- those days are gone, my friends. Gone. Yes, the fries are still very good, and I love that sauce. But....  I ordered the chicken caesar. Yes, a lame order, I admit, but so many of the options seemed to be fried or really bready (sandwiches, pasta). So, I ordered what should be pretty basic.  First of all, the romaine lettuce was so pale, I wasn't even sure it was romaine from a glance. But even worse.... the chicken breast.... the basil grilled chicken breast... was served sliced on the salad WITH THE SKIN.  Gooey, stringy, slimy chicken skin.  Absolutely disgusting.  My companion ordered the grilled basil chicken dinner. His chicken arrived smothered in some kind of creamy mushroom sauce. Underneath? You guessed it: slimy gooey stringy icky chicken skin on the breast.  Why oh why??? It was, I believe, the second worst chicken caesar I've ever been served. So, I'm done.  I don't need those fries anyway.
This is not Louisiana style food.. The crawfish are frozen and soaked in some buttery sauce. They claim to have Patton hot sausage but it was a hot sausage link (not Patton) the fries tasted like donuts... Save yourself the trouble and money. The hostess speak very little English. I had to repeat my order 5 times and he still messed it up. It was a party of 6 and we received our food at separates times, each item came out like 7-10 minutes apart. Was a horrible experience!!!
Went to Stella last night and will NOT be going back.  It's a shame; they have a great menu with some of my favorite ingredients and some great wines, but my experience on Valentine's Day will be my last.  I felt like I was in a fast food diner the way they tried to get out in and out of there in under an hour.  The food was obviously pre-plated and reheated, and tasted that way.    The service was completely obnoxious - the waiter dropped our check before we were even finished dessert, the bus boys tried to clear our plates before we were finished our first course, and after being seated for no more than 1 hour, we paid our $200 bill (for two of us), and while we sat finishing our last sip of wine, the hostess came over and asked if she "could help us with something."  What a waste of money and waste of a night.  This restaurant obviously cares a lot more about volume than they do about quality food and a quality dining experience.
I had a very painful experience with Sixt. I strongly advise against going with Sixt to try to save money, because you might end up wasting a bunch of your time with bad customer service. Sixt went against our original reservation agreement before when picking up the car, and also made a bunch of mistakes with incorrect additional fees.  Car reservation: I had made a reservation for a car over the phone for an agreed amount of around $299, to pick up at the Kissimmee Sixt location. As I was on a lyft ride on the way to pick up the car from the Kissimee Sixt location, I got a call from Sixt saying that there are no more cars left at Kissimmee and that they changed my reservation to be at Orlando, and that the amount is changed to $500+. I actually received this phone call a few minutes AFTER the time I was supposed to be picking up the car. I tried to argue that I shouldn't have to pay any more than I agreed to, as I reserved a car for a fixed amount. They wouldn't budge. So I ended up having to pay for the lyft to go to the Orlando location when we were already almost at the Kissimmee location. After some negotiating at the Orlando location, they lowered the amount from $500+ to $372, which was still $72 more than the original reservation agreement over the phone.  Incorrect fees: After having rented the car, we received a summary of invoice charging us an extra day for the rental. We had to call and email them numerous times to correct this mistake. In doing so, they also took off the daily express toll charge, which covered for all the tolls on the freeway, when we never asked them to. They never even gave us an invoice showing that the daily express toll charge had been removed. A few weeks later, they charged us $175 for the tolls because they took off the daily toll charge. That was a huge pain, because we had to call/email to argue that Sixt made the mistake by taking off that toll charge when we never asked them to. Eventually, they refunded us for the $175 that they charged for the toll roads.   It took a month and a half to resolve all the issues we had with this car rental, and it was just a lot of work and time wasted dealing with customer service and silly mistakes on Sixt's end.
Do not eat here!!! Worst food ever! Burnt bacon twice and burnt pancakes! How do you burn pancakes!
Windows don't open much.  One elevator for five floors.  Vending and ice machines that didn't work for for the three nights we stayed.  TV changes channels very slowly, with no TV Guide functionality.  Each outlet near the beds were loose, making plugged-in things instantly fall out.  Shuttle service answering machine says 7am-10pm monday-friday. Actually ends at 9pm monday-friday. Nearly stranded.  This has a price of over 200 USD per night.  I recommend against this place.
We went there today to grab some lunch. While the service was OK, we spotted a dead roach on the floor. Not sure how we managed to eat there knowing that fact.. someone came and picked it up and the waitress apologized, though anywhere else in the world as an apology you would be offered a discount or the drinks prices waived. Nope, not here. Pretty dirty, never coming back again
Hyde Park B and G, what happened to you?   This place used to be 4 star at least. Now I really want to give it a 1.   First of all, the hostess sat me, a disabled lady with a cane, as far away from the door as possible without being the back of the restaurant. I had to navigate a through a crowded restaurant. Even on good days, I'm wobbly.   Then we found out that they no longer have any gluten-free items marked on the menu, and I was flipping through not seeing anything I could eat (I am gluten-intolerant, and can get really sick from eating it). And, I was irritated but telling myself well at least I can have the creme brulee that was honestly my reason for choosing HP for dinner. Then I see the dessert section.  No creme brulee. *head desk*  I ended up getting a side of cheese grits because it was the only thing I could safely eat besides maybe a $9 salad. $9 for a salad? No. I can't justify that as "affordable".   I'm not going to bother going back unless I hear that they've done something good with the menu.
I really enjoyed all the reviews I read the rating seems very high for what I actually experienced today when I went in about 15 minutes after they opened for lunch when I got there I don't know but I had the Vaca Frita... Which is a dish that I absolutely love!! listen, it arrived literally within about 5 minutes after I ordered it which kind of surprise me  and the presentation looked really good  but the taste just did not match up one bit as I couldn't even eat more than a few bites of my food and I ended up taking it all to go it's still sitting in the refrigerator here and I'm really not even thinking about eating that tonight for dinner or let alone eat it tomorrow I'm actually thinking about throwing it out it tasted like a bunch of rubbish thrown together and cooked and a lot of it just was not good and it's terrible to say that because I love Vaca Frita! also, the white rice barely had any flavor no saltiness to it it, very blah.. the black beans were lukewarm and had also no flavor I had to add extra salt just to kind of give it a little bit of flavor! what was delicious was the fried bananas you know the plantains and the side salad that was the bomb and finally they actually do offer the Spanish soda such as Matveva in which that shows the authenticity but I'm thinking they may be had an off day today.. Who knows :( the ambience there is very nice definitely has that great vibe that feels like the potentials there but my waitress didn't bother to ask me if I liked my food she just took my order the food was dropped off and then the check was just brought over she didn't even ask if I wanted desert so customer service definitely was not spot on either..
Every time I came to this store (which is right down the street), I had to either wait for hours to get my phone fixed or wait for hours to get my phone fixed. Some of the staff were really nice and efficient (hence the two stars) - but others ARE NOT. Today I went in for my appointment and I was able to see a rep there and get the part replaced. However when I went to pick up my phone at the time displayed on the ticket, I waited and waited - 3 different associates helped me check on my phone and finally figured out the issue - the girl who had my phone was helping another customer who came in, evidently, after me. Then she finally game me my phone with a sassy attitude. Well, try waiting for your phone for 1 freaking hour just because your rep was trying to make a sale! Of course dropping a phone to a customer won't make her sales number look good. Next time I will try to go to the Easton one and NEVER EVER come back to this store.
We had made a reservation and arrived at our scheduled time with no tables available. We were told we would be the next one's seated; we checked in multiple times with the hostesses as many other parties were being seated. 45 minutes later we were finally offered a table that couldn't even fit our party. No apologies were made for their error, kept calling us "my party people", and acting as if this was typical service. Food was good; waitress was friendly but the hostesses were entirely unprofessional and unable to do their jobs properly.
I'll start with their wings. They are amazing, I could eat these wings everyday of the week, galic parm and lemon pepper are the best in my opinion. Which brings me to my 2 star rating, simply because their garlic parm wings are so amazing... if it weren't for those I wouldn't go to wingstop anymore. Being that I work and live near a wingstop I have given them more chances then I should have. In the last 2-3 months I have ordered wingstop maybe 10 times most of time being a different location. The other location never, and I mean never got our order correct. So I tried this location thinking it would be better. 3 out of 4 orders were wrong. Everytime it's always something different. Wrong flavors, wrong type of wings, or a mixture of the two, missing fries, missing ranch, etc. I've seen it all and I order the same thing everytime as you may already noticed garlic parm and lemon pepper bone in wings, 8-12pcs depends.... how do you mix that up with a 20 pcs boneless bbq. I have officially given up on wingstop after I went there during the holidays and I "had" to purchase a drink with my wings. Okay fine, take my cups that I did not want and go to get my fountain drink. Surprise the fountain machine is already been "broken" done, but I didn't see that before placing my cup under the machine. I was instantly sprayed with soda.... so I went back to the register and asked for my money back for the drinks that I didn't want in the first place now that I have been soaked by their machine that was taken apart during business hours and they refused. Even went as far as putting the machine back together just so I could fill my unwanted drinks..... with that I will never return to this wingstop or any other one again, I'll miss you garlic parm wings :(
I have been here twice because it is the closest dry cleaner to my house. Both times have been bad. The first time I was dropping off clothes and the guy at the desk told me the total (over $50 for a few blouses and pants) so I took the pants back and said I didn't need them dry cleaned. He then was very rude to me and belittling. At that point I was right out of college and just didn't want to spend that much money and figured I could clean the pants myself. He still had my blouses so I wasn't walking out of the store giving him no business, the blouses were still $35 to dry clean. When I got the silk blouses back two of them had stains on them. Of course I noticed it at home because they left a little tag on the hanger saying something along the lines of this is the best we can do... but they're the ones who caused the detergent like stains. I couldn't take them back to them because once you leave their store they don't let you. I took the same two blouses to another dry cleaner and they dry cleaned them with no problem. I have avoided them for a few years now, but a few weeks ago I decided to give them another chance due to their proximity to me. Big mistake. This time I brought in six silk blouses. I didn't learn my lesson about what happened the time before and didn't check their condition in the store. Once I got home I checked the blouses and four of the six had stains on them with the tag that said "this is the best we can do." The stains were new and not caused by me and looked to be detergent stains again. I just would have liked them to tell me before I left their store both times that something didn't go right with my clothes. I then took the blouses to Rainbow Cleaners on 3rd Ave and they fixed what Spring had done, and for a cheaper cost too. If I'm going to spend $6 per blouse then I want to be told before I leave the store either 1) we made your blouse more dirty and thus will refund you, or 2) we need to dry clean your blouse again.
We came here for dinner after my boyfriend graduated from Law School.  The wait staff was LESS than sub par.  In fact he was horrible, and the place was near empty.  I got the chicken pot pie which was so salty I felt like I was literally eating a salt lick.  For the rest of the day I was chugging water like it was going out of style.  I wouldn't go there again.
I just had the worst burrito ever....the rice wasn't cooked, the veggies were ice cold and it was all soggy.  I remember when Moe's had good burritos. ...not sure what happened? !
So after reading all the Yelp reviews about the Buffalo Chicken Calzone, I couldn't wait to try it.  My expectations were set very high and this calzone didn't come close to living up to the hype.  I don't really understand what people raved about.   I have had much better buffalo chicken calzones in my lifetime.  I personally think the buffalo chicken calzone at Melrose Pizza is better and I don't think they were that great.  I guess the blue cheese at this place is good.
Watch your receipts!! We went there for my birthday with a few friends, September 5th at around 7pm. Not only did they charge my fiancée for an extra taco he didn't order, but when I went up to correct it the cashier handed me my friend's receipt instead of the corrected one!!! It seemed so sketchy, but she swore up and down she corrected it and handed me the "corrected" receipt. We just checked our credit card statement, and we were DOUBLE CHARGED (for what we're sub-par tacos, I might add).   Yup. I stood up there correcting my receipts while my friends sat there waiting for the birthday girl to come and eat, only to find out they took even more of our money. I live two minutes down the road, they could have had a consistent customer for life but now I'll never go back. Now we're calling the bank to fix it, because they sure as hell won't.
Just ordered from scrambler over uber eats and received the wrong order. They gave the uber driver a totally different order. The idea behind getting food from them was due to having a newborn at home and not wanting to travel. Called the store and talked to 3 people, two who claimed to be managers having to explain myself multiple times. They explained that "oops the server must have given them the wrong andrew delivery" and that "sorry there is nothing we can do" I explained to them the situation with the newborn to which I was told, if you come into the restaurant to eat we "can offer you a discount on your meal". So you want to offer me a discount on something I already paid for and didn't receive, and now make me come into the restaurant after we've already been waiting 45 minutes, pack up a newborn and travel there to wait in line and now wait longer.  Ridiculous and rude. I will never be spending money there again, and hope they figure their customer service out.
I really liked this place until I found out they lie about there glass and manufacturers and up sell cheap crap. Don't waste your money on liars looking for a buck.
I have gotten take out a few times and the food was okay (Damn I miss New Asia)  First the food, I would rate it more on the lines of 2 1/2 stars Did Dim Sum, Sweet Soy milk, Chinese fried dough, taro root something and Parsnip pancake.  All average nothing I would recommend or not recommend.  Though let the Parsnip pancake cool before eating.  Service.  No Stars. - We got ignored until everyone else was served (regulars, friends or family?maybe), not just last order taken, everyone else had food before we had our order taken even though we had menus down and tried to make contact with staff.  Not impressed.  Not recommending.  Not going back again.
The food was good but the service was horrible, me and two other people joined our group after they ordered and waited a good 15-20 mins before I got up and asked for service. The wait for the food seemed too long for the amount of food we got.  When we got our food it was definitely delicious, great sparks of flavor. If the service and wait for food could improve this place could have much better business.
I'm giving this a 1 because their staff at night BLOWS. I'm sorry, but if you're THAT miserable, to the point where if a customer asks for extra carmel, you huff and puff, then you probably need to rethink your career path. JUST SAYING. I didn't dish anything this woman that was searving me, back, but I thought in my head, YUP I'm definitely going to yelp for this meanie.
For the money we spent here, two stars is being really nice.  We registered at this location and had a pleasant experience with Allison.  When I returned to purchase the remaining registry items and our nursery furniture, the chaos began.  First of all, the crib I'd spent months searching for was back ordered 10-12 weeks.  My problem with this is that there was absolutely no indication of the furniture being back ordered anywhere!!!  Online it said the furniture was available and would ship within 2 weeks. So of course I wonder why it's readily available online, but not when I purchase in store.  My rep (Heather) tells me it is one of the most popular cribs and that an online purchase is different from an in-store purchase because the furniture ships from a different warehouse.  But should I care?! How about order it from whichever warehouse gets it to the paying customer fastest? Or, easier than that, warn your customers some of the cribs might take 3 months to arrive. So...I decide to go with my second crib choice and it was the exact same thing!! Really?! Finally I try to go with my 3rd choice and of course they had trouble finding the item number even though the furniture was on display in the store.  Ugh!!  When they found the item, they couldn't find the advertised color I wanted.  I was thoroughly aggravated by this point. I was prepared to leave and go to a different location or simply order off line, but then I wouldn't have been able to use the coupons I had (which I didn't understand either). Beyond all that, I go to purchase other things off the registry and they aren't available either! I had to change several things about my nursery because this location didn't have the items they allowed me to scan/add to the registry.  Heather was okay, and seemed to try everything she could, but she also seemed confused and like she was saying whatever she needed to say to keep me there.  Thank goodness for the almost 40% in coupons I was able to use, otherwise I would've walked out and went to buy buy Baby like I seriously considered.
Well this is for sure a dive bar.  The good news is that they have real cheap drink prices.
So I came to this cafe with the expectation that it would be an amazing dessert and bubble tea place that conveniently also has Darts but to my dismay this place sucks.  Let's start off with the fact that it took 30 minutes to get a slush or how I would like to call it.. sweetened ice. The amount of milk they put it was insufficient to the point where the blender was making loud noises. It wasn't even a vitamx! So what we got was a very thick ice drink that was so hard to get anything out of  This place sucks never coming back.
I travel constantly for work, but I will not support any Hotel Indigo locations for the fact that the Austin, Red River establishment has been coercive and damaging to the local economy. Austin is known worldwide as the Live Music Capitol. The erection of Hotel Indigo Red River caused local venue Cheer Up Charlie's to shut down its main stage in 2016. The city of Austin is making moves to protect its local economy, especially the musicians who draw tourism and local commerce. Recently, their efforts to extend the noise curfew until 1:00 am on weekends have been threatened by Hotel Indigo.  Musicians of Austin are instigating an embargo on this business and urging the worldwide music community's cooperation.
I always dread taking my car, affectionately named "Crystal Flame" by my good friend Sarah, to Herb Chambers.  I have to book an appointment 2 weeks in advance, once I arrive and drop my car off there is always a wait to speak to a representative, the repairs and parts are completely overpriced, and without a doubt when I go to pick my car up I wait AT LEAST 15-20 minutes for them to drive my car to the entrance to the service center after I have already paid so that I can drive it home.  Honestly, what are they doing in the back that they can't pull themselves together to drive a car 50 feet from where it is parked to where the customer is waiting in a timely fashion?   I don't trust the men who work there, and I hate that I know very little about cars and have no way to negotiate with them or understand what they are talking about half the time.    But today was a particularly frustrating day.  I made an appointment over 2 weeks ago to take Crystal in because the back window on the passenger side of the car refused to roll up or down.  Thursdays are the only day I work late (12-7pm rather than my usualy 9-5 the rest of the week) so I wanted to take her in first thing in the morning at 7am so that she could get fixed up and I could still drive her to work the same day.  I dropped her off without much of a problem, stated that I would be waiting for the car, and went to a coffee shop to grab breakfast and read while I waited.  At 8am the service man, I think his name was Matt?, called and told me that they had the part in stock for my window to be fixed, and there was also a problem with oil leaking and a mild problem with one of my tires.  I told him to go ahead and take care of the oil leak and the window and I would deal with the tire elsewhere (I'm not going to pay a BMW store price for a friggin' tire).  I asked him how long the repairs would take and he said about 2 hours.  I let him know I needed the car around 10am to get to work, and he said they would "do their best for me".  2 hours later at 10:05 am Matt finds me in the waiting room and tells me that they in fact did not have the part in stock to fix the window.  Okay, so let me get this straight.  I've been waiting here for a total of 3 hours, and you didn't fix the one thing that I made an appointment for 2 weeks ago???  I asked Matt what they had been doing the past two hours and he said "Well we were fixing the oil leak problem.  You don't want to mess around with oil leaking in your engine."  True Matt, very true.  But you had told me that both repairs would take 2 hours, and you spent over 2 hours just working on one of them.  I then asked Matt how long the window repair would take once the part comes in and his response, "I don't know.  Probably about an hour and a half".  No apology.  No explanation.  He just handed me the bill and told me to stop by in the next few weeks to get the window on my car fixed.    I need to find another place to take Crystal for servicing.  But I just don't know what other company has the same BMW expertise as Herb Chambers in or near the City of Boston???
Make sure you tally your order yourself.  Last couple of visits they have charged me $3-7 dollar extra on my bill!!! I'm sure this happens a lot and it's very unfortunate especially when they write your receipt in non English format.
Oh man this review caught my attention right away bc i had problems wit this publix too.  Its terrible.  Every time i go to the deli they run out of something.  I used to stop by prolly like 3 X a week on my way to work, i would bring a sub and refrigerate it and haave it later.  Every single time i went there i had a problem with something.  But no worries danny b, i stopped going to this one because theres one right nearby on university anyway, switch it up and go there and you'll be fine.  Publix is allright i like their subs but this ones bad.  Also, i had problems with the one on e colonial too.  Its not a consistent company but when you find the right one its allll good
After reading all the great reviews, gotta say I'm pretty disappointed. In town for work, ordered for delivery, and it took 45 minutes. That was not out of the ordinary, and I was ok with it. What was disappointing was the fact that the pizza was barely warm, onions that were supposed to bee caramelized were basically just sauteed, and it was just mediocre at best. Oh well, what do you expect for $12. Might as well go get pizza hut or dominos.
I had to look up a word in the "Big Boy" dictionary to best describe my experience here.     "PRESUMPTUOUS".  My wife and I were surrounded by empty tables. Overly ambitious was my take on the owners. With casual optimism, we ordered the small "Tower Of Seafood". Imagine my surprise, then, when you picture a TOWER OF SEAFOOD, you get what looks like the results of a drone strike. Epic disappointment. Tasted great, though, but come on, for $74, couldn't the chef just toss on some extra goodies ?? Make me want to come back. I am the 98% that you should be marketing to. I hope you don't expect the other 2% to support your business. Lobster bisque was good. My cocktail was good. Even the 70's playlist throughout dinner, was good. But holy plasma center !! It's a big pain in my wallet !! Street parking available.
I went in for a quiet dinner on Sunday night at 7:30, nobody at the front desk, 1 table in the main dining area seated, 5 seated in bar, 2 dirty 2 tops, 1 table, 1 at the bar.  I waited a couple of minutes at the front desk, finally went into bar, asked if it was open seating he said yes.  Sat down, already thinking "probably not gonna be good" and after sitting for 10 mintues with an older heavy woman who I assume to be the manager walked by me twice, stopped to talk to the bar tender, the bartender moving slowly, handling the wine glass by the TOP RIM, ughhh, I decided to go elsewhere.  I am in the biz as well so know the ins and outs, this is def. an out now.  Been there before, food was ok, not great, but wanted fettucine tonite, not to be..
The food was okay but the service was awful. I've been here twice and have had the same experience both times. Server never checked on my table, I had an empty drink for 80% of the time, never gave me chopsticks, and he had no sense of respect for me as a customer. Some people just aren't meant to be servers. Safe to say I'm not coming back.
I recently took my beautiful Chloe coat, worth over $4,000, to Portland Cleaners. When I dropped it off, I explicitly told the young lady behind the counter to be extra careful because it was very expensive and it meant a lot to me. The next day, I found that the paint from the buttons and the hardware on the sleeves had peeled off. I called the cleaners immediately after finding it and asked if dry cleaning would do this. Nick, who happens to also be the manager, advised that dry cleaning wouldn´t do this and to bring it back so they could try to fix it. Not feeling comfortable leaving it with them again, I did so anyways. I was told that the manager would be calling me back once they got in in the morning. Two days went by before I got a response via e-mail. He advised he could buy some paint and try to fix it or give me free dry cleaning for a period of time on the coat. Why on earth would I give them my coat to dry clean and maybe ruin it even further AGAIN or risk them ruining the rest of my coat with paint? I asked for my money back to which he simply asked where to mail the check. The complete lack of care and service made me regret ever trusting them with my garments and I will never do business with them again. I am incredibly disappointed with this dry cleaners and with management's handle of the matter.
I ordered the chicken lunch platter. Was very disappointed by the serving size, and the chai was already luke warm when she brought it to me. The butter chicken was really tangy but at the same time lacked flavour, the chicken curry was meh,  and both had a very chewy texture. The lentils were tasteless and gooey, and the salad was so small i hardly remember it.
I ordered a chicken salad and got a chicken sandwich instead. Order took forever didn't have time to wait around to change the order. The sandwich wasn't that good maybe it was because I was anticipating a good healthy salad instead of a unhealthy greasy sandwich. I won't be back.
Came here after getting a pedicure with my daughter. Came in to people sitting down while the only employee who was working greets me from the table she was sitting at while on her phone. She continuously sat there on her phone until someone actually asked her a question. Very rude and I own a business. If my employee ever did that.... well actually they would never. They know better. Then she started picking at her nose. Are you serious? Never again.
The service here was amazing, all employees were very friendly and helpful. Unfortunately, the food was just not good. I was served my food very quickly after ordering, and it was obvious it had been sitting for awhile. My fried appetizer was very soggy, and my pho was very bland and did not have much meat.
How do you join the ranks of Tacodeli, Torchy's, and numerous other outstanding taco stands and joint in Austin?  Perhaps give the taco lover a new spin or twist on something they already love! That's what Yummi Tacos attempts to accomplish with the "Asian Fusion" concept of Mexican and Asian....but FAILS DISASTROUSLY! The fusion theme is "spotty", the attempt and intent is there, the execution lacks in so many ways. YT tries to take the content of a Banh Mi - or Vietnamese sandwich (see my review on Baguette house) and Bulgogi (Korean BBQ), and blends it with Mexican flair. Except it's universally inconsistent!  Tom B had told me it was open last Monday (Day 1), but I thought I'd let the new restaurant owners get settled and give them sometime to work out any kinks. I couldn't wait longer than a week. I came in on Saturday, the restaurant decor was still very sparse - empty refrigerators, make shift sauce station (soy sauce & siraracha), bare walls ....all unappealing first impression.  I ordered one of every Taco - the bulgogi, lemongrass chicken, fish taco and fried shrimp rolls.  In speaking with one of the owners, I was told the Banh Mi had the same content as the taco, except in a "miniature" baguette. I say miniature because it is half the size of those found at any good Vietnamese sandwiches in town. At a whopping $3.50, I didn't think it was worth the try. Taco's are $2.00 each.   The descriptor - marinated meats with asian slaw. Okay, kind of like the Korean bbq or the contents of a good Banh Mi inside a taco, I was excited!   Except, there was no Asian slaw to be found...NO ASIAN SLAW !...Absolutely unforgivable! That's what makes a good Vietnamese sandwich - the pickled daikon/carrots lending the tart, sweet punch to complement the meat!  Nope, all there was was just some onions and a lot of cilantro all wrapped in a corn tortilla (no option on the type of tortilla, btw).   Bulgogi was mediocre, the lemongrass chicken was bland and gave me only a glimpse of lemongrass, the fish taco - NOTHING special. I was blown away. With the idea of fusion, I was hoping for a freakin' party in my mouth! Flavor bursts were nowhere to be found. I was deflated to say the least.  I concocted my own sauce at home mixing the spicy mayo I had requested from them with some more sriracha to spice things up.  The fried shrimp rolls were essentially a shrimp with tail on, green scallion in an egg roll wrap - over fried, and disappointing.  Suggestions to YT: Rethink the sauces - either Vietnamese or Korean - and kick up the sauces a notch - offer a Vietnamese sauce or Korean spicy bean paste or something, anything that can compete with Tacodeli's dona sauce. If you make it, they will come! Create an Asian salsa to punch up the flavor and follow through with your description - I want SLAW!!!  Reconsider the price of the Banh Mi- right now, you're offering your customers the same thing in a smaller size baguette for $1.50 more. Austinites are too intelligent and too versed in the way of foods to accept that.   I wish YT only the best in their business venture, but they've got a long ways to go. I'm hoping the above suggestions are considered and I'll wait a little longer to see if any changes are made and give them another shot  in a few months. It's not worth the drive north for what they are currently offering.  For, now, if I want Banh Mi - I'm still hitting up Baguette house (their bbq pork and chicken sandwiches are unbeatable) and if I want good fish taco - I'm sticking to Tacodeli - they actually have slaw and amazing sauce - it might not be Asian, but it's there and it's fantastic!
worst service ever! they keep rushing & ignoring us. we decided to leave the table to get the check at the front desk. we waited for about 10 minutes to pay so we can leave
OK...so I really wanted to like this place...but...  Too much of a mash up.  I love Greek food...and REALLY love Indian/Pakistani/Nepalese food...but I just can't wrap my head around this place.  Too many flavors at odds with each other.  If I was an inebriated 20 year old college student and it was 1:30am, maybe.  The owner is VERY nice !  I'll give it another try, maybe @ 2am.
The preponderance of positive reviews about this restaurant only serves to reinforce my well considered observations over the past 20 years that the Portland dining community has shockingly low standards and is comprised of sheep who know little about food (and in particular ANY sort of ethnic cuisine) and will flock anywhere they are told or happens to be trendy.    Lechon is an absolute joke!  In fairness, I have been there only once and it was for brunch but given the clear and glaring shortcomings I experienced I can't imagine it could be any better for lunch or dinner.  I had the steak sandwich. It was awful and tasted like something I would expect to get from Quiznos or in a mall food court. The "baguette" was soft and elastic in texture and tasted like Wonder Bread, the extremely small portion of beef was cold, tough and under seasoned - totally lacking in flavor as were the peppers and onions. The chimichurri had the flavor profile of a commercial product manufactured to satisfy middle america rather than being bright and bold as it should be. It added nothing to the overall flavor of the sandwich. The sandwich had no character whatsoever and execution and attention to detail was poor. The parmesan herb french fries that accompanied the sandwich were barely lukewarm and very light on the parmesan and herbs. It is clear that the kitchen staff is lacking in skill and experience and that oversight and overall standards within the kitchen and by the expediter (who appeared to be a manager) are non existent.  My server was very pleasant however not particularly attentive. I finished my beverage half way through my meal and neither she nor anyone else ever came by to ask if I wanted another. Overall, the service staff was amateurish and inexperienced. The feel of the restaurant is very much like what you would expect from a suburban chain eatery in a strip mall.   This restaurant also adds a 3% "Health and Wellness" tax on to the bill without disclosing anywhere on the menu that this is their practice. While I most certainly support employees being paid a fair and living wage with adequate benefits it is the responsibility of the business to build those costs into their pricing structure. Restaurant prices are based on cost of goods, labor cost and operating expenses - including insurance benefits. It would not surprise me one bit if this cost is already factored into the menu pricing and the restaurant uses this fee as a way to increase revenue or offset other costs by making customers think they are doing something good for the employees.   I was looking forward to trying Lechon for dinner however after this experience it is clear that returning would be a complete waste of time and money. Very, very weak.
Bad service, no matter what you want to buy, guys are helpless and even rude, I bought here my Ibanez AR 320, but I will never come back, not even for a simple set if guitar strings, which by the way , you can not take your time to choose because the guys there do not like to wait for you to make the decision....sucks
Never again will I ever step foot in this horrific institution that they call a hair salon. Rude and even Ruder customer service.
This place is ridiculous, waited over an hour and offered to sit at the bar! Otherwise had to wait another 30 mins to get a seat. We had invested all the time there and were hungry so decided to stay! Ordered right away and it took them 25 minutes to have the food ready. In my opinion Vancouver fire department should check the capacity for this place which seems very over crowded.
Dont go to Scrub a Dub in the hood! If you have to go to them, go to the ones in the white areas. No disrespect, no racism intended. Ive been going to Scrub a Dub for many many years and I always chose them becuause they were convenient, were brushless, and offer a warranty on their washes. I like how they re-wash your car if you're not completely satsfied, and give free Birthday washes to members which I am.   As of lately I think S.A.D (scrub a dub) fell off in quality. I gave them a try after a long fall/winter break and Im pissed off and feel like I got taken for my money! First off they charged $17.50 for the "Works" car wash, okay no problem. The car in front of me is not moving because either the wash is malfunctioning or the employees started shutting down vital parts of the car wash because they want to go home early tonight either way closing time is another hour away?? While Im waiting to go thru, one kid takes a broomstick with a brush head on it and pre-washes a few spots on ONE SIDE of my car only while the other guy pre-treats just my front driver side wheel with a spray gun. Finally the kid at the register manually adjusts some kind of lever on the track then it gets moving again. I finally start going thru the wash. I notice maybe a few cups of water spraying on my car. Then some faint suds and the DRY washing wheels swirl my paint on both sides with nothing but dirty water and dirt/salt residue NO RINSE. I come out and immediately mention a refund.  Professional customer service would refund and rewash or rewash and give a coupon for a free future  wash. I was only offered to go thru again after I sign their clip board and give a reason why Im going thru another time. Pissed off I hesitate then decide to go thru again. I noticed all these neon signs that are supposed to light up and let me know when the under carriage is being done, then when simoniz is applied, Blue Coral, etc.. but NOTHING lit up ever. So I just paid $17.50 to have the dry salt swirled around on my paint and an express wash. R U kidding me!!??!! At that point I attempt to speak to a mgr as I dont like the way the kids at the drive thru register are running this multi million dollar corporation. The door is locked and lights are out in the inside store/office. At that point I just say F___ it! get in my car, and peel out leaving skid marks thinking how if I ran that company how many changes I would make. When you damage someones car or scam them out of their money, "YO, my fault yo" is not an acceptable response.    I did take my complaint to the mgr the next day without "snitchin" on anyone, and he gave me the okay to get another wash and reset my 4 day clean car guarantee. When I finally got there I explained my issue to a different mgr and he at first gave me a hard time, then he just scribbled his name on the receipt and told me Im good. Now I can see why people dont support inner city businesses. They always think somebody is out to make a easy dollar off them, and if youre not trying to scam them, they are thinking of ways to get over on you.   So in all I have driven thru that car wash 4 times in a week span, and my car is only 80% clean. There are still spots on it, and the wheels still have the same brake dust that was there the first time and wait.....heeeeell naaawww my oem lug nut cover/wheel cap is missing! Now Im so pissed off Im laughing to my self like a crazy person. No these mutha____s didnt.....    All I wanted to do was pay for a good car wash. Is that too much to ask? I really liked S.A.D. before this even though most of the cars I have owned in the past went thru some kind of trauma there (rear wiper snatched off, body trim pieces being ripped off, scratched wheels, and more). I stuck it out thru all that, but as you get older you tend to not settle for just anything considering you work hard for your money and the economy is tough.    In Natick, Woburn, or Shrewsbury Scrub a dub if this happened they would refund your money, and offer to do a complimentary interior clean with a rewash. Maybe throw in some coupons. This is where I feel customer service in the hood is lacking. If you know your people need a job, Im all for providing a job to keep another person off the street, but dammit somebody teach that whole place customer service. Next time I'll just go to Autozone and spend $20 there and get car care products that will last me thru the summer and do the car washing by hand.
I had the Blueberry, Bourbon, Basil doughnut. I didn't particularly enjoy the texture of the doughnut which was bouncy/chewy. The bread was fairly flavorless. I didn't appreciate the flavor of the frosting either; it was underwhelming to me.  There was a slogan on the wall: "Doughnuts for grownups" or something like that. I guess I'm not grown up enough. Or maybe I know when a doughnut isn't good.
This review is for their massage and wrap promotion. Sometimes with big promotions you discover a place you'd go to regardless; other times it's clear why they have to resort to such tactics to get anyone in the door. Sadly, this is one of those times.  The woman who saw me was terribly abrasive in her manner. I had to repeatedly decline the upselling for their facials and products and she went so far as to reenter the room just to loudly disturb my "relaxing" portion of the wrap (my eyes were closed) to ask me again--after I'd already politely declined numerous times!   I've experienced many a massage and wrap and this was by far the worst: 1-star technique, attentiveness, and attitude. The facilities are also nothing special and I was not even offered a towel and had to ask for it after my shower. I also told her to be careful about a big cut on my knee, but she dismissively nodded and proceeded to scrape across this area anyway! I also was never offered anything to drink for the nearly 2 hours I was there, and had to ask for that too.   Bottom line: dismissive, pushy, sloppy, and unprofessional. DO NOT RECOMMEND!
I used to rave about Genies' tasty hamburger.  I thought that juicy meaty delight was spiced well and near the best in town(bigger does not mean better)  and I came back often to indulge.  Many times I brought friends for confirmation of my opinion and more often than not they ordered the burger with me to see if I was right.  But the last time I went, their burger wasn't up to par.  It seemed like the portion was drastically reduced and it was way over-cooked.  Why bother asking me how I want it done if you are just going to cook it into shoe leather anyway?  I rarely complain at restaurants but y'know this was my favorite burger in town and I felt like something had to be said.  I know cooks can have an off day and I just wanted a little feedback to get back to the kitchen.  I wasn't asking for my money back or anything, I ate the burger.  I was hungry.  But when I told the waitress my thoughts she responded with arguing with me and telling me that's the way they always cook it and nothing was different about my burger.  Well, I guess I must have plum forgot that these burgers sucked and I am just a glutton for punishment.  When should you imply that your customer is a liar when they give you feedback?  Never. And the look she gave me... I wasn't rude to her or anything and I kept my voice low so other tables wouldn't hear me.  Don't get me wrong, I could forgive a one off bad burger and I always put up with their lousy service.  But to have the wait staff embarrass me in front of my wife, treat me like that, and tell me I am basically full of it means they don't appreciate my hard earned cash or my patronage.  I don't want to go back and never will.  You can call them sassy, hip, or whatever, I'll just call them rude and less one regular customer.  Plenty of places in town to eat, Toots.  This ain't Oakridge.
We have used Mesa Cleaners off time of Mesa Road for a couple years.  Had a number of issues with their equipment breaking and not getting our clothes....we dealt with it and kept going back.  This past week, they were closed all week citing an air conditioning issue by way of a note on the door.  Went today to try and get my clothes and the there is a sign from the landlord stating Mesa Cleaners is locked out and owes more than $18k in rent.  Not sure how I'll get my clothes, hopefully the landlord will help us!
My husband and I used to LOVE Curra's. We would go a few times a month and also get food Togo pretty often and it was always wonderful. We moved away about 2 years ago, but still make a point to visit Austin every 2-3 months. Curra's has always been one of the places that we make sure we visit while we're here, but the past few times haven't lived up to expectation. The food is different. We can't figure out what is different about it, but it's just not the same. The food has been very cold the past few times. This past visit, I was served the wrong type of beans (no big deal) but I couldn't find my server to tell him until I was 3/4 the way done with my meal. Service has been kind of iffy. Plus they charge you for chips and salsa, which we've always overlooked because of the yummy food, but I think it's time to find a new Austin Tex-mex favorite.
Went there for lunch, we were tired and it was a short walk from the hotel. The place was not very busy and all the tables were not clean. The waitresses were sitting and talking, not sure if the manager was training or what, but he was sitting with them. We ordered wings and shrimp, the food wasn't great, but it was ok. I wouldn't recommend it.
This used to be our # one place for pure comfort food.  Their breakfasts are amazing.  Since they lost Anne, one of their managers, not only has the service declined, I think that the food prep has deteriorated also.  The one redeeming fact is, they still Ave Valerie, who is a great server.  It's back to Biscuits, for us.
Been here plenty of times! Service is great and food is cheap and tastes great. I got the Mac n cheese with grilled chicken and the chicken seemed a bit under cooked I thought it would be fine I've been throwing up for the last 40 mins and it was the only thing I ate all day!
I'm going to be the odd man out here. I was tempted to try it out because I've heard several people say they liked Ethiopian, and I had no concept of what Ethiopian food was, so I decided to find out.   This was my first time, and was a little surprised at the method of serving and eating Ethiopian food.  I've heard injera bread described as spongy and sour, but I expected like, pancake spongy, not... wet sponge sitting in my sink spongy.  I suppose I would liken the bread to a very bland crepe.   I went with two friends, and we each ordered different main dishes, and asked the waiter for a sampling of various vegetable sides.  Some were really good (whatever the yellow paste was in particular), some were blah, and nearly all of them reminded me of Indian food in texture and taste, but not quite as flavorful.   The best meat dish (forgive me for forgetting the proper name) was a beef cooked in onions and peppers and garlic, kind of like Ethiopian fajitas.  The lamb was.. well, lamb, and the chicken was disappointing - just two drumsticks, no breast or thigh meat at all.   Unlike most other flat breads, the injera kind of made me sick the more I ate it.   Perhaps because we were noobs to Ethiopian food, we had to order an extra round of injera to scoop up the food, but were too stuffed to eat the injera bread used as the 'plate' and after sitting underneath the food for the whole meal, it got a soggy consistency that wasn't very appetizing.   I will admit they gave us enough food, but I thought it was a little pricey for what it was.  It came out to about $18 a person after tax & tip with no alcohol.    Also it seemed like I had to wait for about a half hour to get my water refilled.   My biggest gripe isn't anything against this establishment, but against the family-style serving of Ethiopian food.  Now I went with my two best friends, and despite everyone washing their hands before eating, I didn't like the idea of eating food other people have stuck their fingers (which had been licked clean) into.  If you get mad when you see someone double-dip a chip, Ethiopian is not for you.  IMHO you're better off going to an Indian place, getting very similar (but tastier) food, and scooping it up off of your very own plate with some delicious-ass Naan bread.
I will never go to Lamb's again.  Two strikes and you're out.  First time I had a problem was when I brought my vehicle in for it's 50,000 check up and oil change.  Which now I'm wondering if they did, but we'll get back to that.  One of the guys came out and told me lady you need a new battery - I'm surprised you made it this far.  I said really - what's wrong with it.  He showed me a copy of a print out and said it was barely putting out power. I told him that was surprising as it was a brand new battery - just put in 4 days prior.  He tried to back pedal a little but tried valiantly to keep up with the new battery story.  I asked how it was that a mechanic couldn't tell the difference between a new battery and an old one - no answer to that.  So I took the read out from him and drove the the dealership that put the battery in.  Explained the situation to them and they ran the check on my battery twice to be sure.  Their mechanic said there was no way this readout was from my battery - which is what I thought in the first place.  Onto the second strike - took my vehicle in there the other day for an oil change.  Got a call from them that my transmission fluid was black and that they told me 30,000 miles ago that it needed to be flushed (which they didn't).  Which brings me back to the first strike and the thought that they didn't do the 50,000 check up.  And to top it all off they got grease all over my ceiling - under the visor where I wonder why they had my visor down in the first place - not like they have to block the sun while its in the garage being worked on.   I have been to the dealership for my other oil changes between those two time and I would think that if the transmission fluid was black the mechanic at the dealership would have said something. Lord knows they wouldn't mind the business.
Longest I have waited for a Which Wich sandwich in my life. They also messed up some else's order in front of me. Here are the reasons why it took so long: 1) Cashier was chatting with friends while the line was building up 2) She did not put my shake in the order. Clearly not up to the standards of the other Which Wich shops I have been to in Texas. Top it off they did not toast it even though it was marked toasted.
Was not terribly impressed by either the service or quality of food here.  The real attraction for this establishment is location, which is beautiful.  Sitting on the Columbia with plenty of glass so you can appreciate it even in the winter, the space itself is well decorated and very clean.  From your table you can catch stunning sunsets and have a drink in a way that only a handful of other establishments provide.  The real determining factor, however is if the pricepoint and menu selection (which is found to be unremarkable)  are enticing enough to avoid the other waterfront businesses for.  For me, the impression that this place made on me was so unmemorable that it is an easy choice: go down the street.
I've lived in the South End for over eight years--I'm always up for supporting new local establishments, but I regret setting foot in this place. I won't be returning to Five Horses, and neither will the two friends who joined me (also long time SE residents).   We stopped by after a performance around 10:30pm on a Saturday evening--I heard they had a great beer selection and wanted to check it out. The place was dead, but it didn't stop the "host" from stopping us as we walked towards the bar. He asked us for our IDs...I'm 37, my friends are 43 and 44. I have no issue with this request (I find it flattering), but his abrupt and rude manner instantly made me think--wow--this place is a winner.   Our server, shortly after handing us our menus, urged us to "hurry up" our food selection since the kitchen was closing. We sat, munching on our mediocre food and drinks while chairs were put on tables, garbage cans were loudly dragged down the stairs and after only 45 minutes we were asked if they could get us anything else...yes, if you did the math you realize it was now 11:15pm...on a Saturday night...in the South End.   The beer menu will only get them so far--this place won't last and if it does, they should strongly reconsider their approach to customer service. I won't be going back...and I've already spread the word to my own network to totally bypass this place.
The customer service was horrendous. The food was  subpar. And when we complained to the manager he didn't seem well trained in assisting customers who've had a negative experience in their establishment. The employees never apologized. I witnessed three different food prep employees wipe their gloved hands on their filthy aprons and continue to prepare food without changing into a new pair of gloves. I will never return here. I understand they are near Rollins but it seems like the majority of their staff are ill-equipped teens. It makes sense why their ratings are in a steady decline. My stomach is not feeling well after dining there either.
The Old Fashioned was $12. My drink was $13. Definitely overpriced.
Agree with other yelpers - this Lowe's in Dedham is awful. Terrible, terrible service. Cashiers and people at "customer service" desk are miserable. Sale prices are seldom properly coded and I am always overcharged for something. Home Depot about a mile down the road in West Roxbury is so much better. Employees are much nicer and more helpful. They actually want your business.
Me and my friend were driving through, and I saw the owner yelling at a poor Latino kid and telling him "you know you're not supposed to park here, right?"  First of all, business must be slow that the owner would harass people that park there - there were MULTIPLE SPOTS open. For one, the owner shouldn't act like the parking police and I bet you he doesn't watch the WHOLE parking lot and probably would ignore it if the person was white.  Sometimes when I have errands, I'd run to one spot and maybe go over to other businesses. I'm not telling some random stranger what I'm doing with my time.  Maybe the owner should think of better ways to pass the time besides policing the parking lot that had MULTIPLE OPEN SPOTS.
I was so excited to hear that Jerk Brothers would be a part of the Livable Buckhead Park(ing) day event today at Lenox. The service was great but the food was awful. I ordered the jerk chicken and the rice and cabbage were undercooked. The chicken tasted like it was warmed up from yesterday and they poured bbq jerk sauce on it. It was definitely not worth my money.
Traveled to Atlanta from Las Vegas for 4th of July weekend, and based on this restaurant's hours of operation we planned on having dinner there tonight (they close at 10pm). When we got there at 8:45pm they denied our entry.
First, let me start off by saying that I would give this place less than one star if it were possible. I think that there are two locations these 2 dentists practice at, the one at Round Rock, and the one I went to, the South Austin location.  I have lived in other cities before and have had experience with numerous dentists as well as dental surgeons (when I had my wisdom teeth pulled out). Never had I had such a horrible experience as what I had here. On a side note, I do have high expectations and am willing to pay more if the quality corresponds. Unfortunately, I decided to purchase a Morgan's Deal and try to save some money (I mistakenly thought, How bad could it be??).   Perhaps if you went here and received basic cleaning or other services requiring little or no skill, you would have a positive or average experience. My dentist was Jordan Von Seht, and he is the worst dentist I have had and I therefore cannot recommend him. Dr. Caparas I cannot comment on because I haven't been seen by him (my understanding is the Caparas travels a lot and that Von Seht is the primary dentist there).   I went in for a routine cleaning, and was told I required a few small fillings. No problem, I have had fillings before and they were no big deal. However, it went horribly here. First, Von Seht was juggling multiple patients at once so I saw him intermittently in between numbing and then the fillings. I don't know what technique he uses to numb patients, but my JAW, CHEEKS, and FACE went numb...I thought the goal was to work on my teeth; if I had known my entire face was going to be numbed, I might have gone elsewhere...Anyway, when I tried to tell him what was going on, he was curt and dismissive. Furthermore, I felt a bit odd after the injection and inquired what was in the numbing agent. Again, no response. After he left to go tend to other patients, his assistant (I forgot his name) told me there was epinephrine (adrenalin) in the injection, which explained why my heart was pounding and the odd feeling I was experiencing as a result of the numbing shot. Basically they add epinephrine (epi) to prolong the anaesthetic. I had never had shots with epi before and would have appreciated an explanation from the dentist about what he was injecting into MY body, or at least an answer to my question after he had already injected me. Needless to say, I was waiting until I could get out of that place. My numbness lasted far longer than usual and my jaw was in severe pain from his numbing "technique." I have had dental work before and never have I experienced this from a couple of basic fillings. However, my other dentists have typically been highly recommended (=more expensive) and more experienced (30+ yrs).  Surprise, surprise: within the same week a filling came out and I called to make an appt to get the problem fixed. Let me just clarify the problem: if the filling were put in properly, it would not have fallen out. So it was the fault of the dentist who put the filling in. I've never had a filling fall out before. When I told Von Seht that I was flossing when the filling came out, he implied my flossing caused the filling to come out. Then he said that he would use "more durable material" to put in the replacement filling and that it should be secure this time.  Hmmm...Wouldn't it have been efficient to use this "more durable material" the FIRST time? Not to mention that the other fillings were filled with who knows what...perhaps they are trying to save money by using subpar materials? Anyhow, before I made the follow up I made sure to confirm that the other dentist would be working on me,  of which the receptionist assured me. When I came in she politely informed me that the other dentist was 'busy' and that Von Seht would be working on me. So she lied when she made my follow up appt. Unprofessional. Von Seht came in, used the same numbing "technique," fixed his previous shoddy work and I left.  I had purchased the annual in-house insurance on my first visit to save money on my fillings. Needless to say, I did not return to this facility. They have been featured a few times on online discount deals (I wonder why?). I would not recommend the facility nor the dentist. Oh and my dentist chastised a receptionist or hygenist of some sort in front of me for 5-10 mins, while she argued that he wrote an incorrect prescription. Can we say unprofessional?
Chewy stale bread and horrifically salty tofu banh mi.  How an banh mi be bland?  Not the best option in a neighborhood where there are better choices.  Tried once and won't be back.
Not a bad spot to grab a drink after work but wouldn't be high on my list of places to return to. In terms of drinks, got a margarita that was a bit on the sweet side; I would've preferred to taste the alcohol a bit more than I did. Also, sort of a homogeneous crowd of people who likely work in the area made for a less then diverse environment. Overall, not my favorite, but I didn't really dislike it too much and could be persuaded to come back.
I always wonder, when people rave about places like Dixie Crossroads, whether they take most of their meals directly out of a dumpster. All the "unforgettables" this place has garnered are, frankly, a symptom of people who must eat very badly most of the time, which is to say, Americans. That said: Yes, of course it's a tourist trap. Yes, of course it's overpriced. But in terms of Florida rip-off restaurants, it isn't even one of the worst. Compared to say, the embarrassing greed of Bubba Gump's, which might well have been inspired by a place just like this, it's a wonder of the modern world. But what Dixie Crossroads really is, is an immense, cavernous, completely anonymous mess hall, and that's the kind of dining experience you'll have here: anonymous. There is no charm at all (unless you think Cracker Barrel-type kitsch is charming; and, in that case, you'll be enchanted by the bad oil paintings of herons at sunset). Instead, there's enormous turnover and the sense of being served on an assembly line. The food is not bad, but it isn't all that special either. The portions are tiny (if you think $1.40 is a fair price for one, single cooked shrimp, I have a bridge I'd like to sell you). All you can say about the service is that they're doing the best they can, given that there's almost certainly the modern-day equivalent of a drum master in the kitchen beating out a rhythm so that the oarsmen and -women keep rowing at ramming speed. There's no pleasure in witnessing that or in being served in that way. Dixie Crossroads' claim to "Southern hospitality" is nothing more than one of the dozens of empty phrases that have kept the greater Orlando area in business for decades and which might still work some magic on your Republican great aunt. There is, though, precious little hospitality to be had here. Eating at Dixie Crossroads isn't for the food, anyway, of course; it's for the "experience," and if it's the experience you're looking for, you might find it fun. If you actually enjoy food, expect to be treated like a human being when you're paying good money for a meal, or are depressed by wait staff that seem on the verge of a nervous breakdown, then give Dixie Crossroads a miss.
Really disappointed at this place.   Food was good.  Service was really poor.   We were not greeted nor acknowledged as we left.   Not worth coming back.
i went to the bakeshop last friday - it was about an hour before closing time-  I got a piece of key lime pie and also another pastry -- both to go -- i took them home and ended up throwing them away -- they were really bad -- pie tasted like it had old marshmallow topping on it or something that tasted like that - yuk!     so the pastries at the bakeshop get a big thumbs down -- unless you want to lose weight
I have stopped at this establishment several times in the past 6 months. Every time I have ordered and paid for "2 extra drumsticks" only to find out when I get home I didn't get what paid for.  I have ordered the tenders only to get home and find they have not included gravy, or left out the biscuits. One should be able to trust the employees/manager to check the order before it is given to the paying customer.  Long story short this place is notorious for failing to fulfill orders placed. Don't waste your time or money. It will only end in frustration.
Wow! I was shocked by the rating and all of the positive feedback. Maybe I hit it on a bad day, but I thought the mediocre food was over priced. I prefer Habana Grill (the old Don Pepe's), Black Bean Deli  & Alex's Cafe. For the good stuff, I head South to MIAMI; nothing beats it, but that's a whole other series of reviews!  Maybe I'll try it again one day and then come back and edit my thoughts. Until then ...
Good prices, but rude pharmacist. I'd rather go to another part of town or Fred Meyers. I've noticed this poor treatment several times since the store opened.
We waited an hour an a half for the delivery. Call 3 times. Nobody seems to care. We end up canceling the order. The pizza never showed up, even when they said they were at the hotel already
The food was okay but the service was terrible. The waitress took 10 minutes+ after we rung the bell to come out. She automatically assumed we were ordering to go and seemed annoyed when we stated we wanted to dine in. She stated "if you are dining in the price changes" and didnt tell us the new price. She never offered us drinks, we had no water the entire time and she was too busy answering phone for to go people she never once came back to make sure we were doing okay. The bill had a 18% gratitude automatically added in despite there being almost no service and there was only two of us.
I am reviewing a restaurant that is closed because I just have to memorialize the story of the time I went there. You know, so it doesn't get lost to the dustbin of history.  A friend was visiting Boston for the weekend and we decided to walk the Freedom Trail. It was a windy New England winter day and the sky was spitting slush, but I still insisted that we walk all the way across the Charlestown Bridge because otherwise her Freedom Trail experience would not be complete!!  By the time we were walking back from the Bunker Hill monument, our coats were entirely covered with a layer of slush. We had wanted to go to the North End for dinner, but we weren't sure we'd make it that far without dropping dead from frostbite. As we approached the bridge to cross back in the other direction, we spotted the haven of Olives, with its warm, friendly lights inside. We walked to the window, looked at the menu, and were thrilled to see prices we could afford. So in we went.  We were seated by a friendly waitress who dropped off a basket of bread and dish of olive oil with herbs. It smelled heavenly. But when we opened our menus, we saw prices that were most definitely not what we had seen in the window. So, we waited. With that bread in front of us, tempting us with its irresistible aroma. For fifteen minutes, while our waitress did not come and did not come and did not come.  When she finally came back to take our order, I said, "The prices on the menu don't seem to be the same as what was in the window." Without a word, she turned and walked to the window. She removed the lunch menu and replaced it with the dinner menu. Then she came back to our table and explained that the lunch menu had been left up too long in error. Gesturing to the dinner menu, I said, "These prices are really more than what we were hoping to pay."   Instead of saying, "I'm sorry. You can order from the lunch menu, since it's our fault that it was left up too long," she said, "That's all right, you can just go ahead and leave then." So we did.  True story.
This restaurant has 4+ star quality food but the layout and service completely destroy all the quality coming out of the kitchen.  We ordered our first round of drinks and received them 20 minutes later.  It was so bad that our kids entrees came to the table before our first round of drinks!!!!!  To make matters worse it took 40 minutes to get our entrees after we ordered them.  Normally it would be great to chat during the long wait but the acoustics in this place are so poor that you cannot even hear yourself think. Overall a bad experience. Tighten up, Range.
I tried Nails by Porter for a main and pedi, because my go-to nail salon is closing... I was disappointed! My pedicure came out well  but my manicure smudged all over. I had two coats, stayed under the fan for 10 minutes (I was told 5 was enough but they didn't seem hardened at that point). Even a full hour after leaving the salon, my nails got dinged by everything I touched. Maybe something was wrong with the polish? I had to remove the polish when I got home because the manicure just wasn't salvageable. I also tipped 20% prior to ] getting the polish because that's the ideal time to get your wallet out... Not the end of the world, but not sure they will be getting my business going forward.
The room was disgusting! It was dank, smelled moldy and there were BUGS. I went to check out and get a refund and the staff was completely rude and for some reason they couldn't reach their manager. The receptionist thought it was "funny" that I wanted to check out. It was completely unprofessional and upsetting. Eventually I was able to get a refund and leave but it was  took ridiculously long. I'd rate negative stars if possible.
On vacation from NY. We googled Spanish foods places to eat. And found número uno. Omg the air conditioner was blasting. Being a small place it felt so cold that the food turned cold on the plate. My husband asked for a fish he said it tasted like cardboard. My daughter asked for Fried chicken and she got chicken stewed. I asked for green plantains and got sweet ones. My son as a joke asked for a beer and he wasn't ID. He was given a beer. Food was tasteless !!!! Never again on the way to Boca Raton Florida to finish our vacation. Can't wait to eat at our favorite place down there. Little Havana restaurant here we come !
VERY DISAPPOINTED!!!!  Looks are definitely deceiving. This place looked really nice and classy, but today changed their image. We came at a busy time, so the customer service wasn't great. The hostess was not helpful or courteous, but just because you're busy doesn't mean that you loose your hospitality. We had a 45 min wait. After waiting 30 mins, an older grungy looking man came into the restaurant with 2 empty filthy looking lunch containers. He was trying to get the attention of the hostess, but she was distracted. He went near the buffet, but came back down to ask the hostess if he could get some food. My friend and I observed the whole encounter. The hostess said, "Go ahead, but I cannot seat you". As they continued business, the man went to the buffet with his 2 empty lunch containers and started to fill the containers with food from the buffet. We were shocked at this! How can you let someone (anyone) from off the streets come into an establishment with their own containers and start to fill them up with the restaurant food? The containers didn't even look like they were cleaned properly. You can't even do that at a fast food restaurant. They call it contamination. He was touching the inside of his container with the utensils that everyone else was using to get their food. That's disgusting and very unsanitary. After witnessing this, we were appalled. So we left immediately. We contacted the manager at the restaurant and expressed our disgust at how this situation was handled. She was apologetic and even lied to us saying that they told the guy no, but we heard her say go ahead. If they were trying to help this guy out, they could've easily gotten some to-go boxes and boxed up some food for the guy. Instead they let him contaminate the buffet. The manager apologized, but didn't even try to accommodate us or apologize for our wait. We definitely will not be returning back to this restaurant.
Arrived at 3:30 during happy hour, understandably there was a 30 minute wait for a table, no worries the view is beautiful. After we were seated it was a bit long until a waiter came over to our table. We asked for a happy hour menu and the waiter said im not sure where they are, so we just ordered our drinks and an appetizer. The food and drink took unusually long to arrive. Next we ordered a pitcher of beer but after awhile the server came back and said that particular beer wasn't included in happy hour so we said we would take another beer. More time passes and the server csme back saying the original beer was already poured, so we said no problem we are fine with  the non- happy hour beer. It arrived, warm of course. By now we were really getting hungry, so we ordered food which took over a half an hour to arrive. Meanwhile one more person joined our party, and he ordered a beer and food item. His beer never was served, but ended up on the bill. The food was barely warm and not good. Maybe it was better when it was hot. The whole experience took almost 3 hours, including the wait for the check, which included the beer we never got but the thought if waiting for a corrected check was too much so we just paid. No idea why we left even a modest tip. We've been to another location of MCmennimens and had a much better experience. Won't be going back to this one. Ever.
After they lied to me about the part I had been assured to receive ask again its validity on the phone drove down there to pick it up the little parts baby boy felt uncomfortable when I said Napa had told me the same fkn thing. But Napa admitted they didn't know if it was the exact part. He decided I was swearing at him. Wow what a bunch of baby's . Poor things not comfortable I wasn't to Comfortable either wAsting my time and money driving down there after babysitting them through the spending of my money. Guess that's what I get for being a hillbilly. All the little flatlanders are weak muncomfortable and scared. Needless to say I've had it with Autozone. Now they can be comfortable I'll stop buying parts from them for our fleet.
Decided to come here for dinner with the wife and kid and we were seated just fine. However, we ordered salmon, tuna, and edamame from the sushi workers.  waited 20 mins and no food was prepared or delivered. I understand there may have been a to go order in the process, but there were 3 chefs working and I don't see why orders could not get delegated. After 20 min we asked where our order was and no response was given back to us, so we got up from our table and proceeded to check out and even that took another 5 min just to pay the bill. I did not have a great experience here and I wish management would do better at helping their customers.
I had originally given this place a much higher rating, but subsequent visits have been disappointing. The food has gone quickly downhill and the last straw was finding the place closed at a time their posted hours say they are open. No sign on the door, no explanation. Just not open. So we're done with this sketchy-looking place that was quite good on the first visit and then never measured up again.
Food is very Americanized! Two out of three non-spicy dishes were simply too sweet! As a Chinese, I would not recommend it.
Qdoba...oh it sounds Spanish alright.  But you won't see any Spanish people in this place...and they won't be able to translate what that word means...for you either.  If you've got a craving for Mexican, it will satisfy...but you prolly won't find yourself running to the border for more any time soon.  I had a Pork Burrito here...with the usual fixings in the thing.  First off, this thing was massive.  In fact, probably overstuffed.  And not with the pork, with all the other misc fillings.  The burrito was not well constructed at all...I was soon wishing I had a bowl, a fork and a lobster bib to take this sucker down.  It didn't taste so bad...just not overly impressed at all.  If you have better Mexican options in your neighborhood, I will save you the time and money and let you know now...go there.  Like you peeps in Saugus...Chipotle is just up the road and is a better choice...thank me later via compliment.  BTW...I gotz da inside track on their name.  Qdoba, in Spanish, translates loosely to "Expensive Taco Bell".
This hotel is poorly staffed, poorly ran, and the room was tiny for how much it cost. They did not send someone to fix our toilet that did not flush after asking, messed up the parking, and overcharged for brunch. I've worked at a holiday inn express and am horrified at the quality of this "hotel".
Literally the WORST Brazilian I've ever experienced. Too hot wax. Double dipping in the same wax pot as a friend I went with. Left over wax on skin. Lack of privacy. Extremely painful. I would not suggest coming here for a Brazilian ever
We picked the wrong place for lunch at the Red House Restaurant. As we sat down to read the menu,I flagged down one of their senior waiter to ask him the difference between two types of beef that was listed in their beef noodle section. He replied "How am I suppose to know,maybe you can tell me.This is a HK style cafe,we don't detail our menu!" I was shocked with his rude attitude. I then replied "Since you work here,you are supposed to know the menu inside out." He actually just walked away,with a very red face.  We will never ever return to this rude,unprofessional place again.
Prices are super cheap - but first trip there they lost my favorite shirt, gave me someone else's, and didn't really seem that concerned with the mixup.  Didn't offer a discount or anything - said they would call if they found it.  Bummer.
Monopolies should be illegal.  I had my can out the night prior, but when it was not picked up, I thought it was a delayed schedule due to the prior holiday.  So I waited.  Next week, no pickup so I called.  I made sure I did not raise my voice when I was told they will not be picking it up.  "I was suppose to call within 24hrs".  I started into my rant about Monopolies in a calm voice and she hung up on me.  I used Grutters sanitary for 12 years, I also have a 2 plex that is serviced by Sunset.  They have hands down much better customer service.  Even when you call Portland Dis, to just ask a question, they seam irritated and unfriendly.  This is my only venting method due to the monopoly.
Beautiful place that I used to love, but it's not good anymore.  Now it's: unprofessional and terrible management and bouncers, poor quality frozen food, poor service (except for host staff who are always really nice), overpriced for meals that has become slightly better than fast food.  There are plenty and much better options nearby.
Went there because a buddy kept raving about the place. We stood in line for 45, sat at the bar and after waiting another 20-30 minutes finally got our food.  Underwhelmed to say the least. Was it fresh yes? Was it a burger? Yes. Was it worth what I paid for it? No.  The fries were just kinda eh!  The bar is a joke, they place all the chairs rightnexttoeachother. Very uncomfortable to eat this way. The noise level is through the roof. Can't relax and eat in this place.  The stench of hipsters with their Buddy Holly glasses permeates the air.  No thanks!  I've never been back and never will.  I'll stick with the old Austin standby Fran's Hamburgers up the road, or Top Notch Burgers on Burnet road, the real places where the locals eat.  This is a place for hipsters to feel cool and a place for tourists to feel like they're getting a "taste" of real Austin.  Bottom line, in my opinion, doesn't live up to the hype and you can get a better value for your money elsewhere.
Hell on wheels and I'm not talking about the roller derby/sons of anarchy/railroad boys/tour de France fun kind of hell on wheels. No, I imagine that the deepest and darkest level of hell might be akin to riding the number 1 bus all the time. It's always crowded, loud, and obnoxious. Baby carriages fly everywhere and you need to listen to that annoying dude proclaim "Route 1-Dudley Station" over and over again.   The worst part? The bus stops every single block. Every. single. block. Boston is a city facing a very serious obesity epidemic and I do not understand why the good folk of Boston can't walk just one more block. Ridiculous. Stop and go. Stop and go. There goes my lunch.   My bus ride is always full of loud drunks hollering about complete nonsense-it sort of reminds me the after party to a yelp elite event only it's 8:10am. Speaking of yelp elite events, I take it back. The deepest and darkest level of hell is not riding the 1. It's riding the 1 with a hangover. I do give props to the drivers of the good ol' proletariat chariot-they may be in purgatory but they are handling it with a smile.   I dare you to search my reviews and find one review with toilet humor. I am way too high brow for that sort of thing, but I assure you the number 1 bus is appropriately named-it is downright pissy. (and smells like it too)
Went for brunch on a Saturday around 315pm because we were told brunch was until 5pm. After being seated we were given a menu of options that were only available after 3pm which was different from the brunch menu. I decided to order the chicken and waffles that came with eggs, which was stared on the 3pm menu. When I ordered it the server told me that I couldn't get eggs after 3pm....it wasn't an option at all even though it said it on the menu. I spoke to a manager and he told me the same thing. Needless to say the brunch is misleading because technically you can't get breakfast food after 3pm or items stated in the menu.
This place is a nightmare! I chose to have my vehicle towed here after an accident and I would caution anyone else against doing so.
The drinks that are made are great but I've gotten the wrong drink two times in a row - and it was the same person that took my order both times. I almost asked for someone else to take my order the second time but I didn't wanna be a dick.
The service here is AWFUL!! the first time we came here (yesterday for dinner) the hostesses were so mindless they never even took our name down to seat us and we stood in line for about 10 mins.   Today we tried again thinking that lunch time would be less hectic. We got sat, only to be ignored and have every other table who sat around us and seated AFTER we did get their drinks and place their orders before we did. Then we still waited and we weren't even greeted by a server. We didn't have water, we didn't place out order, NOTHING!   I really wanted to like this place because all of the reviews were good, but honestly if you're in a hurry don't go here. In fact, if you want to eat at all I don't recommend you come here. The service is just horrible, rude, terrible service.  We will never go here again!!!!
The service at Ankaras is really slow.    How slow is it?    True story: I used to live 2 doors down. I once ordered a sandwich, went back home, got laid, returned to Ankaras, and still had to wait a minute or two for my sandwich.    Food's not particularly exciting either.
Toy-Story themed dining option at Disney's Hollywood Studios with what my boyfriend called "microwave food". Not a shocker, as this IS in an amusement park. The personal pizza and caesar salad were passable; I think we preferred the meatball sub a bit more. We did come during the lunch rush (around 1pm) so the lines were longggg and moved at a snail's pace. I don't know how it takes so long to get your order when (once you finally get to the counter) you see that there are rows of items ready to go and all they need to do is place them on a tray to hand to you! I did like seeing that they offer more wholesome additions to go with your entree...in an effort to reduce our saturated fat consumption the boyfriend and I opted for snack size bags of baby carrots instead of cookies. Oh, and even with two floors of seating you'll have a difficult time finding a place to sit...I think your only choice is to eat standing up if there aren't any more tables.
Fair cookies, not great.  Very expensive.  But it seems like I am not the only one who met the nasty guy who looks like the world owes him a favor.  This humorless guy didn't want to help and seemed like he was about to open a vein.  Buddy get yourself on some Prozac, you work at a cookie stand at Faneuil Hall, how bad can life be?  Didn't want to answer questions, when I bought a tin of cookies he wanted me to tell him how many of each type of cookie I wanted,  I felt like I was dealing with the soup Nazi when I said "a few regular chocolate chip cookies" and he barked back "what is a few?".  Dude you are selling cookies, take a pill, there wasn't a line or anything and since I was paying $16 for a tin you would think he would work with me, I am not the enemy.  If this guy is the owner, good for you staying in business with a crap attitude, if this guy is an employee, this business should get him to a licensed mental health counselor to have a suicide assessment.  Either way, get help!
The only good thing about this place are the multiple TVs.  The food is not good at all.  Our service was actually pretty good, but I can't get over bad food.  We had the calamari and chicken poppers for appetizers and split a reuben sandwich for the main.  None of it was worth mentioning. I'm going to give it one more shot and try the wings.  If they mess that up I'm going to have to say "Sayonara" to the Scoreboard.
We picked up our 3 Ruben's to-go and all 3 were made on the wrong bread, not the dark rye we had requested. Also, our sandwiches were soggy even though it had been just 20 minutes from the time i picked up the phone and placed my order to the time we sat down and ate. We have been to other Roses's locations without issue, it was just this one that needs to get it together!
I didn't feel wanted or appreciated in this strange store, unsure why, but I've taken my business to a nice salon in Austin where my stylist is friendly. Not expecting the moon, just simple chatter and to not feel awkward? Haircut was what $8 gets you, but now I have a pretty hair style ( for much, much more $,) so I thank this store for helping me venture out and pay more.
The absolute worst quality mattress I've ever experienced.  I bought a queen sized bed for my son about a year ago and it's more like a hammock that a bed.  Big lumps in it.  The fabric on the mattress is pilled up with bunches of long threads.  It sinks so much where he sleeps that the mattress pad won't stay on.  I looked on my receipt and there is no warranty in writing on my paperwork.  Huge waste of money.  My husband and I bought a mattress at another mattress store near Trader Joes and it is stellar.  That's the only place we are buying a mattress from now on.  The glowing reviews make me wonder??
The food portions are ridiculous. Arrived during happy hour, we noticed that multiple items were the same price as the normal menu. The server's excuse was that "the portion is the same size." Um... it usually is, that's not the point of happy hour. It's not often that I will not give a place a second chance, but this place will definitely not be getting one.
Just awful. Cheesesteak is not real steak. It's weird stringy meat that doesn't seem to be very tender. I've been a professional chef and cook for 16 years and never had a cheesesteak this bad. It's got cheese on it and that's good. Bread was soft but the meat was so so so awful. Didn't bother to eat it. Dr pepper was ice cold and perfect. Customer service was decent. Though he charged me $15.00 for my sandwich fries and coke and didn't tell me about the daily lunch special which could have saved me $4.50.
Positives included the burrata and lobster ravioli.   Negatives include the chewy calimari which in the North End is inexcusable.   Overall it was a good restaurant, but not exceptional.
I was in a crunch for time so decided to grab something healthy from The Whole Bite and head back to the office. I've purchased here in the past and thought it was decent, but I was pretty dissappointed today. I ordered the Asian Chicken Spinach salad and it was so bland and dry that I could hardly eat it. This cost about $8 which was a bit steep for what it was. Frankly all of the prices seemed about a $1 higher than places like My Fit Foods and Snap Kitchen. The quinoa didn't seem seasoned at all and the chicken was extremely dry. I am a healthy eater and cook so I like seeing more places like this in the area, but this particular lunch was a waste of money.
Although they have better than average food I will not be back.  I was approached in the alley near the restaurant by the young man that works the afternoon shift.  He said he recognized me from the restaurant and ask if I would loan him money. I declined his request.  I will not go back. How might the employee retaliate?
I didn't even want to give the one star because in my personal opinion they don't deserve any stars. They deserve negative stars! First of all we were asked to go to a timeshare meeting for 90 minutes and sit through a presentation and the gentlemen, or should I say so-called gentleman, Brian Campos how does over almost three hours, even though we told him we had a church luncheon that we could not be late for.  He then told us that there would be no problem after us going through the presentation and all they wanted from us would be a simple yes or a simple no. That is all he said and that was extremely extremely false and misleading. After we told him that we could not afford the trip and did not want the timeshare he began being very insulting to all of us stating "oh so you guys just came here for the trip and wasted my time". Then after we all four of us told him no respectfully and told him that we'd like to wrap this up and collect our promotional gift he left the table and comes back with his manager who then keeps us there for another 30 minutes while he tries to sell us on how he can help us get the price now. We politely told him that we were on a time crunch and had to go to our church luncheon he very rudely replied "I heard you the first time". Then finally we told him no again probably for the 15th time and then he finally walked away along with Ryan Campos. About two minutes later a third person walks up and tries to sell us another type of timeshare and again we had to sit there and tell him no several times and then he left rudely. No one really ever directed us to where we were supposed to pick up our tickets after I guess they couldn't get us a lot of us they pretty much said to hell with us. Watch out for these tricksters and swindlers they were you in with the promise of tickets to some attraction or free dinner and then when they know that's what you're there for they get angry when you turn them down for the timeshare, its not like they didn't know why you came in the first place and I'm sure it wasn't to buy a timeshare. Even though they kept telling us that one out of every for families purchases I didn't see much of that going on, especially for a property that smells like mildew and an NFL locker room. Not to mention just walking around the property it smells like an open sewer and I believe they have four by four sewer grates does hanging around in the parking lot that stinks and reeked of swamp gas and feces. My family and I have never felt so harassed and so degraded by people trying sell us property for $15000, that isn't worth $15.  all in all it was a horrible experience and ruin that day for our  8 day vacation that we were spending florida. I am warning everyone now never cross into the westgate lakes resort parking lot. don't buy!!! run run as fast as you can in the opposite direction. they will make you feel horrible that either you don't make enough money or you just don't want a timeshare at all. don't let them make you feel bad about making your own choices especially at a place that you don't wanna stay at because of rude timeshare reps and a property that isn't up to par with all their fancy videos and slideshows.
I went in here for lunch   I ordered a chicken sandwich n panini bread and $13 it came out pink mostly raw and so I sent it back in person next to me go to truffles said they were horrible they sent it back they brought it back to me it looked OK so I ate one half the sandwich I was getting a little for the other half I just decided to rip it in half and it was all pink inside still I reluctantly paid for and left the next day is spent on the toilet most of the day way overpriced shitty food I will never eat there again
Really frustrated. After I got out of work late last night, I went to go meet my friends here because I saw online that they are open til 2am. Nope. I get there at 1245am, I was able to grab one beer. Went back for my second around 1:15 and they told me last call was ten minutes prior. What?! Next thing you know they're kicking everyone out (aggressively) at 1:25am. Please don't advertise that you're open til 2am when you stop serving at 1:05 and kick everyone out at 1:30. Waste of time going all the way in town. Take your service somewhere that actually closes at 2am.
Drove from oregon to try this place.... When letting waitress now we had restaurant.com certificate this lady stood up and caused a huge seen cause it wasnt printed, when it clearly said redeem on your cellphone..pretty much yelling at 2 employees and seriously embarrassing us (customers) we wanted to walk out but already ordered food, come to find out she was the OWNER!!!    They went ahead and redeemed the certificate, after this seen was caused... the owner was literally standing in the middle of bar yelling at her employees, as everyone was stairing at us :(     A few min later a couple walked in with there dog, owner came out with a booster seat and a blanky to snap onto table, then came a bowl of water in which dog drank from on the table people eat at......       Needless to say...... we will not return and I truly hope the owner reads this so she can understand making customers feel so embarrassed over 15 freaking dollars is unheard of as well as the way she treated her employees... on top of having dogs on the tables has to be against regulations and is just gross and unsanitary for the other customers eating
The food is fine; and it's breakfast food so you know what you're getting.  But I will never come here again, unless it's the only place around that's open (and I NEED bacon, which, is a very real possibility).  It has the slowest/worst service of any cafe I've been to. The staff seem nice enough, but will avert your gaze if you're trying to flag them down for a refill, or to take your order, or to sit down (after standing for 5-10 minutes with everyone ignoring you), or to ask for the check, or to get your card back.  The kicker is the place is not even that busy when it's happening! Sure, there are some customers, but it's definitely not packed, and the staff seem to function with such slowness/malaise that it makes me assume 90% of the patrons are either new customers, or returning customers with too much time on their hands.  When we waited for 30 minutes for our food to come out (after waiting 15 for someone to acknowledge us or take our order), we asked them to put it into a takeout box so we could just eat at home. Apparently that meant another 20 minutes for boxing. So over an hour for takeout in late afternoon (so not at 11 am at the height of breakfast fever).  It's no wonder so many other reviews here talk about the slow service. They're not kidding. Next time, go to new seasons, buy your own ingredients, go home, and cook it yourself. It would take less time.
Had a terrible experience at the Tab recently. I've recently purchased tickets for 17 shows in Atlanta, a large handful of them at this venue, and because of my love for the music I kept going back. They recently added some bullish*t general admission ticket called "The Room" BEWARE: this will not get you into the show. You will pay for this ticket, get treated like dirt outside the venue, and after paying for the ticket and parking...you'll be sent away with no live music to free your soul. I don't even weigh 100 lbs and some little punk doorman literally pushed me away from the door as I was trying to approach the manager. Employees should realize the faults of this system and RESPECT their loyal clientele in the future, as my friend and I were not the only ones who dropped $70+ to stand outside. They take tickets to concerts, they are not gods..most of us have better things to do than bully customers...like real jobs, worrying about loved ones in Afghanistan and terminal illnesses. But hey, to them we are just rodents. Good to know.
I don't do many reviews, but I have to for the sake of the yelp community. There is nothing good about this place. The server was rude, offensive, argumentative and just plain mean. We ordered 4 meals and I can't say a single good thing about any of the food. It was poorly prepared and difficult to eat. Please go to any of the other food carts around here, those are fantastic.
Went to pick up a birthday cake, the staff asked me to look for it in the fridge. Couldn't find it, she came and looked. Not sure and asked if I know which one is mine. Told her I wasn't the one who ordered, and she dared to tell me that she wasn't the one took my order. I'm the one who work there?
This LA Fitness is very convenient and I have regularly attended a yoga class expertly taught  by Daniel for over 4 years. It is the only reason I use this location. Today I was told it would be Daniel's last class due to management problems.. Others come and leave constantly. I have made the staff aware of a chronically dirty floor only to find it still had dust balls the next week. Recently the floor is clean and the new front staff actually smile and say hello. When I talked to the manager today about Daniel leaving he was totally unaware of it and said he would tell Shelly about my disappointment. He didn't offer to take my number and have her call with any follow up. THEY REALLY NEED TO GET THEIR ACT TOGETHER
After reading much about this place and being recommended by friends, we decided to stop by and get some hot dogs and burgers.   Nothin special and over priced for what it is. Personally, I dont like my hot dog buns mushy and soggy. The hot dogs did have a pretty good snap to it, though it's a darn small dog!   The burger was very fresh, though not outstanding --nothing we can't fix at home for cheaper and better dining experience!   And I like to eat this kind of food with fries too, and they dont have them :(. After eating here twice, we really see no reason to eat here anymore!
Caffè Artigiano is certainly not consistent with their coffee drinks, between stores or between personnel.  Sometimes very good, sometimes very bad with plenty of mediocre.  This suggests a real lack of proper training and/or supervision.    In addition, I stopped by to have an early lunch around 11:20 and the selection was very sparse with mostly egg based breakfast sandwiches.  When I asked if a delivery was missed or late I was met with a blank stare.  Needless to say, I had my coffee and went elsewhere for lunch.
Worst New Year's Eve experience of my life. Aside from the less-than-festive ambiance on the second and third floors, there were only three bartenders on each bar to service hundreds of people. It was a legitimate 20 minute wait for drinks. Once I got to the bar, the bartenders were really great and attentive, but management really did a crappy job staffing the bar and the guests and staff suffered because of it. Oh, and whatever happened to the champagne that we were supposed to get for the midnight toast? Yeah. I'll be doing my bowling at King's or some other place. Definitely not going back to Jillian's again.
Mr Rooter had installed a sump pump for me and did a nice job.  1 year later, 2 weeks after the 1 year warranty expired, I discovered a leak in the pipe and called to have them come repair it.  Grant it, it was a Sunday but this was an emergency situation that could cause flooding if it wasn't repaired in a timely manner.  The woman in the office was no help and could not send anyone, the best she could do is have someone come out on Wednesday.  What part of emergency did she not understand.  I will never use this company again and if anyone ask about a plumber I will say DO NOT call Mr. Rooter.  I would have thought that since they installed the sump pump for me, even if the warranty had expired they would at least still try to help me fix the situation.  DON'T USE MR. ROOTER.
I honestly have to say I was very disappointed with my experience here. This place does not deserve any stars. The service was terrible. Except for one waitress who took care of us pretty well the rest of the waiters were rude and there was no communication. They got our order wrong several times and when I pointed it out to one of the waiters he snatched the order paper out of my hand. The food was not that great either except for the meat, that we cooked ourselves. We constantly had to wait for them to come to our table because to be honest their presence was rarer than I usually like my meat cooked. I don't recommend this place to anyone because it seems the waiters just don't care about any of their customers or even their jobs for that matter. Overall if the management is reading this I strongly suggest you teach your workers a lesson on customer service if you really want your business to do well.
This restaurant has slipped terribly in service and quality overall.  I used to love it but the last 3 times I have been there I was very disappointed.  It took forever to be served.  The wait staff was not interested in serving but just in getting us fed and out and the portions get smaller each time as the prices go up.  Basically it has diminished to an overpriced food establishment still "riding" on its former reputation.
Service: snooty if at all.  Food: okay, but nothing special (and pricey).  Atmosphere:  the patio is in the shadow of an enormous billboard for goodness sake.  Nope, won't be going back here anytime soon.
Was here on a Saturday night and was not at all impressed. Too loud to hear yourself talk, let alone have a conversation. Total meat market, very frathouse-esque. Definitely NOT the place to go to relax with a beer and good company. I'll never understand why there's always a line to get into this place. The big TV screens with the music videos are a nice touch, though, as are the nifty little light-up ice cubes they put in the drinks.
Food is good but not amazing by any means. When they mess up your order they get upset and blame you. NOT COOL. Maybe listen to your customers when they order.
It seems that the courier we used occasionally before, Performance, joined Breakaway. My first experience with them: at least $5 more for the delivery and no receipt. When I called, I asked for one, gave them my email address, followed up twice with an email; it has been a few weeks now, nothing.
My daughter saw Dr Powell at the southwest location.  I felt judged as a parent by Dr Powell.  My daughter is in the 90+ percentile of height and weight...I am 5'11" and my husband is 6'5".  I got a mini lecture on what my daughter "should be eating" instead of a discussion regarding what I am already feeding my kids.  We are healthy eaters and gluten free...we are not an obese family.  However, it was implied we are unhealthy and my daughter is too big. We ARE tall and so is our extended family.  I fretted and worried about this for several days then contacted a friend who is a pediatrician but lives out of state.  I was reassured everything was fine, and to reconsider returning to Dr Powell.  My daughter was very uncomfortable with the nursing staff.  She had a male nurse.  I don't think the nurse has much peds experience.  The nurse was not warm and friendly, and actually rather rude and curt with us.  It was almost as if he was just there to do his job and that's it.    HOWEVER, my son goes to Dr Chapa.  We LOVE Dr Chapa.  Dr Chapa is warm and caring, very knowledgeable and aware he is treating a kid.  My son likes him a lot.
Received terrible customer service - unreliable, didn't show up, won't answer the phone.  When I scheduled my appointment several weeks in advance, I let them know that I'm selling my house and that I wanted the windows cleaned before the open house.  I was assured that the cleaners would come at 9am today, and I rearranged my schedule to be available.  By 9:30, I called the company to ask when the cleaners will arrive, and was told by a different person that they can't guarantee an appointment time, but he thought they'd come between 9:00 and 12:00.  Then he checked the scheduled and said that because they didn't document my phone number, I'm not actually on the schedule for today.  He told me that he'd straighten it out and call me back.  It's now past the appointment window and the cleaners haven't come and I haven't heard back from the company.  I've called six times and left six voicemails.  I will be requesting a refund and hoping to schedule with another cleaning company within the next 24 hours before our open house.  Update: Still haven't heard a word from this company.  Trying to get a refund from Living Social, but that's a headache.  I ended up using Window Cleaners Experts, and they were great!  They did great work and came to my house in less than an hour after I called and the price was very reasonable.
Visiting family in Portland, went to Claim Jumper on June 12th. I remeber now why we quit going there when we lived in PDX. Slow service... empty tables all around us, not like the restaurant was busy. We ordered a whiskey sour, it came and was not a whiskey sour it was made with marqarita mix?  Party of 10 and they brought us 3 rolls... really? Waiter came to our table only if we could see him and wave him over. Food was unremarkable, service was slow and uncaring. We hoped for a nice dinner on our last night in town.... next time it will not be at Claim Jumper.
I go here quite a lot. But today was the last time. I ordered a salad and a cup of water. I was charged .99 cents for a cup of water. Really???? This has never been an issue before today, so it must be a new company policy. Has anyone else had this happen to them?  Next time I will drive the extra few miles to the Wendy's on McNeil and get some free water.
The food is getting too greasy and gave me headaches..even ate someone's hair that was in the food.. I used to be a fan of Lemon Thai but time to find a new restaurant.
Crappy place. Draft beer means Bud light. Sllooowwwwww service. Blah blah blah. Cramped pack with 2 person tables. No elbow room. Big line at the bar.
UPDATE: After many emails back and forth I was actually able to get a partial refund so I have increased the rating.  While I appreciate the refund I still would not recommend renting a bike from them without clearly understanding what the rules are.   ---------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------   The bikes themselves are okay but the terms of service are shady and the customer service is not very good.  Just know that if you rent these things you have to watch where you are locking them up.  Make sure you read all the information and look at the map on your phone.  The first thing is...  a "Day Pass" is really not a day pass at all.  It is a 3-hour pass.  That's right, when you pay for a day pass you get 180 minutes of use of the bike.  They really should rename it a 3-hour pass.      It gets worse.... I was on Hawthorne street, in one of the more popular neighborhoods in Portland, and I locked the bike up outside of Por Que No Tacos and a minute later my girl and I got the "your bike has been locked outside of the system area" email telling us that we each were being charged a $20 fee.  That's $40 for parking at one of the hottest taco places in Portland.  It's almost as if they set up the territory to intentionally have people lock the bikes up outside of it and incur the $20 fee.  On top of that, you can only put the bike on "hold" for 30 minutes so if you are planning on going to eat somewhere, or shopping, or really doing anything that could potentially take more than 30 minutes you shouldn't bother using these bikes unless there is a Biketown rack within a couple blocks of your destination.      I will not be renting these bikes again and I told my friends who live in Portland to make sure they tell any future visitors to stay clear of them as well. What a racket!
We went here because we saw this place on tv (Phantom Gourmet). We ordered nachos, which were suppose to be amazing and stuffed burgers. The nachos were burnt and not good at all. Burgers were ok, but not really 'stuffed', more like some filling. The experience was disappointing. I had talked this place up with my friends and felt silly. Not sure if I would go back.
They are great for acrylics but gel not so much. I got a gel manicure last week and the gel is already chipping and cracking. It's very disappointing. They had me cure the gel twice which I think could have caused the cracking and chipping. Normally when I get gels it's cured once so I'm not entirely sure. When they took off my acrylics though for the gels the lady ended up breaking a bit of my nail by the cuticle causing me to bleed, which oh my lord was so painful. Other than that this place isn't that bad.  I never got offered any of the free drinks though as others have posted about. The salon itself is very clean. They do a great job on acrylics but the lady I saw wasn't that good with the gels.
We had Tom Ka soup, Spring rolls, Pad Thai, and a peanut broccoli dish.   The spring rolls were just pastry and cabbage. Tasteless and bland. The dipping sauce was almost water.   The soup was (way too) heavy on the mushrooms. But otherwise tasted fine.   Scratch that, Everything has too much mushroom. When does pad thai have mushroom? Let alone that mushroom is half of the veggies!  Not impressed.  The service was fair. Lots of water refills, but he forgot to bring the peanut sauce one of us asked for. Also, they couldn't understand "two thirds on one card, and the rest on the other" ...look of confusion... "two thirds. (holding one card)"  She replied "one and a half?"  So we just did the math for him.
I love their wings and blue cheese but always disappointed in their service.  Guess I'm here to eat and not make friends but if the person you're sitting with is automatically brought a re-fill and my glass is empty,  why would you not ask if I wanted a another?
The service was slow and unfriendly. The food took a long time to arrive and when it came, I could not eat it because the French toast was burned on the bottom and mushy and tasteless on the top. The hash browns were burned on the outside and raw in the inside.  A couple of business-suited men behind us carried on a speaker enhanced conference call the entire time we were there. Finally another customer asked them to at least turn the volume down.
Went here last weekend to see Paul van Dyk. I will never be back. 1) The security was waaaaay over the top for Portland. What did they think we were going to do? I've been to many clubs in Portland and have never seen an issue. My mid-40s bf was told he had a fake ID and refused at the door. It wasn't and what would be the point when he's 45? Luckily he had his passport in the car. They searched every pocket on the way in. There was security all over the place in the club and instead of feeling safe I felt uncomfortable and I didn't have anything to hide. 2) The show itself in total was lame. At least at the Whiskey Room you have real opening shows leading up to the main show. At 45 East it was like everyone was just waiting around until midnighti-ish until PVD showed up. PVD himself was great but still, I think the Whiskey Room is better. Too bad the crowds are so small there. 3) It was very cold in the club.  Update spring 2018:  I couldn't keep away. There were some DJs I just had to see. I've been back at least 3 times since the review above. They still demand the passport and still feel like a military zone, but I've gotten used to it (sadly). I still have the complaints above but I had to come clean to you all and say I went back. 45 East gets (got) better headliners (until now...not a famous DJ booked in the future that I can see...boring summer).
Ordered takeout from here through Foodler. The chicken katsu was ok but the curry was probably from a packet. Everything else was awful and not fresh either. Steamed shumai is probably straight our of the packet. They put really hot beef soon doo boo soup in a plastic container and the lid broke, spilling all the soup in to the plastic bag. They sent me the replacement order for the soup, but it tasted so terrible that I couldn't eat even half of it.   The price is not cheap either. Couldn't understand why it's still around.  I'll never order from this restaurant again.
The one star isn't about the froyo, the place or the girls that work there, its about their manager!  I was in there a few weeks ago w/my GFs. It was just before 10pm. They place was semi-busy, but not slammed. The girls were really friendly and helpful.  All of a sudden we're about to check out and a man who was sitting at a table chatting it up with some woman stands up and yells at one of the girls " DON'T JUST STAND THERE AND STARE AT YOUR FEET, AT LEAST WALK IN CIRCLES AND ACT LIKE YOU'RE DOING SOMETHING". My friend and I looked at each other in horror. The girl put her head down and scurried around looking for something to do.   Not only was the manager sitting on his ass chatting it up not doing anything himself, but he screamed at this girl in front of the whole establishment (customers and staff).   My friend and I said the same thing at the same time: "If my boss EVER spoke to me in that tone, manner and in front of people like that it would have been a giant F-U I quit"  When we got to the register I said to the girl "I'm sorry you have a boss like that!" She kept her head down and nodded and quietly said "me too".   This guy feels like he's in a position of power and can treat these girls (probably all still in high school) like dogs. It was disgusting, and we weren't the only people who mouths dropped open.   How about YOU stop eating froyo with some woman and do your job as a good manager and watch the shop!!!  I even took his card to call the owner and complain/tell him how unprofessional his general manager was, but unfortuantly can't find it.   I bet the owner has NO idea what a total jerk/unprofessional loser his GM is, but I will NEVER go in there again because of the way he treated the staff. He was the one sitting on his butt doing NOTHING.   Fire him.
Terrible customer service! Heavy set man who works in the office was rude and condescending. I had a hard time doing the self checkout and asked for help, he was being really rude during the whole thing. Never been to a place with such poor service.
So I went to Hudson Grille for the food and Trivia on a Tuesday night.  Left at a descent hour and as I was walking out to my car I saw a cop parked behind it.  Apparently my car, along w/ a few others, had been broken into.  The morons busted my front passenger window.  I was in complete shock.  The next day I called up to Hudson to talk to the manager and the girl who answered the phone told me he'd have to call me back.  I told her why I was calling and she responded w/ "Wow, that happens so much here!"  ......if this seems to be an on going issue, it seems to me that businesses of Brookhaven Station would make it a priority, for their patrons, to make their parking lots a SAFER place
For those looking for a great watch buying experience,  I'd suggest paul duggans, bobs watches , and bernard watch.   These are businesses I've done business with and have had great experiences with.  They all will take in trade for purchases that will give you the most for your watches value.
Great prices for sushi, lunch is a good deal too - comes with miso and salad!  I started with the basics, cali - philly- spider. Not impressed. You need water to stomach that rice, it is so glutinous. Sushi rice isn't grainy or soft, it certainly isn't the same rice you would eat with a meal. I think the rice killed it here and the fact that each piece was huge. More is not better. The fillings were also jumbo sized - too much cream cheese, quarter wedge cucumbers and imitation crab stick rolled in, unripened avocado... this place has potential and I will say the decor is cute.
Service was ok but what do you expect from DD? Coffee was luck warm and and burnt tasting.  I have always liked DD but over the past year their coffee qualities have gone down down down.
I ordered peanut butter chip and peanut butter cookies and didn't like either. All I tasted was butter and the bottom of the cookies were over cooked. I will never order from them again, will stick to Insomnia Cookies.
After being a loyal patron of this restaurant for all of its years of existence, I have decided I am done with this place.  You cannot beat the beautiful view of the Columbia River or sitting on their patio watching sailboats and barges cruise by on a sunny day but the food has taken a definite turn for the worse.  Sunday marked the third bad meal at this place in the past two months.... an entree salad topped with "chicken" that was mostly deep fried flour containing a thin, barely recognizable ribbon of poultry.  My husband had a sandwich with a bun so soggy that he couldn't even pick it up without it disintegrating in his hands.  The table had not been cleaned from former guests.  Dine here if you want a nice view, and expensive food slathered in various forms of grease.  As for me, I will be sitting on the deck next door at McMennamins.
I agree with all the reviews after the move.  Used to be a great little Starbucks.  But the new location is not set up for the increased volume.  The drive through line blocks half the spots in the lot and sometimes even backs up outside the parking lot.  Many of the spots are on the back side and there is no back door and no sidewalk.   Drive though line can take 12-15 minutes and going inside isn't much faster.  Really disappointed at what they did to my favorite Starbucks.
The food was wonderfully flavorful. The execution of the meal was well below expectations.  The apps arrived at very different times, well below temperature. Service was poor. The atmosphere was forced festive, demeaned by way too loud Greek disco music.  It was almost punishing.
Ikea is a great place to visit, get some cheap crappy food, and wait in long lines. This review is mainly about the lines. What's the point of having 10 registers but only leave 2 open lanes with huge lines. I miss the old days of self check out at Ikea. Slowly Ikea is turning into the Walmart of furniture stores. Sorry to say that, I know that's a low blow. But it's true, cheap and shoddy furniture and little to no customer service. I say little to no service because every time I ask someone for help they always have this look on their face like they can't be bothered and disturb their genius because they're pretending to be interior decorators. I like Ikeas prices, designs and atmosphere but the experience kills it. Sorry Ikea Orlando, hire better people, and open your lanes.
We went here after a Blue Jackets game because shockingly everywhere else we tried to go to was already closed. It was busy inside and we were taken care of as soon as we were seated, but other than that, service was nothing to write home about.  I ordered a burger, which was dry sadly, and fries were unsalted and but overall lacking. The wings were decent but not decent enough to turn this into a 5 star establishment.
Smelled bad, had flies everywhere, workers were rude, and the food was way too salty and thrown together.
We went to this restaurant after we saw a recommendation on Thrillist. Disappointingly, the food was terrible compared to the price. The only dish that was worth the money was the scallop ceviche. Their signature sole dish with sea urchin fondue was bad. The fish was over fried and cooked. The sauce didn't add much value to the dish. Portland has so much food to offer. I would avoid this restaurant.
Kid's cheeseburger with fries and a milkshake cost $15.29. The milkshake was good but the cheeseburger was horrible. Not worth a return.
Horrible. I used these guys to save a few bucks when moving last year. They damaged the stairs in my house dragging furniture upstairs and dropped a very expensive dining room table off of their moving truck completely breaking it.   I called and spoke to one of the owners to get them to pay for the table repairs. Basically the only option was to have them take the table and find somewhere to get it fixed and they would have the final say on whether it was fixed properly or not. Oh and she made it a point to tell me if I had purchased the most expensive 'insurance' option they would have handled it differently.  They're cheap yes, they're also inexperienced and RUDE! Stay far far away unless you want to have your belongings broken by their inexperienced staff and then have to pay to have it fixed yourself.
just ok! the menu and the irish breakfast needs work! nice waitress , very friendly.bar wasnt  full of drunks, very clean, quite, I may go back for a drink.
Qdoba is a good place, but I have some serious problems with it:  1) At a restaurant like this everything should come with free chips, and it doesn't.  2) They do not have tofu.  If qdoba made those two improvements it would instantly be 4 stars. For now, walk just a little farther down the street to where the burritos are better ....
I really didn't want y'all to be the pretentious douchebags everyone said you were. But the fact that you managed to deactivate my lock and temporarily steal my bike from me proves you have no chill. You're in south Austin. And you have no chill. Some things you should know, south Austin had chill. It has soul, pulse. Live music and even more alive people. You're in our hood so you best play nice. We care about family, friends, good food, and most importantly community. So the next time you up and root a bike from a visitor of your property I hope you remember that. Community is far more important that the esthetic your owners cling to so intensely. South Austin is more than hummus and happy hour. You can join us or well beat you.
Saw this place on YELP and the pics of food really look good and the website is most inviting.  Took our Tuesday Night Dinner with Friends this week. While we enjoyed our time there, I wanted to comment on a couple of things.   The place itself - an offshoot of Mi Madres - looks cool and is seemingly well run; service was really friendly, knowledgeable and fast. Seating is a little tight, but HEY it's a pub!   However, we are foodies and the food well... the food looks really good! Nice job on presentation! The flavor however was a bit lacking.   The Fish/Chips was OK at best (and only $5 this night); nice big piece of fish but as it sits on the hot fries it begins to steam from the inside and presumably once crunchy batter turns into a soggy unappetizing blob. Worse, the oil then separates and completely soaks the fries and drips off the board it's served on. Not pretty or tasty.   The burger wasn't good at all; bun not toasted and the beef patty was bland and grayish; definitely not a quality piece of beef. The mac-n-cheese was good and creamy and had a nice breadcrumb top but bland/flavorless.   The homemade pickles/mustard are AWESOME and the Arugula salad was nice too.   Go here for the atmosphere and beer -the cocktails were so-so perhaps a bit too contrived- but if you're a foodie, don't go here expecting much (yet??).   I really do encourage the owners to take a look at these comments because it wouldn't take much to kick the food quality up a couple of notches! If you do that, I think you could have a real winner.
Late night drink stop. No waitress service. Have to order at bar and bring back to your table. 6 people in our group and ordered 5 different drinks. You would have thought bartender couldn't count that high. Repeated order 4-5 times as he started opening up cider drinks that I never ordered. Tried to stop him, but too late. This made him even slower and more angry. No reason to go back
The cashier who worked the counter wasn't asking for customers names. If you encounter this, have them write your name on the cup. Otherwise, you'll end up having your drink swiped by someone who figures that their time is more valuable than yours.  Thus the additional wait, with no apology. It also doesn't help that the barista seemed like he would rather be somewhere else.
The blowouts are good but they are always running late. I've been here 3-4 times and always waited at least 15 mins past my appointment. I'm sitting here at 1:25 and my appointment was at 1. For an appointment that's supposed to be 45 mins long that's pretty ridiculous. And it's not like 45 bucks for a blowout is cheap - for that much money they need to figure out how long it takes to blow dry an average persons hair and adjust their appointment slots accordingly. This is absurd.
where to begin??    my friend and i went here when i was able to get some $25 restaurant.com gift certificates for $2.  i decided to go for local places that i haven't eaten at... and bengal cafe seemed like it would be a good place.  we were squished in the corner.  well.. not squished but it wasn't completely pleasant...  there was only one other couple in there waiting for their food.   we get approached fairly quickly with menus.  we have PLENTY of time to look over the menu to see what we would like.  the gentleman comes over and takes our order.  great.  eventually he comes out with water and our drinks.  happy i ordered something to drink because my glass had a bug in it.  not huge.  but it was still a bug.  i would have asked for another one if i had seen the guy again.  it came to the point i just sucked it up and had my diet coke.  the food comes before the bread.  the meals were decent.  i got a goat dish with bangledeshi spices and rice and my friend got a shrimp dish with coconut milk.  mine was fairly spicy but tolerable.  i liked the rice that it came with.  there was some raw onion pieces on the dish that i wasn't sure what to do with so i just avoided it really.  my friend said her dish was okay but that her shrimp had some gritty taste on it.  after a bit, we get the bread.... and it was fried.... and supposedly filled with onion (at least it was suppose to be according to the menu)  but the center was almost raw.  not delicious.  we each had a piece but that was it.    i won't return.... but.... if you DO choose to go, i would get the goat dish with the rice and bangledeshi spices.
Ugh! This is a health club bar. Smells of chlorine pool chemicals and sorry ass bentley students. Don't waste your time - I went thinking based on reviews that it was a neat, neighborhood place, but alas, wedged into a health club just ain't no fun. Barmaid was a hottie though!
One of the worst dining experiences we've ever had. Think of going to a Chinese buffet that also serves 'seafood' that is always questionable and you just skip it to be safe. This entire restaurant is that questionable seafood you want to just skip. EVERYTHING is dried out, overcooked, over poached, or just plain smelled awful. We paid over $100 for dinner for two and couldn't even finish our first plates! Pushed the plates, paid the exorbitant rates for this swill, and left before we stuck to something. Oh, and if you want a real treat, try the bathrooms! Wow! Something positive... the staff was friendly.
Never wrote a review about a company or location before, but I felt strongly about writing this one. These guys were crooks and tried to make me pay a large amount on an issue with my brand new Jeep that should've been covered under warranty. Then they tried to make me pay for labor even though nothing was done to fix the issue. They then proceeded to try and convince the co-owner of my vehicle that I signed off a paper agreeing to said terms, which I did not and it was NOT my signature on the agreement paper faxed over. I strongly advise anyone who goes here to be very cautious and avoid it if possible. I called the Dodge dealer back in my home town where I originally purchased the car and they said they would take care of the issue, under warranty, no problem. Never going back to this location in Orlando, I rather make the trip down to Miami if ever necessary.
My god, the homeless people here basically run the back of this panera. They take all the booths so there's virtually no place for paying customers to sit. They leave their backpacks all over the tables while going outside for extended periods of time like they pay rent or something. This all leads back to, once again  leaving no place for paying customers. It's ridiculous, I will not be back.
If you're into getting verbally abused by door staff then this is the place for you.  My friends and I (group of about 10) organized a pub crawl for the holidays and had this pub as one of our stops. When the black guy at the door asked if we were on a pub crawl and my friend said yes (not knowing that was against the rules of admission?) he informed us that none of us would be allowed in. When my friend (visiting Boston from Ireland of all places mind you) questioned him he called her a "white trash cunt." It's not the first comment regarding staff here calling girls cunts so I was inclined to write a review. Don't go here.
I spent 5 minutes standing at the "hostess stand" waiting to be seated.  I was made eye contact with, I was looked at, smiled at even. Someone was seated before me and the person that seated them said he would be with me in a moment... and that was it.   So I stood there, and waited.  My lunch mate showed up and I told him what was happening and he said "oh hell no" and spoke to someone.  All of a sudden they were helping me/us.   The food was better than good, but I will not ever go back there. If my lunch mate hadn't been so set on eating here for his birthday, I would have gone else where. They don't need or want my money it seems, and they won't get anymore of it. Which is sad, because their food is good.  #24/365 #24/100
O so salty!  I'm not a fan, maybe it's the kind I have or its an off day but it was not tasty.  I had the miso ramen which is a pretty standard one, I had to take giant gulps of water after every bite until finally I had to call it quits.  The karaage chicken was not memorable and the prawns was only okay too. There were not many topping options to add to and I like my ramen stacked with corn, bamboo, egg, seaweed, and shiitake mushrooms.  I honestly think the hype is because it's a hipstery joint.  I've seen someone bring their own Togo box of Nancy's yogurt container.
Mediocre food, sour coleslaw, and an inattentive server...No thanks.
First time trying this place. Seemed like a standard pizza and sub place however it was not my favorite. The order took an hour when they said 40 minutes. I ordered a cheeseburger sub and onion rings.  The cheeseburger sub was average. Its hard to go wrong with a burger.. the bread could have been toasted or something and they added mayo but didnt add ketchup which i feel like is unheard of.. i didnt even ask for mayo. The onion rings were quite bad.  It seems like they overloaded in the fryer causing them to all stick together. They were lukewarm and very  oily.  Overall with the mediocre food and the long delivery time I would not go back.
Oy. Food poisoning two times in a row, months apart. I won't be coming here again for any of the sandwiches. I'm sure the soup here is still fine, and the chicken pot pie too . . . but avoid this place unless you want to take a risk.
a 6 year old, my parents, and me Monday around 2pm Ordered 2 sausages took 20 minutes. They come awkwardly on a plate with a little shriveled pepper and some dry, old tasting bread.  at the same time we had ordered he sausages we also ordered a small plain cheese pizza  took 35 minutes, The pizza wasn't even hot when we were served...  the crust was burnt and the rest of the pizza was soggy ... to the point where i only ate one slice. (and pizza is my fave food)  Pepsi is always a downfall for me... so that pissed me off as well. No coke or coke products. was not busy at all, but our waitress was too busy loudly chatting with a coworker to pay attention to our needs.  the decor is old, and tacky... its all the stuff from bennigans pretty much. from what i remember there is minimal changes. Bill came to $39.48 and our waitress seemed disatisfyed with the $7 tip we gave despite the horrible experience.
Horribly rude bartender, no please and thank you. Ordered me around as though I worked for her. Didn't ask to see my id, ordered me to produce it.  I hope for get sake she isn't relying on this job to eat.  The drink was marginal. I was at bar on March 17th at 11am. What a bitch!
I don't really like UNO's, and I like chain restaurants in general even less, BUT, I discovered today that they serve 20oz glasses of killian's red for $2.  All day.  Every day.  20oz.  I thought it was a joke, so I went and asked the bartender.  It's true.  Unfortunately, being a poor student, as I am, this now gives me a reason to go there even though I don't like the place.  I guess considering the price, the alternative is to get a 40 and a paper bag ... kind of a tough decision to be honest.
ok so here is the story i went to buy a laptop but they didnt have one i could afford. i was in a pinch and told the guy i really needed a computer to use right away. he sold me a desktop computer. when i got home i realized there was no monitor and i was out of spending money. so i had to lug it back on the t. when i returned they told me i had to pay a $50 restocking fee which was not true. when i finally got my money back i had to get it from the computer dept. i went to get it. i didnt know the guy giving me my money had a bluetooth on. we were the only people there so i thought he was talking to me. he screamed at me that i interupted his current conversation. what a dick
Went to B&G with great anticipation,  excited to try the oysters and see what unique offerings were available. We had been dying to try a Barbara Lynch establishment and had received a number of positive reviews.   We sat at the bar in close proximity to the kitchen. Staff was incredibly knowledgable and attentive with extensive  knowledge of the wine list, very refreshing!   The biggest issue we had was the staff (cooks) decided to eat a number of oysters behind the bar while we were ordering our meal. I realize the kitchen is small but there is something un-professional about the kitchen staff eating oysters in front of the customers. Needless to say, we refrained from oysters that evening.
You've got to be kidding me, right. I usually try to be positive with reviews but, really? I know this is a South Station place and it's either this or McD's or stale Regina's. What is the markup on a very mediocre Grilled Cheese and Campbell's soup? It's a standard and no one expects them to reinvent the wheel... But with all the hype this place got, I'd rather get a stale slice of Regina's
Food was disgusting today March 3rd 2017. No jerk taste at all in the chicken and it wasn't even fully cooked. Not sure if they were rushing because it was lunch hour and they were busy but a word of advice "don't sacrifice quality for a sale". I was ashamed that I brought my coworker here to get food who isn't Jamaican. Do better or you will lose customers. It would have been a zero star today but since I have to give you one there you go.
This store has gone out of business. A Beaverton location of Relax the Back is still in business.  And thanks to it closing, I dodged a bullet.  I showed up looking to buy another, hopefully less uncomfortable, high-end, non-returnable pillow. Because the business was gone, I drove to the other location, only to discover that my issues with the first pillow were because it was the wrong size for me.   I'll never know why the failed owner sold me that pillow. But I think I know why the business failed.
Don't waste your time unless you want to be in an immature environment where you wait 30 minutes to get a drink and risk getting stabbed. No thank you. Avoid this place and go downtown.
Service was horrible...  Also, why such a price difference from your location in Oregon City? Everything is about a buck more expensive here.   And you don't use debit cards? Yet you charge $2 to use the ATM (payable to Roakes).  Despite these few things, I needed to get lunch while waiting for tires, so, I ordered two longs, figuring I would eat one and take the other home. When the dogs came, I saw a lot of pepper mixed in....and when I say "a lot of pepper" I mean, it was more like, "would you like some sauce with your black pepper?" ; for some people, this isn't a bad thing but for me, personally, it is. But, I tried anyways. I cut two pieces of the dog and bun off and tried, but it was way too spicy.   I stepped to the counter and told the shorter blond (Saturday shift at 1:45pm pst) with her hair in a pony tail, my dilemma. She stared back at me and then rolled her eyes. I mentioned that the other location sauce wasn't as spicy. She snapped back, "Well, we make the sauce here and then ship it over...it's the same thing, so, like, I don't know what to tell you."  First...when a lifelong customer tells you they are not happy with the food and can't eat it, even after two small bites, you try to make things right. In most cases, a lot of places will ask, "what can we do to make this better?" Or even offer a separate item. Since she didn't understand customer service, I simply asked for a refund. She literally rolled her eyes again, purses her lips and then shook her head. I was refunded but the attitude was simply atrocious. If you're the person who interfaces with people, this is stuff you don't do! You're supposed to make things right, not give attitude.   What upsets me was the complete lack of respect that she and her counterpart gave...I don't need to explain why I may be unhappy with something but when the pepper was so heavy that I couldn't eat, I'm going to say something. She should have asked "how can we make this right?"  Her attitude has made me never want to return to this location. It is leaps and bounds less of an establishment than the one in Oregon city. I've been a lifelong fan of the Oregon City location, and my parents went there when they were kids in the 50's...I won't ever come back to this location. It pales in comparison...
Sorry there are no more good choices along this stretch of Baseline. Sadly, WFM closed their store a block from here last spring. It was a great place to pick up basics in a hurry without facing traffic across town at the wrong time of day. Sprouts was a good backup, a little more diversity of products and somewhat cheaper prices. Going significantly south will get you a decent sized and supremely friendly  King Soopers.  However, this store no longer holds up even as a backup. First of all, they have dropped most of the few brands I used to buy here. Even the produce where I could often find something that would "do" on my errand looks a lot less appealing. So much junk food/candy stacked in piles, I just don't know how they consider themselves a healthy choiceYou'd think with the only nearby competitor gone, they'd do more business, but apparently not. There are never more than one or two checkstands open, the staff is not efficient, often tasked with a little job so they aren't paying attention to wait times. And frankly, it smells subtly from something unappealing when you step in the door.  Not for me. And its a shame, because in the winter, Baseline is well plowed during storm events and both they and WFM used to be packed when it was too hard to get far north or south across Boulder. With so much CU student housing nearby, you'd think one of them could have made a stand!
The space, drinks, and service were great. The food on the other hand was TERRIBLE. INEDIBLE. TASTELESS. And for $23 and $26 entrees, it was absurd. If you do need to eat, stick to the burgers and poutine. But again, poutine was tasteless and I've had much better elsewhere.
Concept is cute and naive - didn't know how to anticipate a large crowd with their meager order intake set up - but perhaps they never have to manage that cuz I could see this place closing in a few months... They have no signature!  I could make a better, tastier, juicier, cheaper burger at home - but the dining out experience is what one seeks so alas we go.  Buns were soggy and stale hence the three day old chewy bun.  "Premium beef" patty - uhm, I don't think so.  Fries - sweet or not along with the onion - Soggy too!  temp people - u r frying at the wrong temp!!  Must not have a commercial fryer. So after two 1/3 lbs. (smallest they have) stale bunned sandwiched non premium burgers, soggy sweet and reg fries with just as sloppy soggy six onion rings which were $2.90, two sodas totaling twenty- four dollars and thirty-two cents - started this review last year...  oops!  they are closed -
Bartender was quite a dick. Not from here. Looked at me like I was crazy when I asked if we ordered at the bar or if a waiter came to us. Ordered pork tacos, had NO idea they were going to be so spicy. Some note on the menu should have been made. Either way, won't be coming back.
first off I probably should've changed my mind when I noticed there weren't many patrons.  Also, the tables needed to be cleaned off.  I forgot what burgers we ordered but they were both nothing to brag about.  We also ordered cheese fries.  I wish I would've known they used shredded cheese instead of melted cheese before I ordered so I didn't like the fries because of that.  The service was great from the one taking our order to the person that brought our food out.
This is one of the worst nail salons I have to. Biggest waste of money. My nails look terrible and were smudged before I even left the salon. They look so bad I am headed home to remove the polish and repaint them myself. And the prices they charge you after the services are different than what is listed.
Wow I have never been to a place where payment is required prior to service! I asked for spa pedicure so it was $40 paid, when asked to pick color I said french and was then informed it was an additional $5 I said no problem I'll give it to you she ran to get her machine to charge me again. At this point i wanted to throw the $5 at her but I didn't. Then she took me back where there are 2 chairs almost on top of each other and a lined bucket. Yea bucket! Perhaps they charge you first so you don't change your mind! I look forward to jets and hot water! At this point I've paid, my plantar fasciitis is killing me and I just want a run down. Well I had to figure out the massage chair on my own cuz no1 helped and we began. The nails are ok hardly worth all the other stuff but the 2 stars comes from her foot and leg massage it was very good. I probably would not go back. Paying up front is weird and buckets are turn off
I was looking for a new pair of shoes, but wasn't sure exactly what size I'd need. The UK sizing on DM's still seems so out of whack to me after all these years. Since this place was fairly close, we decided to check it out. As I entered, I couldn't help but chuckle at the painfully trendy hot-topic-esque decor. The owner/clerk? was on the telephone. I walked up and asked for help. He looked at me and continued to chat on the phone. They didn't have much selection anyway, but the few shoes they did have were all stored out of customer reach. I walked over to the shoes, and back to the counter again. This guy was still just chatting it up. Now I KNOW a cruddy little shop this small can't do much buiness in a day, much less in a month...because quiite honestly they don't hardly carry any merch at all. This guy continued to chat and try to sound cool on the phone. After a few minutes, I just stormed out. Give me a break dude. You obviously need OUR money much more than we need YOUR shoes. Hope it was worth losing 130 bucks. I just purchased them somewhere else. Somewhere where the staff was attentive. Maybe the guy's rich or something and doesn't need customers. Sure didn't look that way to me, or else he would have tossed out the chincy nude mannequins long ago.
The portions and service were respectable, but the food was aweful.  A group of us (4 ppl) each ordered a plate each which was served family style and we ate off a large plate with our hands, Ethiopian style.  The food however was not appetizing at all.  I am not a picky eater and eat practically anything, however the food did not go well with me.  Go somewhere else, you will thank me later.  Food - 2 Service - 4 Value 3  Would NOT come again.
Worst "Greek Food" Ive ever had. Mostly pre-packaged, cold and dried out. They actually reheated the meat on a grill rather than shave it to order. Nothing fresh here at all and over priced. Horrible-Horrible-Horrible. Completely ruined my food experience in Boston for the day.
One star is more than they deserve. I went in to help my daughter pick up a car that she wrecked. They were rude and hateful from the VERY FIRST WORD!  No service, no respect! I would use another towing company if I were you! 5 thumbs down!
I ventured into this established no more than two days ago. The pizza was absolutely delicious. But at a restaurant like this, flavor is just a fragment of success. One of my close friends spilled her water all over the floor. She was embarrassed but it's happened to everyone right? No big deal, it's a simple cleanup. The employees saw the spill and did nothing to help. I was cleaning up with napkins while I waited to get something more absorbent, but it never came. I guess that was a poor expectation on my part. So I went up to one of the servers and asked him for a towel. He looked at me and gave me no response whatsoever. He just walked away. I was actually somewhat shocked by this. I just stood there feeling curious and he came back with a towel, looked at me and threw the towel on the ground, just staring at me, waiting for me to get on my hands and knees and start cleaning. I would have been perfectly happy to clean up the mess, but his attitude was just so appalling. We cleaned it up, but I hope the managerial staff at Pizzicato is going to do some evaluations.
Sorry guys! I really like the employees. They try really hard, but always out of everything. The last 3 times I went I tried to get reusable cups...... No lids! Ask for a certain food on the display and it's not in stock (try got one out of the freezer for me today, thank you). It's busy and I place an order and everyone behind me in line gets theirs first when all I ordered was a simple Americano.  It is a block away from work so it is convenient for distance and I really appreciated how during a partial blackout they still accommodated who they could.
In one of my previous reviews, I raved about a similar "meat and three" kind of place, and one of my friends insisted that I had to try Our Way, swearing up and down that it was better. Maybe I just hit Our Way on a bad day, but I gotta disagree with her. I ordered the Salisbury steak, butter beans, macaroni and cheese, and creamed corn. The macaroni and cheese was pretty great, hence the two stars. The rest ranged from not good to just okay. Tack on the fact that it was really hot inside and the bathroom smelled really bad, and it just wasn't a pleasant dining experience. I doubt I'll be back, but I might give them a second chance on a Sunday.   P.S. From what I've been told, they don't ever have fried chicken on their menu..... what?!
Its OK if you want a beer hall with a poor selection of beer. The reason why it gets an extra star is they did at least have Lagunitas. But out of a plastic cup almost lost the star again. I ordered from the bar and later from the table. The staff were a bit like those zombies from "Night Of The Living Dead". But there was a game on and it was mobbed. It's OK for game watching, although far from the best. Everyone has got small plasma TV screens these days.   The place is huge, it feels like the lobby of the Woburn Laser Tag venue.  The food is way overpriced for below average pub food. i mean $28 for a steak, in this place that looks like Chuckie Cheese?  - cummon, you gotta be kidding me. The ook of the place should give you a fukin clue people. This is not your Capitol Grille !! I mean would you get breast implants installed in a car wash?   The nachos we ordered at the table took a while to come out and were very disappointing. I personallly wolfed a lot of it down, even though it was garbage, because I had not eaten. If I ever go back there, I would definitely eat BEFORE going there.
The Yelp reviews were mediocre at best but a crowd of Italians at the door and inside chatting at tables drew me in.   I had a roasted vegetable sandwich on flatbread at lunch. The flavor was pretty bland. The tomatoes and cold vegetables were flavorful and fresh but the cooked vegetables, the eggplants and such were grossly overcooked and mushy. Price was high for what I got.
Let me begin by saying I love Cha Cha Cha.  LOVE. It took me a while to find my favorite dish, but I did and I am never disappointed. I hoped my heart would flutter the same way at Cha. I mean, a fancier Cha Cha Cha, with more cocktails? Sounds awesome! Alas, no...  My boyfriend and I stopped in for a medley of appetizers and a couple margaritas. We decided to get one happy hour version and one $10 premium version. The regular margarita tasted like something my roommates used to make in college - sticky sweet with bad tequila.  The fancy version was noticeably better.  But, shouldn't the standard marg be better here than something poor 20 year olds make?  The food didn't fare much better.  We had three or four happy hour foods including ceviche, tacos, and enchiladas, and I only had a bite of each before I decided it wasn't worth my taste buds to eat the rest.  Nothing was good.   I wish this place was just a Cha Cha Cha with more booze and in fancier digs.  Bring me burritos and salads and tacos and deliciousness!
This is the second time I wrote a review about this place. And I have given this place a very good review . Been to this place many times for breakfast, this morning we went again and had their special: biscuit and gravy with 2 eggs and 2 bacon for less than less 6 dollars.  There is nothing fancy about this place. True home made and down to earth food... it was good. However, i hate to say this but when we walked in this place this morning, of course I expected a smell of bacon but instead there was a very disgusting smell of cockroach urine.  The service was great all the staff was great but I suggested that we will not be coming back to this place again.
Where do I start? I was okay with the wait because it was Sunday after church and the Falcons had a home game so I expected a long wait. I paid $45 for a vegetable plate, mystery meat (oh that was chicken) over rice. My seventy six year old aunt said "that she wanted to go to S&S Cafeteria but I said Busy Bee would be better". What a tongue lashing I got from her. Salty collards, half cooked yams and a tablespoon of Broccoli Rice Casserole.  We had a to go order.  I should have listened to my elder and went to the cafeteria.
I love Disney and I love trying the different restaurants.   I have tried over 2 dozen and have eaten at many more than once, including the Flying Fish.  This is my review of our latest visit.  The Flying Fish is located on Disney's Boardwalk.  Theming was great and well done as Disney always does.  Our reservation was on time and waiter was attentive.  Salads and bread were very good and everything was wonderful until the steaks arrived.   The sauce was very tasty but the meat quality was on par with Ponderosa or Sizzler.  Tough and not much flavor.  We had 3 NY Strip Steak dinners in our party and they were all the same.  For $45.00 you would expect a decent piece of meat.  I was commenting on the steaks not knowing the waiter was right behind me.  Then the service disappeared.  It took a very long time for our deserts to show up, even though they were very good.  Check took a long time and our water glasses remained empty for the balance of the evening.  I did eat here 5 years ago and did have a very good meal, but not this time.
Delivery took 1.5 hrs (was told 35 -45 minutes). When it was finally delivered pizza was cold and tasted terrible. Never again.
OMG, took at least 5 min to take each order, couldn't find any items on register, didn't know what came on the burger....hope you don't have a flight to catch anytime soon!!
I was initially thrilled when I found out that this location had an ink refilling station. Woohoo, I was excited. Now I can spend 20 bucks for both my black and colored ink I thought to myself. I get to this store and am helped by two people because I am the only one in the entire store. The first helper told me it would take about 10 minutes to refill my ink cartridges....so I wondered around the store and gathered some supplies. Then I checked back, still not ready, checked back 15 min later, not ready....it took 45 min to refill my ink. I stayed because I was convinced it was worth it to save money on the ink . Then I get home and literally printed 1 color print out and about 5 black text only sheets out and it was out of ink again! Yay I spent 20 bucks and waited 45 min to basically get robbed. I am NEVER refilling ink there again, and I doubt I will ever shop there again. Office Max: Please do not continue offering such a poor service that is ripping people off. I had many documents that had to be printed urgently and instead had to go back out on the ink hunt again in the middle of the night. People don't like when you waste their time.  To be fair though, office max has really improved their store layout and the overall feel of their store is more fun than it used to be. Also, the people there are nice and not elitist star trek nerds like the people at the print center at the office depot just south of there.
Would not have even given them one star but no other options avail . Worst place ever DONT EVEN WALK THROUGH THE DOOR. back and forth for over a month online with sales person explained to him that I was disabled and only had the one income avail to me I filled out all of the financial information . He told me he had a car avail I sent and filled out the online form to evaluate the value of my trade in when it came time to go there he told me that the car was sold. Gave him benefit of the doubt and he convinced to to bring my car in there and assured me there was a lot of cars there that I qualify for . Even after I explained that it would probably be a one way 40 mile trip with my trade in cause of the transmission problem he said no problem if it breaks down he would come get me. Well after getting there he said I needed a co signer and there was nothing he could do. This was the beginning of my nightmare. Remember I'm very disabled on a fixed income and this piece of shit had me go there under completely false  pretense. My  Car broke down on the way home and it cost me $350.00 to have the car towed and take a taxi home plus gas in the car and tolls. DONT LET THEM  LIE TO YOU STAY AWAY.
Sleezy, suited, circle talking car dealership. What a nightmare ..... I was there for 4 hours and left so mad and upset at the stupid sales team and their condescending "manager". Do they think I don't have the power of the internet? Do they think because I am buying a hybrid that I have money to blow on inflated prices. Don't fall for their lines. I ended up buying at Expressway Toyota where from the moment I walked in until key signing on the dotted line it was a pleasant experience.
I was charged over $70 to take a taxi from Bonnet Springs / Hilton Orlando to the Airport (20 miles). The driver talked on his cell phone along the way, and then declined to use the in car Mears payment system, instead passing me his phone for Square. The payment came through as "marc pierre" instead of Mears, so how am I supposed to expense that for work? Definitely feeling scammed.  Update- I called Mears and they explained their drivers are IC's and can charge however they want. MAKE SURE to know your pricing in advance. I gave an extra star back because they called me back within 24 hours and emailed me a receipt on corporate letterhead. Next time I will use Uber and avoid the hassle.
Meh. If you don't know a lot about clothing design, you won't notice all the fakes, so be careful. I've worked in the clothing business for more than 25 years and noticed a lot of overpriced items that were clearly designer knock offs - Pucci-influenced scarfs that said "100% silk, Made in China" and clearly were not silk; dress in the vintage section (also a Pucci knock off) that was a nylon/spandex Halloween costume; and so much more. Not cool.  The store is neat and clean, very shop-able and the staff is helpful and accessible, but prices were very high relative to quality and desirability.  I was just checking out the new place in the neighborhood, but I wouldn't shop here or recommend it.
I have yet to receive my order so I cannot vouch for the food, but I am NOT impressed with the service I have received so far. I am from out of town, staying in a hotel, and I requested to be called and met in the lobby of my hotel when the delivery person arrived. I was called back, and told that they cannot call me upon arrival. That's fine, but when I asked for the person to meet me in the lobby and have the hotel front desk call me so I can come down, I was asked why and told "it would just be easier for everyone if they could just come to my room to deliver my food". The on the phone was very rude, and I do not appreciate it.
Went in to get a full set of acrylic nails today, and after making my selection based on the menu they had sitting on their front counter I was told that it would be $35 instead of the $25 that they had posted on the menu. When I asked if they'd honor the price they have advertised on their own menu, she responded "no, that's an old price". I continued to question why they wouldn't honor their own prices and she continued to respond in broken English that that was just not what they'd charge me, and that they simply wouldn't honor their own price. Absolutely unacceptable for a business to operate this way. I decided not to give them my business at all, and I recommend others  avoid this business that refuses to honor their own menu prices.
Pizza may be good but the service is HORRIBLE.   My family and I came in while visiting campus.  The place was less than half full. After sitting at our table for approx 5 minutes without even an acknowledgement that we existed by any of the wait staff, I went up to the counter to get our menus.  There were 3 waitresses just standing around by the kitchen, so maybe we were supposed to get our own menus and place orders at the counter.   I was rudely told by some chick in bunny ears that "someone will be with you in a moment. ". I returned to our booth and waited for another 10 minutes before  someone dropped off menus and promptly left without even getting drink orders. 10 minutes later we were still drink less at our table trying to figure out whether or not we had invisible suits on. Mind you, it was not busy at all. Wait staff standing around everywhere. We got up and walked out. As we turned out on to the sidewalk looked like some guy noticed we had left...to bad he hadn't noticed we were in the restaurant and willing to spend money.
Went here for a pedicure...wouldn't again. Not the most trained staff for pedicure purposes. Also they slightly over buffed my feet to the point where the top of one started bleeding a bit. Ladies were very kind and courteous but this is not how I like a pedicure- in the top floor of a house through a dingy back hallway.
Like another reviewer, it pains me to write this review.  But every time I think about our experience at The Frogmore, I feel irked.  I was so excited for this restaurant to come to the neighborhood, and so disappointed with what it turned out to be.  The decor is cute -- definitely an upgrade from Sanctuary -- the outdoor patio is nice, and the cocktails were fine, but sadly that's where the good ends.  I'm shocked by the rave reviews on the food.  We found it overpriced and bland.  They call it "elevated" low country, and setting aside the contradiction, it seems like "elevated" to them means only that the food is low on flavor and offered in itsy bitsy portions.    First, I love, love, love hushpuppies, but the hushpuppies were meh.  Not soft and light and slightly sweet with a nice crispy exterior like they should be, but really tasteless.   Next, $9 for a little ramekin of Hoppin' John?!  Totally outrageous for black eyed peas and rice, and not nearly as well-cooked or deep in flavor as the real version you get down south in a big bowl for $2.  Worse was the Frogmore Stew (low country boil).  For $25, you get a bland, tasteless, TINY portion consisting of 1/2 an ear of corn, one slice of rubbery sausage (literally, 1 slice, as in a single 1/8in. diagonal slice), 3 overcooked shrimp, half of a soft shell crab, and a couple of potatoes.  I love a good frogmore stew, but this was just awful, and absolute highway robbery.  When it arrived, there was so little food that it was like a terrible joke.  My Southern husband gnawed at the bits while semi-laughing in disbelief.  In the end, we left hungry and unsatisfied, and also thirsty, as all the food was overly salted (and I'm a huge lover of sodium).  Having spent a long time in the Carolinas, maybe I'm biased, but this place is a total disappointment and would make any southerner reel.  It's a crime against Southern hospitality, whose biggest tenet dictates that people leave full and happy!
No reviews for this place in 18 months...and I'm not surprised as to why.  Macklin L. and I ordered take-out from Peter's and I have to admit, I'm pretty disappointed.  Delivery took almost an hour (they said 40 minutes on the phone, and my office is just two miles away) and once the food finally got here, it was seriously underwhelming.  I'm still looking for the "buffalo" in my Grilled Buffalo Chicken Sandwich, and the garlic bread, which was supposed to have Marinara sauce and Mozzarella cheese, tasted like ketchup and Kraft cheese instead.    The food wasn't terrible, but come on guys, step your game up.
You would think that El Chilto is doing something right, since there always seems to be a line out front.  Too bad it's chock full of hipsters that wouldn't know a good taco if it hit em in the face.    Bland bland bland.  I would rather eat at Juan in a Million, and that's saying a lot.    It's amazing that some places can screw up something as simple as a breakfast taco, but El Chilito manages to do it every time.    Head down the street a little further towards Airport, and eat at Taco Mex.  You'll be much happier.
Read great reviews so scheduled appointment for late Saturday afternoon (12/7/13). After booking appointment with Wendy online, they proceeded to call me twice to move my appointment around.  Finally I just canceled as I guess their assumption was I had nothing going on in the afternoon (and was free at their convenience). Just thought the back and forth calling and bumping appointment times was unprofessional for someone who was trying their spot. They may cut hair well but perhaps need to learn about customer service and stewardship.
Review only based on shake/bubble tea.   New Dong Khan was closed so we went here to get shakes with boba. My main complaint isn't that flavor wasn't good, just that my matcha shake was NOT a shake. It was so runny. The boba were weirdly small but not bad, just disappointed because I expected the shake to be smoothie consistency and it was watery.   Good, just not what I ordered.
They gained a second star due to the fact that I'm pretty sure they found the drain bolt which allowed them to do my oil change. As usual the guy brings me over to the car and tries to tell me everything that is wrong with it and the exorbitant amount that they will change. I told him that I didn't care to fix a single problem that they found as I am just here for the oil change. He then Shows me the cabin air filter, which is terrible looking. I ask him how much yo replace it. I know the standard air filters are about $10 if they were to charge me $15 I'd pay the connivence fee and just have him put a clean one back in.  The guy told me that they replace them for $40 bucks. I told him for the $30 markup I'd just drive to the parts store buy a $40 K&N filter open the glove box and clip in the new filter myself. This is when the sliminess of their sales practices kicked in. He began to tell me that theirs was a great value.  He told me that K&N filters were $100 he knows because he just bought one. I told him he got ripped off because I bought one a year ago and it was $40. He then pointed out a few small chips in the front windshield and tried to grimace at how bad they were. I told him that I literally just left the windshield repair shop 10 mins ago to fix the rock chip that needed attention. When I was at the rock chip repair shop I pointed out the other 3 and they told me they were cosmetic and didn't need to be filled. Again when I told him that he questioned if I went to a reputable repair place.    These guys are so hungry to make a buck they'll tell you just about anything to get you to buy their extremely overpriced services. Get your oil change but be cautious with everything else
Must downgrade my review...Jaho is over priced, which I could deal with if they weren't cheap and sloppy.   I ordered a drink with extra ice b/c I like my cold drinks to stay cold.  Despite the request, there wasn't much ice in the drink so I asked for some on the side- no big deal. However, the only way they would give me more ice was to sell it to me for a dollar- on top of the $5 plus I had already paid for the dumb drink in which I asked for extra ice in the first place!  You're kidding, right?!?)  This actually happened about a year ago and I still get worked up thinking about it.   Unfortunately, I also witnessed one of the owner/managers preparing food in the customer seating area, without gloves, while simultaneously eating from the apples she was slicing and touching her cell phone. I can deal with expensive, but only if you back it up with kindness, cleanliness, and quality.
Average food at best, and AWFUL service. Decent environment, there was a 20 min wait when we came at 8pm on a Friday. 2 orders were messed up, and our waitress was essentially a mute. The food is good enough to not upset you but not good enough that I would ever come back or recommend this place to anyone.
I requested a quote online from carpets by Conrad and got a pretty quick response to call them about the quote.  Before I called I decided to go by their store and check it out to see what kind of samples they had. They were not very busy, only one other set of customers in the store.  There were two people working, one was on the phone and he was the one helping the other couple.  The other was behind a computer and seem to hide when I walked by.  No one ever tried to greet me or ask me if I needed help or anything!  So I went out to my car and called the lady that they told me to call for the quote, who is the manager of fashion floors which is a sister store of carpets by Conrad.  I told her about my experience going into the store and she told me "oh those guys they do that sometimes" and proceeded to help me try to get the quote. We set up a time Saturday morning for her to come over and measure and then I was going to go look at samples at their store up north.  I waited for an hour at my house for her to come she never showed up and I still have yet to get a call.  I was excited to use carpet by Conrad because they had such good yelp reviews five stars from every customer practically and everybody seemed very impressed and complementary of their work. I am very disappointed at the way my quote has been handled thus far and will find another company to use.
I love pretty much anything in a pie crust, savory or sweet. So naturally, I was excited to find this place fairly close to my home and to read all the "oh-my-god-you-have-to-try-it" Yelp reviews. My experience, however, was not so great.  I bought an apple pie (expensive at $30+) for my sweetie's birthday dinner in December 2013. Took it home, sliced it, and served it to the family. Ugh! The pie was undercooked. I'm talking wet dough-undercooked, and not just in the center. In addition, the pie lacked flavor. I don't need an overwhelming amount of sugar and spice in my apple pie, but this one barely had anything other than apples.  I returned the pie the next day, showed the counter person the crust(dough), and she offered a refund on my Visa. Fine, OK, that was the right thing to do. But there was no apology, no surprise/disappointment expressed, no offer of an exchange pie, no goodwill gesture of a slice on the house. I mean, it would be one thing if I had returned the pie because I didn't like its flavor. But this pie wasn't even cooked through and it was pretty obvious.  For this kind of $$, I expect a better product AND better service.
Joes wins simply by having a great patio, location and a loyal clientele of mostly gay men. Service is friendly if not always great at getting thing right the first time. The menu is basic bar food executed poorly. This is another restaurant under the Metrotainment umbrella which as a restaurant group seems overall poorly run and executed. "Joe's go for the food, take home the food poisoning!"
Okay True Grounds.  The following is what we in the corporate world call a "feedback sandwich."  I'm going to give you two compliments to soften the blow of AREAS YOU DESPERATELY NEED TO IMPROVE UPON.  You speak sandwiches, so I know you'll appreciate this.  You still have delicious food (lox and capers bagel?  Various sandwiches of breads and spreads?  Yummy coffee?  Yes, please!), you still have those darling mosaic table tops, and now you even take credit cards.  Good for you.    But here's what: your staff is STRAIGHT UP RUDE, and I'm effing over it.  I worked at Starbucks off-and-on for six years; I know how hard...and how easy...good customer service is.  And I've never been more consistently ignored/eyes-rolled-at/borderline snarled-at than I have here.  It's not the customer's fault that the system of ordering, pushing aside, calling out, tossing bags of food willy-nilly can no longer accommodate the volume.  It's not MY fault that I enjoy cucumbers and tomatoes on my bagel.  It actually makes me not want to patronize you, and that's a shame for both of us, given that I live a two-minute walk from you.  Okay.  Um.  Hmmm.  You play good music.   Overall score: attitude adjustment recommended.  Good job on the lox, though.
If you are going to post some hours on your door of when you are open, then obide by those hours. Today I went over there at 11:40am, the sign says they were open at 11:30am. I was told they did not open for another 20 minutes. Hmmm - then why does the sign say 11:30am ?????
I went here last night with a friend:  Pros: Largely friendly, professional staff. We were there during off peak hours (around 5:30), so it wasn't too noisy. I had the crab cake sandwich, and it was good, but not amazing.  Cons: This place is really, I would say, disporportionately expensive. The view and atmosphere was pleasant enough, but nowhere near enough to warrant something like  25-50% more costliness than what I think are similar places, and the food isn't THAT good. The place is clearly geared HEAVILY towards tourists, as the waitress's spiel told. Also, she seemed to think that we were from out of town, despite a fairly pronounced Boston accent from me. I found that amusing.   Final thoughts: Not bad, but far too expensive to warrant coming back.
Fancy restaurant and great service! BUT food is just ok. We went there in new year eve. They had special menu. We had scollop for appetizer. New York steak and salmon. Salmon cooked burned. And scollop was salty. I wouldn't come again.
Lyn did my nails today. I got the quickest 10 minute manicure I've ever had. Including file, soak, massage and nippers. I asked her if she was in a rush. She said no. I don't get them done too often so when I do its a treat. The lady was very rude. I asked her to paint all the way to cuticle, she said don't worry about it just put your fingers in front on the fan. She also added thinner to the color cause I guess it was too thick. It should be thrown away at that point. Ok. ...after she finished painting my nails I went and sat under UV light for 15 minutes to dry. When. I left I sat in my car and let them dry at least another 10 minutes in front of vent. When I got out of my car 30 minutes later to run errands, the second I do normal daily tasks it ends up looking like this. Thanks for making my supposed to be relaxing day crappy.
Good sashimi. I went there for lunch and had the sashimi plate. The portion is huge but I guess I expected it to be since it was $25. The pieces of fish are thick and seem nice and fresh. The service was a little inattentive and the guy seemed a little pretentious. It is a place I would go again though.
Food is CHEAP! (Which is a plus). But the food is only so-so in quality. There are far better places to eat Asian food downtown but probably none this affordable. Probably won't be back but if you need something quick and cheap, not a bad option as there will never be a wait even on a Friday night.  (also they don't have any alcohol).
Nice people, reasonable price;  but the quality just wasn't there. I had gel nails applied and the layers were done very thin and were pealing off after 7 days. The rest of the nails are bending and cracking.  When the old gel was removed they didn't soak them long enough and tore into my natural nail to remove the gel coating.  I will probably not return.
Portland is full of great breakfast places with fresh, fun ingredients.  Places like the new Bar Carlo on SE Foster and Zell's on SE Morrison.    Bijou Cafe is about $5 more per person than those restaurants (meal and coffee tab for two came to $35 with tip!) and the food doesn't even begin to compare.  My oyster omelet was so-so, the coffee was weak and cheap-tasting (get some Stumptown!), and my husband's roast beef hash was overcooked and tough.  Also, the roasted potatoes are far tastier at other places I've been.   The only thing Bijou has going for me is location... Basically, when you're downtown and you want something more than a bagel and coffee for breakfast, you're kind of in trouble.
So what exactly does the Burren think it is? $6 for a pint of Guiness at a dingy Irish bar in Davis Sq? Outrageous, its not Fanueil Hall! Went with a few friends, got fish and chips.  Over priced for dry, flavor less fish and chips... Not to mention that the seating was uncomfortable.  I've been a couple times to their music nights in the back: way too packed and some how I got suckered into 80s cover bands, which I generally dislike...
I ordered this cleaning service for 4 hours on Saturday 09/03/2016 to begin at 10:00 am EST (ending at 2:00 pm EST).  The two women showed up 25 minutes late (10:25) and did not begin working until 10:45 am EST. Upon their arrival they had no cleaning supplies (no mop, no vacuum, no chemicals, and only limited sprays).  She asked to borrow cleaning chemicals, so I gave her my professional grade granite cleaner, glass cleaner, and wood cleaner.  At 1:54 the lead cleaner told me she was done, but upon inspection, I found most items were not cleaned (tables, countertops, etc.).  I informed her of this and I asked if she could stay for the full 4 hours to finish cleaning.  She acted as though she did not understand English, and proceeded to pack up.  As she pulled away, I realized that she took my cleaning chemicals with her - I reached out to the company immediately via email and was told I had a $20.00 credit applied to my account.  I was charge for 4 hours, received 3 hours and 10 minutes, and had the cleaners steal my cleaning products.   Due to how they cleaned the hardwood floors (with a stick from a mop handle and a towel) there are damages to my floor.  In addition, the items cleaned were not satisfactory, even stainless steel refrigerator has streak marks on it. I did ask for a call from a supervisor and received no response after that.
The drinks are fine, the food is okay.  The space is nice (but also seems a bit sterile) but the staff is rude and careless.    Living in Decatur, my wife and I have been on multiple occasions and each time the staff has been rude and/or inattentive.  On one occasion I ordered a nonfat drink and received a regular instead.  Stood there watching the barista make the drink and when I tried to get her attention and correct her, she ignored me.  Then she acted put upon when I asked for a new, nonfat drink.  Ordered a Black Chai Chilly Goat last Sunday and when putting the lid on the cup, the barista accidently dropped the lid into the drink.  No problem - throw away the lid, get me a new one.  Nope - she instead took rag/mop they they use to clean up countertop spills and proceeded to wipe my lid off and put it back on the cup.  Is a new, clean lid that much of an inconvenience/expense that they're okay with serving a drink with a dirty lid?  I'm not okay with it and as a paying customer I don't expect to be treated poorly when I ask for what I order or call them on sanitary issues.  We've tried really hard to give Dancing Goats multiple chances.  We take our son to the playground just around the corner and have stopped multiple times to get drinks on the way there and back.  I've taken clients there for informal meetings.  So trust me, I've tried.  I like that they have fresh water for dogs.  I like the outdoor seating.  I REALLY like the Black Chai Chilly Goat.  But the service is just too consistently rude to overcome ANY of the positives as far as I'm concerned.  So if you want to support a non-Starbucks coffee shop in Decatur, go to Java Monkey on Church St.  Added bonus is that Java Monkey is locally owned and operated.  Dancing Goats has seen the last of my cash.
Unbelievable that this place is in business- not only did the food taste terrible, the portions were incredible small and over priced, and the service was subpar.  Menu changes, so do not choose to go there based on the menu on yelp.  It wasn't even close.  The food was atrocious.  We had a party of 12 people with almost the entire range of menu ordered and no one enjoyed their meal.  The short rib was actually a steak (and inedible), salads were bad, paid over $25 for 3 scallops, cheese platter had 3 cubes of cheese, Mac and cheese was burnt.   I'd love to say the service made up for the food, but sadly, no.  Our party of 12 waited almost 30 min for our drinks and we didn't receive several items ordered.  Avoid this place
The martinis were good, but service and food was not impressive. Also, there are numerous misspelled words on the menu.   Overall, the food and service was poor and slow.  Not worth the amount of money they charge.  I'm surprised because the restaurant was featured on Phantom Gourmet and I've heard so many great things, but it was a big disappointment that ended up costing us a lot of money.
As much as i love the Hilton chain, specifically the hamptons, this hotel ws disappointing. firstly was definitely overpriced at ~$250 a night, add tax so $289. the decore represented $110/night. The location ws across frm a oil storage tank field which could be smelled when outside of the hotel.  the staff checking folks in ws not the normal friendly Hamptons staff i am used too. also, dont be fooled by their name- they r ~2 miles north of boston logan airport which cost $22 to arrive by taxi.   Ok good things: they shuttle back n forth to the airport and a few local restaurants. frm the airport can catch the Silverline to the boston convention center and other locations. the shuttle drivers were up beat/positive and the hotel coffee ws  very good. they have a little lounge area that serves drinks and food frm 5-11.   overall, dissappointing for this amount of money. next time ill remember to book early fr big conferences in boston for a hotel worth the money. if travelling here again, will try hilton which IS on the boston logan airport property.  only took one pic because it was worth taking.
The food is less than mediocre.  The beer selection is poor.  The place smells like spilled beer.  The service --- I wouldn't call it that....  spends most of their time chit-chatting.  It can take forever to get sub-par food even if the place is empty --- oh, and they only take cash.  Not my fave.
Way overrated.  Make some normal burgers that aren't slathered in stuff...or if you insist on all that flavor, make em good like Casino El Camino
Absolutely disgusting customer service. I ordered drive through and got home to almost every item being wrong in my $40 order. Called right away and no one answered. Called 3 more times over the next half hour and no one answered at all even though they were supposed to be open for almost 3 more hours. Called the next day and the women who claimed to be the manager told me that there was nothing she could do to help. I asked her name and was told that since she didn't serve me the food, she doesn't need to give me her name. I've now spoken to 3 people on the toll free number requesting contact and they each tell me the store owner has been notified and will not respond. I just left my second message for corporate. I am absolutely disgusted with the way this company feels it is appropriate to treat paying customers. Done with Popeyes completely.
I'm not sure how this restaurant is rated so highly.  We came at 6pm on Thursday. Food was mediocre at best.  I had eggplant parmesan which I normally love at most Italian restaurants. The eggplant was soggy and the side pasta was cold.  Hubby had chicken parmigiana which was also underwhelming.  Kids had kid's fettuccine alfredo () and kid's ravioli.  The ravioli dish was the only one that was enjoyed.   Summary: disappointing and not worth the drive from Steiner Ranch.   Ps.  I've eaten at the Lamar location several years back. I recall enjoying that meal.  Maybe it's just this location?
There is a point where the amusingly brusque New England style service tips over into something else, which is just rude or mean service.  I read these reviews and I honestly wonder if there are a different set of staff for some of you than for others.  The funny thing is that I've come here every now and then for what must be 20 years now, first on Huron and then to its current spot, and the staff here has always been like this.  Almost every time I've been to Emma's, I overhear an employee speak down to a customer, and no staff member there has ever been truly friendly or pleasant, in fact I can't recall seeing a smile on a staff member's face to anyone.  They are extremely nice, obviously, to some people, and extremely rude to others.  Do you know which one you'll be?     It's a shame when a restaurant has great food (they do, clearly) but you find yourself wondering how to obtain it without any contact with the staff or setting foot in the tiny, uncomfortable space.  But also, it's clear that enough people will be coming here for the food to keep it open and doing fine regardless of how unpleasant the experience is otherwise.
This place is TERRIBLE!!! The food is just average and cold just waited an hour and a half for our delivery!!! NEVER EVER EVER ordering from here again
Correct me if I am wrong ( and I very well could be ) but the Beaverton area seems to be void of awesome sushi places. This place was good but nothing out of the ordinary. The service was quick!  I would come back...but I wouldn't mind if I didn't.
Bloc 11 is an okay place for a sandwich -- a more expensive, smaller, less charming alternative to Diesel, owned by the same people. But friends (and Robert B.'s informative review below) point out that it's named after Auschwitz, and that the owners refuse to change the name, claiming their own ignorance in defense. That's chutzpah, to use a word that'd get you shot in Bloc 11.  Now, I know Adorno didn't say there were no sandwiches made by unwashed college kids with piercings after Auschwitz. But I'm getting my overpriced low-prep grub and free trade coffee somewhere else in the future--our area offers a wealth of non-Shoah options.
After all the hype and cute theme, as I'm a child of the 80's - my siblings can recite lines from The Breakfast Club movie - I'm annoyed that I put so much of my energy into wanting to come here.  If you are a true foodie, this is not the place for you...  I was distracted by a phone call and my toddler daughter and ended up ordering the wrong breakfast omelet.  Instead of ordering an omelet with sausage and bacon, I ended up getting one with ham and salsa on it.  Normally, I love salsa and thought to myself, maybe it'll be house made salsa.  No, when it arrived the presentation was slightly lacking with a medium round sized amount of obviously jarred salsa on top of the omelet.  Personally, I think it's real skill to know how to cook eggs properly, and I felt hat my omelet was slightly overcooked.  Putting jarred salsa on top of an overcooked omelet is something that I can make myself.  Actually, it's what I do when I have left over salsa in the fridge.  Unfortunately, this breakfast was nothing out of the ordinary to me.    I wanted to substitute the home fries for something else b/c I had made home fries for breakfast yesterday morning, but the waitress said that they don't do that there.  So, I tried to be optimistic and thought that they might be tasty.  Nope.  They were tasteless and didn't taste good at all.  They didn't have a potatoey taste about them, and while they looked crispy, they were actually somewhat soggy.    The only thing that tasted yummy to me was the scali bread toast which came pre-buttered.  I put on some strawberry jam, and they were tasty, until I found that one side was completely burnt.  How can they serve that to a customer?  I didn't eat that piece.  Research has shown that charred foods are linked to cancer which is why Chinese parents around the world tell their kids not to eat too many barbecued foods.  Last, but not least, I noticed that they use Garelick Farms for their orange juice.  I am a big OJ drinker and have tried almost every brand.  I like Garelick Farms the least b/c it has a very sour taste and also happens to be the cheapest brand.  Knowing this fact, it gave me a good information about what kind of place this is.  Originally, I didn't want to order OJ since I get it at home, but the smoothies here are made with a pre-packaged mix, not fresh fruit.   Everything here seems to be pre-made/pre-packaged, nothing notably fresh or unique aside from the 80s theme.  Service was good.  The servers were quick to get me a high chair.  Although it was somewhat confusing who my waitress was b/c I believe I was helped by a few of the women there, but oddly, they all kind of looked similar to me, slim frames, long dark hair, face jewelry, etc.  I really don't know if I would come back again.  Most likely not, unless friends insisted upon it.  I would certainly try other items on the menu.  Overall, this place is more about the theme and not the food, sorry to say...I did enjoy listening to the 80's music in the background though.
found many spots that required cleaning the day after my carpet was cleaned.  one month after the cleaning I am seeing the old spots re-appear.  bout on a living social deal - the price was right but not worth it because after only one month my carpet needs to be cleaned AGAIN
Are you kidding me with this place. I thought I would be to find a good deal on some dress shoes for my husband. Hahaa NOT. I found a pair of used Aldo for $40!!!!  The outlet mall in round rock has the same shoes for $60 and they are not used!!!  Please make sure you price things out before buy. This place is over priced
SENSORY OVERLOAD!  Always hustling and bustling , DC is a hub of public transportation with access to all lines between this stop and the nearby State Street one.  Sure, H&M is cool, there are some chic bars, and you can't beat Filene's Basement for cheap designer underwear (ew, but you know you love it), but if you aren't in the mood to get elbowed, catcalled, trampled by tour groups, or accosted by street performers, this might not be the best place for you to go.  It is kind of neat to go during weekday lunch hour--the crowds and colors make a nice contrast to a bland office, and the quick food choices are endless.
Ugh... Fiilthy!  I went in to wash a comforter in one of the giant machines.... I think it was absorbing more dirt from the second we walked in.  The woman working was nice, but the place is filthy and looks like it was last cleaned in the 1970's.  Many machines are out of order, two were marked "cold water only", and it was just plain scary.
We heard great things about this spot, so we had high expectations going. We ordered the chicken & waffles, and the double perfectly poached eggs (with the hash browns and hollandaise).  The chicken & waffles were average at best, the chicken was dry and Yolks uses a very light batter. The waffles were nothing special either, we've had better. As for the poached eggs, they were decent but we found a hair in our truffle-lemon hash browns (NOT COOL).   Service was good but the hair did it. Price was fair for the portion size, but we are not on this Yolk's bandwagon.
The food was ok, not bad, just not Good.  I was however not disappointed.  I'll go back :) I love burger joints.
We heard about the HOW Foundation from a neighbor that had used them and was satisfied with their work. They came out on May 7th and gave us an estimate for mulching up some brush piles that we had on our property. We agreed to a price and gave them 1/2 ($600) and was told that the scheduler would call us to schedule the job ...when he called he told us that the earliest day they could come was June 4 ( almost a month away) and that it would be a 2 day job. Since we had already given them a deposit, all we could do was wait...so June 4th come along ( finally) and the crew shows up around 10am and starts to work ( after complaining to my husband about how big of a job it was). They worked until about 4pm and then sat at our property until about 5:15... Around 5:00, the big boss man called my husband and told him that they wouldn't be able to come back the next day ( Thursday), but would return on Friday...but could he go give the guys a check for $300 to cover the costs for the day...Of course my husband said No and explained that they didn't even get 1/2 the job done and now they were trying to reschedule after we waited for a month. So the guy calls back on Thursday afternoon and says the crew will be out on Friday to finish the job...Well guess what...They did not show up, nor did we receive any phone calls explaining why...So now we still have  more than 1/2 of our brush piles to deal with...We are extremely disappointed as we really loved the idea of giving these guys a chance to make some $$...
First time here taking advantage of magical dining month. I always appreciate when restaurants put their actual menu items as part of magical dining. It is why we chose to go here and check it out. The Steak Frites that is part of the magical dining menu online was not on the in-restaurant magical dining menu. It was still part of the regular menu for $27. Disappointing for a first time visit because thats what I was looking forward to and part of the reason I made the reservation. I don't think a restaurant should pick and advertise a menu and then change it.
PLEASE READ THE REVIEWS ON THESE SCAM ARTIST BEFORE GIVING THEM ANY OF YOUR MONEY!!!  I'm sure New Health Denistry THINkS they are going to get away with the botched job they did of putting implant caps on (that I am now being told they they shouldn't have done after   I gave them over 6000.00!!)..But I guarantee before I am done with them they will lose a lot more than $6000.00. PLEASE DO NOT INVEST ANY OF YOUR MONEY ON THESE CROOKS WHO OBVIOUSLY DO NOT HIRE ANYONE WHO KNOWS ABOUT REAL DENISTRY!!! I have been dealing with this nightmare since day one of giving them my money 3 years ago and now I have a totally screwed up mouth due to them! Lia is a certified LIAR who will regret her decision t9 lie to me and tell me there will be nothing done after they took all my money!!
Just read an article about Spirit in Round Rock calling the cops on a calm gentleman for trying to return a lightbulb (Austin Chronicle, volume 36, number 14). Sounds like a joke but wasn't. Sounds more like the staff was rude, antagonistic, and the gentleman is left with little recourse to fight his police record since the store is seasonal, closes, and laid off its employees. Not a company I'd want to do business with.
Meh - I feel like the belly dancing and napkin throwing is raising the bar way too much on this place.  It's a gimmick and if you remove it, I don't know that there's all that much left to talk about.  I sat outside and so I didn't really get all that extra stuff - I was left to base my opinion on the food and service alone.  - My party of 15 got glasses of water first.  We ordered pitchers of Sangria and got them - but never got any separate glasses for them.  So we either drank Sangria or Sangria-flavored water all night.  I asked for another glass for the water, was told "Sure!" and never got it.  - we got a lot of appetizers but only the Greek salad came with a serving utensil.  So the whole table was made to take from the apps plates with forks that they had already been eating from. That's kind of gross.  - I saw that the hummus was hand made - that sounded cool.  I didn't realize that I had to hand make it myself.  We got several dishes of chickpeas that we crushed ourselves there at the table and the resulting hummus had no flavor.  It was like it was just chick peas - no garlic, tahini, lemon, salt etc.  just bland crushed chick peas.    - Flaming cheese tasted good but so would melted cheese I made in a frying pan at home.  Melted cheese is just a universally awesome thing, like bacon.  I feel the gimmick of lighting it up at the table is what makes people think it's better than it really is.    - Calamari was rubbery.  - The grape leaves were pretty good, I liked the flavor of the titziki too.  - we only got one round of pita bread, apparently it didn't matter that we still had 3 half-full bowls of crushed chick peas (I won't call it hummus)  - I got the surf & turf for my main meal.  It was ok.  The lobster was tasty and cooked well.  The filet was very small and a bit fatty.  It came with bland rice and a single potato wedge, like one triangular French fry.....  Overall I think this place is a lot of show and not a lot of substance.  Belly dancers and throwing napkins might make for a fun time but it doesn't automatically make it a good restaurant I'm afraid...
TL;DR Pub has lost its appeal, probably won't be back after last visit.  Typically The Pub is just OK. However, after last Friday I'll be hard pressed to come back. A bunch of us routinely reserve the Tap Table mainly for the novelty of it. On Friday we were informed that another group reserved the Table in a few hours behind our reservation after our arrival. When we reserve the table it is well in advance and with the expectation that we will be using the table for the entire night. So we were informed we had to be ready to leave by 10. Our crew was small this night, only 6 showed up, so we did feel a bit pushed out.  Had our usual numbers came out it would have been a very big problem. On top of this, a waitress kept coming to our table to fill glasses from our tap since a bar tap was busted. This left some of our group miffed and concerned that the deduction from our bill would not be actuate.  Even though by the end of the night the ounces were deducted it was annoying.  We probably will be looking for a new gathering place.
This Pizza Hut it is less than 2 miles from my home - second time I received cold pizza, not even warm - cold pizza. First time, OK whatever, things happen - second time, which was about five minutes ago, not thrilled. It took almost an hour for it to be delivered and it showed up cold. I ordered at it off time, so it wasn't like it was peak busy hours - the delivery said it would be here in 30 minutes, took almost an hour and like I said it was cold. Is the food good, not sure. The Pepsi I ordered was cold, I suppose that is a win.  She asked if I wanted a credit or another pizza and I requested a hot pizza and offered to give her the cold one back.  Let's see what happens with the new one. - UPDATE - it took 2 1/2 hours to get the pizza. It was hot, but at 2.5 hours for one pizza - insane. Don't order from this location.
Worst experience hands down!! Waited 45 minutes for the shuttle from MCO then when the driver arrived we hit another shuttle! Talk about a potential lawsuit! We haven't made it to the actual rental facility yet, but this company is off to a bad start with me. The driver mentioned that we had to detour to drop off his supervisor at another terminal as if we hadn't waited over an hour in time now. Never renting with this company again!!!
never open when i'm not at work.  can't reset password online.  impossible to self-manage account/transponders.  just total suckage.
I recommend going there and telling them you hear great things about their $9 Sprite. You may have to use their brand name, "vodka tonic," but you will quickly see that what you get is their signature lemony-flavored soda, with no discernable vodka in it. They sure do know how to enjoy a good joke at the customer's expense. Fun for all.
Worst customer service ever. Very snobbish staff. Made reservation, Tables are empty but they don't have enough servers, are you kidding me? . On a beautiful sat afternoon, how can you not be ready ?! What a big lie!
Previous reviews had me frightened, but they were, unfortunately, correct. Thirty minutes had not gone by and we were already disappointed by the service. The shuttles to the theme parks are pathetic.
A few days after sending a complaint to the Dunkin Dounuts, I received an e-mail.  It was from the manager of this location.  It was a form letter full of typos and had a blank subject line.   It's clear this location has problems from the top down.
With my experience in restaurant management, if you want to know how clean the kitchen is take a look at the cleanliness of the bathrooms.  Bathrooms were in dire need of a good cleaning, in the mens two bulbs are burnt out, two empty air freshners on counter (shows lack of attentiont to detail), dining room had Christmas decor in July....really odd.  Staff was nice, but food was not amazing.  Normally I go to Hunan Pearl in Lake Oswego or Wu's Open Kitchen and will continue to.
I chose Cloak & Dagger yo get my beard done and haircut for my wedding because I heard so many rad things. I know a ton of people that get their haircut there. Walked in without a reservation and the guy chuckled and said I wasn't getting in. I made a reservation for the day before I was supposed to leave. Lo and behold, the guy made my reservation for the wrong day. Now it's Saturday at 7pm and I'm trying to find a place that's open and not booked, fat chance I know. I've never yelped our of anger before but this is the most ridiculous thing ever. Pretty dumb this dude messing up his job is now going to mess up my wedding. Girl on the phone was nice enough and seemed helpful but still didn't end with me getting a cut...just a scraggly looking beard for my wedding pictures. Pretty rad.
I had a haircut with Dane and while i thought he was very nice, he didn't listen to me or give me a cut that I can live with. I am a wash and wear athletic girl and I can't make this cut work without styling.  Disappointing since I spent more than I usually do for a cut.
The new chicken is horrible. I literally just threw away a entire burrito bowl. Moe's was my favorite restaurant and now with the changes they have lost a customer. I'm so sad
I got the shawarma combo with beef and chicken.  The meat was very dry, and didn't have much flavor at all. The rest of it was good- rice, salad, white sauce, pita etc all were fine. The portion size is good, but for $14 I expect big portions.
Worst service.  This is our second time here, with the same server.  We waited over twenty minutes just for our drinks.  The food took half an hour, and the order was wrong.  And my tacos were cold.  Our server didn't even apologize.  Don't waste your time or money!!!
This place is close to my apt, so I want to like it.  Tried it a few times now, and I've never finished what I bought.  Both runny and gritty somehow - not delicious.
The only reason for the full two stars is that I left before the end of the evening with my group. We went here after the JP Morgan Corporate Challenge to grab a beer and some apps. It wasn't 100% packed when we went in and we actually sat at two tables separate from each other. The waitress came right over and took our drink order and the beer came pretty fast. But then it became a challenge to get a food order in and when one of our party wanted to pay for his single beer so he could head home, the waitress was openly critical of the fact that she couldn't understand him. (He is from Norway and I do have to listen to him carefully sometimes to catch what he's saying, but, she didn't even bother) "What?...I don't even know what you are talking about...I don't know what's going on here." Then walked away.  Wow. Can you imagine if you were in there with a family member who had a speech impediment or something that would require someone to take a minute to really listen and figure what's going on, and the waitress was that blatant about not giving a shit? Is that how you should approach a situation that is difficult? Just throw up your hands and walk away? The food took a very long time to come to the table (she blamed it on a big party) I think they just didn't prepare for night when 12,000 people descended on the Boston Common and dispersed throughout to hit up local businesses for wares. I could say it was the crowd, again the corporate challenge just ended. I could say that it was the din of the crowd in the place (it was pretty loud in there) but in this case, (and from what happened to the group who finally settled up-the waitress wouldn't take cash and credit for the bill) I think it was the waitress.
Me and a couple of my work friends go there sometimes.  We were at the buffet table one day and a Cock Roach came up out of the food.   The place is really dirty, if you look around all the walls are really dirty.  Gross place to eat.  When it was new it was a great place to eat.  Very gross now! Don't do it!
My partner and I were tenants at this property for a year.   1. The location is perfect--close to the north end, across the TD Garden, a few steps away from Quincy Marker, and a 15 minute walk to downtown Boston.   2. The concierge is wonderful-- very attentive and engaged with the community.   3. Compared to other buildings, this property has relatively decent amenities.  4. Management is perhaps the worst. The manager and staff do not care about residents; they do not respond to requests; are unfriendly driven by new tenants rather than keeping existing tenants and are not able to create any feeling of community.
My grandparents would have loved this place, but they all died back in the '90s.  The look of the place is cool, but the vibe of it is stale and haughty.  There weren't any veggie options on the very limited menu, but when asked I was given a few choices. What I envisioned that I ordered, vs what was delivered was radically different.  My meal was a vinegar soaked portabello mushroom with some chevre and pesto.  I wasn't aware it had pesto, which I hate, so scraped that off.  Then, the soggy mushroom with the tiniest bit of chevre on it was not good.  It was served with some wild rice and some steamed green beans.  Price tag for this?  $26!  Are you kidding me?  This was far from gourmet, not well prepared and seriously inexpensive ingredients. Even if this was served on Brad Pitt's abs, its still not worth that.  My beau got beef tenderloin which was under-cooked, when he was asked how he was enjoying it, he showed them it was pretty raw and even bloody.  They corrected him and told him it was right. I flat out complained about my meal and they gave a $10 comp, which is nice, but one vinegar-drunk mushroom is not worth even $16.  Sorry, not coming back. Portland is overflowing with crazy good, unique, gourmet food, but not here.
I heart yoga and have been doing it on and off for years.  With that being said, bikram yoga is not at all like other types of yoga.  No downward facing dog? That all aside, I did like how challenging it was. I mean, sure my vision will go and I feel like I'm gonna vomit and black out at the same time (its a strange feeling) but your body feels good afterwards, note: hydrate well before and after or suffer from a headache for 24 hours.  I never thought too deep about it, but what others have said about the carpet I did notice.  My foot kept slipping on the carpet, makes me wonder how well they clean the carpet and how often.  Also, I found the staff intimidating.  It keeps you in check, but at the same time, it makes me not want to come.  And it's expensive. All this and the fact that I just sucked at it... is why I no longer go to Bikram. :(
On the positive side, the restaurant delivers and the person who took my order was quite nice. Also, my mother says the little pieces of ox tails was very good. On the negative side, I purchased a large jerk chicken. The portion of jerk chicken seemed undersized and it was VERY VERY VERY dry and overlooked. Did I say VERY? Also, the macaroni cheese seemed like it was boxed, certainly not home made. Finally, the delivery took over an hour. Oh, the restaurant was out of cooked vegetables. Isn't that a staple on a Jamaican food plate. Not good.
What's worse then bad customer service? Consistently bad customer service. I've now given this place a 4th try and the baristas continue to be stone faced and sour. Which is disappointing since this is such a cute, convenient little place. The coffee is above average, and there is plenty of space to work. But it's rather uncomfortable to be in a service establishment and be treated like a nuisance, rather than a much appreciated consumer. There are plenty of other south Austin coffee shops with better character that I will choose to frequent.
Decided to try a new restaurant for lunch today, and chose Breakfast Club Altamonte. I guess we came late, as only 2 other tables were occupied.  The menu selection was impressive,  so I opted for the Reuben that would be "piled high" with corned beef and sauerkraut. The sandwich had 3 slices of corned beef, so my defintion and theirs is slightly different.  It tasted just fine, though, so kudos for that. My friend ordered the Frisco melt,  and it was quite good, though fries were not hot and the coleslaw was bland. Sadly the place was not clean.  It could have done with a good sweep, and a pick up of the wadded up napkins and empty creamer containers on the floor. The window next to the booth we were seated at had some sort of gunk on it that we had to look at everytime we looked out. Might give this place another chance in the future if we run out of other options.
Food was as marginal as the service.  Despite a bounty of available tables, we waited for 20 minutes.  The burger I got was over cooked. The pizza was adequate.
Just don't. There are plenty other Thai restaurants and places in Somerville to spend your money. Terrible pad thai.
YMCA offers a reasonable value bordering on boring if you don't want to get into a long-term contract, but the downside is that it's a magnet for a few weirdos. They don't position themselves as a gym from my perspective, but more like a community center, so there's no overt appeal like you would find at a typical gym that is trying to get you all pumped up about working out.
So I have been a customer at 888 on oltorf for a very long time have never had a problem, until now. tonight I decided to carry out. Big mistake, I live in southwest austin so the drive was not short and when I opened up the entree of sesame chicken there was a long ass red hair twisted through the broccoli and chicken. When I called to inform them the supervisor said I was lying. And that people do it all the time. Good to know this is how they treat customers.  At the end he said the manager will review this complaint at a later date
The food was great but the service was HORRIBLE. took 20 minutes to bring us water and the waitress was inattentive. Do not come here if you want a quick bite, the service was one of the worst I've experienced.
My experience with the Bee Cave location was from an afternoon at the barn. Had been craving their pesto pasta with chicken, stopped by for a ToGo order... I felt that was more appropriate then sitting at a table with the essence of eau de equine on my person.   When I got home (less than 10 minute drive). I sat down at my own table (the cat doesn't mind the barn funk), and dove into my dish. The chicken was EXTREMELY dry, the pasta was sticky, and the sauce was lacking.   This is NOT what I remember from my beloved Triangle location!   I've toyed with giving it another try, but the offending dish was probably enough to make me want to spend $5 in gas just to drive in town to the other location.
This Chipotle has been very disappointing.  A year ago there was a line out the door with 3 people working behind the counter.  It would take 45 minutes to get a burrito.  Nine months ago Chipotle made everyone sick.  Now the lines are completely gone and in its place is a hand sanitizer dispenser, as if to imply the customers made the company sick and not the other way around.     But tonight may have been the last straw.  I ordered and received a burrito that was smaller than my hand.  See the attached photo with my checkbook for scale.  If I'm going to risk my health to eat a burrito, I want the burrito to be the size Chipotle burritos are supposed to be.
Disgusting food! The pork dumplings and the fried chicken were terrible. The ribs and the rice were pretty good though. The mai tai was ok. It is so expensive here don't waste your money. It was my last night in Boston and I was disappointed.
Let me start by saying the motel is renovated nicely. However, they need a dehumidifier in this place because it smells like mold so bad. We decided to tough it out because we were only staying one night. Around 11 at night the room that conjoined with ours had a couple I'm it that were having a domestic dispute. The husband was KICKING & PUNCHING the bathroom door that his wife locked herself into. Screaming bloody murder. We called the front desk twice and finally had to tell them it was serious and we were going to call the cops if they didn't do something. Security came to their room and said "got to stay quite" and left! Do yourself a favor and stay somewhere else.
1 month ago i went in the service line with my car at Curry Honda, after some minutes a service technician approached me ,and i explained that i got an overheating problem...He told me that it would take 3 hours of testing-running a test...of 3 Hours to detect the problem , it was $120.00 / 1 hour=360$ worth of testing...are you kidding me? are you ?  they should run an annual drug test on  their employers, because that technician was high
Let me start off by saying visiting on a very dead Monday night about 7:00p.m. waitress visited our table and took our beer order quickly. Beers were delivered several minutes later although place was practically empty. After waiting a few to put our order in which was nachos as an appetizer and a BBQ chicken pizza with a burger for my wife the appetizer finally came out agonizingly slow. Nachos were huge plate but buried in gooey cheese chili sauce and lettuce, nachos didn't hold up to this mess and made them completely soggy. Pizza was delivered about 10 minutes later and I can't in good consciousness say it was very good, BBQ sauce looked like the lid popped open on them and they created a pond of it on top of the pizza. Now comes the part where I had to ask the waitress after 30 min where was my wife's burger? My friend and I were almost done eating our unfinished pizza before her burger even came out. Don't expect any prompt service from the kitchen or to get all your party's food all at once. This place could use a "Restaurant Rescue" if I ever saw one, I'm not giving it much time to survive. I felt like I was bent over and shafted once I received the check too for a party of 3 with the slow service and dimwitted waitress and all, nachos,pizza,burger, 3 tall drafts, 3 short drafts-78$ completely not worth it and will never return.
Last night, I treated a vegan friend to Pizza Oasis, having heard that their vegan pies are the best in town. Now, the pizza itself was excellent, but sadly this was the ONLY good thing about our experience here.   There were maybe three or four other tables of customers in the place when we arrived. Not overly busy whatsoever, but it still took the waitress a while to even come round. We ordered and she was really nice and friendly; then she simply sat at the table behind us and chatted with her friend--and hardly got up to do her job after that. She never returned to our table, and got up maybe three times after the initial plunk-down to deliver a bill to one other table, a couple of beers to another, and a box. Our drinks ran out and we were never asked if we wanted refills, the cook brought us our food, and literally half an hour after my friend and I had emptied our plates (I timed it, because at this point I was getting really annoyed) I finally went up to the counter and a guy from the kitchen rang me up. FOR THE WRONG BILL. I don't know if our lazy waitress wrote the wrong table number on the order slips or what, but I'd ordered a small salad and he tried to charge me for a calzone, among other things. I ended up having to go back up and get my $5 difference back.  At which point the waitress, still sitting at the table between mine and the counter, finally turned around and chimed in to the guy that yes, I had ordered a salad and not a calzone, so he was charging me for the wrong check. Thanks, lady, for finally proving yourself more useful than a stump. You were four feet away from me the entire night, you could have just leaned slightly over and noticed that our glasses and plates were empty and maybe done your job a little. That would have been cool. I don't think you were on break, as you did periodically get up to help other tables as I mentioned before, just not us. The people who were within your line of vision the entire time. Thanks.
Very poorly run.  Staff was rude and if it's 104 degrees outside and you have a 7 pound dog that you can carry, don't bring them here.   I obviously can't leave him in the car and they wouldn't let me carry him inside the store even when I asked nicely.  The man working responded rudely and acted like I was a huge inconvenience to his day.  I'll take my business elsewhere and always.  Would have given zero stars if there was an option
Had my second "cleaning" yesterday using Handy.  This time a different "professional" came named James C.  Nothing was cleaned.  Floors were not touched, toilet bowl has stains and wasn't touched, speakers around the TV still have dust so they weren't touched, trash bag was sitting in the hallway and wasn't taken out, nothing was vacuumed.  Basically I have to hire someone else to clean the place because nothing was done.  The "cleaner" used air-fresher from the bathroom to spray the whole apartment...classy move.  Guessing the cleaning person simply watched TV for 1.5 hours.    On a positive note, I did receive great customer service from Handy with a full-refund and an apology.  I'd definitely rate the Handy app, experience, convenience, and customer service on a high-level.    Having said that, I'm using the app for apartment cleaning and this time the job was very poorly done.  I will give them another shot in a few weeks and will update my review accordingly.
I got the HanLin Creation milk tea with mixed white and black pearls and was not impressed.   The big pearls were hard and the milk tea wasn't good. Hard pearls alone will make me not come back to this boba drink place.
Worst stay won't be staying again..If you stay make sure don't book room 424 it's next to exit door..noise is awful could not sleep at all..it's not worth 124 hard earned dollars to pay for this..I will be definitely letting management know about level of noise I had to go through..also room has no view but on garage..aghh not a good stay here guys if you book make sure your room is facing court yards it pretty looking inside then out..so disappointed !:(
This is not base on the food. I went there Saturday afternoon, and we waited maybe 5 minutes. When they took us to our seats it was an uncomfortable table not a booth which me and the wife hate. So we asked for a booth and the hostess said they are short on people for service and that it will be a while before we can get a booth, I ask how long she said "undetermined time". So we sat down and we realize that these seats suck...so we left. Walking out I realize that hardly anyone had there food let alone drinks. So I was sure I made the right decision cuz it probably was going to be a while before I got my food.
Try the "killer" drink has good flavor and comes in a shark cup with a plastic mermaid. Tacos were good but expensive at $12 for two.
Due to the price and convenience of supermarket shopping, I'm forced to shop at this location to feed my family on a weekly basis. Admittedly, they have a good selection of bakery goods, deli stuff, and meat here. Over my numerous trips to this location over the years, there's a few ways this place could definitely improve.   1.) Stocking groceries. Can you guys please stock the groceries before the store opens or after the store closes? So many times I have found myself stuck in an aisle, blocked by 3 or 4 employees stocking the shelves, and then having to wait for little old ladies to maneuver around them before I can finally get the items I need and get out of there.   2.) Available Cashiers. The cashiers here are fast, and I rarely have to bag my own groceries, and this is nice. But there are so few cashiers available sometimes, that the customers and carts really start to pile up. Sometimes I have to park my cart behind someone else already waiting, and at that point, you're way out into the walkway. At times, they will open new registers to quickly expedite customers when it piles up, which I appreciate, but it doesn't happen often enough.   Otherwise, this is the decent neighborhood H-E-B. The one on William Cannon is the ghetto one.
This review is mostly for the fourth floor (the dance "club") of Felt.  Here's the thing about Felt.  I feel like I really -want- to like it. It's a great space, honestly - four floors, reasonably attractive decor, conveniently located to the red, orange, and green lines.  Alas.  As far as the dance club is concerned, one of the major problems I've noticed with it (as with many Boston dance venues) is that they don't actually let people onto the fourth floor until nearly 11. Now I realize that there are people in Boston who don't depend entirely on mass transit to get home when they've been drinking, but I am not one of them, and so I need to be out by 12:30.  Which means that my friends and I ended up listening to some bullshit music while we waited for enough people to get drunk enough (yay Boston) to actually venture out onto the dance floor, instead of milling around near the bar, trying to look pretty or cool or both.  We paid ten dollars for this privilege. (Again, covers are expected, but when I only have a maximum of an hour and a half to get my dance on - irksome.)  The drinks were overpriced, which is to be expected at any club, but when I have to hang out in an overdressed pool hall for an hour while I wait to be let into the club, $12 for a Ketel and Red Bull seems a little excessive.    But these are all just details. Honestly, I might not have even mentioned these little petty bits if the actual dancing had been what I'd wanted it to be.  Of course, this is Boston, and as someone else in Yelpland wrote, Boston doesn't dance.  I've only just started my Boston tour of dance venues, (this is my second attempt at a place that refers to itself as a dance club), it seems like Boston DJ's have a serious problem with figuring out themes, and far more importantly, transitions.  I don't mind if the DJ wants to throw in a little old-school freestyle with the more recent r&b remixes, but goddamnit, I should -not stop dancing-. Match your damn beats people. Also, while I'm never against hearing a song I really love, no matter when it came out, can I ask why the hell you're playing top 40  tracks from 2003 when there are actually a) hot, danceable top 40 tracks out currently, b) more obscure hot, danceable tracks worth playing instead, c) the top 40 tracks you pick from 2003 all suck?  Further, if you start playing a song - and you manage by some miracle, to pick a good one, with a nice build up, and a hot beat, and people are dancing hard, and really enjoying themselves - DO NOT SWITCH THE DAMN TRACK IN THE MIDDLE OF THE CRESCENDO. ESPECIALLY if you are incapable of matching beats and we go from 100 bpm to an effing slow-jam build-up! I've been to house parties in basements with ceilings so low your hands hit the tile where I paid five bucks for a cup to drink cheap beer all night with DJs a hundred times more crowd-savvy, talented, and up-to-date with their music selection than at this place where I paid ten damn dollars to get in.  What's up, Boston?  The crowd was okay, though there was a much higher ratio of ridiculous drunk girls who couldn't balance in their stilettos, dancing like complete assholes than I would have liked. (And I don't just mean they looked ridiculous - I mean they'd just stumble/dance into your dance space, blocking you off from your friends, because they were trying to seduce [ahem] whatever piece of ass they were hoping to take them home that night. Not cute, ladies. Please learn to maintain.)  The dudes were for the most part respectful, so there was at least that. Though there were many moments when it felt very much like a damn high school dance, with most of the boys lining the borders of the dance floor and all the girls dancing in the middle.  The crowd wasn't terribly diverse, but I've sadly come to expect this from Boston.   Overall, I hate to say it, but Felt is not worth your time or your money. And my search for a decent Boston dance club continues.
2.5 stars for the pizza. 0 stars for the service. I work and live in East Boston and have been looking forward to going here for so long. I was disappointed but not surprised to see in past reviews that minorities don't feel welcome here. Staff actively avoided our table (my boyfriend is black) while chatting and laughing with other costumers. Probably would have enjoyed the pizza more if I had water to drink with it, but as I asked for water the waiter  walked away. Bottomline:Overrated pizza. Unwelcoming staff. Will AVOID going here for the remainder of my time in Eastie.   **Also the pizza at Kelly's Pub was way better.
Food was passable.  Our waiter had some miscommunication and this is understandable, however the manager was completely rude.  She started lecturing us on the difference between bananas and plantains and how it was our fault we should have known the difference and corrected them.  They over charged us and also charge for chips and salsa which has never happened at any tex mex place I have been.  Save yourself time and money.  There is better food out there.
Oh the joys of trying to recover a car from the impound lot. Granted I understand that this process can be painful but the employees at South Metro Towing not only refuse to soften the blow but they throw salt in the wounds. It appears any measure possible to waste time is taken here. The first location provided to us was incorrect. It's was not until you reach what appears to be the former location (that still has the signs up) you are greeted with a sign on the door that has the correct address. When you finally reach the correct location you are instructed to take a number and sit in the waiting room furnished with broken and exposed wires and holes in the wall where the wiring is shown to be incomplete. When your number is finally called you are asked to prove ownership of the car by presenting the cars registration which is in the car in the glove compartment because that's were normal people keep it. So at this point you are instructed again to take a number and wait in the dreadful waiting room only to be told that they cannot find the registration that's located in the glove compartment where every normal person keeps it. Now once again you must take another number and wait in the waiting room at this point now feels like a detention center. This may go on for a while and I would assume that our situation was an outlier except for the fact that there were other people going through a similar situation. At this point this ordeal has last over an hour and could have been worse if they were actually busy. Finally when the registration has been magically found in the glove compartment where almost everyone keeps it, it must have no issues. The registration better not be expired, no misspelling, be in your mother's maiden name, etc. or you may be cast back into the dungeon they call a waiting room, or they can now electronically for a small price of $5 look up the car registration an option that 45 minutes early we would have gladly taken. Now you have proven ownership and a sealed plastic bag with your valuables is presented to you unless it is cash. Bills larger than 20 may be missing. Unless you can prove it was actually in the car kiss it goodbye. Now you have to wait outside for them to bring your car out to you. Don't get to excited this too will take some time. Hope you bought an umbrella or you may be left standing outside looking like a sad backup dancer in a Usher video.
WARNING! 1.       The Wyndham Grand Resort in Orlando claims to be pet friendly, however, their pet policy is "you may not leave your pet in the room unattended at ANY time."  HUH?  How about when you go to dinner, or to the pool, or to the Disney parks?  Nope, not allowed.  I found this out the morning of our vacation, when I called to confirm booking which was made through Hotels.com.  It doesn't say this anywhere on the Wyndham website or the Hotels.com website, but I was assured by the Wyndham Director of Guest Services that this is Wyndham's policy.  So we scrambled to find other arrangements for our dog on the morning of our trip, since it was too late to cancel. 2.       We asked at check-in if we could purchase Disney theme park tickets at the hotel, to avoid the wait times at the park.  No problem, they told us the tickets at the hotel were the same price as at the parks.  However, we could save $133 on our park tickets by attending a ninety minute presentation about Wyndham time shares and we would be served free breakfast.  As it turned out, breakfast was prepackaged muffins and coffee, and the price we paid for the park tickets was over inflated.  We actually only saved $68 dollars total and the presentation was a horrible experience.  We sat there for TWO hours being interrogated with personal questions and eventually insulted for not realizing the value of investing in a time share.  Had I known what the true savings and consequences were, we would never have agreed to attend. 3.       The hotel itself was clean and nicely appointed, with various pools and a walking trail around the lake.  However, in addition to the hotel price, they tack on $20 plus tax per night for self-parking and $20 plus tax per night for resort amenities.  So that's an extra $44 per night on top of the room price. My advice, if you are bringing your dog on vacation, stay at a Hyatt hotel - they truly are pet friendly.  And don't fall for time share presentation scams.  Lesson learned.  Were it not for these two incidents, our trip to the Wyndham may have been a totally different experience.
bad service dont go here! They needs to learn customer service... They're food is okay but the service is extremely bad..... Im not going here again.... My mom was even disappointed because of their service...
Had high hopes for this one as it is right around the corner from my house, but unfortunately, it was pretty poor.  I ordered on the app from my house and pressed the option that said "prepare immediately". I waited 30 minutes  at home as I thought that'd be plenty of time to prepare the food. When I arrived, the gentleman was nice enough but did not even know I had ordered. He then looked up my order.   To be fair, on his end, it said that the order was not supposed to be ready for an additional 30 minutes so they had not even started the meal (so much for "prepare immediately"). I was surprised that the app didn't inform me of a pick up time. If I had known it would be an hour from the submission of the order, we probably would not have ordered. After all, it was a pick up...not a delivery.  The cashier said that if I wanted to wait, it would only be 10-12 minutes for preparation of the food. 20 minutes later, the cashier said that it would only be 3 more minutes. 15 minutes after that, I finally received my food. Again, to be fair, it was only a few minutes after the non-immediate pickup time that was arbitrarily assigned to me, but if I had known it would take 35 min instead of the promised 10-12, I would have gone home and come back.  The food was not great. Again, I live close and by the time I got to my house (.5 miles away) all of the food was less than warm.   We got the Parmesan, teriyaki, and original hot wings with some Parmesan fries. The original hot wings were good, but the rest was just a waste of money.  I think we'll choose a different place next time we want wings. There are definitely better choices in the area.
Came here tonight and put my name on the list. Hostess told me 20 minute wait. I came back after 20 minutes and she told me it would be a 25 more minute wait. I looked at her and asked if she sat people before me. She said "no because people had reservations". Either she's really bad at her job, or she boldly lied to my face as I saw names crossed out after mine. Never coming here again. Trash hostess.
This place is way too expensive for what you get; my girlfriend and I ordered a charcuterie plate for $22 which wound up being Cabot cheese, "American Prosciutto", some kind of random salami and a couple of other uninspired cheeses, not slices, but crumbles of cheese. Pretty disappointing. Formaggio is like half a mile away from this place, for $22 I expected at least something quasi exotic, this charcuterie plate looks like something I could make out of my fridge. We also got half a dozen oysters which tasted fine but whoever is doing the shucking back in the kitchen needs a refresher course. Not having bits of shells in the oyster is shucking 101. Also some of the oysters were destroyed, like in pieces. Moving onto the main course, we got steak frittes, again for $22 but it was honestly what I would expect from ordering steak at TGIF. A little too tough. Not the greatest cut of meat and some garlic parmesan fries that were meh. Also for some reason the steak and the oysters came out at the same time, five minutes after we got the charcuterie plate. How is that even possible?  Rafiki would be fine it was in the suburbs somewhere, but it isn't. It is in Boston. Right next door is Temple, a similarly priced place with similar food that is much, much better. The chef may have revamped the menu but it isn't enough. This place is going down unless it picks its game up.
I was there January 13, 2017 celebrating my gran baby birthday I order the Loaded Nachos without the Black Beans when I got the Nachos did have any chicken just bacon n cheese. The waiter sent it back and brought me another Nachos it still was not rite had the black bean  which I said to hold the beans. Very Unsatisfied Customer.
Let's see - 35 Yelp reviews on Ace, or which 33 (including my own) are one-star, the lowest rating possible. At least they're consistent.  And I assure you that this consistency is well deserved and about the only positive thing to be said about this pus of misery on McCoy Road! 45 minutes at MCO awaiting their shuttle, along with a dozen or more other unhappy customers; my son was waiting for me at their rental facility, and when he mentioned (in response to my phone call - I couldn't get through on Ace's phone system) to the guy in charge that people were stacking up at the pickup point, he was, by his report, pretty much called a liar.   When the shuttle finally showed up, there wasn't room for everyone; at least one person ended up being obliged to take a taxi to the facility.   I had a confirmed reservation in hand, made through Orbitz, for a minivan, but was told that no such vehicle was available. Apparently confirmed reservations count for nothing at Ace RentACar. I was offered an economy car, the only cars they still had on the lot; bit of a tight fit for a family of five. Thank you, but no - we ended up making a reservation on the fly with a competitor down the street and getting a van there. This at 11.00 PM, by the way. Thank God that someone else was open and had a vehicle available.   I did learn something from the experience; check the reviews before you jump on the low price offer! Had I thought to have done so, I would never have considered Ace. Imagine this: stranded late at night in the middle of a really dubious (ie crappy) neighborhood, sitting with your family on the sidewalk on your suitcases, seeing a side of Orlando you really didn't sign up for, and wondering what you're going to do next. Quite an adventure, eh? This could be the beginning to YOUR vacation - just book with Ace RentaCar!
I've been in Atlanta for a few years now, and people talk about Tin Lizzies, but I've never been there. then, they opened a location at Emory Pointe, and I work at Emory. So, I went over there for lunch the other day. It's fine. I'll eat there, I'm sure, because it's convenient to me and it's not terrible (see any of my reviews of Emory Village, except Falafel King). What's more, when I was there, it was really nice out, and with all of the windows and doors open, it was really comfortable. But, other than being not terrible and convenient, it doesn't have all that much going for it. It reminds me of a Chilis, with a little (I mean _little_) less of a corporate feel. The food was better than Chilis, but not by much. I had shrimp and fish tacos, which were fine.
The food fucking sucked. Chicken and steak both undercooked. Soup tasted like a sweaty gym sock dipped in water. The chef and waitress were extremely rude. Yelled at us and were not nice at all. Threw my credit card on the dirty greasy grill didn't apologize and when I went to pay she ripped the check and card out of my hand. Fuck that place will never go back there again. Much better options than this stupid ass fucking dirty, gross, and rude place.
Food is great. This review is about the service.   Waitress was not attentive at all. She was attending to all the other tables but not ours.  Waited for drink orders for over 10 mins and then waited for paper check because kiosk had the wrong bill and had to literally flag her down to pay the bill.  Very dissatisfied.
It's an old restaurant axiom that while the food's meh, there's lots of it.  I ordered Chicken Katsu and it was served promptly.  By the way, service was very friendly and accommodating.  The Chicken Katsu came with an iceberg lettuce salad and 2 large ice cream cone scoops of white rice.  The chicken was pounded very thin to give the illusion of quantity.  It was cooked at least once before because the chicken was dry.  I left almost half of it uneaten, heresy in my book.    It has a limited menu and I think anyone looking for a quick cheap meal will be satisfied.    Table top was sticky/tacky to the touch.
I have driven past the CSI building many times and I have always wanted to see what it was about. So, when I got to go for a birthday party, I was pretty excited.   When you first enter the building you feel a rush of cool air and the lighting is dim.  Before you enter the Crime Scenes you are given a vest and clip board. When you enter the crime scene area you jot down notes about the scene, then go to a separate area to answer/enter in your findings.  Unfortunately, you can tell that the questions and prompts are geared towards children and are very easy.  Because of that fact, it was very boring for me and I could not stop yawning during the experience.
I had been recommended to this place by yelp and a drug rep so I decided to take my mom out to eat there. We got there when they first opened up for dinner. We got our miso soup which..how can anyone mess that up? and we ordered a variety of different sashimi and some tempura veggies. The tempura veggies was tasty but man I'm still disappointed about the sushi. It was odd cuts almost like they just quickly cut of the unsavoury parts of the fish and slapped it on our plate. Some slices were slim then thicker on one side and it just plan tasted old. Not fresh (even close to fresh) and really not worth the price. I will just stick with getting my chunks of sashimi from the Asian Market.
What happened to this place, they now appear closed, with no sign?  This place used to be great, but the food went a little downhill.  They only ever seemed to be busy when there was an event at Lynn Arts or the Museum.  They could be really good if they just did some marketing and reached out to the locals and surrounding communities.  You can't expect the same 5 people to go night after night and survive.  The Blue Ox is packed and Tatiana's gets a decent crowd as well.  Such a shame, this really was a hidden gem with so much potential.
Poor ambience. Very flimsy furniture in a cramped room. Our furniture moved and shook each time someone at the adjacent table moved. Food was average.
I loved this place. I loved it so hard. Awesome food, good price, weird Chinatown stuff afoot. But then the roaches came. Went with a girlfriend and saw a sizable one on a wall. You know, restaurants have issues and it is Chinatown so I hesitantly went again because as I said, I loved it so hard. Came after that and saw THREE. two on the table. The waiters look at you like, uh oh--did she see that? I can't go back, it's utterly tragic. Hit me up if they get their health code right.
Went here for dinner with a friend. We walked in and awkwardly stood there for a few minutes before almost walking out because there was no one in sight, including in the restaurant. Shoullllllllllld have taken that as a sign.  The waitress was someone who I'm pretty sure owned the place and she was pretty much the most inattentive and apathetic waitress I've had in a while. We had questions about the menu but really got nowhere with answers so I ended up getting something much more spicy than I could handle. (That's definitely my own fault for trying to be ambitious in Thai food.) My dining partner did enjoy her dish, though, but I have no idea what it was.  On a random note, the place was sort of eerie and empty. Add that up with the owners' kid running around and bad service, well I'm not headed back anytime soon, even IF they did just introduce a beer selection to their menu.
Earlier tonight, I had a rather underwhelming happy hour experience at Gusto. We ordered some decent wine; calamari, which was quite bland and not-so-fresh tasting; meatballs, which were pretty meh; and a margherita pizza, which was the best of the food bunch. Not the most flavorful pie ever, but the crust was quite good and the rest of the fixings were serviceable. Speaking of service, our waitress seemed peeved to serve us in a restaurant that was, maybe, 20% full. I'll give her credit though - she warmed up a bit toward the end of our meal.  I suppose that I'll return if a friend really wants to check it out, but I won't otherwise rush back for a second visit.
Might have to say that this is the first place in Boston that I'm giving less than three stars.  Stopped in here on Memorial day weekend.  This place was getting slammed with people and it was apparent that they couldn't handle it.  Our first attempt at sitting outdoors there was dashed as the right side where we were put felt like a wind tunnel.  They wouldn't accommodate sitting us in front so we opted for indoors.  It was around dinner time on Sunday and took forever to get a drink via waitress service.  Beer menu was wrong incorrectly listing ABV on one of the beers, I took note to this as it was the beer I order and found out it was labeled incorrectly during the 20 mins it took me to get my drink.   Nachos were mediocre and the kids Mac and Cheese was served much later and was nothing but Kraft.  Real weak.  Ended up bolting ASAP and going somewhere else.
Maybe it was a busy lunch? Waited (and waited and waited) for water. Water. Got my food served and was still waiting for water. The food was "chain-ish" (which it is, but you know what I mean) and didn't have a sense of people really caring about the delivery of the experience. Maybe I'm spoiled by hyper-local places?
Drove 25 miles to be told they were out of donuts. They were open but no product? Seems a bit off to me. If you have nothing to sell. Close and lock the doors. Kind of took the adventure out of it so I'll probably never know what a Blue Star donut tastes like. Of well...Voodoo donuts here we come....
Went there about 1 PM on a Monday.  It wasn't particularly busy, and we were seated quickly.  Our drink order was taken promptly, one coke and one beer, and we didn't see our server again for 10 minutes.  I believe it was the bartender who finally brought the beer, but didn't get the coke. He then brought our second drink a few minutes later.  When we did see our server, she was  taking an order at another table, and then 5 minutes later brought those people their drinks.  Didn't see her again for another 5 minutes when she finally came back to take our order.  At that point we were more than 20 minutes into this place, and decided it wasn't worth any more waiting so we put a few bucks down and got up and left.  Very poor service.  No idea how the food is since we didn't even get our order in.  Only about the second place I had to walk out of due to extremely poor service.
Let me preface this by saying I used to go here on a regular basis and was a totally satisfied customer.  I think that one dude still gives solid cuts. But everyone else will just straight up ignore whatever requests you make about your haircut. I asked for a scissor trim cuz I didn't want to take much off. The guy promptly pulled out a buzzer and started shaving the sides of my head.  Then he proceeded to shorten the length of my sideburns by about half without even asking. Not only that but they weren't even straight across - I will have to try and fix them when I shave later.  The guy who cut my hair was also rude. He acted like I was putting him out the entire time.  He also did not use the straight razor across the back, which I used to get every time without fail. This place has gone downhill.
The flavors were very "muted" as someone else also said. Haagen Dazs is way better. Tillamook is way better. Salt and Straw is way better. This store only gets notoriety because it makes eccentric flavors and the names sound interesting. The taste, however, is bland.   Also, it's weird to sit down at the bar and hardly be acknowledged for 10+ minutes, while one person struggles to efficiently get an ice cream scoop for a couple and the other organizes container lids. Then the 4 of us are only helped by one person instead of the two of them helping us - the other girl moves on to others that just walked in. It was like being in the twilight zone. Pass on this place.
I think 2.5 stars would sum this place up.  I like the breakfast, nothing fancy, but always good.  Never had a bad meal there. For breakfast, a little on the expensive side. The space is cramped, and the service is not friendly, bordering on rude, always.  It's fine during the week, but not worth waiting for a table on the weekends.
I recommend this for buying - some good finds.  I definitely do not recommend Caliente for consigning (for selling).   I tried a number of times to get reimbursed for  my sold items, but they always had an excuse.  At that stage they owed me only $15, but they'd say oh even for that amount you have to always call ahead, then oh we haven't made sales yet so don't have enough in the cash today to reimburse, it's a weekend we only reimburse on weekdays (don't most people have jobs?),  etc. etc., and finally that it had been too long to be paid.   Keep meaning to report them to BBB.
My first Buca's experience was 8 years ago, in the Seattle location on a trip to visit some friends. It was awesome - we had never heard of it, and were so pleasantly surprised by the fun concept, the amazing food, the great service and the abundant wine, we lamented going back to our very new home of Columbus. However, we were overjoyed when we found out there was a location just a mile from our Short North apartment.   We were soon regulars and found ourselves eating garlicky bruschetta, marghertia pizza and glasses of rose as often as we could, on graduate student budgets. The visits trailed out a bit, over the years, but what we started to notice was a number of little changes that have culminated in our most recent bad experience that leads me to believe that we won't be going back.   Many things have changed over the years, and at first I assumed it was just me, like the new Buca-for-two menus that didn't really fit with the concept at all, or the lunch items that were of much lesser quality than the dinner entrees (maybe because of lack of volume). Then the wine prices started going up, and they started removing clear favorites from the menu (like the warm tomato salad that we saw other tables around us ordering EVERY time we were there, until they axed it).   Tonight's experience was sad. I called a week ago to make reservations for 4:30 on a Sunday, which isn't a terribly busy time, but it was after a downtown commencement ceremony, so better safe than sorry. We arrived on time, and our party of 9 was shuttled to the back cramped corner of a tiny room and split into a booth and a nearby table. It took us 15 minutes just to figure out how to fit everyone in. When we asked if there were another table we could be moved to, the waitress (who was very nice and accommodating) said that there weren't enough servers to open up some of the bigger rooms. I mentioned that I had made a reservation, and she said that they were actually having this problem with 4 other families. She did find a table we could move to, but by that time we had already been settled.  One look at the ridiculously heavy, impossible-to-navigate, spiral-bound, laminated menu and it felt like we were at a TGI Fridays. All that was missing was a kitschy cocktail menu...oh, wait...there is one right there. Gone was the placemat and wall menus, and gone is the fun of choosing your food as a family. We ended up just delegating a person (me) to decipher the items and choose a few dishes.   The prices, by the way, were astronomical, and the small/large size thing was confusing. At one point our server was trying to explain, and said "well, the pasta large is the same as an entree small, so if you're going to get three entree smalls, get 2 pasta larges and that should be good for our party." My suggestion? MAKE LARGE BE LARGE AND SMALL BE SMALL.  We got the bruschetta and I almost cried. It was basically a huge grocery store hamburger bun, brushed with cheap olive oil with canned diced tomatoes dumped on top. There was no garlic, just a whisper of old brown basil, and, most of all, no flavor. I literally spit it out on my plate. The antipasti salad was fine, but drenched in dressing and not as good as I remember it. The margherita pizza was also still tasty.  We got the rest of the dishes quickly; most of them were luke-warm and over-sauced, while the spaghetti and meatballs was undersauced. I felt sick after dinner because of all the heavy butter and unnecessary oil in the dishes.   As silly as it is, this experience depressed me and we won't be going back any time soon. I will miss what it once was, and certainly won't be recommending it to anyone. Buca's hired the wrong managers that changed way too much from what was working about their restaurant, and I have no doubt their time as a company is limited.
Should any self respecting asian eat here? that answer is no.  I was kind of excited coming here. I have hot pot at home with my parents all the time. But because i havent been home for a period of time longer than 2 weeks in more than 2 years, i havent eaten a traditional asian hot pot meal in a long time. So i REALLY REALLY wanted to like this place.   So why the 1 star? Ok summary. The food is WYY too expensive for what they give you. The main serving sizes aren't very large, and to be honest, its kind of bland.   Ok i know what your thinking, its hot pot, your supposed to use the sauce they give you. well i did. and yes i did eat EVERYTHING i was served. and i was still hungry on top of that. I went with a group of 10 people and we were all seated togerher pretty fast. now when we get our food, we get clear rice noodles, and a small assortment of asian fish balls, yam, and slices of various spuds. when i say a small assortment, i mean one of each. the serving size of meat they give you also isnt very large. I got the sea and meat comgination with lamb, and there were maybe 10 small slices of lamb, along with 10 pieces of a variety of seafood. when you boil them, its not all that much.  Needless to say, my friends and i were all still hungry at the end of our meals. OH and they dont have mango bubble tea!!! WAT IN THE WORLD. so i got a mango slushy which they said they were making from an actual mango. GUESS WHAT. THEY LIE. Ive definitely had enough mango anythings to be able to tell when something is from a syrup and when something is from the actual fruit. altogether it cost me 20 dollars.   20  dollars!!!! think of all the places i could have gone on buford with 20 dollars. HECK penang and pho bac are right next door. i could have eaten myself into a food coma at either of those 2 places for 20 dollars.   In the end, when i was giving a rating to this place, i went through the list of places that ive rated, and asked myself if i would go to mini hot pot over any of these places. and that answer is NO. so definitely a firm 1 star
I had one hour appointment with Dr. Wong. She completed new patient consultation, panoramic x-ray, bite-wings x-ray, and periodontal maintenance within that one-hour appointment. She was too busy and in a rush. Dr. Wong spent about 15 minutes on my periodontal maintenance. Later we found other dentists spent 45 ~ 60 minutes on the same treatment, and did a much delicate job.  Dr. Wong suggested me periodontal maintenance since I had periodontal issue. Other dentist told me periodontal maintenance is generally necessary three months after periodontal scaling and root planning. In other words, Dr. Wong should have done a periodontal scaling, instead of maintenance, on my first visit. Maybe 15 minutes is not enough for a periodontal scaling, but why do I need a maintenance?  Dr. Wong told me I have one teeth needs be filled. She didn't want to spend another appointment for that filling. Instead, she wants to combine the filling with my next cleaning four months later. The combination is a good idea of improving Dr. Wong's outcome in one appointment, but my purpose of visiting dentist is to resolve existing problems as early as possible.  I notice Dr. Wong and her staff didn't understand their insurance filling system well. They overcharged my wife's filling. Dr. Wong complained that my employer purchased a poor insurance for employees that only covers old-style filing, but not filling with composite materials. She said insurance company generally don't cover this new technology. That is not true after I check my insurance benefit. I noticed the over-charge after receiving the statement from the insurance company. After three calls and four months, I finally got the refund from Dr. Wong.  My wife's tooth is very still sensitive half a year after getting filled by Dr. Wong. My review might be subjective, but we do hope Dr. Wong could slow down the treatment process, do a more delicate job, and do a better staff training. We understand that time is money for a dentist. That's true in any dental office, but the trust from patient is also important. Now we find a nice family dentist in South Austin. Every time we pay our new dentist, we feel their service well deserve it.
don't waste your hard earned money....very greasy food and whatever dish you order expect very little chicken or beef.  The food lacks flavor and is just plain distasteful!
Definitely not the best philly I've had.  Their sandwiches are missing quality steak meat. They've got a good location, but have to learn to make a great cheesesteak.  Weeyums here I come.
Stylists almost always do a good job but I don't know why corporate can't get its act together on customer service.  I went in with just enough time available before an event last Monday and was told they were 25 minutes behind so I had to leave without getting my hair done.  Not only that, I wasted 40 minutes getting there and back.  The receptionist explained they have no phone to call people and let them know if they are behind?! Not the first time this has happened!at this location, but things happen.  I call the one phone number available and am told it will be 24-48 hours before I hear back.  6 days and still waiting.  Not the first time for that either.  So instead of making the situation right, they make it worse.  Clearly they just couldn't care less unless you complain on a public forum.
2.5 stars...  but not quite 3.   I'm not sure about this place. It seems that they don't know what they want to do, there's a swordfish on the wall next to a giant skull.   I feel they are trying TOO HARD to be hipster and cool. I love metal/death/rock music as much as the next guy. But blaring in a room full of people consistently, not so much. I mean I love rocking out, but not for several hours straight unless I'm at a show.   The crowd itself seemed to be very poser-ish. Maybe it's because it's so close to all the colleges. Again, it just feels like the whole atmosphere is trying so hard to be edgy, but it's so not.
This place was a horrible mistake. Had to change rooms THREE TIMES! The first room they put us in stunk to high heaven. We got moved. Second room the TV and air didn't work so they installed a new air conditioner. OMG it got even hotter and that one didn't work. (It was not new as maintenance told us). Maintenance then tells me that our thermostat was being used in another room. How does that even happen?! I completely lost it! We were moved again. Finally a room four hours after checking in and three moves. Manager wasn't helpful gave us two days of free breakfast we were staying four nights! As I was down in the lobby about the second room i heard over the radio to go back to my room and maintenance response was "What the hell does she want now", REALLY? We finally got to a room with air conditioning and again the TV is not working. We didn't even bother with reporting it. They advertise that they are across from Universal Studios, not even close. They offer a shuttle but you have to reserve then and it's a crapshoot unless you take their 90 min timeshare tour. (No thanks) We ended up taking Lyft everywhere. There is a TGI Friday's on site and they were just as rude as this hotel! (That's another story!). Save your money, time and hassle and stay away from this place! (We are IHG Gold Elite members and will be filing a formal complaint!)
Checked in- reserved King room- reservationists stated we had 2 king beds- not- 2 queen beds! Hallway had huge fans drying the carpet? Went back to reservations stated we would have a king bed the next day at 11am- it's now 3pm and NO king room! Jeff the manager was very unaccommodating- Very disappointed and discussed with Disney World!
Food was two cliks north of terrible. Yrs, the drinks are strong but not well or artfully crafted.   To top it off, it's expensive! Sixty bucks for a grocery store quality steak and Mac and cheese life you can get in a box.   Disappointing.
worst Wendy's in the area. just sat at the speaker while it was dead with cars behind me for several minutes before asking if anybody was there. I got no response, then noticed another car pull up to the other speaker next to me and immediately get the order taken. The bun on my sandwich was stale, which I've never had in my life from Wendy's.
wifi is nice, but the 17 yr old baristas at this dingy overrated coffee shop have confused "handmade" with "messy." drinks are sub-par, bad top 40 on the radio, and sweaty pastries under cellophane is what many people awarded 5 stars. really? i understand the need or solid alternatives to starbucks, but central square is hurting if this is considered good.
I keep giving this Outback another try - and I simply do not know why. The service has been downhill for sometime now. We recently went in on a Friday night at 6:30. Clearly, we expected it to be busy since it was Friday.... but to our surprise, despite there being a major line - there were more empty tables than sat tables. The host told us that their evening shift wait staff wasn't in yet, and so they couldn't seat everyone and that it was a 30 minute wait. WHO DOESNT SCHEDULE WAIT STAFF AT RUSH HOUR ON FRIDAY? Unbelievable. We snagged a first come first serve table at the bar and ordered there. After a ridiculously long wait, our food finally came out. Both mine and my fathers steaks were cold. Not luke warm, cold... like they had been sitting there for awhile. Just then our favorite waitress walked by and stopped to say hello. It was now about 7:30 and she was just coming on. She even commented on how if they would have just called her, she would have come in early. Neither my father nor I ate our steaks; and finally called it quits. I'd sooner drive down to Kissimmee to that Outback before I even go to the St Cloud one again.
I ordered a tonkotsu ramen and gyouza on Ubereats, wondering how they would deliver. They delivered all the ramen and topping in one bowl, and broth in another, which was nice.  In terms of flavor though, it was very meh. When I opened the broth container, I was surprised that I couldn't smell it at all. It wasn't until I tried a spoonful of the broth that it even vaguely resembled a tonkotsu broth. The chashu in the ramen was like the broth, pretty weak in flavor. They also added some unconventional toppings, pickles and pickled ginger. I ate the pickles first because I didn't want it to spread, and I can't imagine it going well with the ramen. Whenever I got a taste of ginger, it simply overpowered everything else about the ramen (not difficult considering the weak flavor in the first place). Overall, it didn't taste awful, but definitely not worth the price. Gyouza was fried ok, but I didn't really enjoy the filling. Next time I crave ramen, I'd definitely just go out to Santouka instead.
So disappointed! Been coming here 4ever 4 the pitcher of beer/pizza special. Had to send pizza back n it came back the same. It had no sauce, the pizza was mushy and was basically glorified cheesy bread. Manager came out and listened but really didn't care. Told him we would not b back. There are too many other options in C-vile!!!
Went to Ma Soba for dinner last night for the first time. My friend and I both ordered dinner combos. I had chicken teriyaki with spicy tuna rolls, and she had veggie dumplings with spicy salmon rolls. Our portions weren't very big, and we could tell which rolls were which. They both looked liked pulverized pink fish surrounded by rice. The dumplings didn't look appetizing and weren't finished. The atmosphere of the restaurant was nice and so was the waitress. Next time I want to get sushi, I will try someplace else.
My husband and I were on vacation and we were exhausted from spending all day in the parks.  We didn't feel like cooking and we certainly weren't getting our of our PJs for the rest of the night.  I decided to look up some good Italian that could be delivered by ubereats.  I looked through some menus and found an restaurant that had a pretty authentic Italian menu.  I ordered all of the delicious items and hit send.... Unfortunately the food gods had other plans for us that night.  Ubereats malfunctioned and I couldn't get my order.    Plan B.  Grubhub.... and as luck would have it, that particular restaurant wasn't offered on Grubhub.  Craving Italian, we went with Retro Station.  The menu seemed to offer the basics so let's give it a try.  $81 and our food was in the garbage.  I ended up with a grilled ham & cheese.
I would love to try the food, however I can't get them to answer the phone. Today, their phone was off for two hours, and when they finally answered, I was told they wouldn't be delivering. They probably have delicious food, but I can already tell they have terrible customer service.  Seeing as my entire work experience has centered around customer service, I find it somewhat insulting to have a restaurant rely souly on the quality of their food, and have complete disregard for their customer service.
Staff kinda suck and for the size the price is a bit high. Might try again in a couple weeks and see if my first impression is correct. I think the fact that they are usually empty and that I have never seen them busy only proves me correct.
Their food sucks! I have tried the sashimi, the nigiri, sushi, gyoza and fried chicken and all of them were poor quality and poor ingredients. The rice had some hard rock grains on the sushi, the sashimi was so thin you could see through, the fried chicken had more fat than meat, and they don't accept AMEX. Simply put: I'm never coming back. I don't recommend.
I go in asking for a vegan glazed donut. Dude (some bearded guy, not that narrows down anyone in Austin) says "I don't think we have any". So I say "is there anyway you can check cuz it's really what I had my heart set on". He just says in response "yeah, we don't have any". Umm okay? So I order a different donut. Total included change, I put the change down with my $20 and he pushes the change back to me in the counter and says "just keep that" and charged me out of my $20 and giving me more jingle. Annoying. Talk about shit customer service.
Well, this place is consistent - I'll give 'em that. The pizzas came out looking exactly like they do in the Yelp pictures, and that's what I was afraid of.   After a single piece of the first pizza, the entire center of the pizza crust was completely soggy and after the second piece, the pizza was cold. Not to mention the toppings were skimpy, haphazard, and not even close to representing 'art' - three pieces on our Lamb Sausage pizza didn't even have sausage on them. And the Mushroom and Leek pizza we got was super bland. A liberal dose of hot pepper flakes was a last ditch (failed) effort on the majority of what remained of these limp, cold, pies. How this crust recipe made it through the testing phase is beyond me.  I have had pizza from over 12 different US locations certified by the Associazione Verace Pizza Napoletana, as well as at least 5 VPN-certified restaurants in Italy from Campania to Puglia. Not to say that this pizza-making certification is the be-all, end-all - absolutely not. It does set a baseline for your tastebuds, though. VPN aside, there are countless other non-certified shops that specialize in this thin, wood-fired variety (like Pizzeria Bianco in Phoenix, and Arturo's in NYC) that know what they're doing.  The Thirteen Pies 'popover' style crust edge is so odd, dry and badly proportioned. You could fit a circumference of bratwurst in it. If you are one to discard your crusts, you will starve here. This is an awfully huge crust that just gets drier as the center of the pizza gets soggier. So unacceptable. And at $15/pie for 6 smallish soggy slices, a terrible value. It is fair to say that both pizzas we ordered were in the bottom 10% of pizzas I've had in my lifetime. The pictures tell the same story.  If you *have* to eat here, try the apps and pasta and drink a lot. But you should avoid the pizza. It is so bad! Unless you love wasting your hard-earned food dollars - go right ahead.  All this being said, the location is great, and the decor is sauna-sexy, all untreated, planed 2x8s all over the place. It's the wood that makes the interior good. But unfortunately, the pizza will embarrass you if you try to take a date here. You don't want that, do you?
This happened on April 27th. I ordered sliders, Chicken wings, onion rings and 2 drinks. Most of them are ok, but the Slider was terrible!! I can't even finish them. I ends up wasted a lot of my food.  The worst part if the waitress. Since I got a lot food left, I ask 2 boxes for the chicken wings. After I finished packing two boxes,she just took away my 2 boxes with my Credit card. I thought she was gonna put the boxes to a bag so I didn't stop her. When she's back, she only give back my credit card. And when I ask where my boxes are, she said "are you sure it's me? Maybe someone else took it."  I spent over $60 for these food and they just through them away?! Terrible Experience!!!
This place was not real bbq. The pulled pork was from a tub that probably was bought at Costco/Sams etc...The sausage was Elgin sausage which is good if you get it from Elgin meat market not pre-packed and stuffed in the steamer or oven. Asked for green beans as a side and got a soupy water downed green bean casaole from a crock pot. People were rushed through the line during lunch time and the cashier was raising her voice talking over people about what they ordered and what they are drinking and what type of bread etc..Looked like a scene from when food is served to prisoners in movies..Although the other co - worker's were nice and it looked like it could have a nice atmosphere...The food was just not that good and tasted like left over reheated fast food bbq
I don't understand the hype for this place. I ordered a latte, and it was lukewarm at best. I couldn't taste the espresso- it tasted like overpriced lukewarm milk. I ended up tossing it and going somewhere else :(
The woman in the store us a terrible sales person. She is unhelpful, in kind and almost rude. after buying one wig for my daughter she then told me I could only try on a maximum of 3 wigs. How do you know? She doesn't recommend and there are wigs you are never allowed to try on! I will never go back and am now looking for a place where the wig expert can help me figure out which wig will make me feel more beautiful. DONT GO THERE...
I order take-out from here regularly with no problem.  Food is hot, fresh and tasty.  My husband and I had date-night a few evenings ago and this was the first time I ever dined in.  As we waited for our food, we watched another table get served.  There was a problem with the woman's food, so the server took it right back.  The man's food sat in front of him for several minutes while two servers were in somewhat of an animated discussion nearby.  They kept looking at the guy, then back at the kitchen, etc.  Finally, one server walked over, explained something, removed his food from the table, and took it back to the kitchen.    Shortly thereafter, they brought us our food.  They had served the other table our food by mistake.  i asked if this was the food that was just on the other table and the server replied, "yes."  I told him that I couldn't eat that and he argued that the man never touched it.  I refused.  It sat on his table for at least 5 minutes while he breathed over it and could have dropped anything (hair, spittle, etc.). For my trouble, they gave us $1.49 off my husband's food.  Gee, thanks.  That's my last time at L'Thai for take-out or dine-in.  Such a shame that I can no longer trust what's happening behind the scenes in this restaurant.  If they do something so blatantly unhygeinic in front of you, there's no telling what is permitted in the kitchen.
I've been coming here for the past year. The roasted brown rice milk tea is the bomb. Sadly, the service has declined the last couple times I came in. I had 3 drinks over the phone. When I arrived, the girl had only punched in 1 drink, so two were missing. I had requested extra ice normal sugar, but the 1 drink that was made had extra sugar and normal ice on the label. I waited from 2:10 to 2:35 in the store (upon entering to leaving with the  3 drinks that I had ordered). The two additional drinks they made were really, really sweet to the point that it was hard to gulp down (had requested extra ice, normal sugar). So the person making it wasn't following the label instructions correctly - switched the two around. I feel that there is a language barrier with their current staff.
I've had a terrible time getting Handy to actually keep an appointment. It's my first time trying to use the service (they ran a special on Groupon), and so far they've canceled twice. The cancellations have both been an hour before the scheduled appointment, which completely throws off my day, as now I have to do the cleaning or let the house sit dirty for another week. To add insult to injury, Handy offered a refund but only gave $17 of the $50 payment back - the remainder was a $33 'credit'. Why would I want a credit for a service I'm never going to use again??
Absolutely terrible. The lady we got argued with us about the toll pass. Unfortunately she was right and so we had to buy a sun pass but it is cheaper to buy one outside of the car rental place than at the store itself. If you have AAA they are dirt cheap. However, if you prefer paying cash, they have lanes in Orlando for them, but your going to need coins for highway entry lanes.The bus driver was nice and helpful but was slow in picking us up from the airport and the store itself is at least 2 miles from the airport. AND THE WORST PART: my rental has an expired registration, EXPIRED. Luckily we caught this before a cop did so we will hopefully get this resolved. Overall I'd say avoid at all costs even if they have significantly cheaper cars.
Ordered a chicken salad sandwich that had a HUGE piece of gristle with fat and bone attached on about my second bite of lunch. Needless to say I lost interest thinking about what just ended up in my food and my mouth. Called to complain and inform since they might make this chicken salad in batches...guy who answered my call was apologetic and said he would send me a gift card as a goodwill gesture however I never received it... Just as well, not sure if I will eat there again, or at least not the chicken salad.
The House of Blues does a great job with stage lighting and sound; things look great if you are seeing it from the right angle. There are quite a few spots (especially on the second floor) where that might not be the case, but overall, a concert here is definitely decent, and if it's not, it's probably because of the act and not the venue.  The reason this rating is so low is because of their service and events. They can be super rude; they will yell at you to leave the venue at the end, and are not hesitant to kick you out into the cold. I once tripped on the sidewalk and had to convince them that I wasn't drunk; a friend of a friend once was wearing really high heels and tripped and wasn't allowed into the venue. These things are true at concerts; they just get worse at events. The coat check line gets even longer (it took my friend half an hour to get her coat, and I hid in a bathroom to avoid getting chucked out into 20 degree weather while I waited for her. They were yelling and banging on walls to get people out). They patted everyone down. The event started at 10; a bunch of people couldn't get in until 11 because the line moved so slowly (due to pat downs and double ID checks). The food provided was pretty meh. I just don't understand why they didn't prepare themselves for the number of people they knew were coming, and why they chose to do pat downs when they don't do that at concerts.
Holy smokes, I may have to move when my lease is up if this is what 21st has to offer!!  Everybody told me that Basta's had great Italian food and a cool atmosphere. Eek. I guess if you want five dollar plates of fried calamari and spaghetti and meatballs you're in luck, but I don't go out and get a $9 cocktail or glass of wine to eat from Chef boyardee. Service is very slow and neglectful. I have worked as a waitress so I am not a snob but I know how long it takes to do things if you want a good tip versus just resting on your 15%.  So that is how I sum up Basta's. It's a 15% place for a 20% girl.
usually, people's is great. helpful, friendly, and fast. but not this time. my vet called in a prescription for my sick kitty yesterday morning, and it won't be ready until 8pm tonight. granted, it is a medication that has to be compounded, but i really feel that taking 2 days to fill a prescription is kind of ridiculous. why in the world would it take well over 24 hours to make the medication? maybe they could've said something when the vet called about how long it would take so i could've chosen another pharmacy. i'm wishing i'd taken my business somewhere else.
Don't bother.  Go to the Tavern next door.  We were ignored at our table, the entrees & pizza were gross.  I was so excited to try this place b/c I liked Tavern so much, but was very disappointed.
Food is very average. They have  very few options served for the buffet and not worth for 15$.  Pani poori and bhatura are good. Interior decor is good except the Ganesha artwork  near the Bar area.   Definitely  not a place for authentic Indian food !
Tuesdays just happens to be all you can eat tapas for $18.00 coming across this deal when in need of dinner after a walk in Piedmont Park sounded like a good idea. After making a phone call about what was on the menu I was in. Let me start by saying it was a nice night sat out on the large deck there were enough fans going that you thought there was a nice breeze and a decent band playing inside. With that said I have never been one to "beat around the bush" and hate to waste money on things not worthy, so I will go so far to say "I have done the work for you."  Service was a bit jumpy in the beginning three different guys came to the all wanting to know if I'd been helped ? Several rounds of tapas were ordered what started out as interesting eventually went down hill for reasons listed below.   Mussels - The first order was tasty enough tender pieces of garlic, onions etc. were swimming in lots of broth. The second order was nothing like the first complete opposite in fact no seasoning, hardly any broth and the mussels tasted strange (?) after trying a couple & spitting them out they were pushed away.  Chicken Empanada - Plenty of meat with a touch cheese & topped with a roasted pepper sauce was average.  Pork Ribs with Balsamic Glaze - Requested that they go light on the sauce (which they did not) two in the order one being tender the other being very tough.   Sauteed Grouper Taco - Awful, the fish itself was pure mush one bite in = done. Whatever they cooked it with was dumped in to the flour tortilla and made it a soggy mess on one side and sent it away then went to wash my hands.   Marinated Chicken - Two per order on skewers is tasty the first time, still pink inside the second time and was taken away to be recooked it came out "well" the third time.  Beef Taco - Was good with tomatoes and cheese inside the meat was tender.   Calamari - I have to shake my head at this both orders were over cooked and inedible.   Stuffed Pablano Pepper - Came out looking like a 'hot mess" it was a split pepper topped with ground beef and melted cheese.  Ciabatta bread - Was to have a "rub of tomato & thyme." Presentation spread on  bread and could not figure out what it was supposed to taste like ?  I spoke to the server and the manager (both nice enough) about the inconsistencies and no answers could be given but was told that Luna "has been doing ayce tapas for two years" and I will say save your money it needs work.   I should have gone to Woody's......
I would go if it is an emergency and you do not have a local vet-I just moved here and have a tiny (6lb.) 10 year old maltese with severe digestive trouble. The vet staff were lovely-the vet himself rough and uncaring.  My little boy has never yelped at an injection -until this clinic- that was given so meanly-the shot site would not stop bleeding. I had brought cash for a donation but was not told until after the injection that the vet needed an additional $20 for administering the shot-thankfully I had the money with me. Only use this clinic as a last resort!
The hotel staff was friendly to me.  Another couple was waiting I guess for a while before anyone came out but I called back and they came out the other employee was rude back to the customer but still I had great service.  My only complaint is how dirty and the trash.  The room was clean and nice. They should keep papers plates and silverware stocked though since they have a full kitchen that way you don't have to go down to the lobby every time.  Also the trash outside to get in was ridiculous.  We had to move a box that was in the way and it was piled up so gross and the hallways looked like the floors weren't swept in awhile.
We have been here many times, mostly for happy hour. The last few times, we were disappointed in the quality of the food. We dropped by, with friends, the other night and it was awful. The service was delightful (a young English lady, was efficient, funny and quick) however. We always order the table side quac as it is always good and it still was fine.  The chips were stale though.  I ordered a chili relleno, it was awful. The pablano chili still had the skin on it and the filling and sauce was bland and tasteless. The calamari appetizer was cold and soggy. The fish taco's were 'fishy' and bland...no one enjoyed their food selection. If it wasn't for the good service, my rating would be one star. We won't be back.
I had a 7am appointment and was taken in promptly (which was a concern due to other Yelp reviews). It wasn't the best hair wash (minimal scalp massage) but it wasn't bad. I brought a picture of what I wanted my hair to look like, and the stylist did a pretty good job. The low rating is because the style didn't even last an hour - I had loose curls put in and by 8:15 it was limp and stringy looking. My hair is naturally curly and typically holds a curl well. Because of the product they put in, it looked very stringy and off when the curls fell out.
Came for the first time after hearing good things. Was very disappointed. Ordered food after being ignored for a little bit, restaurant was not busy at all. We were a party of 3; 2 of us ordered the chicken enchilada soup. After 45 minutes of waiting for 2 soups and an order of flautas, our waiter told us that there was no soup. Apparently the guy in the kitchen was new and didn't know what was going on. They compt us some guacamole. Also everything just took a long time. A really long time, for everything. To get our check, to get refills, to get drinks. Our waiter was apologetic, but overall a bad experience.
I was so saddened and disappointed that a place like PEM was engaged in exploiting live birds in their from Ear to Hear exhibit. These birds have been transferred to a larger cage, a room, and are refused their rights: right to sunshine, right to fly freely, right to fresh air, wind, insects, all the rights we would want for ourselves. All this for one reason: our entertainment! You should be ashamed. I hope others become aware of their plight and DO NOT SEE THIS "EXHIBIT".
the machines in the place work, so i mean i have to give it SOME credit. but i find this laundromat dirty, dingy and sketchy. not exactly where i want to be hanging out while my clothes wash. so many other options around, i opt for them before this place.
Raw meat hanging out in the hallway aside, this place really isn't worth the time checking out. I still haven't forgiven my brother for taking me here and saying its "awesome". Nothing food-wise stands out, and if you go on a day where its cold outside, be prepared to be choked out of the restaurant by the smoke on the grill out front. Its really, really awful. There are plenty of other great, inexpensive Chinese places in Vancouver where you won't risk dying of smoke inhalation (or from meat chillin' in a hallway by a mop.. yuck).
Dear Jimmy's: We live around the corner from you and so desperately want to love you.  We have given you two chances but alas you have failed miserably.  That being said, perhaps we were the fools for trying your mussels, baked salmon and chicken marsala instead of just going for burgers or pizza.  All were bland, really bland and not worth the $$$ we spent.  The waitstaff seem to be in training, which is fine as we all must start somewhere.  However, the wait for our appetizers was far too long even for a Memorial Day evening....45 minutes is a long time.  So long that we contemplated canceling our order and going next door to the Abbey, which we love.  But we really did want to give Jimmy's a second chance.  I'm sure your burgers and pizzas are probably good, pretty hard to mess that up.  Sadly, we probably will not return.
Not worth the price. I had a party of 9 and no one like the food! The food had no flavor order rotisserie chicken with yellow rice and beans, Cuban sandwich, roast pork  the yellow rice was hard.  I have had lots of Spanish food before and this by far is the worst. Even the southern style sweet tea was nasty!   The restrooms had no paper to dry your hands had to ask for napkins.
This place kicked out a woman BC she had a broken ankle?  I literally took a video of the whole thing! I'm so bothered by how they have treated that guest and I think there should be a list of liabilities at the door if your going to call cops to drag paying nice customers out...I'm ashamed and pm on making sure everyone knows about it...
I've gone into Cafe Yumm! several times since the location near me opened, and always ended up turning back after having a look at the options. Finally gave it a try today though! It ah... Exceeded my expectations for disappointment considerably. At least someone else was buying so I didn't waste my own money on this.
I've been spoiled by flying JetBlue for most of my flying needs, and the other airlines just can't compete.   Maybe I'm bitter about the extra $30 I had to shell out in order to check ONE bag.   Maybe I felt more squished that normal in my tiny seat with very little leg room (I'm 5'3 so...)  Maybe I felt like the crew was kinda bossy (they tell you when to de-plane, as in, they almost put a number on your forehead, regardless of where in the plane you are seated).  The terminal that they are in at Logan SUCKS big time. The monitors don't work, so you have no clue what gate you should go to... THEN, they like to change it up, so you have to keep checking to make sure you're at the right gate.   I see that my 2 stars is double the # of stars of others, but honestly? AA is qualitatively better than Spirit. Just barely.
Unfortunately, I was not able to try to food which i have heard was great. I went there with my friends this morning and was greeted very rudely by the hostess who was very dismissive and rude. I was appalled that they would have this girl working here with that type of attitude.  Customer service is everything and It made me leave the restaurant. Obviously when looking for a great restaurant, people want good food. However, most people always remember how they were treated and how the staff acted. I will definitely be passing this on to people I know.
Good food and location. I've always liked Hudson grille but the manager here is so rude and right off the bat a jerk, don't bother being calm and nice like we were. The hostesses and wait staff were much nicer than him.  Because of this I will not goto this location.
I am speaking about just the roswell shop. My friend and I were in the area so we decided to stop by.  I usually give glowing reports on the cake and chocolate pretzel here but I have to say the cupcakes I got were very good but the chocolate pretzels were rancid I plan on taking them back to the Decatur shop where I usually go and have had no problem. Not to mention the roswell shop looked like people had their own personal party out side their store with beer bottles not cleaned up and a bag of ice to boot.
Midtown needs a good Mexican restaurant and sadly there are none. This place is just awful. It's that typical "American" style Mexican food that so many unrefined palates think is so amazing.
Visited this location on a Saturday on January this year. We did not make reservation. We walked in and the receptionist told us it would be a 30 minutes wait. After we waited for an hour, we asked the same receptionist when we would have our table. She said she did not know ,but first let her take care of all the customers who had done reservation. We told her it was too cold here and  if they could adjust the Ac temperature higher. She told us for keeping the meat's quality, they had to keep the room temperature low....Funny, then you should build your restaurant into a big walk in cooer  for customers to sit in and you will be able to keep your meat under 41F to pass the health inspection..  hahaha...please consult with your local health department.  We didn't calculate how long we waited further, yet after a long wait, we finally were directed to the second roll of table to their open kitchen. it took another 20 minutes for the waiter to come here to explain us the green color and red color thing.. and another 10 more minutes for the waiter to offer us the chicken with bacon,the parmesan pork,   the salty sausage and the garlic something..the chicken with bacon and the parmesan pork , the salty sausage and the garlic something... : I told them please gave me some meat, the restaurant is called Churrasqueria  buffet ,which means all you can eat charcoal grilled steak. It seemed like they did not understand my English. They kept on offering me the mutton, which I have serious allergy with. I told them I wanted a piece of beef and that was it and if  after I had my beef, I would leave and  would not bother them anymore.  After another 10 minutes,the server gave me two small pieces of Rib-eye steak that tasted like a piece of chalk. When the manager passed by, I told him about my whole experience. He told me the server said I wanted well done beef and that was why it came out dry like that. I told him I am a food professional , the way they cook on a large  skewer, they could slice a piece from outer part of the meat and that will be well done.  And after that .the situation did not get better and they did not offer us anything anymore. I talked to the manager who looked like an Asian (actually ,they had two managers on duty, one was caucasian, the other one was Asian. The Asian look manager was the one walking around the tables and talked to clients. The Caucasian was standing by the POS,acting like he had nothing to do with all the problems of the operation.) I told him the service was poor and too slow. He said the restaurant was not like McDonald's,,,  Funny, if you compare your restaurant to McDonald's.. I don't know what to tell you. With the price we all paid for this meal ,we could buy 100 McDonald's burgers and played a burger war... I decided to leave the money and walk out...  The Caucasian manager saw us leaving in unhappy way, he pretent he was walking to the kitchen..  What kind of  chain restaurant is this, managers being lacking of food service knowledge, poorly trained cooks and servers, irresponsible management... too salty food, very slow service,stupid explanations from staffs and manager ,cheap meat combination in relation the price....supervisors and COO of this chain, you need to look at yourself seriously  or you will be down very soon...
i walked into hotel and was met by three employees at the front desk never heard "hello" " welcome" "how can i help you" ( i'm a black male ) instead i walked over to  employees who stood looking at me as if i were in the wrong hotel or place , ( put a bad taste in mouth immediately)  when you work in hospitality greetings guest is basic 101 of customer service!!!!!  the room itself i had no issue with  clean  clean sheets towels etc  nice setup love the shower    breakfast was okay get downstairs before 730!!!!!  i have 11 days left at this hotel so hopefully before i leave my review will change    i'm excited to be going to disney so that trumps everything
Went in expecting to be wow'd. Nothing special at all. I could have done made this (butcher chop, fries and cap'n crunch shake) at home just as well, and I am NOT a chef by any means. Burger was cooked longer than i asked for and was very small. Curious what the Krispy Kreme shake tastes like but will never return to find out. Food was edible and didn't make me ill, so I'll give it 1 additional star for that   Planning on trying vortex someday.
I experienced an overall lack of quality with this dining experience.    First off,  the actual meal I had intended to eat ended up costing me five dollars over the twenty dollar Groupon value.  It doesn't do me much good to buy a Groupon when it won't cover a meal to begin with.    Their website did not list the sizes of their sirloin steaks by ounces.  I had to talk to the manager (Geoffrey) in order to get him to update his site.  I would think any customer-oriented business would want their potential clientele to know what they are ordering to avoid any issues down the line.   The largest sirloin they offer is 10 ounces, which is fine for most people but rather small for those of us who are used to eating 12-16 ounce sirloins regularly.  Most steakhouses offer large steaks.  I was rather disappointed  to find out that Texas Steak Out did not.    I had to negotiate over the phone with the owner to get what I wanted and even with that, I still paid $5 more than the value of the Groupon!  I ordered a sixteen ounce sirloin steak meal.  They allowed me to sub out the salad/baked potato/roll for grilled asparagus and onion rings.    Sirloins are lean cuts of meat and that has been my experience whether dining out or buying meat at a deli.  Naturally, when this steak came out, I was shocked to see a slab of fat on the side which probably weighed about four to six ounces itself.  When I finished cutting away the fat, there might have been eight to ten ounces of actual meat there.  I gave my feedback to the manager on duty (Marlon) and he refused to serve a new steak nor refund the purchase price.  To summarize:  The taste of the steak was fine and the sides were adequate; it was the value for the cost of the meal that was lacking, as well as the quality of the cut of meat that is in question.  This steak was roadhouse dive quality.  You would not see this type of cut at a butcher or grocery store.    The worst part of this experience was the ineptitude of management and ultimately, the owner (Geoffrey).  They knew I was using a Groupon, knew I was trying their product for the first time, and STILL could not deliver on the promise of a good impression.  The meal I had would have cost $25 without the Groupon, and quite frankly, it was wasn't even worth half of that (value-wise).  Lower your expectations if you are going to try this place, or better yet...grill your own steak at home for about one fourth of the cost.  I am amazed they are still in business.
We have 82 people in our company and nobody eats here. Now I know why.   Prices are high for a substandard experience. Had the honey mustard turkey wrap and it had lettuce, tomato and turkey. That's it. Very bland and unexciting. I don't know what people are getting that is promoting them to rate 3 and 4 stars. Maybe they know what to order and I don't? This is my first and last visit
im from sourthern california. this is NOT boba (the tapioca)!!! its waaaay overcooked, and the tea tastes...bland/lack of taste/whatever :/   no bueno! :( i dont get why it has such high rating...
not recommended!   it's continued to go downhill.   some of us, not so young anymore, remember when it was simply Multnomah Fountain for kids after school.  Multnomah School was in operation from 1908 - 1979 and tho the stores of the village were out of bounds during school hours, many went there after school. Cherry-flavored cokes were the thing here.
Horribe horrible customer service--insulting and rude.  I had a valid gift card that they were unable to process due to a problem THEY were having with their scanner....  None of the in-store staff, including the manger, were willing to work with me to rectify the problem. I requested a credit for the ham pending the repair of their equipment. The manager literally laughed in my face--in front of my kids and other patrons.  I reported the issue with the corporate office, filled out all the necessary forms, but was never contacted by anyone--even though it clearly stated that someone would be following-up.    Just a horrible experience from top to bottom. The only reason Im giving 2 stars is because their product is good.....  Bah Humbug!
We live in the neighborhood and have been to Barcelona many times. We put our name in for a table on a Friday at 6pm and  it is now 8:45 and we have yet to be called for our table. Unfortunately this is indicative of other similar issues at the restaurant due to terrible management. It's a shame, the food is good and creative, but the odds of having a bad experience is high whether that be waiting for a table for 2:45 minutes or waiting to be served for 40 minitues. Beware, it's not worth it
They went with a Chinese theme and menu for New Year's Eve and I really wish they didn't. Not only is it overpriced for Asian food but they did a poor job. I came here after being upset with another restaurant for changing their regular menu for nye.   I ordered:  Green tea soba noodle - it had veggies, cucumbers, peppers, and a lot of oil. Massive amounts of oil. The soba noodles weren't even separated; there were huge chucks on the bottom and some couldn't even be broken apart.  Stir fried tofu - I'm assuming it was soaked in wine. It came with bok choi and  white rice. The tofu had sesame seeds on it and it as a slice. Just one slice. For the price I paid it is not worth it. They jacked up the prices which I'm totally fine with but only if the food was good.
First off, who brings food 10 mins apart from one another without letting a customer know. My significant other received his food before I did which was fine, I get it things happen. But it took more than 10 minutes until I was fed up with waiting. It wasn't even that busy. I mean I wouldn't have minded it not being there for a couple minutes but more then 10 without communication was unexceptional. This is what I hate about going to restaurants with  a language barrier. No communication to non-Vietnamese people. I would rather go to pho hung or pho van down the street. This used to be my favorite pho place, now I can tell you I won't be coming back and bringing people with me.
I had high hopes for this joint because it had good street word of mouth. But then again, so doesn't crack.  The trouble began when the order was over an hour late the quoted Foodler time. Strike 1. Next, the food of course was cold. Strike 2. And Strike 3: the food was gross.  If you've never eaten here...then continue that trend. If for whatever reason you jock this place, well good luck to you and happy crappy food.
I was completely unimpressed with B1 and will not be shopping there again. I am new to cycling and was looking to make my first large bike purchase on a road bike. I had done my research and new I wanted to purchase a Scott. B1 is one of the only Scott dealers in Columbus, which is what led me to their store.  However, when they did not have the bike I wanted in stock, they said they could order it for me and confirmed with Scott that the bike could be shipped and ready within the week. When I had not heard from their store within the week, I called their store. The employee who answered the phone did not know where my bike was so he set the phone down (I could still hear what he was saying) when he responded to the employee he asked the question to I specifically heard him say "Well, I will just tell her it is back ordered."   This makes me think they FORGOT to order my bicycle which they said would be in within the week and then I heard them LIE to me about it. I later received my bike two and half weeks after expected.  I would not recommend this store to any of my friends and would recommend that anyone else looking for a bike shop search elsewhere.
Not impressed. Got a combination dinner, none of the items were good and the spring rolls tasted like chemical cleaner.
ZERO STARS. i placed an order for delivery that they said would take half an hour.... and they just never showed up.   NEVER AGAIN
I thought we had stumbled on some kind of old-time gem based on all the newsclippings inside the entrance.  Boy was I wrong.  It was like a mall restaurant's Greek food.  I am wondering if we hit it on an off night?
Went here tonight for my brother-in-law's birthday. Service was okay except for our waitress forgetting my nephew's food so we had to ask for it. The food was not very good though. I had the lobster and crab dip appetizer. I didn't really like the taste and the sweet peppers on top didn't go with the dish. The clam chowder was thick and just tasted like flour. Very tasteless and hardly any clam. I also had the bleu cheese balsamic salad which was good but nothing great. Overall the food was disappointing and I think we were all shocked to realize that Beaches doesn't do anything special for someone's birthday. He just got a fake lei on his neck. I've never been to a restaurant that doesn't sing happy birthday or have a dessert for the birthday boy. So strange. I wouldn't go back.
This is review is for their delivery service. I ordered food via GrubHub and I'm waiting for the last 1 Hr 30 Mins. No food yet and I am told it takes another 30 mins. Never had such problems with other Indian restaurants. Thats very bad!! Will never order again from these guys :(
I usually go to the PF CHangs in Boston but I went to the one in Natick with a friend. The service was horrible. The waiter we had didn't come at all to serve any water. They took forever to take the order. Once we were finished eating we had to wait half an hour before anyone came to see if we were all set. Than we told them to bring the check and they did. Than it took them another 20 minutes to come back to take our credit card so we could leave. THEY ARE HORRIBLE!!! What makes it worse is that restaurant was completely empty there was only one other table there... SO I don't understand why this kind of service????
If it was possible I would give this place negative stars.  I moved  to the area 6 months ago and every medication I have was transferred to this incompetent pharmacy.  When it's time to pick up the  wait line is a minimum of 20 minutes just to find out they misbilled my insurance and are charging full price, with a "sorry" from the med tech, which then requires I either come back the next day or wait another hour so they can re bill.    Don't waist your time.  Drive a few extra minutes because I'm sure other pharmacies in the area are not as incompetent as this one.
I haven't been to Brown's in a really long time. I went to have the potato crusted halibut bowl, but it's no longer served with halibut, and instead it's served with cod. I don't eat cod, so I was disappointed! I guess the halibut is too pricey for them to serve.. The service was okay.
Bottom line: you MUST update your business hours on places like Yelp! if you are going to be closed for months through the winter.  My husband and I decided to take our dog and go for a walk to Vintage Custard last weekend (an unseasonably warm January day). We checked the business hours before we walked the three miles to get to a dark, empty building.   Unfortunate, because my husband has had their custard and I was looking forward to trying it.  Bonus star for the good conversation that we had on our walk.
Just a note: A hot pepper ClipArt next to an entree generally denotes that a dish is going to be spicy.  So, when bf and I ordered one "Hot" item and one non-hot item, we weren't expecting Bland and Blander.  We were both hungry, so the Bland plate got eaten, as it was the lesser of two evils.  This place was vacant, so it was a nice quiet spot, but now I know why: bad food.  Also, they don't have free refills on Cokes. :(  Shoulda gone to the Thai place next door.
Had an emergency hot water heater relocation I needed done.  They were able to come out the same day and move it and replace some valves.  The 2 that came out were friendly enough and just focused on the job and were able to work around the other construction going on. Only reason for 3 stars is the super high price compared to other quotes but they were the only ones able to get out in the time frame I had available.  Down grading to 1 star for now, apparently permits were not pulled and when inspector came out to check off the job the water heater was moved for he found there was nothing filed and slapped a stop all work sticker on the job. Waiting to see how this is going to be handled
Food is so-so for Mexican...  What's beyond unfathomable comprehension is the non existent skill level of all the bartenders. I work at a place that does at least 5x the business as here nightly, with that said...10 minutes to greet a group sitting at the bar when you have 3 bartenders, minimal tickets, and not even a full bar is downright absurd ESPECIALLY in Boston. Then after being greeted with an attitude, another 8 minutes for drinks. Then after first round was done another 10 minutes to even take orders for the next. So on and so forth you get the idea.   First bad review I've ever written. It's that deserving. Tip for management...fire your entire bar staff last night and start from scratch. You'll make more money.
The service is touch-and-go and the food is consistently bland & boring.  The first occasion I went to the bar inside.  The bar floor was sticky & 'kritched' everytime I took a step.  It was worse than the stereotyped floors of Peep Shows, etc.  I asked (VERY politely) about the house draft.  The answer I got was 'look buddy its just a light beer, OK?'.  Jeesh!  What a way to guarantee yourself no more than 15% tip, and left on a credit card to boot in lieu of actual CASH!   The stickly floor & snappy answer all happened before I even got a menu to open up and read.  The food was bland as if it was done intentionally.  NO chances here, folks.   I really had no intentions of ever going again and this would've been a one-star review if it were not for a non-profit fundraising event a local hospital was running at Brookhaven station.  Hudson Grille, Mellow Mushroom & Pub 71 all share a common patio area at Brookhaven station that each establishment marks off with movable gates, etc.  For the fundraiser, all three establishments removed the gates so folks could easily mingle between the locations & make for a fun outdoor party.  I sat over on Hudson Grille's outdoor patio & ordered a meatball sub.  The food was, once again, typically uninspired Hudson-Grille bland but the service & bartender was top-notch this time around.  As such, I bumped them up to 2 stars from 1 star.
Sitting here eating my house special pho and shrimp + pork salad rolls..... the broth is below average. Weak in taste definitely nothing extroardinary. Instead of bringing me a tray full of additional spices to add the guy brought me only 2 things. Sriracha and Hoison Sauce. I'm just wondering why i didnt get the full service sauce rack. Near tasteless meal indeed.
Worst drive thru experience every time I come here. The staff always takes forever to make the drinks and this time I went thinking it would be different but the man making my drink has it in his hands waving it around talking to all his other co workers and not giving me my drink. I dislike coming here because it always takes forever. Not coming here again.
Got a great deal from a discount site, but would have been VERY angry if I had to pay full price.  Rooms are dated and loud.  Plumbing and halls as well as neighbors in next rooms could be heard at all hours.  Beds not very comfortable and NO WI-FI offered in rooms!!!???  It's across the street from a convention center and it's 2011!  Ridiculous!    Reds Deli is open 24 hours and has a great selection of food, snacks and sundries.  It's the best feature of the hotel.  89Forty Offers some interesting items and is good enough.  Don't bother with Banshoo Sushi. What a let down.  Items look great on paper (menu) but completely fail to impress in presentation and taste.  gaugin is mediocre at best.  Didn't try Everglades but menu looks like a winner.  Staff is mostly friendly and helpful.    Would not return unless a major remodel takes place and if they were to  offer WI-FI in rooms.  It's 2011 people!
Full of pre-pubescent, buck nasty first year UBC students. Might I add, don't order a double Long Island if you don't want a glass of straight alcohol. The restrooms are less than sanitary, and the establishment is full of scrubs. A scrub is a man that can't get no love from me, hangin out the passenger side of his best friend ride, tryin to holla at me.
Yeah, there's nothing special about this place.  I've gotten dragged there a few times, and it pretty much sucks.  Food is eh and the service really is like they're walking through mud all the time.  Believe me, I have no desire to go back.  It's even more dismal as a night spot.
Worst Dominos. Over a  two an a half hour wait no pizza and all they did was laugh about the order while on hold.
Really not a very good thai place but with the entertainment book coupon, this was a pretty good deal. We came at lunch so we ordered two entrees off the main menu as well as al lunch special. The pad thai was made with thick noodles and was really really sweet. It had way too thick of a sauce and although had some prawns, the proportion of noodles to other ingredients was way off. The chicken stir fry with thai black bean sauce was again, sugary sweet and extremely oily. Because of the coupon, this was an okay deal but it was no different from chinese style stir fry. Finally, the red curry with prawns in a young coconut was the best of the bunch. It was extremely coconutty and was very flavourful. For around 12 dollars, this was also a good lunch deal!   Overall, i wouldn't return without a coupon and even then, everything is sugar loaded so be prepared.
One of those hipster places that everyone thinks is way better than it is. First experience the guy making my sandwich had a piece of meat with his fingers and then continued to make mine. I said can you please wash your hands after touching your mouth and make new one. I ate it and was fine but nothing special.
Decided to try a new place. Maybe its late, not sure, but, staff is not on point. Food -cold. Staff not understanding that when your food is not hot people will voice their opinion. Fix it and make us happy. Experience might be better if they had some Prosecco to go with my meal. How do you run out drinks? Dann...I even gave the waitress a tip. No bueno.
The food was lousy, sausage patties are dry the pancakes are flat and for the first time ever at an IHOP I did not finish anything. Not to speak about the slow slow slow cooks.. I will not be back for along time and will hope for a management change or staff turn over.   And I loved IHOP till today! Sad!
I usually buy my oils, chemicals here. But recently i had them change a tube for me. they didn't tighten the rim lock down, so after riding, the tube spun around, and i had to put a new tube in at the track... I'll never make that mistake again
A run-down shack where you have to go to two separate bars to get your $6+tip drink. If you want to donate to charity, just donate directly to them! There's a concept.
I wanted to like this Petro-Canada, but when I paid with my gift card at the cashier for 20 dollars of gas, I got only 19.50 cents worth of gas. The receipt said only 20 dollars of gas and my tank wasn't even half full. Think twice before you get gas at this station!!!  On another note, they serve fresh pizzas and hot dogs.
Medium wings had no flavor and made me sick.  The only reason they get 2 stars is for their good beer selection.  Once it gets later in the day they apparently start charging pint prices for lousy plastic cups that aren't a pint.
Well just checked in here and I can't say I'm too pleased.   I should have known when they told me they'd waive my valet fee there was something up with this room.   I was told it was just one queen bed when in reality it was a freaking cot.  Same mattress my ass.  I have two stars because they did at least change my room.  But not before the receptionist made sure to tell me it was the same mattress again..  LAST time I book from hotel tonight that's for sure.   If they ask you to take the room with one queen, trust me, say no thank you.
Great location unless you stop on your way to work. You will wait until they decide they are ready to open! This is just reviewing the Amazon locker location. I wouldn't shop this time of morning, but it would sure be nice if I could have picked up my package
Go somewhere else if you can, try Bernardi on RT9 maybe. This place will sell you a car for a higher price than others, and when you go back to lets say sell it or trade it in, they value it lower than others. Don't really know how to deal with customers I think, it took me 15 mins just to get somebody to assist me.
If i could this place would get a -5star, just cuz they have rare fish dont give them shit to be rude and the simple fact that they sold a fish to me with a bad heater burn wouldnt own up to it and eventually when they did own up to it gave me a coupon to use and in my email stated can be used in conjunction with their sale they wouldnt honor it even with email proof and then their owner had the audacity to come to me personally in the store to kick me out and say they didnt want my business after i spend hundreds of $$$ here previously just because i called her out on their mistakes that right that is customer at its finest woot karmas a bitch and hope this store eventuallt falls and burns due to its ungrateful rude owner
Unfortunately, I used to live in this craphole.  The regular apartments are okay size-wise, but in very poor shape.  Going condo will hopefully bring improvements.  One word of advise...stay away from the studio apartments.  Don't rent one, don't even visit a friend who lives in one.  This place is a magnet for bums and crackheads.  This is the reason I moved out!  With the huge price increase on the studios and the rest of the place going  condo, I'm sure there will be improvements in both the complex and residents, but in the meantime--stay away!
Overhyped for the price. I thought this would be a special place for the wife and my anniversary. I was right about the romantic atmosphere at least but the rest, not so much.   We started with the onion rings which might have been our favorite part of the meal. I really liked all four sauces they came with. The steak was good and tender but needs a serious seasoning addition. My wife didn't like any of the sides, and I thought most of them were below average. The lobster mac was very bland and I ended up picking out the lobster pieces to eat and leaving the rest. I liked the asparagus but I think I got maybe 6 stalks in total. The wine list was impressive but most were out of my price range. I settled for a mediocre bottle of chardonnay that tasted like could have been had for a few bucks at a grocery.  Dessert was pretty good creme brulee but nothing to write home about. I'll take the creme brulee at Figlio any day. Also they got our order wrong the first time and brought my wife an incorrect side. For two people, the bill came to about 100 bucks which we both felt bad for spending given the quality. Will not return.
Random Breakfast in Coquitlam Review.  I'm not a fan of Copa. I haven't been a fan since the first time I've been here almost 3 years ago and I still don't like them now. The decor is nice, the parking is convenient, and the location of an hk style cafe around this part of town is nice; however, thats all the positive things I have to say.   I'm probably nitpicking quite a bit here, but I have a huge issue with services when dining in any Asian Cafe. I'm not a fancy diner, so I'm not expecting to be treated like royalty, but does it hurt to maybe put on a smile at 8 in the morning? Or simply just maybe pay a little more attention when you're taking orders or bringing out food? The waiters working there that morning just didn't seem to care. While we're ordering, they'll look at some other table while scribbling down our orders and reply with "mhmm". When we asked for 2 bowls to share they took 5 minutes and brought us 1. When we asked if item X can be combined with item Y on the menu they just told us you can do whatever is written on the menu.. All that just feels a little rude to me.   The food itself was alright.. I mean... how badly can you screw up eggs, sausages and noodles? So don't have much to say about that. It's a pity there isn't any other Chinese cafes around this area and Copa is the only restaurant for HK cafe style food around here because that is also an excuse for them to charge the prices they charge..
The beef shawarma was pretty dry. Felt like eating rubber. Flavors were decent. Cook needs to take grilling leasons.
Do not use this one. They treat customers terribly and the groupon is only good for 10 and 11. Did not show on groupon but did on their website in a shady way. This type of business practice is unacceptable and if I had known they would play the bait and switch game I would have gone elsewhere.
Mexi-Spanglish?Needs some cultural focus. tequila and tacos...?tequila selection inflated with novelty brands,waitress uninformed,didn't know what sotol was,grapefruit juice tasted like a sunny d mix.fried tapas dry and overcooked,pork tacos bland puerco.corn pepper mix was quite tasty.staff was overall nice and helpful.oh yeah,the music selection was pretty random and w/o connection to eatery theme
Ok, yes, I've only ever been to one other Panera, but this one just doesn't equate to the one back home.  It's possible that the other one was a fluke of a well-oiled machine.  I'll be generous and start with the good: - The staff is friendly, helpful and seems to be well-trained. - I can get a fountain drink & cup of soup and read for an hour or two.  (This is really the only reason I'll return). - The buzzers are really nice when you're having to spend so much time looking for a table.  The bad: - Crowded, crowded, crowded.  And this place isn't small.  I've been in a few times, different days of the week, different times of day, and have had to wait for someone to vacate a table each time. - Probably due to the heavy traffic they get, nothing seems to be all that clean.  Counters, tables, bathroom...all seem to be getting dirtied faster than they can keep up with it.  Nothing disgusting, just crumbs, dirty floors, etc. - The music I'm used to Panera having is low-volume classical.  Non-intrusive and calming...perfect for reading/studying.  The music at this one varies from crossover-classical to pop to easy listening, and is more at a medium level.  Just intrusive enough to be annoying.  I know this is a little picky, but I'm a musician and am probably more sensitive to this than most people.  It's Panera.  Generally good food, but overpriced for what it is (though one of the cheaper options in the area).  A big part of their appeal comes from the atmosphere of the place, and that's what fails here.  Though to be fair, it's not totally their fault: single people studying - stop taking up 4-tops!  Do you not see how this adds to the crowding?  When someone vacates a 2-top, move to it.  Or move to that big communal table in the middle of the upstairs dining room.  It's just common sense and common courtesy.
This review is strictly in regards to Soccer.  Last year I signed my 3 year old up for soccer, and it was cute to watch the young kids play, but if you get on a team that has a coach, consider yourself lucky.  We had no coach for a while, which appeared to be the case for several of the teams as many parents could not volunteer to be a coach.  Finally, one parent became our coach and did a decent job considering he had no prior experience coaching.  I didn't plan on returning however since my daughters friends were joining this year, i decided to put her in again.  I registered and paid the steep 200 dollars being a non member.  Practices have started and my check has been cashed and i have not received a single call or email in regards to what team my daughter will be playing on.  She has already missed her first practice and most likely her first game that should have been tomorrow.  A total of 4 phone calls and 3 e-mails in one week later and I have STILL not heard back from them.  At this point, I have finally contacted the soccer coach's supervisor and am hoping to hear soon and get a refund.  NEVER AGAIN.  There is Rush soccer, the winter garden league, and striker soccer, all of which i have heard have a far better reputation than this particular Y.  I have had friends that have had similar issues with this Y.
Fly in my Frosé! Actually there's one in our Moovin Cab as well. Yes they're probably just fruit flies and yes it is still summer we totally get that, but we were sitting indoors in the lounge and not on a patio or anything. We brought it to our server's attention and she swiftly changed the drinks, but later we were double-charged for them on the bill. Of course she corrected the problem when we pointed it out, but honestly we very rarely encounter this type of 'error'. We still like Cactus Club as a whole, hence the two instead of one star, but it's quite doubtful we'll return to this particular location.
Terrible online customer service!!!! I was looking for a new used truck and they had the one I wanted. I applied for credit by clicking the button right next to the picture of the truck I wanted, I filled out the credit report and submitted it. They called back from their CA call center with terrible terms from their in-house finance department. With $1000 down financing $17273 at 72 months they had me at 13.45% APR, Terrible!!!! My credit score is 705 I should get better then that! That's credit card interest rates!!! Then they tell me that was just a general pull on my credit and NOT vehicle specific!!!! And that they would have to pull my credit again against the specific vehicle I wanted to see if it improves my APR lending rates. Wait a minute? I clicked the button right next to the picture/vin/stock number of the vehicle I wanted.... They need to at least have a disclaimer notifying you that the credit pull is NOT vehicle specific!!!! I thought it was since the button was next to the vehicle I wanted!!! Buyer be warned! Then they ask what I'm going to do with the vehicle and who will be driving it (as if it's any of their business) I tell them the truth that it will be myself and my partner, then they say that he will have to be on the loan too. WTF? He's already on my car insurance policy and he's not on my other car loan! How does this make any F*#kin sense??? CarMax sucks!!! Don't buy from them!
Pretty pricey for same ole gyros nothing to crazy but pretty decent food. Using Their location to justify their prices. Customer service and personable attitudes are lacking personality and friendlyness. Wont be coming back thier "broasted" potatoes are greasy and stale the prices are outrageous the portions were minute. Aside from the decor I enjoyed nothing about my experience here. I certainly hope they change their act very soon. My recomendations gor to pita pit!!
Don`t you just shake your head at yourself when the office is thinking of ordering lunch from a place you`ve never tried, so you decline, then right at the last minute, you change your mind and order something anyway.  I decided to order the shrimp basket.  Its described on the menu a lightly dusted and you can pay an additional 50 cents or so to have them dipped in buffalo sauce.  What I received was a heavily breaded "something" with tails on the end and dipped in so much buffalo sauce, if I could have drained it off, I'd have enough sauce for a 20 piece wing.   The basket comes with fries and of course when you have fries delivered, you expect them to be somewhat weak due to transport and sweating in the container until they arrive to you.  These fries had to be a week old and why they were brown I still don`t understand.  I called the restaurant back and asked them to refund me my money since what I`d received was not what was described on the menu and actually couldn`t be eaten due to being cold and really was just deep fried breading.  I even offered one of the shrimp to a co-worker just to make sure I wasn`t being over the top and the first thing he said was, you need to call them and get your money back.  I called back the same afternoon we ordered and was told the manager was gone for the day.    3 in the afternoon and the manager is gone for the day????  Called back the second day and was told he was too busy to speak with me, so I ended up disputing the charge with Bank of America.
The food is still good and some of the best grilled salmon I have had in Austin.  It used to be good all around, i.e. service, atmosphere and food.  They renovated, (not so great, the fish tank I loved is gone) changed the name (whatever, FD's now) and the staff turned over (that's where the problems start).  Saylavi good service. The last time we went in the service sucked and before that it was awesome.  The staff are much younger and lack experience.  We arrived and sat down and we waited for a waiter when one didn't come we had to get up and go ask for a waiter, we had to wait on the waiter, we had to ask for water refills, we had to ask to have the plates taken away and then ask for the bill.  We just got blank stares the whole time.
Prepare to wait almost an hour for your food and a very loud atmosphere. Service wasnt good but the food is amazing! (Unless your on a diet)
I wanted to like this spot, I really did. The only problem is that everyone ignores you when you come in. As I came alone, the hosted did not give me an option to sit at the many available tables (this should've been my first clue) but instead directed me (without a smile) to sit at the bar or a high top. The problem is I don't drink alcohol but came instead for the seafood.  The name was kind of quirky so it caught my attention. Anyway after being seated at a hightop I sat for quite some time and no one ever came to wait on me. Finally a waitress at the bar noticed I was there and asked if I wanted to see a menu. I responded that I would love that. She put a menu on the bar, even though I was sitting 8 feet away, and just left it there.  That was the last of my interaction with the wait staff. Eventually I just walked out. I can't help but wonder how many others have had the same experience.
Down grading my previous review for  three reasons:  1) waiting for a table and there are no less than 5 empty tables and they have been empty for 15 minutes. This has happened before so not an odd occurrence   2) Trying watch a playoff game on their one TV. Turns out they do not get ESPN. Further, they only get over the air channels--meaning they do not even get NBC--the channel carrying the game tonight. Pitiful. Just pitiful. It's 2015. Rabbit ears went out a couple decades ago.   3) Last two times here have had to send pizza back because they were cold.
No Standards! We should have known when we walked in the door and several employees were standing around the host stand chatting, one of them holding a bus tub under his arm resting on his hip. Later I noticed several employees chewing gum (bubble gum) including the coat wearing hostess. Now for the food, we had breakfast, the plates arrived with big piles of hash browns that looked great, unfortunately other than the crunchy top layer the potatoes underneath were not cooked. The eggs were cold and the toast was lightly browned stale bread. The coffee came in a dirty cup and once I got a new clean cup the coffee wasn't good! I read in the restaurant that the "original Metro" was on Diners Drive Ins and Dives but they have not successfully translated that formula in the expansion to new markets. DON'T GO!!!
It will cost you a $100 for 2 people unless you drink then it would be even more, and you will leave hungry Mark my words
Do NOT book with this unprofessional company. Firstly, this company advertises that it is open on Saturdays. Not true. I bought a Living Social deal and called in April to book. I bought the deal because i wanted to get my home cleaned on a weekend, but when I called to schedule my appointment, the owner said that they only clean during the week. We scheduled for about 6 weeks out and she asked that I text her a reminder with the date and my address. A little shady, but ok. And I am glad I did because I have a record of it. She was supposed to be at my home by 7:45, so when no one had arrived or called by then, I called. She rudely told me that she would have to come tomorrow because she had 2 other houses to clean today. I explained that I had taken the entire day off and had texted her the reminder that she requested (and that I still had a copy). She hung up on my without apologizing. I assumed that we had been cut off so I called back. And she answered, said "don't bother calling again, I ain't coming" and hung up again. Wow. Mistakes happen- although, again, I have the text message that I sent her- but way to compound it.
I have a 9 AM appointment for my toddler son on December 16. It's one of these subzero mornings. I arrived at about five after and not only was the business still closed, there was also another person waiting who had a 9 AM interview aith this business. I finally left about 9:15 and went to another hairstylist.  They're advertised hours of business started 9 AM on Saturdays. I would assume that someone would actually physically be on the premises no later than quarter 'till.  Unfortunately, this was a bit of a prospecting run since this was the closest hair place to my home. In the future, as I take my son to get haircuts, I will more than likely just go back to the place where I ultimately found myself.
I stopped here with my 3 kids after a long day of doctor appointments. I've been here many times before and almost every time ordering is painful through the drive through do to the language barrier. We decided to dine-in tonight. To start off no greeting from the cashier, just an annoyed look on her face. I decided to order simple and slowly, so there would be no mess ups.. oddly at the end of my order the final price kept changing from $18 to $15 to $16. I kindly asked her to repeat my order back to me and she kept saying "$80". She didn't understand. I asked 2 more employees to repeat the order and no one understood. Finally I turned the screen around to see I was being charged for food I didn't even order!! The two woman continued to talk about me in Spanish calling me a "pathetic American" I will be contacting the DM.
After reading the reviews I was hesitant about visiting this location but I've had an enjoyable experience at other hooters locations I've eaten at so decided to go against my better judgement and check this one out...I should have stayed away!! The food was pretty good but the service is bad and the ambiance is awful. These ladies seriously need to take the chip of their shoulders and develop some personality. This is the only location I've visited where the staff acts as if they're doing you a favor...get over yourselves your serving beer and chicken wings not diamonds and pearls. The next time I visit a hooters it will be in SoFla where the hooters girls are gorgeous and the beer is cold.
Oh, Yelp, the rare instance i wish there was less than 1 star ratings....We went because we have had great experiences at the Charles Hill outpost of Figs and we had a $40 groupon.  (Note: it's VERY hard to spend $40 for two at Figs).  This place has TERRIBLE. SERVICE.  It's obvious no one here gives a cr@p about the customers experience (as evidenced by my partner's email to them that was never replied to.)  After confusion about seating us (they thought we were waiting to pickup a takeout order, despite JUST having said they'd seat us soon -- sorry, i confused them by using the bathroom, i guess), we had to pipe up before they sat a party that came in after us.   When we sat down, the table to my left was finished and waiting for their bill. They waited for their bill until after our entrees came.  It took about 30 minutes for they to pay!  The table on my right just never got their pizza. It was  comped pizza after it never came out. They brought the little hoopy thing to put the pizza on, but never brought out their pizza.  We had the huge calamari platter and a half-and-half pizza combo, It was so undercooked and bland, that i honestly have no idea what i ate. Plates were not cleared, water was not refilled, we had to ask for things over and over.  When we wanted our remaining food boxed up, we had wait a half-hour to get anyone's attention.  Getting our bill was another wait.  And a pet peeve of mine:  Having to hand severs plates when they clear up, and take them from them when they serve. Your ONLY job is to take my order and bring me that order. Is it too much to ask to have you put it down for me as well?  For i think the 2nd time in my life EVER, we didn't leave a tip. Not only was our service lousy, but every table around us was too.  On top of everything else, the place is dark, loud, and crowded. It was utterly unpleasant all around.
Had a lot of Indian food in my day, and this place was not at the bottom.  That said, Vancouver is almost legendary for Indian food, so don't settle for less than a 4 star place when you're here.  Price was fair (I think we paid $16) for a couple of lunch buffets.  Food was underspiced, and naan was undercooked.  Bartender wasn't there at lunch, so no martini, which also irked me.
Wow these people should really remove the word hospitality from their name. We went at around 8pm and the place was empty aside from two tables. A total of 3 customers so by no stretch were they too busy but the hostess practically ignored us the entire time. From the moment she laid eyes on us, it was like we had robbed her in the past or something. I don't know if she doesn't like kids in her restaurants or what. Or she has beef with Muslims (I wear a scarf). I don't know. But I've never eaten at a restaurant in more discomfort. I asked her what she recommends from the menu and she says everything is good. Really? Then during the meal she never once asked us if we needed anything.  The food itself was just ok too. I didn't like there were no carbs with either the lamb or beef we got. I felt like I had beef soup for dinner. She could've informed us that perhaps we'd like bread or rice or something. I hope the owner reads this and cares about fixing the crappy service we got.
Probably the worst liquor store I've been to- both in terms of selection and service.
IMT: In Moment of Terror! That's what it really is, I swear.  This is the worst apartment I have ever lived in. I still regret that awful day when I made the decision to live here. I have lived in older apartments that are way cleaner than this. Trust me, go for expensive ones (look around), or cheaper ones, but certainly not this one. Hygiene and cleanliness are absolutely no focus here.  Full of insects.  Go to the swimming pool, and you'll find yourself swimming with insect.  Open your closets, cabinets in the apartment and you'll be welcomed by all different kinds of insects.  Thinking of relaxing in your tub? Well, stop, take a look, you'll find an insect already waiting for you there. This is nothing. You want a cup of tea. You go to your kitchen, open sugar container, and right when you are about to put a spoonful of it into your tea, you are shocked to see yet another insect. Least expected, right! But nothing bad is UNexpected at IMT. Basically, your apartment is more a home to all those insects than to yourself. Forget about getting back home tired and changing your clothes and just putting them to fold them for later. 'cause you never know when you'll see something under your sleeve.  Another frustrating thing. If you are one of those people who choose to do laundry in the building, make sure to have ample stock of quarters. No dimes, no cents, no dollars, just quarters. Only then, it's gonna work. Dryer doesn't dry your clothes completely. So you might have to run it again or have your clothes all spread out to dry them naturally.
Writing this review pains me because I'd rather be writing something positive about a fellow compatriot's business. However, I'll begin by saying that this was not my first visit to Sofritos. I believe I've been here about 3 or 4 times and I can't really say that I had a bad experience and the food was pretty good.   All was fine until this past Sunday where I came in and ordered tequenos, a cachito and a loaded burger around 3pm, went home and felt a bit off so I skipped dinner altogether. I woke up in the middle of the night with full blown food poisoning. Mind you, all I had for breakfast was a bagel...  I'll spare everyone the details on my illness for obvious reasons but I struggled to make it through the day yesterday and I'm still having a hard time keeping my food down.   The icing on the cake here is that I got together with a couple of friends tonight and mentioned to one of them whom I knew frequented the same establishment, about my recent experience and he told me he got gravely sick off their Tripleta.   I hope Sofritos can correct this issue because I absolutely love and miss Venezuelan cuisine but clearly they have a cleanliness and/or freshness issue.
I didn't appreciate how they can charge what they charge and have HORRIBLE CHEAP silverware. The 2 must match. Waffle House silverware is better than this place. Our waitress was nice and attentive. But i won't be going back.
Pass on this place. The rates were decent but they have a very young staff that lacks customer service and you may later find yourself a victim of identity theft.   I arrived late at night and the car I rented and reserved was not there. They drove it out to me the next day but that was a major pain coordinating with the driver who didn't speak English. No knock on the driver,  she was probably the shining star of this bunch but directions was not her thing.  The language barrier made it a greater challenge as trying to coordinate the next day delivery held up our day. Perhaps it was my fault for actually holding them to the terms of my reservation.  Fast forward to the end of our vacation a month or two later and I started to see Sixt rental car show up on my credit card account for small dollar amounts (a common tactic used by identity thieves to see if cards are still active).  I called to inquire but nobody knew anything and there was nothing owed on my account. The pending charges then mysteriously dropped off. Two weeks later several fraudulent charges were made against my card for hundreds of dollars, not  likely a coincidence.   I would avoid this place. Any money you save may be lost later in time away from your vacation fixing poor reservations and dealing with the hassle of trying to recover loss from the identity theft.
I really, really want to rate this restaurant higher than I am. I hate leaving low reviews. However, they have a prime location, plenty of customers, and expensive drinks, so I doubt this will eat into their profits much. Also, I will make sure to come back after a few weeks and amend or delete my review if it's inconsistent with my experience.  FOH was nice, but none of them were really on the same page, perhaps from a lack of training on the manageent's end. Everyone who served us was very eager to please, which was pretty apparent when the food took about 50 minutes to arrive (didn't see too many customers) and they comped us a round of drinks - which was nice - but it doesn't outshadow food that is not only late but mediocre. Burger bun was over toasted, damn crunchy, and black around the edges; patty was 2 shades darker than what I asked for, and my friend's tomato soup lacked body and flavor. It was either canned already or should have been. Fries were fine. Cocktails were acceptable. There was a mess-up at practically every stage of our meal here making the experience a total drag.  Hey, I'm sorry, but at the kitchens I've worked at, my chef would have smacked me upside the head for serving a burger like that, and if I'm paying 15 bucks for it, well shit. These things are better left said, because it'll hopefully lead to improvement. If not, then they deserve this review.  Before you get your jimmies rustled, my friend and I both tipped 20%+.
if I could I would give them -100. I was so mad at them that I had to come write a review. Looking at the reviews below i agree 100%. The staff are nothing but a bunch of LOOSER!   My first time there, of course I was asked rudely to buy a tape even though I saw tape on the self service counter. Silly to expect there would be tape at a post office. But no!!!!! the next two times i have been there I saw everyone using the tapes from the self service area.  I guess no wonder they are going down and shame on them for making money the way they are. But the experience was not as bad that I write a review plus it was ok because free tape is a luxury and i do not mind paying for my tape. I just have a problem with them having double standards.   Which brings me to why I am writing this review. If you are staying in student accommodation and I am sure most of us around here are ,,,,please take note!  With an authorized delivery note you can no longer get your mail / package from this office . According to this lady I need to have the receiver's ID card :O and not my ID even though according to usps system an authorized agent  I should be able to collect with my ID.   So I ask this lady then what is the use of your agent collecting facility and she tells me "for student housing we don't  give it to the agent, you might be collecting it even if it is not yours by signing it yourself"  I appreciate the thought here for protection but I would have also appreciated a prior intimation by the post office that they need receiver's ID. That way the receiver who is away for a long duration might have left something behind.   The worst part is that I feel this rule just popped into the lady's head. I have been collecting packages as an authorized agent since quite sometime now from this office but never did I have such a problem.   I honestly hope they get some competent people to run this office
As a SoCal chick, this has got to be one of the least authentic and most flavorless Mexican joints I have ever had the displeasure of eating at.  The store is crowded and the line is almost out the door (why does anyone even eat here???). Not to mention that it has bizarrely high prices compared to your typical Mexican restaurant.  At its price, you'd be better off going to Chipotle's, which - while equally inauthentic - at least has tasty food!
Service is fair. Can be harsh at times.  Kitchen was clean. Food is good.
The food is good, but the customer service needs some work....  My best friend went with me and we both ordered the same thing, however hers had some extras added to it and mine had the one ingredient left out (due to an allergy). Well, the order was placed correctly, but executed incorrectly. They put all the extras in mine (with the ingredient left out) and made hers as is. Instead of them giving her the extras she ordered in a separate bowl to make everything right.... They asked me to take the extras out from my bowl and put them in her ramen bowl since I didn't pay for them. So I had to take a spoon to dig out random extra ingredients to stick in her bowl after I'd already taken a few bites.   The appropriate response to that would have been to give her the extra stuff she ordered in a separate plate and not have a customer dig stuff out of a soup bowl. I couldn't just switch with her bowl because I would've had an allergic reaction, and we didn't want to send the entire order back because it would've been wasteful.   Not sure if I would go back.
Spent almost a thousand dollars for 5 Dropkick Murphy tickets on Saint Patrick's day.. the ultimate St Patrick's day in Boston right???? WRONG!!! Tickets were on mezzanine level...never even saw the band!!!!!  Talked someone into just letting me take a peek at the crowd below that was actually having fun. I felt like screaming at someone, but no one cared. The mezzanine is set up so poorly and no one cares...They take your money and then actually put these weird screens up so you cant even get a glimpse of the band. I tried to watch it on the tv over the bar.....its a smaller TV than I had in my dorm room years ago...I never felt so ripped off by anything before. They should just not sell that level AT ALL. Turned a fun event into an angry bunch of people. Dropkicks were unbelievable and worked the crowd on the the floor.
Way overpriced, weird hours, a lot of goodwill looking, broken toys. And Ihate that all the font is tiny! Seriously, so annoying you can't even read half the flyers. Hard to find Bc the font on the sign is tiny! It seems like this would be an obvious one. BUT on a 90 degree day sometimes it's worth it to let the kids play inside (although last time we went it was super hot in there). I say find a food place with a play area instead. If I'm gonna pay 10$ a kid I'd rather use that money to get a pizza and let them play some where like Papas.
UPDATE: I just walked out and will not be returning. I advise everyone else to do the same until management gets the message: your service is the WORST. I've made excuses for the poor service because the food is so good in the past...but I've officially had it.   I went in to order take-out, plenty of people working, was blatantly ignored despite there being someone right in front of me at the register, had to ask for a menu, waited for anyone to take my order. No one did. Still, even after asking someone to help and watching another woman place a to-go order by badgering an employee, no one helped. I walked out for the last time.   To the owners, I seriously don't understand what is going on with this place. Please do something.
If you need a new pair of scrubs, this is one of the few medical uniform stores on the West side of Portland you can go to. It's conveniently located off of hwy 217 next to Washington Square and has ample parking. However the selection and staff are disappointing.  Every time I have come here I feel like I have to wade through an endless parade of hideously patterned scrub tops. The designs aren't flattering or from this decade and the price tags will make your wallet cry. They carry almost no petite or tall sizes in the store. The owner will order you a pair if you want but it will take several days and multiple return trips to pick them up at the store. She will not ship them to your house. The store brand (although considerably cheaper compared to the other brands they carry) is not only cheap in price but in quality too and will fall apart on you in months, if not days, after purchase.   I have never seen anyone working here other than the owner. She is often rude and inattentive to her customers. I went into the store the other day and once again had my purchase delayed as she stopped mid transaction to answer the phone. The person on the line was obviously one of her vendors and rather than put them on hold for a minute and finish my purchase she stopped what we were doing and continued to talk on the phone for 15 minutes and ignore me. I was stuck at the register while she argued on the phone with her vendor about when a shipment was coming in. Uhhh hello I'm still here! I guess she can't do two things at once or doesn't know how to use the "hold" button on her phone. I should have known better when while shopping in the store I saw her do the same thing to another woman that was only buying one item but had to stand at the register for almost 20-25 minutes while the owner talked on the phone, had the woman's money in her hand, but refused to finish the transaction until she got off the phone.   Returns are a nightmare. I hope you never need to return anything here. I bought a pair of pants that were too long for me because they once again had very few petite sizes in the store. I was going to hem them but I was able to get a pair in the size I needed online and tried to return the pants. The tags were still attached and I hadn't worn them but they did sit in the back seat of my car for a few days. I guess they got a little crumpled in the car and she refused to take them back because they were a little wrinkled claiming she knew I had worn them (apparently with the tags still on and everything) because that's the only way they could get wrinkled and wouldn't take them back. I also had their store brand items fall apart on me shortly after purchase and she also refused to return or exchange them claiming it must have been something I did instead of the cheap and poorly constructed item falling apart due to hems falling out from poor design and sewing.  Unfortunately this place is the closest medical scrub store to my home on the West side of Portland. I only go back because my options in scrub stores are limited. However, if you have the time check out NW Scrubs in Tanasbourne. Much better selection, cute designs, lower prices, large selection of tall and petite sizes, and friendlier customer service!!! Only go to this store if you have no other choice and need to replace something immediately. There are better options if you want to leave a store happy, not get stuck at the register forever, and leave with your wallet and bank account still intact.
We're really disappointed with My Brother's Place in Arlington.  My husband and I ordered dinner for delivery via MixMenu.com at 8:06pm.  Estimated delivery time was 9:06pm.  By 9:20pm, we are worried and STARVING and exhausted (we just had a baby).  We call the restaurant.  The woman we spoke to seemed with it, but we got passed on to someone who sounded like he was on drugs, quite frankly.  Completely inarticulate and completely lacking in customer service.  Guy says, "Uh... um... yeah... uh... they don't pay me."  I'm like WUT.  Who doesn't pay you and why is that my problem?  So he lies and says he cancelled the order thru MixMenu.  I ask him why we didn't receive any notification, and he just says again that he apparently tried to contact MixMenu because he didn't know what to do, and says MixMenu said to just cancel it.  However, we never received any communications from MixMenu about any cancellation.  And later in the conversation, the guy keeps just saying how "they don't pay him" and then says, "I don't even know how to cancel anything with them" which makes me feel like he lied about contacting MixMenu.  Note that we have ordered 2Xs before from this restaurant, via MixMenu, just last week, and it went fine.  And I told him this, and he just said, "I know." So they've got our contact info on record, they couldn't at least have the decency to let us know what happened?!  They couldn't at least have the decency to delivery the flipping food anyway and have us pay them upon delivery????  They couldn't have the customer service to incentivize us to stay on with them?  Smooth, My Brother's Place... reeeall smooth. You just lost customers who were going to be ordering from you very frequently and not with small orders...  When something similar like this happened via DoorDash with Not Your Average Joe's nearby, the manager @NYAJ's totally came thru for us - she had one of her staff deliver the food when the DoorDash driver flaked out, she included a $50 gift card with a handwritten note apologize about our experience with them (and this was totally DoorDash's fault).  So you best bet, we went back and will continue to even do delivery from NYAJ's and never again from My Brother's Place.
Yelp disappointment! Bland, dry tasteless low quality meat and they use microwave not the grill to heat up the shawarma.  Got the combo plate @ $14 after tax. Consists of chicken, lamb n beef shawarma, cucumber salad, tomatoe slices, onions, garlic n tahini sauce plus two slices generic pita.   I should have canceled my order once I saw the plate of shawarma being placed in the microwave. The chicken was dry bland chunks of meat similar to canned chicken. Beef n lamb was worse, a sour aftertaste and very dry. I ate two pieces each of meat to confirm I was not mistaken about the food, ate one slice of hard pita, spoonful of cucumber salad. Then dumped the whole plate of food in trash. Did not bother discussing or arguing with owners about the bad food. Besides I doubt they would have credited money back and I did not want anything else after such bad taste.
Mediocre at best.  Our server was nice but not attentive at all.  I think her name was Ashley.  We were in the restaurant to watch the 1st half of the Green Bay / Minnesota game and the restaurant wasn't very busy for a Sunday evening.  The mozzarella sticks we ordered for an appetizer were okay but clearly a frozen item.  The wings came and they were fresh and seasoned properly with hot sauce. However, not once did Ashley return to our table to refill our drinks, waters, or ensure our order was alright.  She had one other table to service in the whole restaurant and spent the rest of the time hanging out by the host stand.  I would not recommend this location.
I purchased a groupon for an oil change, and chose the full synthetic option. $44 ($80 value). When I got there, they said this Groupon is not for a full oil change and I'd be charged extra (even though I showed them the Groupon said full synthetic oil change). Well, I was charged about $60 extra. So including the $44 I paid about $100. Hardly a discount!!
This review is only based on a one-time Brazilian wax I had done. I've never had my hair cut or any other services here.  To be honest, I had let it go too long so I knew it wasn't going to be fun going in. I called same day and I got right in, so convenience was great. Unfortunately it didn't make up for the pain I went though. It was really painful. I've had dozens of Brazilians before so I know I'm not extra sensitive. She kept missing on her first, and sometimes second pulls. I even had to ask her to stop when she tweezing the strays, which there were a lot of. Even if all of this could be blamed on the fact that it was admittedly a lot to manage, she left so much wax I had trouble taking my underwear off to get rid of it (baby oil works). That alone would have kept me from coming back.
I've been here before and was referred to by a friend. Pleasant. However, I learned Their contacts that they make the worker sign is almost unethical, and unreasonable. Sure, massage here is nice, but the operations suck major loads. Go independent! Make sure you tip the MTs real nice. They the MVP. This place is so dumb.
Worst experience! Got there for happy hour and was waiting for my friends. Got kicked out because I was told they needed the seats even though it was at the bar and there was another customer all by himself taking up a table for 6 with no a word from them!! Very rude and disrespectful. Never again!!!
I ordered a hot grass jelly milk tea ,  Luke warm drink with few piece of grass jelly doesn't worth to paid $4.75 , I won't come and recomanded here .
Never seen a bank branch that could care less about customer service than this bank branch. 1 teller and 12 customer's standing in line. I would recommend using the branch on Adams Street on the Milton line. Never had to wait more than 5 minutes to get to a teller.
Would give a zero if I could. So here's my experience.-   Found out about a bubble on my tire Friday afternoon and immediately call the service center.  The receptionist who answered my call didn't listen quite well to my problem and went ahead to schedule my appointment. On insisting that they confirm they have the part she transferred my call to parts (unnecessary but I can live with that), after going through the ordeal I finally had an appointment for Monday evening   As soon as I drive in, I'm greeted by a very unpleasant man who told me that my car won't be serviced in time  I can understand things happen but then its their job to call me and inform not drop the bomb last minute.  Walk in to the office, the receptionist is too busy explaining how to burn coal for a hukka over her Celphone to help.   Finally make it to am express receptionist who lies about the warranty store hours and continues to log in my information. On calling the warranty provider myself, I find out they are open another hour.   Then I'm told I should be prepared to pay out of pocket and be reimbursed, this is cheating since I was told this would be a cashless process while purchasing the warranty by Herb chambers of Westborough  Now I will wait to see what stories these people come back with.  It is clear that they are a bunch of rude, lazy people who will do anything to get out early, but I'm not one to fall for their tactics.  Would never recommend them to anyone.  I hope Honda is taking note.
Not only is it 21+ after 8 pm.  The manager stated that on weekdays their more lenient to break the rules and let younger people in but on fridays and saturdays they are stricter.  He also tried to state in a nice way that they kick people out at 8 pm even FAMILIES at 8 pm.   The bouncer kept shouting at me stating 21 plus 21 plus. But on their website they state other things. Don't come here. It's not worth it.
Absolute garbage of a ride. Really Universal!!! This has to be the most over hyped attraction I have seen yet. What a waste of time, money, and space! The attraction is poorly constructed and lacking any sort of decor. Extremely simplistic and the line zig zags through it all. Horrible! The attraction is short and boring. No action what so ever except for getting spritz by water. There are 3 rooms and a Kong animatronic that was depressing. You couldn't even see the 3D because the wires and barriers were in the way! Awful! Who came up with this idea? Nothing impressive at all! All the other Harry Potter attractions are far superior then this junk. Waited 2 hours for this! I want my time and money back. Ruined my first day at the park and was so underwhelmed and exhausted afterwards that we just left the park. Never had that feeling before with universal. Put your A game on universal because if you continue putting attractions like this out I'll discontinue renewing my pass.
The layout of this place is baffling to me, and it changes every two days. The number of times I've gotten lost....  Limited soda and junkfood selection, dismal makeup isle, and the self checkouts are ALWAYS telling you to wait for assistance.   They do have one awesome clerk, and by awesome I mean out of her mind, who strikes up such intensely personal conversation you kind of feel bad cutting it off and getting the hell out. But not really.  Unfortunately, it being CVS and next to the T, I can't not patronize.
Awful service.  I work nearby and have had to visit this post office for years. This seems like a chronic problem. Staff seems to be in a very bad mood and not at all happy about being there. Place is usually dirty and has a long line. Really an embarrassment for USPS.
A great restaurant is base on three things for me: location, ambiance, and of course taste. This is one pricy for what you get.  Location: it is a little hard to get to since it is off Mopac. However if you are in the neighboorhood, it's easy enough to get to.   Ambiance: it is a pretty cool looking restaurant. The restaurant is able to use traditional element of Chinese culture with a slight modern flare. The lantern ceiling is pretty cool.   Taste: we are here for a weekday lunch and are getting food right off their lunch menu. Their egg drop soup is legit, while their hot and sour is par. Their lunch entrees falls short of  what you would expect from a Chinese restaurant at this price range. It is not exceptional.
Upon hearing advertisements on the local radio I decided to go to Numale Medical as I am 46 yrs of age and felt that my testosterone level was not at the level that it could be. While I initially called looking to increase my sexual performance , I really was interested in finding out what my testosterone levels where. Upon arriving and checking in I had my blood drawn, which took a while to find my veins according to the staff, which really should have been my first sign of complete ineptness. Once my blood was drawn an individual by the name of Josh came in and proceeded to perform an ultra sound on me. He then came back and proceeded to inject a chemical into my penis which he told me would cause an erection. I asked him what my blood test showed and he informed me that we wouldn't get those back for a couple days. I questioned how he was able to determine the amount of what he injected in me at which time he just responded that its a low safe doseage.   Then next thing you know while I am starting to experience a strong erection a sales person by the name of Marcos comes in and begins to give a sales pitch that reminded me of a stereotypical used car sales person from years ago. He sold on emotion, pressure and every other approach one whose commission relied on it. Worse than that as I was sitting in the room afterwards waiting for Josh to come back I overheard him talking about me and I quote "ya he isn't buying, yet but if you get him asking more questions step out and I'll come back in and give him a hard close". By this time I was furious and felt very stupid as I sat there with a prolonged erection.   When Josh reentered the room I told him I was done and leaving. Josh informed me that he needed to inject me with phenylephrine in an effort to bring down my erection. I immediately looked it up online and saw that phenylephrine has been linked to erectile dysfunction. Upon reading this I said no way. He had me a sign a medical waiver and at that time I left. Well a couple hours passed and even though I tried all the things that the form I was given suggested that I do nothing worked. Against my better judgement(of course going to Numale medical in the first place was against my better judgement). I went back there and by this time was in a great deal of pain. Josh came in and the first thing he said was and I quote "well we know we gave you to much" and over the course of 30 minutes injected me 3 times gradually bringing down my erection. The fourth time he proceeded to inject me with a needle directly in order to be more aggressive with the doseage as he put it. Upon receiving my fourth injection within in an hour I had a violent headache that brought me to my knees. I have never experienced any type of medical event like this.   The reaction of the entire staff was clearly that of a complete lack of knowledge as to what to do with me at this stage. At one point I was left alone as it become clear to me nobody had any idea what to do. Over about an hours time period I started to feel a little better, however had a headache that lasted off and on for about week. On top that I had bruising all over my penis from the injections that was very painful.   This incident happened on a Thursday and finally on Monday I called the clinic as no one bothered to follow up and check on my well being. I was informed because I didn't follow their initial instructions I would not be getting a refund of my intiial $149.00.   I went to my own physician who when I informed him of where I went he just rolled his eyes and said "I certainly would never go to a place like that".   This in my opinion is an operation that preys on the emotions of people and lacks complete professionalism. I would absolutely consult your primary physician before ever going to a place like this.   If you have any questions feel free to call me at 512-809-6386.     Matt
Some corporate big-wig was in town so we decided to order-in lunch from nearby Cosi.  The process of placing an order for 7 was a chore for these people. Honestly, you're a lunch place on State Street--is it really THIS difficult to master lunch for 7 when 4 of the orders are SALAD!?  The salad was bland, boring, and overpriced. It was worse than something you'd buy from a "Mobil On The Run" store...I guess the sandwiches looked good, but I wouldn't risk maneuvering those lines again for possible disappointment. I mean, the other reviews here don't seem promising.   I think Cosi should move itself into Quincy Marketplace to join my shit-list of places that suck.
Ordered a slice of pepperoni pizza and got very disappointed :(. Didn't seem and didn't taste home made at all. Maybe the rest of the dishes are good but unfortunately not pizza!
Lot of options to choose from but only vegeterian.  Dont have much to say but food wasnt the best. The place next to it serves better food.  Also some menu items are over priced. We tried their hakka noodles, scheuan noodles, manchuria, falooda. None of them were good.  Also one of the service guy working there wouldnt listen if you had any questions.   Wouldnt recommend this place at all.
Places is living on it past reputation....Food,service and atmosphere nothing really special... Over priced and really stuffy... Enough said
Deceitful! They are full of lies of omission and take advantage of new customers. I took my dogs there for the second time and it was so outrageously expensive. The first time, when I picked them up they STUNK. So I decided to get baths for my dogs. They failed to tell me they were $33 EACH! And I got charged for half a day of day care because I didnt pick them up by noon. They did not tell me there would be a charge, when I mentioned picking them up in the afternoon. All they had to do was mention it! And I get charged for daycare, knowing that they were barely in daycare in the afternoon because they got their baths in the afternoon and then didn't go back out and play and get dirty. I actually didn't see them on the dog cams at all on their pick-up day. The lady at the front desk blew off my confusion on pricing and concerns. I will never go back there. There are plenty of dog boarding places in this city that have no problem being upfront to their customers.
Had a birthday dinner here a couple of weeks ago, everything was just okay nothing spectacular or extremely delicious.  One of my guests did have a problem with his credit card after our visit, he left a cash tip for the server of 20.00, his check was only around 60.00, the following day he checks his account and the server took it upon himself to add an additional 15 to his credit card receipt. Management offered to give the money back only as a gift card to the restaurant.... FOH  Long story short after going back and forth for an entire day trying to reach the manager, I got a hold of her myself and they fixed the issue without a sincere apology.  Probably will not return.
Met up here with some friends for dinner + drinks. The bar tender said she couldn't make a mexican martini because she didn't have any shakers, it was not at all busy. After we were seated the hostess informed it would be a few minutes before our server could come to get our order.  After 20 minutes we asked the hostess and she said someone would be right over. After another 15 minutes we decided to leave. We walked by the hostess and she didn't offer any explanation or apology as we left.
First off, I enjoy my Qdoba very much, but this specific establishment is always a disappointment. There are always ingredients that have "run out". Today, they were out of white rice, queso, and the corn salsa (my favorite!). The service here is subpar, and the employees are hastily making everyone's meals. Not my favorite Qdoba to go to.
Poor customer service, very hot in there, no warning cash only. Hand a few menus out so you know what ya want before the cashier ask what do you want. Might speed up the process.    Air con might make the staff nicer. Donuts squished in a  bag not place nicely in a  box. But a tasty donut nothing special.
Used to be a regular, but moved away. Came back after almost 2 years and in one night solidified that I won't return. I got puked on my somebody they were serving, the server would not help me find a towel or anything as they were more concerned about the floor. Not even an apology. Very humiliating as everybody stood there and saw it happen.
Bought a 90 minute massage on groupon a month ago.  Tried to book on line, no availability.  Tried calling like the business over a period of 2 weeks.  Several phone calls in and no response....crickets.  Called groupon and they also reached out to the business with the same results.  Time to get my money back.
I have to give the Coop a lousy review for a couple reasons: there are other better booksellers within a few blocks, and I wasn't able to exchange (not return) books I received as gifts but already owned.  The Coop DOES have a big selection of books, which can be nice depending on the topic or fiction title you're looking for. I'll give them that. But otherwise...just go to The Harvard Bookstore down the street. Alternatively, try Raven Used Books. You'll find plenty of interesting titles there.  Oh, and if your friends get you that shiny new copy of 'Men Are From Mars, Women Are From Venus' for your birthday and you already have it...tough. Hope they kept the receipt.  Find me on Twitter: @onlyrandy
As mentioned in the earlier reviews, the shop immediately tried to upsell me. Thankfully, he wasn't pushy and seemed to understand when I explained that I didn't need the pet detailing since my dog rides with me on an almost daily basis.  I did, however, want the interior & exterior detailed as my living social voucher had explained it would be. I really hoped it was too because the gentleman that I worked with was very nice and I wanted to provide repeat business for them.    When I first picked up the car, I should have done a more thorough look at it. The quick glance over I did, it looked fine but then I got out into the sunlight. There were streaks on my back window (outside, I don't think they touched the interior windows).  My windshield looked better after I took it to a gas station and washed it myself.    There was gummy residue in my cup holders which leads me to believe they barely even wiped those out.  They tore off my Bluetooth microphone that was attached to my steering wheel. I had to drop down the steering wheel and go rooting around behind it to even find it but of course, now it won't stick anymore.   I thought, at the very least, that they would've cleaned the cracks around my window buttons & the vents but even those still had dirt in them.  I honestly could've done a better job if I had taken the time to do it myself.    When I called to provide feedback on the service, they were very kind and offered to redo the spots they missed but unfortunately, I can't afford to take another full day off work for them to do so.  Maybe next time, do the job right the first time.
I called both the Highland and the Stassney/I35 locations for pricing on having new lenses fitted to my own frames. I was told there was a $10 fee for customer supplied frames. Fair enough! When I got to the Highland Mall store they told me the price was $20 because I had "designer frames." When I objected to the bait-and-switch and informed them that nobody had asked me if I had "designer" frames their method of dealing with it was to evict me from the premises. At age 63 this was a new experience for me. I went to the Round Rock location and explained the entire situation and they were courteous, professional and agreed to make the lenses no problem. When I called the Stassney/I35 store they also said they would only charge $10. I did not go there because they had suffered equipment breakdown and were way behind. For the record I had raised my voice ( but not yelling). I used no off-color language and made no threats either verbal or by gesture. There was never any apology offered for the two different prices
Dr. Shida is great.   His front desk staff though need some manners. It's been two weeks since I've ordered my contacts and they still have not come in. Apparently the brand is on back order, but not once has someone offered me samples or a different brand of lenses until mine come in.   I asked if they had some samples I could use in the mean time and they said they would have to order those too. They are rude and unapologetic for crappy service.   See the doctor, but don't order your glasses or contacts through them.
The worst experience we have had at any restaurant. We made a reservation and we still had to wait 10 minutes for the table to be set up (wasn't busy). Chicken lettuce wraps came but no plates at the table (thought the table was set). It tasted terrible with many unchewable pieces of chicken (bones and fat). Drinks came one at a time and wrong and some went to the wrong tables. We ordered 1.5 glass of wine but delivered 1 glass first and then another .5 when told 40 minutes later and charged for them separate (more expensive). Dinner came out late and cold and again with no plates (took another 5 minutes to get the plates) Wait staff were not with it with an attitude of indifference. Every table around us had complaints of the same nature. Within an hour of sitting with no dinner served, we made the decision not to visit PF Chang's restaurants anywhere. It is not what they used to be. Don't waste your time or money.
This safeway is a joke.  Every other store has been updated to the 21st century except this one. Old tills, no self check outs, alot products unavailable. The owner is obviously a cheap skate
please adjust your business hours. we were searching for an open now restaurant, found your place on yelp, walked in the rain to you and you had already closed. the times on yelp are wrong as we saw on the door
Cardboard crust Friends and I found a hair on one slice with a random collection of fuzz stuck to a slice of mozzerella on the other So gross save your time
This is a review of Sofia's shoe repair services. I can't speak for her tailoring and alterations, but if I were reviewing her business strategy I would def give her 5 stars. She honey-sweetheart-baby-dolly mou-ed me out of $35 for a terrible shoe repair that not only was sloppy and uneven and left brown shoe polish smeared all over my blue shoes, but was about 2 x more complicated than necessary. All I needed was a new heel piece (for a flat shoe!) and ended up with an entirely new sole that has two huge splits in it that go all the way up to the base of the shoe. It looks like someone went at these things with an axe. Are you effing kidding me, $35?? At that price I at least expect to be able to stand flat without wobbling.  If she weren't such a sweet talker I would never have stood for this. You win this round, rogue!
The cost to food quality ratio at this restaurant is poor. Shocking that it's so busy. Will not eat here again.
4 people in the store staring at computers. Won't go back. Less attitude please and more customer service. Immediately got problem solved at Lamps Plus.
Past 2 orders that i've made were screwed up. 7/10 times i've had an issue. I'm all set with ordering delivery from here again.
I've been there a few times and each time the meat has tasted old (chicken and beef). Also I paid $1.30 for 10 chips. C'mon at least give me half a bag. I don't think I'll be back to this location again.
We were really excited to eat here; unfortunately, we received horrible service, food came out cold and under-seasoned, waitstaff was rude, and manager was even ruder. We will never come back here.
The beans were way too salty, and the rice had no flavor.  Whereas the beef was okay, the topping on the burrito was terrible.  Overall, this food lacked flavor and even the tortilla chips were poor. My suggestion is to eat the beans with chips so you can have some salt on your chips. Also, no salsa with the chips.
My Mother bought her car a year and a half ago. Two recalls have been issued and now she must take it in at her inconvenience.   She is 8o years old and the service receptionist kept asking her if she had friends to bring her in without offering a loaner car.  I get it, the service department doesn;t make money on recalls does not want to go out of their way to help.  She then asked my Mother to bring it during the most convenient times for the service department. My Mother has full warranty on this car. And she is 80!  Are you kidding me?  Seriously..the attitude I got after speaking to the receptionist is beyond reproach.  She said she was making polite conversation about my Mother's friends.   No you weren't. You were trying to do the least amount of help possible because it is a recall and your department makes no money on this.  And then to get snotty when I said my son can take off work to bring her in. She said, "Oh well, does he have insurance? because people say they do but don;t."  I said, "My son has been with USAA for over 5 years and he is veteran with full clearance. Is that good enough for you?"  And with an overwhelmingly snotty attitude, she,"OK thank you ba Bye"  I will post results of the visit afterwards. Stay tuned!
Cheap, but the food was OK. One thing very disgusting I saw was, one woman who's cleaning the dessert table just picked up the tong dropped on the floor.  She wiped the tong with the mop she used to clean the table and then put the tong back to the dessert tray. So gross... I'll never go back.
Absolute crap, everything is broken, everything has to be a conflict with management, you will get stuff stolen, and you won't get a copy of the lease you "signed" until after you "sign" it! The whole application and leasing process is done online, and it always has "difficulties" but it's just a distraction tactic so that you can't read over what you're signing! I have filed multiple reports with the housing authority and they are currently under investigation! DO NOT LIVE HERE!!!! YOU WILL GET FUCKED!
This place is laughably awful. I'd almost give it 4 stars for comic relief except that my husband and I don't go out often enough to waste an evening at a place like this.  Our waiter was so inexperienced and inept we actually felt sorry for him' The menu was an utterly uninspired collection of old and tired chestnuts and the results were outrageously poorly executed. We ordered the least scary things we could think of on the menu because we were on red alert when we read the pathetic menu and the poor quality of the service: caesar salad, truffle fries, trout, and pasta with seafood. No way we'd chance dessert. All about the standard that you might get on American Airlines First Class. We went for the view and it at least didn't disappoint.  This place is going down in flames.
Went there to ask a few questions about tuning my amp. I was rudely told to leave and not come back from one of the owners. Terrible customer service.  Save your time and go elsewhere .
This is nothing but an overpriced tourist trap, with some of the worst seafood we have ever had in the Boston area. We grow up in Boston and have enjoyed some great seafood and I expected at least something close. We ended up being put in the tent area on a cold day and none of the overhead heaters worked. They had some standup machine and was pumping heat into the tent through a pipe. Needless to say, it was very loud and not very hot.  Our first course consisted of 2 orders of Clam Chowder and the Lobster Bisque.  While the lobster bisque, had some great flavor and some nice chunks of meat. The clam chowder was nothing but potato and we struggled to even find one normal size piece of clam.  Second course consisted of a fried fisherman's platter and a clam strip platter both orders with sweet potato fries. While the clam strip platter had a good amount on the plate, they were slightly over cooked; the fries had been very overcooked.   Most of the problem was with the fisherman's platter and had the same problem with the fires being overcooked. However, the over meal was just swimming in grease and totally unappetizing. The few scallops on the plate where like rubber, the clam necks as well. I was unable to even try the fish, when I pushed down on the batter, you could see the grease in liquid form, just rising to the surface.  I brought this to the attention of our server and he was not interested at all. When we finally gave up and decided to leave, we mentioned again that everything was greasy and over and all we got was a simple "sorry". Manager never showed and no one ever came to the table when requested.  Meal consisted of 3 cokes, 2 clam chowder, 1 lobster bisque, 1 clam strip platter and 1 fisherman's platter, upgraded the fries to sweet potato. Total cost with tip was $ 112.78 for three people and because of the quality of the meal; we couldn't eat over 60% of the food on our plates.  Do yourself a favor and go elsewhere, there are a lot better and more affordable places to eat seafood in Boston.
Friendly staff and good service. Good selection of wine and beer. However I have a real problem with any restaurants that try and throw out authentic names (for instance Italian with this place) for their menu items, and not use authentic ingredients. We ordered the "Gruppo" pizza and were very disappointed with the quality of the toppings on the pie. The crust was was decent. I'll give them that. Had a very nice texture. But do not call little dried up balls of meat with no flavor "Italian sausage". The "Canadian bacon" was cut into little triangles that you could get on any pizza from Dominos or Pizza Hut. And the pepperoni may have come from a local Safeway. Needless to say, we did not get what we expected. And the decor was a little much with all the cycling jerseys hanging everywhere. The search for good AUTHENTIC ingredients continues.
Enjoyed the theme and personality of this business. Unfortunately, I found the chili inedible.
New menu..  Maybe new Chef ( unsure )  Either way change was in the air!!  The stock market is up!  The Wayland diners have returned to support our local restaurants..  However,  change is in the air at Prime 131 (formerly Prime Bar & Grille)  My husband and I went to dinner last night and sat at the bar for an early dinner.  Cocktails ordered - menus looked new and the bartender was attentive.  The specials were read - swordfish with avocado sounded healthy and yummy.  I asked Mr. Bartender, was it "FRESH OR FROZEN".  He replied FRESH.  Great, I said I'll have that with a small prime salad.  Mr. Bartender replied, 'Would you like Blue cheese on your salad?" I said yes it's on the salad AND thanks for asking.  I was informed HOWEVER, Blue cheese now was extra? WHAT!!  (Cut back)  come on really!!!  Five small pieces of Blue cheese on a small salad. This is how the owner/partners are going to nickel and dime the loyal customers of Wayland!!  Then I was told the salad was extra too. It  was no longer part of the main meal.  So, I'm paying big money for FRESH SWORDFISH and your going to charge me for a small salad and extra for Blue Cheese...  Fine.  Our Entrees  were served. The steaks are now 6oz for a filet  and not 8oz and they are adding bacon( that's healthy)  around it  but charging the same ( What ????)  MR. OWNER/PARTNERS ......CAN YOU HEAR  ME NOW!!!  The swordfish came out. It was not  "FRESH" !!!! iIt was FROZEN and it was weeks old at that, thus the special I guess!  It was time to clean out the freezer since the dividends didn't pay out after the first quarter of the year!  Needless to say, THE FISH TASTED LIKE I WAS EATING AN OLD TIRE!!  I sent the plate back and asked for the scallops.  My husband eat very slowly as we waited for my meal to arrive.  Needless to say the kitchen wasn't going to prepare my meal any faster then they had to.  We waited so long, I said to my loving husband who was trying to comfort me by offering his meal ( great guy ),......   I said they have three more minutes then I'm going home.  At that  moment, my entree  arrived.......over cooked and once again the scallops were FROZEN NOT FRESH..  My husband was now done!!  Love eating alone. We finished our meal and dessert was on the house.    PRIME 131........The people of Wayland, Weston and surrounding towns pay some of the largest property taxes and make over six figures.  If you think we don't know the difference between Fresh and Frozen your sadly mistaken....   The kitchen staff will drive your customers up the street if your not careful. Please make the proper corrections or stand to loose your bread and  Butter...or bring back Luigis!!!!
I wouldn't recommend this as anyone's first choice to eat at Universal.  We had a long day at the park and this looked like the least crowded place so we put our name down and they said 10 minutes at the least for our wait. 30 minutes later we got a table. The waitress was friendly and we immediately places our order. It took another 30 minutes for our food and when our "simple" burger that was placed as well done came out pink and looking raw, we sent it back with their apologies.  15 more minutes and we got the burger back even pinker.  Again, sent it back for the third time and another 15 minutes later we got it and just packed it up and left because everyone else had already finished eating.  Between that and our strawberry daiquiri having zero liquor, its definitely not a place we will be going to again. The waitress and manager were nice and apologetic, but overall not a good experience.
I have eaten here once before a while back and they were great about finding something that my kids would like. This time we walked in, no one was at the front, no one greated us and it took a min for the lady to notice we were there and make her way to the front. There she was not helpful and we got the idea that it was not kid friendly so we left. I hope they are able to review their practices on making people feel welcome.
Worst italian place possible. Do not go here. The food and the service are mediocre at best. Apart from this, the owner of the place is a jerk. He treated me and my friend disrespectfully. When we asked him why he was treating his customers this way we got jumped by 10 guys of the italian mafia. I had a black eye for 3 weeks after and was severely bruised, my friend got 10 stitched. Also two friends of a friend got jumped there and had a bottle broken over their head. I later found out that this is a mob hangout. Ever wonder why this is the only place that serves sit down dining after 2am?
If time is a luxury you can barely afford, stay away from ordering oysters!  The building itself is quite beautiful, and when you enter, the bar is just straight ahead. When you walk in, the mirrors and decor make the space appear bigger. But when you let everything sink in, it's actually quite small. There is a small bar area, and the lounge area seats about 20 people in total.  The service is quite slow if you're ordering oysters - at least when we went on a Saturday afternoon! When we arrived, there was one other table occupied. My girl friends and I each ordered a glass of wine, and 2 dozen oysters to start. There was only one server, and the server was also the one preparing drinks, and shucking oysters. Despite the 30 min wait, the oysters were well shucked (ie. oysters in one piece, no broken shell pieces floating in the juices).   The girl working was friendly and seemed to know what she was doing, but it wasn't enough to make up the fact that we had to wait so long for a couple of dozen shucked oysters. By the end of our stay, there was another girl who appeared and seemed to work the bar only.  I would love to give them another chance, but not anytime soon. I think there are better places to go in the city for buck a shuck!
A slightly burned sandwich, and when we got home to finish our last half had a nicely melted in hair. Will not be returning. Interesting flavors though
Do you enjoy being treated as a nuisance because you're part of the DragonCon block? Looking forward to being condescended to by management because they just can't be bothered to accommodate you in a business that is all about accommodating its guests? Welcome to the Westin Peachtree in Atlanta!   The vast majority of Georgians you'll encounter during the four days when 70 thousand-plus nerds descend upon the holy quintinity of hotels near Peachtree Street will treat you with that Southern kindness I did not grow up with as a resident of cannibal Florida in my teens. But that quintinity of hotels: the Marriott, Westin, Hilton, Hyatt, and Sheraton, generally regard DragonCon attendees with an ambivalence that borders on disdain. I get it. 70k nerds is nothing to sneeze at, they make a mess, and they must be hell to coordinate. I haven't been back to DragonCon for 11 years, but I knew scarcity was something to be concerned about when attending the convention.   I called in advance to ask if rooms had fridges, and their concierge explained that they were $15/per stay and needed to be requested to be added to a room. So I wrote to the hotel manager to specifically ask if it were possible to reserve a fridge in advance of the hordes. I didn't explain in that email my significant other's specific medical need for a fridge: to store her medication, but was prepared to, if I received the run of the mill "we can't reserve one, it's first-come-first-serve" response, but that's not what the manager wrote back. He was polite and said he'd put a note in my reservation and that I could pick one up when I arrived. Of course, when we did arrive at the madhouse that is reservations, we were told all the fridges were checked out, and we were out of luck. Now, I can forgive a misunderstanding, that his clearly worded email "Once you arrive, please inform the front desk agent to send the frig to your room" meant that a fridge had been reserved for us, written in response to me specifically asking "I'd like to request a fridge for my stay in advance of my arrival, in case they end up all checked out (I am staying during the DragonCon block)" really meant he hadn't done anything at all. But what's not forgivable is his skepticism, after I called to ask about his promise to deliver said fridge, that we had a medical need for it, or his offer to store the injectable in some staff fridge and have my significant other come down every night to retrieve it, or his derisive tone of voice when I explained to him how it might be an inconvenience for us to have to deal with the hotel staff for something private like this at all.   Just so you understand: braving the elevators in DragonCon (in the Westin's 72 floors) is a nightmare unto itself among crowds of thousands, not to mention that getting a staff person to pay attention to you, or finding a manager of any kind, can take half an hour during the constant ingress/egress of congoers every night. The manager said we could come visit him "any time, I'm here all night," but when I did go down to see him after that infuriating phone call, we waited at the empty concierge desk with several other guests for about half an hour, only to be told that concierge was closed and we'd need to get into the line behind the 35 people waiting to check in at reservations. Needless to say, I was furious, but my significant other had had enough, considering that we already spent all day in connecting flights to get to Atlanta. In the end, we were able to cool the mini bar in our room with an ice bucket each night, which kept the temperature low enough for our purposes.   The Westin staff should be ashamed of itself for not doing everything in its power to make good on its promises. You have four other hotels (connected by skybridges) to lean on that you're already colluding with to fix prices for the duration of the weekend. Make it work. Treat the tourists that bring millions of dollars in these four days to your city like guests, not children who are trying to scam you. As an SPG member who frequents hotels in the program, I won't be coming back to a Westin, in Atlanta or elsewhere.
My husband and I thought we would give this place a shot last night. I'm sad to say that we were pretty disappointed. The server was not very attentive. We sat at our table for a good 10 minutes before he even took a drink order then He kept forgetting to bring us our waters. He offered us a free soda but we declined. Granted, he was the only server at the time, I think. I got the chicken tenders with mac n cheese and the duck fat fries and my husband got the 1/4 chicken w/ sautéed spinach and sweet potato fries. The mac n cheese was ok. The tenders were ok too but the sauce that it came with was awful. The fries were the best part. I guess it's kind of hard to mess them up though.  My husband was not impressed with his meal either. We both said that we wouldn't dine here again.
I've eaten at a lot of On The Boarders as I've lived In Texas and Oklahoma but this is the worst I've experienced.  We were being seated and the lady seating us was taking us to a table and we asked for a booth and after the look of irritation she sat us in a booth.  So time to order as I've always done asking for an off menu item and was told they no longer use white cheese so they couldn't make it....so I looked for an item on the menu to order that had the discontinued white cheese. I guess they still had some in reserve for that specific menu item.  When my menu item arrives they cooked it with tomatoes instead of tomatillos as referenced on the menus, I guess tomatillos are also discontinued. So sad I was excited to find an On The Boarder in Florida.  I guess they do it different here.
I don't recommend this mall.  Too many cheap stores in here. I have two words for this place. "KEEP DRIVING".  Yep, I have to admit. Camp Creek Marketplace is a GEM compared to this dump!
Received the absolute worst customer service experience in a long while from the night shift employee named Patrick. Extremely rude on the phone with a completely unwarranted attitude. That's not how you treat customers. I'm never staying here and if I could submit this review with zero stars, I would.
The fact that this shares the same Yelp rating as other establishments like Adriatico's or Mikey's, and a superior rating to Belleria, makes me question humanity.   Terrible, bland, obviously cheap, disgusting cheese and pizza sauce atop a piece of cardboard (often mistaken for crust) makes Houndog's Pizza some of the worst I've had. Really, you have to be trying to make pizza at such a low quality.  For years, Hounddog's has been riding the coattails of drunken word-of-mouth reviews and the distinct crust they offer, which is essentially, again, cardboard battered with butter and Parmesan cheese. When does it end?  Far from being the "best pizza in Columbus," Hounddogs is an affront to all things good about pizza.
Order a Jasmine milk tea one time and it's was just milk with barely any jasmine tea taste in it.  Gave it a second try months later and it was the same.   I had to threw it away both times.
Spoiler alert: THE TERIYAKI CHICKEN IS HORRIBLE.   First and foremost, let me start by saying that I hate people who have ONE bad experience and then write a bad review about it. But BurgerJoy - you have betrayed me. And I am following up my previous positive review, with a negative one.  Tonight was girls night, so obviously, we ordered Chinese food in. I thought I'd switch my order up a bit since I always order one of two entrees. We ordered the Teriyaki chicken. I honestly can not recall a time that I have ever returned food that I don't like. Not in a restaurant, and certainly not delivery. The sight of it alone was disgusting. Three grilled chicken patties with a clump of sauce over it. It was cold, it was rubbery, and even the sauce tasted terrible. HOW do you even mess up Teriyaki chicken?   Since I order nearly once a week, I thought that I'd break my "do not send back" rule and ask if I could get something else (my house is half a mile away). VERY nicely, I told the girl on the other end of the phone that we really do not like it and feel horrible to even ask, but if we could exchange for sesame chicken that I always get. Here's the kicker. The brat on the other end of the phone says:  "It's not our fault that you ordered the teriyaki chicken. You history shows that you always order the sesame chicken. What if EVERYONE that did not like our food, sent it back? You always order sesame chicken, I don't know why you ordered the teriyaki"  Girl please.  Instead of reaching through the phone and smacking this chick in the face, I offered to go up there with the food I ordered and trade it out for another item to save the delivery guy some time on what I know is likely a busy Saturday night. Still no. After telling her that in a restaurant, if you do not like the food, you can exchange for something else. Still no.   Then, she hangs up on me.   BurgerJoy - this was an easy one. Customer Service for Dummies... you may need to read it.
The only reason I shop here on occasion is when they send me good coupons in the mail, have something on sale I normally use/need, and when I can use the digital coupons on the S&S app to further knock down the price on some items. Otherwise stop and shop is way too overpriced, their selection isn't great at this location and things aren't always so fresh. So it's REALLY annoying that I find errors on my receipt every.single.time I shop there. Seriously - every.single.time. I always plan an extra 10 minutes during trips there for a sit down with the staff at the customer service desk, flyer and phone in hand to show them where I was overcharged and didn't get the sale price, or where my digital coupons weren't applied. The digital coupons that you load to your card - ha! What a joke! They don't automatically get applied! On my most recent trip I got refunded $13.94 by the customer service desk for digital coupons that weren't applied to what I bought. That's nothing short of robbery! Luckily I always find that the customer service people are nice and will make things right, they even honored some paper coupons that had expired the day before. But every time I go there I wonder why I even bother......and I think of people in our town who don't have cars to go to the far less expensive market basket 15 mins away and who are stuck shopping at this rip off store. If you absolutely must shop here ALWAYS CHECK YOUR RECEIPT!!!
I had a pretty frustrating time with Portland Pampered Pets yesterday. I was really disappointed because i had a couple people tell me how great they are. I have a six month old labradoodle that went in for his first cut. As soon as i arrived the lady that took him was extremely cold and almost seemed put off. i asked how long the grooming would take, and she said 2 hours. try 4 hours! i went in after the first two hours and he was half-way done and sitting in a kennel. the lady was rude and seemed irritated that i came in. im sorry, but i have things to do! tell me 2 hours, and ill expect it to be done in 2 hours! an hour later i show up and he is STILL tied up and only half way done! Again, put off, the lady tells me 20 more minutes and they'll call me when he's done. ANOTHER HOUR AND NO CALL. i show up and he's done being cut just sitting in a kennel. 4 HOURS!   I get it.. things happen. but if you're backed up, at least be kind and understanding. dont be a bitch.   seems plenty of other people have had this same experience! i wish i looked em up on here before taking him in!   and to top it off, the once adorable labradoodle puppy that everyone stops and swoons over, now looks terrible.  Awful experience! I will never go back! DONT waste a whole day on this place!  NOT WORTH IT!
This is probably my 8th or 9th time going back to Eldo. Unfortunately, my recent experience was rather disappointing. I was five minutes late to my appointment due to a family emergency, and I was certainly reminded of it the second I walked in the door. I got yelled at by Rachel in a very unprofessional manner and certainly was not given the opportunity to explain myself after I had apologized. It's awkward enough to get a Brazilian even if it's someone you have been to a few times, I felt even more uncomfortable during the session after getting screamed at. I should have walked right out but I stuck around and also tipped her generously regardless of what happened. Hopefully, this is a one-off situation and doesn't happen to anyone else in the future.This type of abusive behavior is totally unacceptable and I am pretty sure I can find other waxing businesses where they are nice, personable and make you feel comfortable without being rude to their customers. Needless to say, I will not be returning here nor will I be recommending this place to anyone.
I am forced to use Comcast for high speed internet service in my building. Comcast uses a sneaky (potentially illegal monopolistic bundling?) package to force internet subscribers to take crappy Comcast TV service.  I've had sporadic downtime over the past year, two incidents of "mistakes" on my bill, and a friendly notice informing me that my rate will double once the introductory period ends. These were to be expected of a monopoly business in a dying business with idiots as customer service representatives.  Two days ago my cable box decided to provide a "Error Code: S0a00" rather than any television programming. Three hours later (after working through the Comcast telephone support menu and trying two self-service options), I finally got to speak with a customer service representative.  She was quite pleasant and helpfully suggested that I plug the cable box into an outlet. I asked her how my television could be displaying a message from the cable box if it was unplugged. She asked me to hold on. I assume she was unable to find the proper response in her script. She "accidentally" disconnected me.  It took two more calls over four hours to get Comcast to send a service representative. This morning, the technician arrived fifteen minutes late (outside of the four hour window I was promised). He decided that I needed a new cable box. Unfortunately, he failed to pack the appropriate cable box in his truck. Now I have to wait until tomorrow to get my cable box.  When I asked him about receiving a refund for the cable service for today, he look confused, then said:  "I only fix the boxes, you can call customer service and talk to them about that."  Anyone who gets an S0a00 error code, I suggest you take as much time as necessary to get a technician to give you another cable box. I also suggest you switch to another company as soon as possible. Comcast is the worst company I've ever seen and I can't wait until this terrible business gets killed by the internet.
It's Labor Day, the sign says "open", and I'm in my happy place. I go up, the lady at the counter says "two"? I say yes. She says let me get the manager. Manager comes, says "just the two of you"? Yes I say. Then he says "kitchen closed". They were supposed to be open 30 minutes longer but we weren't a big enough tip.  This place cares nothing for their customers. I will never come back and I will spread the word.
If you have any food restrictions like an allergy, or are a vegan/vegetarian or are a religious Jew/Muslim/Hindu where you don't eat pork/shellfish/beef, etc--you are probably better off not eating at this place. The kitchen is tiny and they are busy, so they won't make any kind of modification or adjustments. You eat what is there on the menu or you go hungry. Which is sad because I am a vegetarian.  :-( A friend of mine who had gone there before said it was a lot like Ubuntu in Napa, the day she went they had sufficient vegetarian choices and they were all really good. The day I went, there were just two vegetarian options and the manager--while very nice, refused to make any accommodations. You have to understand that this is a very small establishment. The kitchen is an open one and really tiny, which makes the possibility of cross contamination a real issue for people with allergies--like my dinner companion who is severely allergic to shellfish.  The tables are all communal, which can make things a bit awkward if the other party doesn't like sharing their table with you. This is definitely not a place where you want to have a special night out or take a date. Way too crowded/stuffy/loud and zero privacy. This is also not a place to linger to catch up with friends or come with a group of friends or family on because of seating issues--they want you to pay and be out as soon as you've finished your meal. I understand the situation, but I really wish the restaurateurs would realize that this is a problem.   The two dishes we got were absolutely fabulous though. We got the Cauliflower with masa dumplings--it was amazing. Loved the cocoa crunch in it, it really added an a nice depth to the dish. Grilled broccoli came out really good as well--the mustard and "egg" really perked it up to unexpected levels. Yum! The service was fairly good--they were apologetic about the lack of choices and were friendly. I really wish I could give more stars, but I can't based on my experience. We left hungry, we didn't feel too welcome in our table by the other couple that was obviously not happy and we felt a bit rushed as soon as we were done with our "meal." I would give this place a 5 if they could add a few more vegetarian/vegan dishes and perhaps do something about the seating situation.
Please note if you are Tibetan and are planning to travel to Tibet/China, do not make any plans to go there before July 15, 2015. I heard that Tibetans are not allowed into Tibet before that date. The visa office will not tell you this information.
My roommate and I were super excited to try Rosie's, so we walked down from Davis one evening to check it out.   Unfortunately, it was terrible. The service was slow, for a bakery counter. The chai latte was basically just warm milk. The lemon bar had an odd texture and an unpleasant taste. What a disappointment!
This Bar Louie location is always the worst experience. The service is just always disappointing. Clearly no interest in establishing an interaction with customers. Very robotic and hardly ever come back to the table. Bringing food out wrong and not acknowledging it or correcting it. Hardly even take care of themselves either, their attire looks like they just rolled out of the bed. Terrible terrible terrible. Sucks cause the food is so good! Best in the area, just not worth the money and time.
Dear B.C.,   I've been to your establishment twice and both times were just A-Ok. I think it's mostly because there's a bunch of hipsters in there that are superficial. I mean, c'mon! This place is supposed to be chill and down to earth. Your food is also just sub-par. I didn't think the clam roll was all that, I've had much better. Also, I have this thing about establishments that serve drinks out of plastic cups! Get some real cups people!  Wish I had something better to write about....  Better luck next time, Dreamsrey
Everyone has a bad day and I'm sure the restaurant business is a very difficult one, but there is no excuse for poor service, downright unclean surroundings and waiting for more than 15 minutes with no appearance of service staff. Had there been a crowd, it might have been excusable but there were few patrons, the restaurant was less than ¼ full.  I literally had to ask to be waited on.  I would have walked out but there was a member of our party that wanted to be there so the rest of us relented. Let me tell you about the unclean part.  The blinds were covered in dust with a sprinkling of various sauces.  The menus were greasy and smudged. The salt and pepper shakers were slimy. Both garbage cans in the Ladies room were overflowing and was very dirty looking.  There was a water leak from one of the machines in the service area and water was tracked around the front entrance, the tiles were icy slick, I'm shocked that someone didn't slip, fall and crack their skull.  The plastic drinking glasses were old and chipped. Even the windows looked dirty.  The furnishings looked old and overused. Many tables weren't cleared for the duration of our visit. It was obvious that there was no care or pride put into the running of this establishment. My gut reaction was to run out the door.  After requesting service a young man stepped up and waited on us.  He was very good at his job but the food took forever to get to us, we were there for over 2 hours.  The prices are in my opinion unreasonable, we had $10 off coupons which helped.  Here is the tragic part, the food was actually pretty good.  I couldn't really enjoy it because of all the gross factors. This place needs to hire a deep cleaning crew and they really need to spruce up and do repairs. No one wants to see a pool of water standing in the serving area. No one wants to use a filthy bathroom and no one wants to wonder about the horrors that must be in the kitchen based what is seen about the entire restaurant​.  I will never - ever go back, there is no coupon good enough or companion insistence that will get me back in there.
The cheeseburger was very sub par.  It is very similar to a school burger, most likely some kind of soy mix. The  question is, "Where's the beef?"  The fries are flavorful- cut from a good potato, but very greasy.  So with great disappointment and ten dollars less in my pocket, I vow never to return.
This is probably going to be the most entitled review I have ever written and I apologize in advance, but this needs to be said. (Or it probably doesn't, actually, but, hey, you come to this website to read honest reviews, right? Or you don't. Whatever. Skip this one, then.)   I fucking hate writing scathing reviews. Hate it. Especially for local businesses that people clearly love. The stats speak for themselves - I've written more 5 star reviews than anything else because I love giving businesses praise.   I've given El Primo numerous chances to make me one decent bean and cheese taco. Just one. Just make me one bean and cheese taco like you actually give a shit that I ordered and absolutely want to eat that. I'm not even the one ordering these tacos - my friend orders one for me when he goes to pick up coffee in the mornings. His tacos? Beautiful, tasty looking works of art. My one measly bean and cheese taco? Looks like something the dog puked up, ate, and then shit back out again.   It's like the dude just honestly did not even care if the beans made it in the tortilla. Every single time, most of the beans are on the foil and nowhere near the tortilla. The cheese? Always clumped in one spot. Not nicely sprinkled throughout the taco, just one greasy clump of cheese.   I know what you're thinking - beans are messy and they just seep out of the taco. I'd usually agree with you, but I've eaten more than my fair share of bean and cheese tacos from a multitude of places. I understand and am totally cool with bean seepage. This is not just a little bit of bean seepage. This is a total lack of caring about my food and whether or not I can eat it. I'd also understand if this only happened once or twice - maybe it was an accident, but he was in a rush and it was easier just to give me a messy taco instead of take the time to make a new one, but this happens every single time.   It puts the beans in the tortilla.  It sprinkles the cheese on the beans. It folds the tortilla in such a manner so as to minimize bean seepage.  IT MAKES A DECENT FUCKING TACO. Or else it gets a bitchy review on Yelp.   I'm giving two stars instead of one because even though this is the second bitchiest thing I have ever written, I just can't give him one star. I feel like a fucking asshole even doing this, but all I want is one decent fucking taco. I genuinely want to enjoy this place. The salsa is pretty good and the red one is nice and spicy and my friend seriously loves his tacos. The dude who owns and works here clearly gives a shit about what he is serving and I really appreciate that; I just wish he also gave a shit about the one thing I order.
I don't remember their steaks being of mediocre quality in the past, so maybe my party had an off night, but meh.
The one star review is because their service was great. They were on time, the driver was professional and helpful, and the car was fine.  However, the company fraudulently charged us several times months after using their services and after we had most definitely paid in full. We contacted them and they said they would call back in 5 minutes then never did.  We have since tried contacting them many times and they have not returned our calls.  We will be taking this up with the BBB and filing a lawsuit if necessary.  Do not do business with these people!!
WOULD NOT GO BACK   I have been looking for a garage in my neighborhood to service my Honda. I liked the idea of a "neighborhood mechanic " Decided to test them out for some regular service work oil change, tire rotation balance filters changed ect. Bought car in at 8:30  called around 1:00 to see if car was done had not even bought it into the bay yet. Called at 5:00 kept getting busy signal finally got through at 5:30  told me they forgot to call that it was ready. Took a while to be helped got my bill $90.00 bucks shocked on what they charged me even the Honda dealer charges less.There were nasty grease marks all on  the interior of my car. I learned a lesson always ask prices do not assume an oil change is cheap.
My husband and I purchased the Groupon for this authentic Arabic cooking class for $42 per person. We were both very excited to attend since we've been to cooking classes before and had a blast, as well as learned a lot of things.  We had a hard time finding this place because we thought it'd be an establishment, turns out, it was just a house, which is fine. When we approached the house, Ahmad was sitting on his porch with another couple waiting for other students. He was a very pleasant man to talk with, and had a lot of knowledge about cooking.  When everyone had arrived, we went inside his home, and stood in his dining room area (chairs and tables were removed), we stood there for a good hour and a half. I was surprised that there were no chairs or something. There wasn't much participation involved, since there wasn't much to really do.  He had someone pit olives which seemed to be a pain in the ass, blend some lemon juice and garlic in a blender, and chop parsley and pick thyme. The students all looked around at each other sharing similar thoughts it seemed. In total, there were about 8 students.  A few questions were asked, but we felt like the answers weren't well answered.  One student asked "where do you buy your salmon?", he answered with "Whole foods", not that I have a problem with Whole Foods, but as a Chef and having been in the restaurant industry for 16 years, shouldn't you know of fresh, quality fish markets or places where people in that industry purchase their ingredients?  Anyway, it was a dull class, everyone was yawning and someone was feeling light headed from standing up the entire class, she had asked for a chair from outside on the porch, he insisted no chairs because he didn't want people to fall asleep (wonder why, it must've happened before?).   The dishes that he made were salmon in a marinade (great flavors), roasted red pepper hummous (very delicious!), and a chick pea salad with the olives, roasted red peppers, thyme, and other spices (it was ok, chick peas needed to be soaked longer), as well as his own blend of lemonade.  A student asked how he made the lemonade, his answer was, "just some fruits and lemon"...not impressed. I think if he taught his classes a bit differently, and had the students make their own dishes, it'd be much more exciting and enjoyable!  He usually charges $85/person, this class was definetly not worth $85, nor the $42 Groupon we had purchased. We really wanted to love this cooking class, but it was a big disappointment as the other Yelper experienced.
I've eaten here three times. I've settled on Denny's as my new favorite restaurant. I've eaten here twice for lunch and once for dinner. The food has been great all three times. It's really hit the spot. My complaint isn't the food, but the service this last time at dinner was sub-par. The waiter *seemed* nice enough, but as soon as the dinner was done, she immediately dropped the check and considered our transaction *done.* I wasn't done. I waited for a good ten minutes before flagging her down and asking for dessert. Then I had to flag her down for a drink refill. I needed more napkins, but I didn't want to flag her down a third time. I'm a loyal Denny's customer. I order big and I tip big. It would have been so easy for her to get a big tip. She just needed to give me a base-line service. Next time I'll choose somewhere closer to eat.
Purchased a cake and it had a metal or freezer burn taste. Total bummer and waste of 30.00. Go elsewhere this place has slowly done down hill and is over priced.
Is you would like to leave a bar smelling like anything other that cigarettes, this is not the bar for you. Drinks are fairly priced, but no real deals here. Okay place to hang out for a few, but don't make a night of it.
My husband and I took a friend here last night for her birthday. We had an excellent time. I used to work in a restaurant, so I think that people who complain about a desert plate placed too far away and a finger print on a plate are absolutely draconian(talking about a previous review I read).   The reason for the 2 stars has to do with A. The ambience  B. The quality of the menu vs price C. My personal experience.   I like to eat at all kinds of restaurants, but this place has high end prices, so I expect a little more elegant experience. The volume of the noise can be likened to a theme park cafe. I don't know how that could be controlled, but my favorite restaurants, rusty spoon and kres, both have what I'm looking for in environment when eating at an upper end restaurant.   My husband and I each got a drink, but his old fashioned had to be altered because the server said they had run out of an ingredient.   I got sea bass because I knew that otherwise I would be spending the same amount of money for a steak with no sides. The non steak dishes are the only ones that have non protein elements. My husband and friend adored their steaks. I tried a bite of both and they were to die for. They got fries on the side which we shared, but I was hoping for more than just ketchup. A creative sauce maybe?  My sea bass was unfortunately served raw and refrigerator cold :(. Mistakes happen and I understand that. The manager came up to our table and apologized, then she brought us out another side of fries while I waited for my fish to be cooked. They then comped our deserts, which was very nice - I didn't ask for any of these things mind you because I know this was a simple mistake.   When it came back I still did not think it was a very creative dish though. I did not like the crispy potatoes on top - they are more like French fries(but the fries are better). Maybe they got over crunchy when they cooked the fish again?   My friend and I both got desert, my husband was too full from his steak. I got the turtle pie, she got the lava cake. I tried a bite of her cake, and it was definitely delicious. My pie kind of had a chocolate pudding consistency that I did not care too much for, and not barely enough of that sensational caramel! Very tasty, however I recall the s'more cake at rusty spoon and the bread pudding at kres, and am left wanting!  Anyway we had a great time! Had I not been juiced up on a Manhattan I probably would have felt more impatient...we waited a while to put in our order. Our server was Sean and he was very nice and attentive even though the place was packed and I am sure he was flustered by the things that went wrong. They gave my friend truffles, a birthday card signed by the staff, and a $25 gift card for her birthday...that's awesome! All of that being said however...I won't be going back, simply because other restaurants in the area offer a more creative menu, better ambience, an absolute wow factor on taste on all menu items (Kres), and for about $20 less on average per person. I have money and I don't mind spending it, but only if I can justify the cost vs quality of the goods.
This ride deserves no stars... my tv at home has better graphics lol... such a bad experience,
My Korean friend and I seated ourselves in the mostly empty restaurant on this rainy Saturday at noon. The waitress came out with menus and never took notice our table was filthy. I was raised in San Diego and am well famliar with Mexican food. Knowing the measure of true Mexican cookery, I ordered tacos al carbon with rice and beans, and a chicken tamale. The tamale came first and was a disaster wrapped in a banana leaf instead of a corn husk. It was filled with what appeared to be chicken pot pie filling. It was mushy, with potatoes and green beens in the mix. The masa was weak, thin, and soggy. My friend ordered a quesadilla with beef, as well as a burrito. The quesadilla was greasy,  but okay. The chicken and bean burrito had an abundance of sour cream and cheese and was also just okay. Ten minutes after we came in, a very noisy Mexican family came in and were served their food 15 minutes BEFORE we received the rest of ours. We spent a lot of time waiting despite being only one of three tables occupied. My tacos al carbon were pretty good. The guacamole was fresh as was the pico de gallo. The meat was lightly seasoned and not too fatty or overcooked. Altogether, I give this restaurant really bad marks for cleanliness, service, and effort. It was humiliating to be so obviously ignored over the other group who came in after we had already been waiting. Again, I worry about the cleanliness. They allowed young boys to crawl all over the tables and the booths, leaving messy handprints of food wherever they went. Our table was already covered in somone elses slopped refried beans and whatever else the sticky mess was. There is no excuse for that when the restaurant was nearly empty. It is just plain laziness. I won't eat there again. I noticed the Cantina a few doors down as we left and wished we had gone there instead. We only tried El Potro because we had a coupon. It was not worth the 10% discount. I may be sick.
Ugh...worst Panera I think I've ever been to. Unfortunately close to my house and I generally like Panera but every time I come to this location I end up being infuriated by their lack of execution. This is supposed to be fast food, or fast casual. I've started using the Rapid Pick Up option, which gives you a time the order will be ready. They are routinely 10 minutes behind if not more. I've had instances where they are 20 minutes late and I feel like it would've been faster to just walk in and order at the register.
Worst experience at a Steak N Shake ever!   took hungry boys there after a tournament and waited 10 minutes before an expediter sat us. Then another 10 minutes before we had to flag a waitress down to find our server who was rude and had ignored us at the front of the restaurant the 10 minutes we waited to be seated.  Place was only half full so no reason for the long wait. Waitress brought shakes after 20 minutes and when we asked which shakes were which she said "can't you tell the difference?"   Food took an additional 25 minutes and looked horrible when it came out.   Buns were burnt and patty melt looked like it had been mauled.   Pam behind the counter came out to help get our food  straight and was the only helpful employee the whole night.  Love the Steak N Shake in Pensacola but this one was horrible!
This review will only focus on the quality of the park itself, despite my (or others') personal opinions on Blackfish/captive orcas.  SeaWorld is a poor man's version of Disney theme parks. Inferior rides, inferior food, inferior service.  Inferior rides: They're all less exciting versions of rides done well in Disney or even Six Flags. Manta and Kraken are mildly enjoyable but become boring halfway into the ride - more nauseating than adrenaline-pumping. Regardless, non-roller coaster enthusiasts may still enjoy the rides, simply because they've never enjoyed better ones before such as the train in the Magic Kingdom or El Toro at SFGA. Atlantis is a campy, weak attempt to be Splash Mountain, all the way down to the shorter and much less thrilling slide at the end. The story was also kind of depressing - reminding of the time when I went to Disney @ Tokyo and the Snow White ride ended on the scene where the queen falls to her death (and Snow White never wakes up). While some rides are newer than others, the majority are quickly becoming dated and it shows to anyone who's gone to more than one amusement park.  Inferior food: Disney has a great system of restaurants, some of which are so good that they require reservations months in advance. Not so for Sea World, which serves mediocre food/snacks at best at the usual inflated prices (even more inflated if you opt for sit-down establishments). It's not bad food, just nothing you'd write home about.  Inferior service: Ok, this is the part that REALLY irks me. Why open your park at 9 am if half your rides won't be ready until an hour later? We were there when the park opened and everyone made a mad rush for Manta - the only roller coaster open during the park's OPENING hours. Kraken was closed until 11, the turtle experience until 10:30, Atlantis "closed indefinitely" (although opened around 9:30). It's dishonest to publish your park's opening hours to be earlier than what your staff is actually capable of producing. OF COURSE, gift shops and snack booths were ready and willing to take our money while we dawdle around looking at dolphins and manatees, waiting for the rides to open up.  Staff also more than willing to send roller coasters up at less than optimal capacity (compare to Disney where staff actually cared about wait times).  Speaking of Disney, we didn't need lockers for their rides. At Universal, they provided free lockers (up to 1.5 hrs each time near each ride location that required them). At SeaWorld, you gotta pay for those lockers, baby.  The positive notes: the dolphin show and the sea lion shows were well-produced. I opted not to go to Shamu's show so I can't comment on it.  I think small children and those who have not gone to Disney would enjoy SeaWorld. But, given its recent controversy and my experience at other Orlando theme parks, I'm glad I didn't pay money to visit this theme park. I hightailed it out of here shortly after lunch.   Save your money - lots of competition in Orlando for places to spend a day with your family.
Stumbled on this place while out in Little 5 Points. It smelled awful when you were at the entrance walking in, but once you got up the stairs into the actual restaurant, the smell disappeared. Its pretty casual and I wasn't exactly sure where the hostess was until a random server popped out from behind the bar to take us to a table. Their menu was pretty extensive with a combination of Thai and Sushi. We orders traditional Sui Mai which was a mistake. It had absolutely no flavor to it. For an entree we ordered Pad Se Ewe and their Hurricane roll. The Pad Se Ewe was too soy saucy and the hurricane roll was basically deep fried rice. The only saving grace with this restaurant was that their Thai Ice Tea was delicious.
If you are going here for the juicy pork belly in the other pictures you see on yelp they don't serve it anymore. They only have these dry deep fried strips. Its just bland unsmoked bacon. Nothing special. Shame, I bet this place was great once.
They sent me a bill for three separate co-payments that were already paid at the time of service!  Luckily I saved the receipts.  They tried to blame my insurance but even my insurance said, "they're trying to double charge you."  After the third "mistake," I am skeptical of this establishment.
Not impressed. I've been here many many times and I always want to love it. But...the service is slow and food isn't great. I will no longer wait 45 minutes for an egg sandwich. We will not return.   And the PSA on the menu saying the service will be slow on weekends....is no excuse.
What's the deal with the volume in this place? If people were dancing I'd be cool with it, but let's not pretend the room isn't less than 400 sq/ft.   That said, I've always experienced The Peacock to be a good place to get pretty unruly and not have anyone bitch at you for it. I'd give them more stars if they would let me take my drink out on the patio.
Food was fine....worse parking ever as it has like 10 spaces. That's just cray. Poor location and will opt for a different one in the future.
Have gone twice now, once to experience the dinner menu, once for breakfast. So far, the breakfast was the better of the two. The bacon flight was good, though it would be a nice perk if a flight was actually a bit cheaper than buying the individual pieces and creating your own flight. I enjoyed the french toast, but for the price point, definitely needs something more justify going there over all the other breakfast options in the neighborhood. The dinner experience I will chalk up to it being a new restaurant, I will try again in a month or so. Love the look / design inside. Overall, interesting options but too pricey for the experience.
Let's start...  The only reason for the one star review is our waitress, who was so inattentive it ruined the entire meal.  Where did she go wrong?  Let's begin our journey....  Our evening began this cold Sunday evening around 6:30 pm.  We arrived and were greeted and seated promptly upstairs.  It was incredibly cold upstairs.  They should really add a door to the stairway just as they have one for their downstairs seating area.  Ask to be seated downstairs if your heading there on a particularly cold evening.  We ordered a couple drinks, reviewed the menu and placed our order.  The hot pot broth came out, along with the cart to mix your own dipping sauce.  Our hot pot food started showing up before our appetizers.  Our waitress informed us they were out of pork balls, so we said ok no worries.  Two of our appetizers showed up, fried oysters and Japanese spring rolls.  They were nothing special.  My companion commented that he couldn't even tell if there was an oyster in the fried oysters, because it had no taste other than being fried food.  I asked the waitress when our fried chicken was going to be out and she told me that they didn't have any more.  Ok...  Could have told us when you told us you had no balls...  The meat came out and we began to eat.  Thirty minutes later no one had come by to refresh the hot pot.  So we waved her down and she apologized, that she was very busy and she would come and refill it in just a minute.  A couple of minutes later she came back hastily poured some broth into the pot.  she added so little it didn't even fill the pot back to the halfway point.  She was right, however she was very busy.  Chatting with her friends who came in a short whole after we did who she was giving her every attention to.    Another gentleman another 30 minutes later kindly refilled our pot without us asking.  Its too bad we were already finished by that point.  Our waitress came back and asked us if we wanted any dessert.  We said no.  Now, typically this is the part where she would get the bill, pay and be on our way.  However, this is not the case.  She kept walking by us to go back to her friends.  It took us another 45 minutes to actually get her to come to the table and ask for the bill.  She was prompt when asked and when we paid.  But seriously, I will never return here again because of her.  Overall the food was two stars, and out of all the hot pot places I've been to it was the worst one in terms of quality and service.  Save your time and money and head to Hotpot Buffet or Q Restaurant.
So I wish I could give more stars...But... here we go. So my friend and I decided to try this place out because it was pretty packed inside. We came here to the Dustin Lynch concert...AYYYYY! Anyways, that day also happened to be the UGA vs NC football game. So, of course, ​people were here for that. We honestly just came for the food before the concert.  We wanted a seat outside, we got seated in​ a timely manner, about 20 mins? It wasn't too bad, during that time we were looking through the menu so when we got sat down we would know what to order. By the way, if you have time, take a look at the menu... Becuase it's HUGE! There's so much on the menu it's a bit overwhelming. But the good thing about this place, if you are vegetarian, you have a ton of options! WHICH IS GREAT! My friend also happened to be vegetarian, so she had a bunch of options to choose from. We picked out what we wanted and we were ready. So our buzzer rang and we got sat down. We saw people with a ​really long plastic bottle of beer like the ones you see while you're on spring break. Gnarly dude.   We got sat down and the waitress came to us. We told her we were ready to order, but she said to give her a minute. She left and after a while she finally came back to us. She asked us what we wanted to drink, we said water and that we wanted to go ahead and order. She said she will be back with our waters and will take our order. She disappeared and we were literally waiting 5 mins. 5 mins may see short but it's not when you're coming back with waters. Then she takes our order. The food takes forever to bring us our food. She did not come back to refill our waters. We had to ask other waiters to give us condiments and extra plates. She never comes to check on us. Then she finally comes when we are done with our food. We asked for our checks. Yet again we are waiting about 10 minutes for her to bring us our checks. She never came, so we ended up going up front and then she finally gave us our checks.   My friend didn't want me to leave any tip, but I felt bad so I left a little. But she had an attitude when she handed us the check. SHAME SHAME.   The food on the other hand was good. We ordered a side of truffle fries to share. Which was really good! Then my friend ordered a vegetarian chicken bowl and I ordered the entree chicken salad which was pretty good. The only sad thing was there was no chicken to be found... Sad day. There's also the small and large portion. I ordered the small and it was plenty! The price of the food was ok for what you get.   The atmosphere is like your typical sports bar. There's TV's indoor and outdoor. Bar. There's tables outside and long booths as well.   Would I recommend this place? I'm not so sure... The service really sucked.
I've been going to Bukhara for years and it's just getting worse to go to the restaurant. The service is incredibly poor. They've also changed several recipes and the food isn't as good as it used to be. I'm sad to say I'm done with Bukhara.
Was a loyal customer, with fantastic experiences with Dr Goo and Dr Doyle. Sadly, due to CorrectMed parent decisions, we have left this practice. CorrectMed gave us no notice, and left us completely without a pediatrician. Plus, their non-compete with Dr Goo and Dr Doyle has left our community without fantastic doctors.
This place is Nasty food wasn't hot at all. Whole place was sticky floors tables chairs and even the salt and pepper shakers. When told the manager all she said was only does was her boss allows her to. Guessing that means her boss won't let her clean Never going back again
I think I have been spoiled, growing up on Long Island and being surrounded by truly beautiful ocean beaches. I have been to Nantasket a ton of times now since moving up here almost 2 years ago. I decided to give it 2 stars because it's a clean beach. However, there are a lot of cons to this beach. Since it isn't on the ocean there aren't many waves, so, not many chances to body board or jump the waves. If this isn't your thing, it's not a big deal. Secondly, you NEED to check the tide table before deciding to go to this beach. Many days I have planned to spend at the beach have been ruined because if it's high tide, there isn't ANY beach whatsoever! I've never seen anything like it. Just rocks. Also, bring a lounge chair! Due to the rocks it's uncomfortable, and the sand is so wet that your towel or sheet will be soaked.  Like others have mentioned, you must arrive early for street parking, otherwise you could spend upwards of $20 (not worth it in my opinion for this beach..). Also, Hull is pretty run down. If they added some new restaurants or shops this really could be more of a destination.   While I am happy to live by a beach, and it's nice to go when there is actually a beach there, I can't help but wish it was a different beach!
Unfortunately, no star for this place.  I will never be back.   I got a shellac today at classy.  The first manicurist was very friendly but she didn't know how to trim cuticles. My cuticles were not smooth so I had to ask to do it again.  So the other manicurist came to trim my cuticles again but it my cuticle was bleeding. She was not friendly at all. She did not even apologize about this, she just made excuses that it's a problem of my skin.   Also I could see bumps and bubbles in nail polish.  I do not know how they got good reviews This was the worst experience I ever had.  I can be patient with low quality, but I cannot stand for their attitude.
Over the past few weeks, the content found on the online edition of the Boston Globe seems to be declining.  While I think "news" is just that, the absence of "breaking news" should not reduce the effort to provide content.  It was especially evident this weekend in which the same articles could be found each day as if even the paper went to the cape for the long weekend.  I move to digital because it seemed to be a more efficient media to take in news but with that gone, perhaps also my subscription.....
This is the worst place to buy a car.  I have purchased 2 cars from them this one being my last.  FIRST problem when I traded my Infinity in with them somehow the new persone who was buying it got my cell phone number and called me numerous times asking me questions about my car.  I did not like that they got all my info including my cell phone number but I told them about my car and I ended up closing the sale for them.  SECOND they did not transfer my warrenty over to my new car and said I caould not I had to purchase a new warrenty.  I found out that was a lie because the warrenty they sold me I was not eliable for and it took me over a year to get the money refunded.  I talked to the warrenty company and they explained they can tranfer warrenties.  Also they warrenty I was not eligible for I told the manager he insisted I was and refused to refund my money.  He said they would cover it regardless what was written.  I had numerous conversations with the warrenty company and they refunded Flagship my money and and Flagship still had not refunded it back to me.  Long story short it took over a year to get the money back and the customer service was horrible.  I am still waiting for my floor mat which I am sure I will never recieve.  This is the worse place to buy a car.  In this economy you can get great deals elsewhere and for the price they ask they should really take better care of their customers.  This place is one should keep driving by
Finally tried this last night after seeing a menu.  Stopped on my way home.  It was odd...what I wanted from the menu, wasn't on the menu there.  Was told I must have seen the wrong menu, but when I got home I checked and I was at the right place!  ANYWAY...I ended up with an order of spring rolls (for four) and the pad Thai.  So the spring rolls reminded me of those tiny frozen ones you find at Publix down the street.  As for the Pad Thai...there was plenty of chicken, but it was so dry!  And the egg was burned.  All and all, disappointed.
we just left shota sushi tonight, we had a very bad service, the server just drop the food on the table and then we had to wait for 15 minutes before getting our order then the kerrisdale roll is soggy, spider roll ( the crab is burnt ) and i was adding dynamite roll and 10 minutes hasn't arrived. so end up cancelling it. over all the food is not very good and yet suppose to be one of the best sushi, I Don't Think So.
I loved this place and came often.  Until my most recent visit. I won't go into extreme details, but I witnessed some scary food handling behaviors while they were cooking my food (thankfully it didn't happen TO my food, but I watched the preparation like a hawk).  It was to the point where I contacted the health department, and their inspection turned up some pretty unnerving things.  It's public record, so you can find it. The food was tasty, but I'm not going to risk illness to eat here.  Sad, thought they had a good thing going too.
The first and last time I got take out from this place.  I ordered general tso chicken with fried rice and a egg roll. I have to say I was extremely disappointed. The chicken was super dry and tough and just had sauce poured over it. No vegetables nothing just dried out tough chicken and bland sauce. The fried rice was literally just rice no onion, peas, or carrots to make it even look like it was fried rice. The egg roll was good but small.  I have not been back so I am not sure if it was just a bad day but either way the food was definitely underwhelming and I don't think I'll take a chance at wasting 10bucks for something that might be better.
This was my first visit to a J. Christopher's. Although I'm a huge fan of brunch, I've always avoided the long lines and lengthy wait times. I found this restaurant to be grossly over-rated, over-priced, and underwhelming. I ordered a sandwich that was nothing special. My husband ordered the bacon-wrapped filet with eggs which turned out to be just steak & eggs. The manager informed us that they were in the process of changing their menu and their cuts of steak. (Shouldn't our server have informed us about this?) To "compensate" she brought us out 1 tiny strip of over-cooked bacon which I suppose she wanted us to wrap around the breakfast steak they had served us. Breakfast potatoes were cold and under-cooked. We really expected more of  what we thought was a pretty popular restaurant chain.  The service and management left much to be desired.
At the Carmax in Norwood I bought a car there and after driving it two days the car's engine made loud noises, the service light came on and I when I checked the fluids I saw that the coolant level was almost empty. These are things I would have never seen in a test drive. When I had the opportunity to extensively examine the car I discovered the rims on all four tires were covered with rust. I live in an area that snows from November to April. The industrial salt used to coat the streets  accelerates the corrosion process under vehicles here. Since this vehicle already had all 4 tire rims covered with rust . I would immediately have to buy new rims from Toyota. I was told Carmax did not/ was not allowed to sell cars with rust, therefore the rims would be fixed.However, after the water pump was repaired and the coolant was added I was informed that a sales manager, declined to repair the rims. I returned the car because the money I would have to pay for those rims / installation/ rotation etc  exceeded the cost of more than a few of my car payments. I bought the car for convenience but their oversight caused me more of a inconvenience.
Great view of the Columbia and that's the best part of this place.  It took forever to get our food, all the tables we saw had the same issue.  Portions are not that great and the worst part is the flavor is mediocre.  Prices are way too high for what you get.  Not recommended
Sorry to disagree with y'all, but I really don't like this place. There are a couple good finds, but overall this place is over priced and the selection is nothing to get excited about. The biggest disappointment for me was their deli selection, it's meh at best.  This place is definitely not as good as Whole Foods or Capers, and it just seems like a regular grocery store in disguise as a speciality food store. I don't mind paying extra for quality but I can get it elsewhere and for cheaper too.
Very disappointing.    Stopped by on Columbus Day holiday, yes the town was busy with tourist, but the restaurant was not.     Servers were actually standing by the entrance trying to convince people to come in.    Well we did decide to stop.   Ordered a beer and looked at basic menu.   My wife wanted to try the turkey club, but with no tomato.   The server said absolutely no substitutions per the chef.   I questioned but what if she has an allergy?   Well she can take them off herself.   So less food and less work, but not accomodating.   This place will close soon if they do not understand customer service.    Sad - nice location.     We left immediately without ordering.   On the way out the host at the door said they was fast.   No one caring
Had the boys over to help tear out a deck. Went up to get 3 tiny personal pizzas for lunch as it's a block away. Nothing fancy- just 1 topping. With tax, the cost was $23 per pizza. Feeding 3 for almost $75!!!!!  Crap, no.  So, I went to get the best pizza in Vancouver at Blind Onion. A large that well fed us all for under $25.
We have been here twice. The first time was good. Bartender took REALLY long to bring us our check, considering we ate at the bar, in plain view. Went back again yesterday...wish I hadn't. The entire reason we went was so my bf could get the steak he liked before. I have never seen him send back food, but the steak he received was not just rare, but raw.  Sent it back and they brought out the same steak, still raw. Third time around they brought back the SAME steak. Of course it was done now, past the point of chewing.  Our meal was discounted in no way, which was the bummer at the end. That and the fact that all the waiters take your orders on a phone, so you have no eye contact, and you feel like your on a date with someone who is texting the whole time.  I want to like this place, but after yesterday I doubt i'll be back.
Avoid this location at all costs..advertise for deals but only for stubmembers, the place is always filthy, seats are sticky, chairs uncomfortable, and last week the tickets were $17!!! And they always have a bunch of people standing around not doing their job. You're way better off going to Marcus, Gateway,  or AMC on Kinnear.
Tried this place for the first time last night, I've been spoiled with good Indian food ~ that being said, this place was not good nor bad. The food had ok flavor, the garlic naan needed to be cooked more - it came out chewy, the food was served room temp, dirty dishes on tables when I arrived, and there were flies. Perhaps I caught them on an off day as they did have a good amount of customer activity. If there were no other Indian places close by like Mirchi and Bombay ~ I'd go there.
Nothing really stood out here. The food wasn't bad but it was nothing special either.  I had the worst dinner roll I ever had here. Completely tasteless and bland.
Sat at a table in the bar area around 3ish so it's a slow time of the day and I realize as a server you're busy getting stuff done to be ready for the dinner rush but the bartender who waited on me was really bad.  I had to repeatedly go up to the bar and ask for more water.  No, I was not slamming the water down in record time, I was drinking it at a regular pace. I was only served water that was tepid with no ice (I finally asked for ice the second time I went up for more water ).  The food took FOREVER to come out and I only ordered the bean queso and the pastor sandwich, both of which were excellent but I think I can find food that is just as good with much better service at this price range.
I will NOT stay here EVER AGAIN! First off, my hubby and I arrived at the hotel at about midnight after a long flight and took a shuttle to the wrong Hampton Inn (my fault for not confirming the address with the driver), and upon arriving to the correct hotel we were given room keys to a room that was already occupied and luckily our keys did not work, but we woke up the poor occupant. We went back downstairs and the on-duty receptionist told us that he did not check the first name on the reservation and just handed us room keys.  Then, we finally get room keys to an unoccupied room and go to sleep. Then in the morning we come to find out that the toilet although clean is not flushing properly and the sink water pressure is very low. So, we call the front desk and the same guy proceeds to ask us if we want to try unclogging the toilet with a plunger. We amuse him and say, "why not." He drops it off and doesn't stick around to see if we want to pack up and change rooms. Guess what -- the plunger doesn't do a thing to fix the flushing power. We call front desk back and tell them that we need a new room. We pack it up and go back downstairs to get a new room. He was nice enough to drop our rate down for the inconvenience.  Wait, there is more...we get a new room and all seems well for two nights except that there is no parking and the hotel is definitely being remodeled. On our last night there, we arrive back from visiting Universal Studios and our room key doesn't work. I go back downstairs to the front desk to explain. This guy takes my old keys and says they are demagnetized (Hmm, my hubby and I kept are keys separately -- how do they both get demagnetized???), plus he doesn't even check my ID and activates keys to the room number I rattle off.  Luckily, our stuff was still in the room and nobody else was occupying our room (two of our biggest fears).  I would not stay here again and hotel management will be getting a letter from me about our stay. This was by far the worst experience I have ever had at a hotel. I would rather stay at a Comfort Inn instead. Sorry Hampton, you have lost a customer for life and I will not stay at any of your hotels again.    Other Cons: Complimentary wifi did not work on my tablet, but worked on my husbands PC Breakfast offering was okay, but not great Tile on bathroom floors feels gross and slimy  Shower walls need to be replaced as the plastic is cracked and has lots of caulking Tile in reception area looked very dirty.  Pros: Clean bed, tv works, and water pressure in shower was good.
Came for drinks and apps before a movie at the Superlux next door.   We got a bottle of Malbec and an order of the shredded brussels sprouts as well as the parmesan fries (both found under the sides section of the menu).  The Brussels Sprouts were supposedly pan-fried in a little bit of bacon grease for flavor and then seasoned after. I couldn't really tell if it was bacon grease, because there was no flavor, but man, they sure were greasy. And bland. And I mean I love brussels sprouts, but these were not at all exciting to me. Would not recommend.  The parmesan fries were a bit skimpy in portion (came in a cone) and light on the parmesan, so they were basically regular fries. Nothing bad to say there.   The bottle of Malbec was fine, although the menu said it was a 2012, but when they brought it out the label said 2014, so buyer beware if that matters to you.  The bartender was there to give us refills on our waters but not enough to be obtrusive.
Gyro was soggy, pita was dried out and falling apart, and the meat tasted like old, processed, cheap, hotdog meat that has been frozen and reheated in microwave (which is how their food is warmed here). Grape leaves were not fresh, tasted like canned or just a few days/weeks old. Nothing we tried tasted good but for the baba ganoush, which was ok.   I was definitely worried about quality control issues here.
One of the absolute worst hotel stays, ever.   First- check in. Almost $30 to park for the night. Be prepared.   Second- was given the room keys to our room and sent up. We grab our children, dinner, and a few things  and head up. As soon as we walk in the door an employee is knocking at it telling us the "bed is broke" and they need to move us. Can't tell us where exactly, just that it needs to happen. On further inspection of the room we realize it's not that someone goofed up and put us in the wrong room. Don't make stuff up please. Just tell us you made a mistake. On the pro side, they let us stay and eat our dinner before moving us to a much smaller room that was not as newly refurbished or clean as the first   Third- we get to the new room and are met with what appears to be blood stains on the ottoman and hair in the bathtub. The housekeeper comes with a new ottoman when we complain, but realizes it's the wrong size so says "oh- I clean that off for you." No. Please. I do not want the blood stained ottoman cleans and then placed back in my room- just take it.   Fourth- my daughter uses the restroom and I hear a crash- the toilet paper holder's screws have literally fallen out of the wall and the holder is on the floor. She's not the Hulk here guys, she's 7.  Fifth- you may wonder why a mom is up at 2 AM writing this review? Well- it's because the walls are so paper thin and the people in the room next to us are so insanely loud and vulgar that I cannot sleep. Have to be up in three hours to finish our drive.   Not pleased. We will not ever stay here again.
TL;DR - give this place a miss.   Came in on a Groupon. Restaurant was not busy, and service was prompt. The manager running the place seemed pretty grumpy, but the waitresses were super friendly. So friendly in fact that they kept making sure we (and every other patron around us) knew that we were on a Groupon, and they had another deal that we should buy and then come back for.   The food itself was ok. The chef was bored and kept wiping his nose on his hand, gross. Some of the veggies fell into the grill trough and were picked out and served to me. The steak was a terrible cut and had been sitting for a while (raw, brown steak. Ew). The shrimp were served with the tails still on and I have no idea what kind of fish was served... some sort of fish with flat crustacean-like exoskeleton that I had to pick out of my mouth.   The fried rice was some of the best I've ever had. Best part of the meal.   The ice cream was about 3 TBsp worth, and freezer burned.   Both my dining partner and I had bad gastrointestinal distress about 90 mins after dinner.   We won't be going back.
Shady business!!  If it was possible to leave no stars, I would have.  I'm incredibly disappointed.  I've been going here for a while, but last time there was some shadiness.  My dad had just flushed my transmission fluid prior to my oil change, yet when I took it in they told me that my transmission fluid was in dire need of flushing, which I knew was a lie.  Then, this afternoon I ran in for an oil change.  I checked my oil prior to going in, and then got home and checked it again and the oil would not even register on the dipstick, which tells me that they did not refill it.   I am FURIOUS.  I called and asked for an explanation and was told that I should come back in and they would top it off.  I said I expect a refund with that.  I have not yet checked to see if they are members of the BBB but if they are I will be filing a complaint.    My dad was right--I'm better off paying a few extra bucks for a change at the dealership.
Yuk, inconsistent- can't make an "Italian" sub, even with instructions, they don't carry provolone cheese so the give you pizza cheese instead, I don't like my subs in the oven so the cheese is falling out of the sub, I order it with only pickles onions and oil, it has no oil, and is covered with lettuce and tomatoes, along with a few pickles, and chopped white onion, all different sizes, some big hunks, other small bites- yuk! Will NEVER order from there again!
Service is usually very slow. The food is sometimes cold by the time it reaches your table. I enjoy Tin Lizzy's and I love many of their options, but at this specific location, my experiences have been awful.
Same experience as others... The wait time is ridiculous. I am totally not a morning person. I made an appointment for 315PM. They told me they were about 2 hours behind. Okay, no problem. I will return in the morning at 7AM. I wait in line to be checked in... Took about 15 minutes. Was promised the oil change would take about 40-60 minutes... Almost Two hours later, I'm still up in here. In my feelings and totally aggravated.
This is supposed to be an upscale restaurant.  Like Olive Garden in Boston, they need to hire people with manners and better work ethic.  I purchased Chicken Friend Rice to go with onions. I waited 20 minutes, and got chicken fried rice with no onions, no vegetables, and just 4 small pieces of chicken.  The rice was cold.  I had to drink water to force the food down, which means it was not cooked fresh but had been sitting at room temperature for more than 2 hours.  After 2 hours, bacteria grows on food rapidly.  The food was not hot or warm, which proves it was spoiled.  I am going to complain on the company website. The african american waiter acts like he works at McDonalds.  He kept going in and out of the restaurant to talk to friends who show up outside the restaurant.  He was rude to me on my way out.  He didn't even wait on me to place the order, so not sure why..  I will not return.
What a difference service makes. I have primarily been dealing with a sweet cello player at this location. I was hunting for a new chin rest and met with a young violinist behind the repair counter. After trying two different styles she sighed and said "this is the best I can do for you, if it doesn't work you'll have to go somewhere else." Seriously? I just left the store.  I may call in advance to see who's working. Clearly I inconvenienced the violinist by walking in the door.
I should have known better than to stay at this restaurant when I walked in on a Saturday night at 6:30pm to a near empty restaurant. However, I was with a group so we stayed and were seated right away.   Considering the few patrons in, we expected the service to be quick. However, we waited over 20 minutes for our appetizers- a few salads and an order of calamari. Our entrees took another 25 minutes. I got the fish and chips, at the recommendation of the waitress who said it was a customer favorite. I've never been so disappointed. The crust was thick, the fish not fresh, and the fries soggy. My friend ordered the burger, which, thankfully they couldn't do much to mess up. You can get better food for cheaper at a 99 or Fuddruckers. All around mediocre to sub-par.   Didn't order drinks or beer, perhaps that is what keeps this restaurant open. But, I do not recommend this place if you are looking for a quality meal. Hopefully the new pub up the street -Bunrattys- will be better once it opens. The only reason I give this two stars is because our waitress was pleasant and attentive.
Food was good, service was on par with McDonald's. We ate here last night on our first trip to Boston. We are from New York and are very familiar with Arthur Ave. and Little Italy so we wanted to try out what Boston had to offer. We more or less stumbled onto the restaurant, only had to wait about 10 minutes for a table for 3, which by New York standards is nothing. Once sitting down, we were barely greeted by our server, come to think of it I'm not sure he ever told us his name, he just asked what he could get us. We ordered Filetto di Manzo al' Balsamico and 2 orders of Risotto Pescatore. The food was very good, all 3 of us finished our plates however the service will definitely keep us from ever returning. Not once were we ever asked how everything was, if we needed anything and never saw our waiter again until it was time to take payment. We twice had to flag down other servers to ask for another glass of wine and some salt and pepper.   I found it quite unprofessional that other servers were sitting in the dining room folding napkins and texting on their phones.   Even though we really wanted to have a cannoli and a cup of coffee to wrap up the night, we just were so appalled by the lack of service that we decided to cut our losses and go to the pastry shop across the street.   For a neighborhood lined with Italian restaurants, the staff needs to know how to set themselves apart to keep people coming back. For the amount of money we spent, the food wasn't enough.
We came here only after our previous visit almost a year ago, the first time we came was a very good not bland breakfast meal that we both really enjoyed. This second time I can't really seem to understand what happened to this place. We decided to start off with the apple fritters, it took so long to get to our table that at some point we though the waitress just forgot to put them in, when they finally came we took the first bite and were somewhat disappointed, I mean they were just ok. The waitress,however, did come to our table to tell us they'll take the apple fritters off the check because of the wait ( which was very nice and part of the reason I'm giving it an extra star) my girlfriend ordered the vegetarian and egg croissant that looked really appetizing at first glance, however, it was missing flavor, like all of it! I ordered the California omelet, again, it looked appetizing at first glance but took the first bite only to realized they missed one basic ingredient when cooking, salt! Ughhh! I added so much salt and pepper I felt I was cooking my meal all over again. To top it, I asked for avocado in my omelet and when I saw the bill they charged me $2 for it, I mean for 3 small pieces! Overall, with so many other places you can go have breakfast  around the area, do yourself a favor and go to Keke's or First watch for the same type of place but waaayyy better food.
Having had "the Rooster Comb" injections in my knee, I know what they do with the rest of the rooster. They sell all to Chicken Express. I ordered chicken breasts that were so  TOUGH you could not chew the meat. My son ordered the chicken livers..dry, cold, tasted old. CHEAP? Yes!  BUT not KFC or Chick Fillet quality.2 stars for sweet tea!
I have had two package deliveries not delivered to me on the expected date because of drivers who don't try. The first package was my car tags and I was at home at the time they said they tried to deliver. The leasing office was also open. The second package scheduled for delivery I was also at home and the driver said that the leasing office refused the package because of signature but the package did not require a signature! Neither time did the driver come directly to my apartment number that is listed on the packages. I have had to call both times and there is not a direct number to the location.
I've been here twice and have been really disappointed with the result both times. The experience was great, the staff was friendly, and I felt pampered, but my curls totally fell out leaving me looking ragged. My hair holds a curl really well, and I don't understand why dry bar couldn't get it right.
The very definition of a mediocre neighborhood pizza place.    Pizza is OK - a little undercooked the few times I've had it.  Subs are alright...I got a chicken parm, which is my standard order for a hot sub.  The chicken itself was high quality but the breading/seasoning was bland and the bread was disappointing.    I've also had the calzones here. It was very good but took 20 minutes to make on a dine-in order.  That's too long and emblematic of the service here - slow.  There's better out there if you look hard enough.  Or even a little bit.
This is the second time i have had this pizza. I have never enjoyed it! It's a major bummer since it is convenient when in Circle C. I had the veggie pizza and it was just gross. Not to mention the weird way they cut it! Pizza is meant to be cut in TRIANGLES not SQUARES. It has worked for centuries! (or something...) Who wants a piece of crustless greasy pizza??
I would give it  a -5 stars if I could.  Horrible service, directly from the Asian owner. Reservation was not ready when we got there on time, we were seated 15 mints late and then an hour an fifteen minutes later before all of the food we had ordered arrived, we were told that they had a 8pm reservation and we were told to leave. They cancelled our remaining orders and we still had drinks on the table. This notice came from the same Asian owner.   while the food was at par with Peruvian fusion anywhere, the portions were minute like for ants and the owner was very rude.  We had two drinks each, shared 2 appies and shared two mains and were hurried out when paying our $200 bill.  This is NOT the Peruvian/latin experience my friends were looking for (and we're all from Peru).  Para mis amigos latinos: el restaurante se llama chicha y no tenian chicha morada para beber! LOL!  Una porqueria de servicio, y la comida meh! realmente se cocina mejor en casa.  Un cuchitril pretendiendo ser un restaurante pasable, y un Pisco Sour que da pena, pondria a cualquier Peruano a llorar.  Will never come back, neither will my friends.
Came here around 6:20pm. Asked to wait about 15 minutes cool not a problem except there were plenty of seats open for 2 people. Many people came in and weren't acknowledge standing there awkwardly trying to be seated. Won't come back to this location.
The moment my family and I walked into the restaurant, we waited for a minute or so before anyone acknowledged we were there. When we were finally greeted, the employee told us he'll be right with us as he walked into the bathroom. Another couple minutes went by until another employee asked how many were in our party. We told her how many then told us to wait until she determined what seats were available. 90% of the seats in the restaurant were available. When she came back, she seated another couple who came in after us with us standing right in front of her.  Customer service is a dying art-form. This illustrates just how bad it's gotten. We walked out and we won't be going back -- ever. Perhaps this kind of service is why 90% of the restaurant was empty.
Just not good.  Weird menu.  Had fish and chips. Tacos.   A really wide range of food from different cultures.  Seem confused on what kind of restaurant they want to be.  Service super slow and not great.  I had to ask 6 times for condiments and finally got up and got them myself so I could eat my lower than average food.  Bottom line go to another restaurant.
Poor quality lunch all you can eat. Tempura is not fresh. BBQ Chicken is not too bad.  Not recommend
This is the worse bbt place I been to, no surprising taste. Original milk tea is too strong too sweet even asked for half sweet. Their sesame tapioca milk is too plain no other taste beside milk and only the tapioca taste like sesame but it's not a strong taste of sesame just feel only 5%taste of sesame in the tapioca. I can say if we want to make this drink we can make it at home just pour milk and add tapioca and make our own pearls.   The service is okay for soft opening I wouldn't judge but I did line up for 1.5 hours to order my drink and the female cashier doesn't even understand at all and I already know what I wanna order. She horrible in math and English as well. So her coworker have to give her a hand and helped her. People at our back was kinda pissed off becuz we took long time well not our fault ad we know what to order only that cashier kept did it wrong on the pos and calculate wrong and all that stuff. I wouldn't go back.  Rather go to other bbt places. For handcraft pearls boba has that too I'm not surprised. They use same machine as well.
The staff was very rude and short with me. The website told me I could return the car at 3pm Saturday, but turns out they aren't open then, and that I could drop off the keys in the box but will be charged for an extra day, as well as a late fee. When I asked about this over the phone, the woman confirmed that the website booking does not actually correspond to their rules and procedures. I was obviously upset by this and the woman on the phone hung up on me after repeatedly telling me "that's just how it is". We called back, and she told me to look at my contract, which I did... but there was nothing in there about it, and then she told me not to call again... This is second time out of two (in separate locations) that Hertz has acted unprofessionally and shady. I will never use them again.
Where to start?  This is my first time writing a Yelp review, but I had such a terrible experience with Budget I felt compelled to write.  I thought I would wait awhile prior to writing a review, since I wanted to be sure I was being fair and not writing based on my immediate reaction.  Back on January 23rd, I rented a car from Budget at the Orlando airport.  Despite having a reservation, I had to wait in line for an hour due to the lack of attendants.  I was informed my car was not available but for a little extra I could upgrade my vehicle, which I did.  I was told the car was new and I would be one of the first to drive it.  Shortly after I left the airport, I noticed the battery light was flashing, but the battery monitor on the dashboard was indicating the battery was charged.  After a couple of days, I called Budget regarding the battery and was told they would send roadside assistance to look at the problem, but I would need to pay if they were able to resolve the problem without having to bring the car in for a repair.  Now, why would I need to pay for a problem with their car that I did not cause?  Simple, I did not purchase the roadside assistance insurance, which does not make sense. So, the next day I went to a nearby Budget to see if I could exchange the car and was told they did not have another car available, but I could drive it back to the airport for an exchange.  When I described the problem, I was told the car was in "demonstration" mode, which is also the reason the radio keeps resetting and the car door would not unlock using the key fob.  He said it's not really a problem, but I would not be able to use all of the functions of the car.  So, basically I upgraded to a car where the battery light kept coming on and I was not able to use the key fob or enjoy the full functions of the car.  I told the attendant the problem when I dropped the car off, but she said she had never heard of the problem and seemed disinterested.  I would not recommend renting from Budget.  Overall bad experience.
My 15 friends and I were super excited to celebrate a weekend away together and decided to have dinner and drinks at the Gnarly Gar on our first night. We rented a great townhouse on the lake within walking distance to the marina and restaurant. Unfortunately some of our friends had to finish their work week before heading here from Dallas. It was late when they arrived but we were all super hungry and ready to get out together and listen to some live music and have some cocktails to celebrate our getaway.  The Gnarly Gar was super cute on the outside but their staff could learn some hospitable manners. Our table of 16 was approached by a staff member that said "our kitchen closes at 11.  You don't want to be those people that order 3 minutes before closing, right."   I've worked in the service industry for 20 plus years and I've never turned a customer down for food service before my restaurant closed.  We were told we could stay for drinks but my group already had plenty of cocktails at the house.  I can't believe they turned down such a huge table with such a horrible attitude.  The Gnarly Gar was by far the worst experience of our trip here.
Wooden, sticky, loud, crowded, beer-spilling, loud obnoxious Irish music-playing place.   Beware.  You must be extraordinarily drunk to enjoy.
Typical American attempt at recreating authentic Mexican food.  House-made tortillas from their carefully selected corn varieties were rubbery.  Pork was dry (carnitas & pastor), and without additional salsas available to dress the tacos.  Cocktail was tasty.  Prices are shamefully high for what was served ($6 for 3 ounces of salsa and chips).  Service was friendly, though inattentive and generally slow.   No thanks.  I'd take a real taqueria 1,000 times before returning here.  But if you're in the neighborhood and want an overpriced margarita, this is your spot.
What a rip off. 17 bucks for parking, 16,50 for the ticket and 20 bucks for some popcorn and two cokes. Not worth it at all.....
It's got decor straight out of the 80's. Shady characters and horrible service. But some of the food is decent, like the chicken wings and bone in ribs. Plus the entertainment value of watching people who can't sing try to do Karoke is hilarous!
Pie=Crust+Filling You can make delicious fillings with local ingredients  but if you put them into shoe leather like crust it's at best a three star product, with a heaping scoop of attitude ala mode from the staff it drops to two stars Random Attitude Pie Bar.
I arrived at this restaurant with a party of 6, waited almost 1 hour for our food. the server kept telling us there was a big order in front of us; however, the restaurant was not busy at all. Finally half of our order arrived....and 10 minutes later the server took the plates out of the table and apologized because there was a mistake and gave us the wrong order. 2 minutes later the manager apologizes saying "the server never took your order, I apologize. Have a great night." Basically he kicked us out of the restaurant. Awful service!!!!!!
It's been a few years since I went here. Used to be good. But tonight was easily one of the worst taco salads with chicken that I have ever eaten. There was no seasoning to the dish, and the lettuce didn't seem fresh. The salad was in a taco shell/bowl and was placed lopsided onto a large piece of lettuce that made the presentation look haphazard. My mom's plate of ground beef enchiladas looked as unappealing as mine dish. The service was also lacking. I hate to say it, but I don't think I'll be back.
This place is like everyone other "faux Irish Bar" in Boston - same smell, same people, same music. The only redeemable quality is they often have cheap beer specials.  I would reccomend this bar as a place to go after work if you are looking to drink for $10 before you really go out.
This place can't seem to decide between being a sushi joint with OK food and low prices and being a moderately upscale restaurant with high quality food and charging for it. What you end up getting is a "meh" sushi and dining experience for a "whoa" price (not in a good way).   The dining area is nice on the surface - even if they're using projectors against bare walls for the decor - but the tables wobble, the chopsticks are cheap/disposable, and the bathroom is in some serious need of repair. We ordered the sushi/sashimi combo for two, which ultimately wasn't enough, so we followed it up with a combo for one.   The maki was put together well and fairly tasty, but the nigiri not so much; the rice on a few pieces seemed to be two distinct and separate clumps. The overall quality of the fish was fine, but not great. For roughly the same price, the sushi at (for example) Genki Ya is of much higher quality.   One redeeming factor is the service. The hostess was a charm, and our waiter was attentive without being overbearing. Wine was a very heavy pour, even if served too warm.   Overall, it's ok, but you'll get a better value elsewhere.
So, I really love this gym. It is a convenient location, and they have everything I need for a well rounded work out. However, their pool hasn't been cleaned in months. It's gross.
I was excited to check this place out. Maybe my expectations were too high, but the whole park looked a little run down. The topiary plants all had stray branches growing and needed a good clipping. Some of them had half of the wire frameworks exposed. It looked like it's been abandoned for months. If it was any other time of the year, I would blame it on the season. But...it's SUMMER! It should look its best now. I see alot of potential, or maybe a glimpse of its past glory, but now it looks a little sad. Hopefully, the city will take better care of this park.
Well, it's re-opened.  Stopped in today just to see what changed had been made by the new ownership.  It does look nicer with the new furniture, tables, carpet, etc.  They do need to figure out their service issues though.  The bartender/server/owner gal was often MIA for a mid afternoon crowd that should be easy to service at best.  Also, they do not have Root Sports, so don't go expecting to watch a Mariners or Timbers game.....but the gal said no one in the areas had Root Sports....a myth I quickly dispelled for her.  I can't  offer an opinion of the food they serve, if any, as there was never a menu offered to our table.  I get it, the ownership is new....I'll try them again in a month or so to see if they have figure out their service issues...............
Gigantic fail on putting a tent over the main entrance for smokers to force their filthy habit on all your customers. I'm fairly certain that's illegal. I hate to think what goes on behind the counter at Mojoe that their turnover is so high. I don't think I've ever gone here and NOT seen the for hire sign up. The food on the restaurant side is mediocre usually, but reasonably priced, especially for the area. The patio, as some others have stated, is quite nice, if for no other reason than size alone. And finally, big kudos on managing to put a Starbucks out of business. That's a commendable feat.
Very, very poorly run and equally disappointing produce. There were numerous problems with getting my delivery and when I would get it, I'd have to throw out part of it because it was rotten and moldy.
Now that I have lived in Orlando a while and learned a few things I can't say I am as impressed with Homegrown as I used to be.  Here's a tip--if you want fresh, mostly local produce simply swing by Clemons Produce and get a ton of fresh veggies and Amish dairy and eggs on the cheap.  Last time I was there I stuffed a cart for under $30.00.  You can also try discount chain Aldi which now offers organic produce and gluten free options, much cheaper than Trader Joe's and certainly Whole Paycheck.   Their "gourmet" food line is awesome as well.  I like the no frills shopping experience and they have really stepped up their game since I was last there.   I have yet to go (but will soon) but friends assure me Fresh Fields is not only awesome, with locally raised meats and produce, but also cheap!  Their website looks promising, with locally raised meats, fish, dairy, veggies.    Homegrown doesn't sell any kind of fish (a major part of my diet) and is SUPER EXPENSIVE!  Um, $8.00 for eggs????? No.  Unless you are committed to the food coop mission ( and there is nothing wrong with that ) and have money to burn, I say skip Homegrown.  The beauty of Florida is that fresh produce is easy to find!
I came here with my family after traveling 6+ hours from the West Coast. We visited this restaurant because we were starving after our flight. First it felt like it took 10 minutes just to get to the drive through because of the turns and crazy exits and entrances. Secondly, we ordered our food and had to wait an extra 15 min to get it because they didn't have grilled chicken ready. When we got our food, it was cold and they didn't even include a fork so I couldn't eat my salad. I am NOT happy and will not return to this establishment. (Btw I did not go back to get my fork because of the hassle.)
The food was OK but I've definitely had better Dim Sum that was at a more reasonable price.  This was the most expensive Dim Sum that we've experienced so far.  Service was slow but staff was friendly and pretty funny.
I honestly don't know why people like this place so much. The only thing decent was our waiter the first five minutes we were here until he went and sat and talked to a customer the rest of the visit. Waited 35 minutes for food that was still frozen. Save yourself time and money and walk next door to trader joes and get a prepackaged meal.
This is probably the worst Taco Bell I've ever been to. Severely under-staffed, they are extremely slow! I have a feeling this location will shut down soon unless new management comes in or more people are hired. Food seems fine (for Taco Bell), but as a fast food restaurant you expect your food In a timely manner, and that's where they fail miserably.
So I went here to get a teeth cleaning.  The process was pretty much as any other dentist.  But when I got to the chair the lady, I'm thinking the dental assistant, makes a suggestion to the dentist about what should be done to my teeth.  Then the doctor saids its unnecessary, and they get into an argument right in front of me while I am still sitting on the chair.  I mean come on, how unprofessional is that?  Anyways, b/c of this experience I give them 2 stars.
Totally disappointing, at least for this price point. It's a weird in-between tapas and a (fulll) dish, that ends being none of the two. We ordered about 10 "dishes" most of them only OK, not really tasty. Portions were small, and the dishes came with odd delays (the first one about 10 min. or more before the next!). Everybody in our party left quite unhappy, even surprised. We all love fusion and ethnic food, and here there was clearly an attempt at this, but objectively it just did not work well. Sorry for not being more positive, but except for a nice greeter, even the service was poor!
I brought my mother here for breakfast on her birthday. We were really excited to try something new! We walked in and stood there waiting to be seated. We were not sure if we could seat ourselves or not? Finally one waitress points to the corner of the restaurant, so we went and sat down. I ordered the Eggs Benedict and my mom ordered a German Pancake. My food took about 25 mins, it was brought to our table. I waited for my moms order to come but it took FOREVER! She felt bad and told me to go ahead and eat, so I did. By the time I was done my moms order came! (Her order took about 50 mins) The waitress didn't say a thing! I would have like to hear "I am so sorry for the wait.. etc." But nothing was said which made me really frustrated! It was my moms special day and I felt so bad! I didn't say anything b/c I didn't want to embarrass my mom! I think the waitress could tell I was upset by the look on my face but she still acted like everything was fine.. Disappointed in the service here, don't think I will be back!
Terrible customer service. I received the wrong medical equipment. When I went to the store for the second time to exchange it, the employee was rude when I didn't have the bag it came in. When I responded to her, she called me rude.  Her comment was "you're wicked friendly." I have shared this negative experience with my physician office, insurance company, and will also be sharing with my patients (since I work as a home health clinician) about my poor experience and customer service so otherws can be warned about terrible service.  Would not recommend this place unless you are looking for wrong equipment, rude employees, and to be insulted.
Found a bone in my daughters chicken strips. Manager came to apologize but thy didn't take it off the bill. She could've choked!  When we got the bill our waitress didn't come back to take our payment for over 10 minutes. We had to walk out and ask someone else to take payment. Waitress saw us but didn't even say anything. Mussels were also way over cooked. Needless to say we will not be coming back
They've missed the mark.  The food is overpriced, tasted frozen, and took forever to come out.  And to top it off, you'll get ants in the sugar and in the salt. Delicious...NOT.
Writing from Inside the venue.  Been here almost 3 hrs.  Tried to get a reservation, but bottle service ($250) took precident.  Got a table eventually.  Took 30 minutes for someone to bus it and get us menus.  20 more minutes to order.  Over an hour later we were still waiting on the food we ordered and were informed that the kitchen was modified to wings and fries only.  All of the bottle svc tables had gotten their food and such.  All we got was a visit with apologies every 25 minutes.  Great place for music and drinks or hookah, but terrible service if you don't spend for the bottle service.  Smh  Update: just after I finished the review, the servers came out and comped our food because it had been lost in the kitchen.  All we paid was $10 for the drinks.  I appreciate the gesture and the correction, but I will not be back
If you want to eat here be prepared for an extremely long wait. It took forever for our orders to be taken and even longer for our food to arrive. Nearly an hour overall!   The food was just alright and the portions were small.   Honestly not very worth it unless you don't want to drive far, want Thai food, and are not super hungry.
We went there for a night cap last night. Arriving at about 1 a.m. the place was nearly dead with only about 10 other patrons in the bar. The bartender was quick to get to us and I had a delicious Serra Nevada pale ale. The biggest complaint I would have is after last call the bar tender came over to us and said he needed to take the glasses so we needed to finish up immediately and then proceeded to go over to the other side of the bar and top off another person's (I assume his friend) beer. Left me with a bit of a pissed off feeling.  The ambiance of this place is cool. Some have said it is a bit pretentious with the low lights and trying to be trendy huge purple velvet couch/booth that expands long enough to provide seating for three tables worth of people. I agree that it is probably a bit pretentious but also kinda neat to look at in an Alice in Wonderland kind of way when you have already had a few to drink.  The music was good too. Some reggae funk playing audibly but not super loud was good background music.   Overall a good place for a drink and some conversation with friends but this would not be a full weekend night destination.
Fortunately, it was short-lived.... but my husband and I both had stomach cramps and what comes with that 2 hours after eating here. Sigh..... we were so excited to try it as our first attempt resulted in a 2-hour wait that we just weren't willing to do. Our waitress was great. Decor is fun. The drinks were too sweet for our taste and who wants breakfast at 2:30pm without a lunch option.  Disappointed but will try dinner after we get beyond this first experience.
Went here with a group of friends for St. Patrick's day... Expecting an Irish pub playing classic rock I walked in with a DJ playing crappy hip hop music and the god awful music called raggaeton and strobing lights! I didn't realize that it was a night club. Went to the bathroom; it smelled like straight PISS. Which I was disgusted by because it's also a restaurant during the day. The DJ kept on telling people to request songs; which was pretty annoying.  I wanted to ask him if he had ever heard of this thing called top 40. The bartenders seemed a little annoyed to be there and i was given a little attitude when i was asking for my drinks. Bouncers were rude although some were nice. There was also a LOT of trashy and creepy people there too!!!   If your looking to see trashy people grind up on each other and listen to crappy hip hop music. Then this is your place to be!
2 stars - when i arrived there were only 3 people working. i decided to get a pedicure and started looking for a color. i noticed that all the polishes were very old (they had yellowed and there was separation at the top of the polish - usually makes the polish very sticky and hard to use) i waited over an hour in the chair while my friend got her toes done. the water went cold. i decided to get the $45 pedicure that has 4 steps. they offered beverages which was nice, and she gave good leg and feet massages. after, i ran some other errands and decided to go for a run when i got home (2 or 3 hours after the service) once i took my shoes and socks off, my polish had stuck to my socks... because it was an old polish it never dried (and they didn't put me under any light to dry the toes) i also felt my feet and calluses were still extremely rough!!! will not be going back. i've had way better pedicures for much less.
I'm very disappointed to have spent my money here for my first tattoo removal session. It hurt more than I can possible describe and it did absolutely nothing!!! I thought something wasn't right with my results so I had a consult at Beleza MedSpa where Iris told me that the most amount of ink should come out in the first session. Whereas the girl at Mad Dog told me I would need 2-3 sessions to see anything!!! I had my second session at Beleza where they used a much stronger numbing cream, and ice throughout the procedure, making it 27 times less painful than at Mad Dog!!! There is a HUGE difference in results as well. And... I payed less at Beleza too! Mad Dog I'm sorry to publicly bash you like this, but you did me wrong :(
We were stuck for about 30 minutes. Not exactly a great experience. No guest recovery whatsoever.
Whatever you do - DO NOT RENT FROM THIS COMPANY. They go out of their way to provide bad service. To begin: We waited over an hour for the shuttle. We tried calling to find out why it was taking so long and no one answered.  We finally arrived at ACE to be told that our car was given to someone else an hour ago (while we were standing at the airport stupidly waiting for the shuttle) and there were no cars left. We could still see our car (a minivan to accommodate our family of five) sitting in the parking lot. After I threw a fit, they scrounged up a pickup truck for us. However, we couldn't even rent that because they wouldn't take cash or a credit card that also functions as a debit card (both of my credit cards also function as debit cards). By this time it was 2 a.m. and we had to call a cab to take us to our hotel (the ACE agent called us a "car service" that never showed up. Fortunately we had wised up at this point and got our own cab.) I even tried to buy a bottle of water from their vending machine - and yes, you guessed it, it was empty (the vending machine took both cash and debit cards). When our cab arrived to save us, we couldn't find the exit. It was like being stuck in a very bad service nightmare....
Delicious food, ridiculously slow!!!  Went here with a group if friends before a bowling event. The portions are huge and well priced, but the wait was ridiculous. We had reservations, so we were seated immediately--ordered within about 15 minutes. Almost 2 hours later, the food came out. Yummy, but not worth the wait.
I have been a Member of all three of the big gym chains in Portland and this gym is by far the absolute worst.  My reasons are pretty simple this place compared to Bally's (MY FAVORITE) and 24 Hour Fitness (SLIGHTLY PUSHY) is that you CONSTANTLY have to put up with absolutely insane sales pressure both from the sales men and from the personal trainers.  Don't even get me started on the prices for Personal Training at this place they price by unit not by the hour a UNIT is exactly a half hour which means you pay the same price for a half hour at LA that an hour cost's at Bally and the trainers are absolute dimwits with so little training that I know more than they do.  The main reason I joined here was for the Swimming Pool which is another joke deepest part is 4.5 feet and 3, count, em 3 aqua classes a week by someone who is not qualified to teach aqua classes and being that I work only 1 of those classes is at a time that I might be able to come in considering the price I am being charged there should be a minimum of a class every day with a qualified instructor.  I finally got fed up and sent in my resignation on January 4th 2010 and sadly I will have to pay for one more month before I am quit of this place.  If you are looking for a place in the Pearl go to the 24 hour fitness the trainers are qualified yes they are slightly pushy but they are much nicer and they know what they are doing or better yet come and join me at the Yamhill Bally's in Downtown Portland where all the trainers are certified and won't try to rip you off.  By the way 1 star is to much for this place they made so many promises that they did not keep and when you make a simple request like a Time Clock for the Swimming Pool and they tell you sorry that is not in the club budget when EVERY other club with a pool has one is asinine.  Also this place costs 3 times as much as what I am paying at Bally's I will be so glad to finally leave this gym.
Horrible experience , bought a yelp deal and the restaurant said they don't honor it although it's still valid . They asked me to take up the issue with Yelp.
This is the WORST Panera. I work nearby and they never have anything ready in the morning, ESPECIALLY the Souffle's. I have tried all different times and they never have them. They are are always just in the oven "ready in 10-15" minutes. Who has has time to stand and wait. Don't bother trying to get a hot breakfast Souffle' at this place. OH and "Sorry Dude" is not way to keep customers happy.
Don't bother getting any bubble tea here. You'll be paying $3.70 watered down flavored drinks. The mochi ice cream on the other hand is the only good product on the menu. Lychee, green tea, and chocolate coconut are three delicious flavors. This is a first and last time for sure.
Super cool concept and experience, but I thought that the taste was lacking. I personally found the shell to be very thick and a little too sweet, which ended up overpowering the vanilla soft serve underneath it. The vanilla soft serve also melted very quickly, and the more I ate away at the shell, the quicker the vanilla soft serve dripped down the cone. I unfortunately was unable to finish the cone as it was just too sweet for me.
If you love day old donuts and blaring heavy metal, this is your place.  The donuts look amazing but aren't better than Donut Palace or Shipley's.
Saturday evening, 10:30pm, closed. No explanation. We've given this place several chances to improve, but sadly this is probably our last visit.
My sofa arrived at around 9:00 PM on Sunday, August 2.  The delivery guys told me that they were contractors, not directly employed by Mor. This explains a lot because it means that Mor has virtually no control over these delivery guys and their schedules. They also made up some story about how they misinterpreted the code for my sofa and thought it was a sectional that was missing a piece. I have no idea what that means, but that clearly indicates that the story about my sofa being "damaged" from the previous day was BS. I am not adding stars to this review because baseline customer service means (1) doing what you say you're going to do (e.g. deliver on time), and (2) responding to customers in a reasonable and timely manner (e.g., not calling them back or giving them updates on their delivery is unacceptable).   Delivering my sofa without drama and delay is standard customer service. If you want additional stars, then deliver exceptional service, not substandard service.
I'll break down the experience I had here during a busy lunch hour:  1) AMBIANCE: The good. The restaurant is very beautiful--marble floors, high ceilings, very art deco. I was not bothered by the sounds of the train, as other reviewers have noted.   2) SERVICE: Our server, while quite nice and checking in frequently, messed up our order quite badly. We ordered an appetizer and two panini, one with a side salad and one with fries. No appetizer ever appeared, and both paninis came with salads. We couldn't wait for them to make an appetizer/fries, since we were on a pretty tight schedule.   3) FOOD: Not bad, but not great. The panini was greasy but perfectly edible. It needed salt--the only problem being that Sulmona doesn't have regular salt shakers. They have little bowls with tiny spoons to dish out your salt, and these I found quite impossible to use without covering the table with salt. I didn't mind, but it must be a headache for the people who need to clean the place.  BOTTOM LINE: I'd definitely be willing to come back, once I see more consistent reviews about the food quality. As it stands right now, I won't be returning. What a shame!
It makes me sad to write this, because I was very excited about this place. I didn't mind the mix up that meant a long wait for our food. I was really disappointed that the entire meal lacked flavor.
30 minute wait for to-go wings (okay technically 27 min from order to getting bag) on a non crowded night. Celery was forgotten and when the wings came they weren't even hot. Ordered 25 wings which came out to about $25 and technically only received 23 1/2 wings. I know the place is new but the manager was too busy watching the game to even notice what was going on which was extra frustrating. I will try again and if it improves I will be back to update review.
I bought a beautiful and fairly large birthday cake (on the cheap $22! WOW) garnished with berries and melon balls that seemed to be dusted with powdered sugar and fuzzy bliss.  It had a strawberry glaze covering the fluffy yellow cake. It was called the "Fruit Cake".  Happy Birthday, Mom.  We did the whole song and candles.  Right around when cake-cutting time was about to start.  My cousin stopped the centuries year old ritual with, "Noo! The fruits are moldy!"  The fuzzy bliss was mold.. and the powdered sugar was also mold in disguise.  How embarrassing.  To save the night, we drove in the flooding rain to the nearest Cheesecake Factory and bought another cake.  Happy Birthday, Mom - Take 2.  Perhaps I should've taken the red flag as a warning when several years before I've saw a ham/cheese roll with a dead fly inside the packaging on display.  Seeing their cakes seemed more trustworthy.. I came back and had this experience.  Don't let it happen to you.  Check for mold and flies before purchasing here.
I'm not quite sure why this place is rated so highly. I don't know if my take out experience was a fluke or what but I am highly disappointed.   My husband and I decided to give this place a try for the first time, tonight, and ordered it to go. We got the supreme with no mushrooms. Anyway- my husband got home with the pizza and I pulled out the first slice. I tried to bite it, but couldn't because it was so floppy and soggy that I had to strain my neck in order to get it into my mouth. It was literally bent at a ninety degree angle in my hand. I would even venture to say that the dough was raw, except for the edge crust and the toppings were sliding off. I actually had to put it back into my oven to make it edible. I took photos as well because I am shocked at how terrible this pizza was. It was equivalent to eating a beef flavored, lukewarm wet towel. I gave it a two instead of a one because the topping were cooked and my salad was good.   I'm a huge pizza lover and hope that this was a one time mistake for Chianti's.
If I could give this place zero stars, I would. I was in Atlanta for 10 days (I live in Seattle) and my brand new (a month old) Samung Galaxy S6 just stopped working one day while I was navigating in my car - I could hear it making noises but the screen just stopped working. So I took it here - they inspected it and said there was no physical damage and that they could fix it for me before my flight out 3 days later. I called them repeatedly the day of my flight and they didn't answer or return my calls. Apparently the part hadn't come in.   Fast forward a week (I'm back in Seattle now) and they still haven't called me, so I call them and ask what's up. They said they STILL don't have the part to fix it - sorry but this is a SAMSUNG REPAIR CENTER - how do you not have screens to the most popular samsung phones AT THE REPAIR CENTER? But I talked to the girl who worked there and she said they'd be happy to ship my phone to me once they get the part in and fix it.  So I wait another week. Then I call (they have officially had my phone for over 2 weeks at this point) and they tell me that they found a tiny crack invisible to the naked eye on my phone which voids the warranty. I have never dropped my phone or anything, and I kept a case and glass screen protector over it. It was in PERFECT condition. I seriously cannot believe the experience I have had with Samsung. I have a sheet of paper they signed confirming there is no physical damage to my phone and now they are saying there is - clearly this damage happened sometime during the TWO WEEKS they had my phone without calling me. Oh and no, I still don't have my phone back.  Edit: After a lot of angry phone calls they agreed to fix my phone in-warranty and ship it to me. Still get 1 star from me though. They've lost a Samsung customer for life.
This group has plastered their marketing stickers all over public property in NW Austin. Shameful.
ok, the haircut wasnt that great! i went there because it was rated best long hair haircut!!!! she did nothing special....not worth the $$$
Horrible place.  Ozzie cut my hair.  He cut way too much hair and my hair is ruined!  He  cut my bangs all the way from my crown.  He used the shears and cut my bangs too deep and then the owner tried to fix it and it's terrible.  I was almost in tears!  I told the owner my frustrations and he still charged me.  He showed no remorse and even said my hair was already messed up.
We grabbed takeout and got the basics--chicken tikka masala, lamb tikka masala, saag paneer, and some dal, along with rice and naan.  The medium spiciness that we asked for was mild at best and my chicken tikka tasted of burnt plastic [!!!!!]--not a good taste and made me feel ill after eating it--this was a huge turn off.  We also ordered 2 orders of naan and it was very skimpy--we assumed they forgot one of our orders.  The mango lassi is now served from packaged bottles--we will probably not order them again.  As I was visiting in Boston, I've had much better experiences with Indian food in California and probably would go further down Centre Street to look for something else to eat.  It was basic Indian fare and the others in my party seemed to enjoy the other dishes [the only reason I gave them a second star], but that taste of burnt plastic from the chicken tikka really soured my experience.
This place deserves no stars!! Horrible customer service.  I waited 50 mins in line because they only had to reps n when I finally got called u don't even get an apology for the wait.  Then they were trying to tell me that my reservation through a third party app is not guaranteed.  They wanted to charge me extra for mileage at .25/ miles because I'm a FL resident even though my reservation said unlimited.  Then he said for $30 more u get unlimited. We ended up walking out n not getting a rental.  This place is a scam!
I've had this misfortune of dining here a few times, and the food hasn't disappoint since the first time I come because I knew the food would be shitty. Right from the get-go, I could tell that this place sucked due to the fact thata MEXICAN taquaria uses flour tortillas (American) instead of authentic corn tortillas. Not to mention the lack of service. The brilliant server decided to not write down our order, checked on us our times (drink order, food order, brought our food, and the check). People come for the food but they also come back for the service, so I don't understand why the GM would allow such mediocre service. Please close your doors, which will within the next year or two, so a better, more deserving restaurant could take your sorry ass place. You have multiple locations to rob people of their money and time.
Bleh....save your money not worth it. The chicken is not cooked "well done". All chicken must be thoroughly cooked ! And the sides taste soo artificial; omg like freeze dried, add water and heat type "food". The sauces are tasty, I tried them all. But...other than that, will not return. Ever...
We wanted to have one last nice dinner before our baby arrived and thought this place would be it. The young guy who sat us asked if we were celebrating anything and we said baby moon. He said that was lame. Really? Are you 8 years old? Next time just say congrats and filter the rest out in you head. So that ruined the start of our date. Our server was great and salad buffet was delicious. The meat was on the over seasoned and on the salty side. They charge for soda refills, who still does that? Overall when we got the bill and it came to $140 with tip we decided it was not worth it for our experience. The floor manager did come over to see things were good but we really did not feel like stopping dinner to complain to him. Damage was already done with the guy who sat us. We get better customer service at home in Wisconsin.
Bad service. Waiting for long time to order while the  waitresses just heading down playing the phone and chatting with each other. No one come to add water. Waitress speak to customers in bad manners and seems angry all the time about something. Didn't enjoy at all.
Customer service was excellent but the food there is horrible for my opinion maybe I ate too much but as soon as I got home I threw everything up
Unless you have an hour to wait for food, I'd avoid this place until they figure out how to run a restaurant.
We went in for lunch. This place looks great and upscale but don't be fooled. They've spent their money and time on decor instead of food. For a low-end cheap diner the food is edible but if you expect anything beyond that you'll be disappointed. The food is bland and unimaginative and my chicken was partially burnt. There's a reason why Cafe Luna next door is overflowing and people wait over half an hour to get a table and Sulmona is half-empty on a Monday morning. Wait for a table at Luna, it's cheaper and the food is actually good.
Very confused by the 4-star rating.  I don't write too many reviews, especially bad ones, and especially for dive bars, but this was disappointing.  First, Yelp lists the place as "good for groups" -  I came here with about 15 work colleagues on a Wed night and were placed in a high traffic area, standing around a couple of small bistro tables.  Floorspace was cramped, and even though it didn't feel particularly busy, the waitstaff was awkwardly tripping over us all night.  We were constantly underfoot and drink orders were missed or significantly delayed several times.  The place was ridiculously warm for a March evening.  The ceilings are low and things got unbearably hot and stuffy really quick.    Finally, $9 for a harpoon after factoring in auto gratuity for being a large group... even though standing room only, crappy "service," and only a few apps ordered among 15 people.   What a waste.
Grotto has a lovely atmosphere but the services was less than desirable, plus the food was lacking in some areas (seasoning).  My friend and I went last night for a simple dinner and once we walked in there wasn't a host or waiter in sight. It didn't help that there wasn't a host table. After 10 minutes of standing and watching the current dinners, a waitress finally walked out. She first asked us how many and preceded to ignore us for the gentleman behind us. She clearly had her own priorities. Once seatted, she was not friendly from the beginning. Although we did nothing to deserve such treatment, other than sitting down.  She took our drink orders, they tasted great. However, when she took down our entree orders, as she took back the menus, asked again what we order. She could care less at that point. Halfway through our meal we could clearly hear her complaining about our table from around the corner. I could not be more insulted by this. But I guess it was better for us because, at least we got treated better from the other waitress who took our table from her. I've had much better service and food from other restaurants in the area.
This bar is one of the WORST in Buckhead. I've visited 3 times and each time has been a terrible experience. The 60 year old bouncer was beyond rude. He attempted to search my bag by pulling on it and yanking it from my shoulder.  This was after several women had walked in before me - all with purses that were not searched. Later in the night he noticed a friend of mine with his hat on backwards and left his door post and entered the bar to yell at him to turn it around. Pretty sure preventing someone underage from entering the bar is more important than getting someone to flip their hat bill. After leaving the bar I politely questioned the reason behind the hat rule to which he had no answer. "It's just the rule."  They now have a bathroom attendant in the ladies restroom - who instructed me to leave my drink on the bathroom floor outside of the stall instead of bringing it in with me. Not only dose that break the golden rule of never leaving your drink unattended but what about the obvious disgusting floor on which she wanted me to leave my drink?!? I refused and she continued to become verbally aggressive. Other than the rude staff the bar is filthy and overcrowded - not recommended for someone of class.
This review is for the Market Place only.   The food is good. I've gotten the chicken parm panini and it's very good, however, it's very very light on the sauce. I am not a huge fan of red sauce, and even I found myself buying extra because without it, the sandwich is a little dry. But still, very good. The *best* part are the homemade potato chips with rosemary that come with.  I made a point to even ask if I could buy a bag separately in the future, and was told I could.   One night I bought sandwiches to go for the fam, and was severely disappointed (and embarrassed) that the take out girl did not put chips in the bag with the sandwiches, even though she did tell me that they come with all sandwiches. I know this is a  little thing, but I'm obsessed with them and was really looking forward to enjoying them. Not cool, TK.   All in all, food is good, potato chips (if you're lucky enough to get them) are phenomenal, but it's very expensive for a sandwich and there are better options out there for a lunch/dinner. And don't forget to get extra sauce. Maybe you can ask for them to add it to the sandwich? I just bought a container of it.
RUDE SERVERS! A middle-aged female server was taking our drink order and I guess we did not answer fast enough. So she very clearly said "I'm waiting" with attitude. I'm sorry we inconvenienced you by walking in the door and eating at your restaurant. It won't happen again. I would give zero stars if it were an option.
Fourth time coming , second time being completely displeased.   Service was very very displeasing food came out I asked for grilled onions they bring me raw and when I specifically notate it when she took my order to make sure he grills the onions then she brings me back burned onions as a replacement.   I come to understand where I'm not wanted.  #Donkeyoftheday
We have been using mears luxury transportation for several years. Always have had a great experience.  Good drivers with professional manners.  But,this time Mears screwed up. We booked our return driver before we left Orlando for Costa Rica. So, Mears knows we are going to go through customs and immigration returning, as they have our flight number. Plane was late taking off, so I  emaiked Mears as to that. We got through custons fast. And went to tge escalator to baggage where the drivers have Ipads with names of clients. There were3 drivers there. But, none withour name or a Mears driver. I stepped aside to get my cell out of my bag to call Mears. As we did not receive a call from the driver, as usual. So, I  had no one to call but Mears customer service.  It took 3 calls to get any help.  Wewent to transportation on the ground floor looking for our driver. Finally,  the dispatcher called, and the the sriver, Louis called. He wad somewhere parked in a private area. He came and got us, and we had to go back up an elevator,  then back down an elevator to tge car. He said he had called and texed me. But, I  bever received.  We finally found out that Mears gave him an incorrect number. One digit off. In the cofushion, l lost my 2 bottles of 12 year old rum. And, being sooo late. We were not able to oick up our pet before they closed, and cost us another  $45. So, $62 for the car,  $66 for my rum, and $45 for ny dog boarding. Mears, you owe me $173 !  I doubt if I  willeven hear from them.
This place gets a zero out of five. I had an  appointment at 10, at 1045 I still haven't seen a dentist yet. Thank god I wasn't in alot of pain. Never coming back.
I am having a hard time even giving this one star. My husband booked a spring break getaway for us. We are IHG Platinum members and used a lot of points to stay for the week. When we went to check in we were told the only room left was a king. This is not what we requested. We requested a double. We had three people in our party.  We were told it was the ONLY room left. We arrive to the room and it smells moldy. The fire alarm is duck taped to the ceiling. The drapes were torn. It was horrible!   The man at the front desk was rude. When we first checked in and asked for a different room, he said there wasn't one; didn't matter we were IHG Reward members and if we wanted, he could cancel our room and we could stay some place else but good luck because it was spring break. Just horrible!  We usually stay at Holiday Inns but this experience really upset us. We called corporate and they said they would give us back four nights of points but we would have to forfeit our first night. At this point, all we wanted was to be out of that hotel!   Luckily we found a beautiful room at the Rosen Centre! Great staff, great rate, great location, great all around stay! Highly recommend the Rosen Centre and would NOT recommend this Holiday Inn.
We had five people for a birthday dinner. The food was awful ! No one liked their dinners. Mine tasted like old fish, my wife's raviolis were tasteless. My salad looked and tasted right out of the bag it came in. The pizza was the worst raw spices on burn bread I have ever seen. Over priced and total waste of money. I took my dinner home and gave it to the dog! Bread pudding was burnt on the bottom and tasted like some one put soap in the mix! We will never go back to this slow lousy slop house again ! They should close
AWFUL!!!  Stopped by to grab some baked goodies b/c I had a scoutmob.  Customer service was TERRIBLE... no signs to tell you what the different desserts were and the lady literally rolled her eyes at us when we asked.  It was so obvious, I thought she was kidding... but nope!  So rude!  And I believe the manager was working right behind her and didn't seem to mind the way she was acting.  We used our scoutmob which was 50% off, and our total bill for one cupcake and a cookie was STILL $3.  I will and have spent far more than that on desserts, so that's not my issue... my issue is that the cupcake was DISGUSTING.  Like not kind of disgusting, but spit-it-out-in-a-napkin-so-I-don't-digest-it disgusting!  You will leave here dissatisfied.
what the fucccccccccccccccccccccccccccccc* is this place?????  i would not feed this sh*t to a starving pig. they operate under like 12343545 names, they have a new menu with a new name showing up to my door like every week, and when u call it , surprise! its the same place. shady???? um yea..what about rude? i wanna pull them through the phone and smack these pple. they have 4  different addresses??? all on the same street... and ask them for it...listen to how nervous they get... as if u might be the health department... gross.sssss. did u ever know a chinese place that cant make rice???? what the fucccccccccccccccccccccccccc. its like barley with ketchup???kings of mystery meat. i love the drunk retards that give this place good reviews,,"well i was pretty drunk it was pretty good...uhhh huhhhhuhuhuh" let me guess , u also spent the night drinking pitchers of pbr at ur local sh*thole dive bar too right? trash bags.
Sometimes they have this drink, sometimes they don't. The wonton and noodles are not authentic! Wonton has no shrimps. Noodles are not shrimp based; texture is soft and not al dente. Overall a disgusting bowl of gross. Service is crap because they are understaffed. This is not a real wonton restaurant.
Holy confused server, Batman!  I was here again last week.  The mixed drinks are unusually strong, the tableside guacamole is good, but WOW our server was just.... from a different planet!  I've never seen a waiter so befuddled by simple requests.  We had someone in our group request a non-alcoholic drink and it totally threw him for a loop.  Took forever with more chips for the guacamole.  Even sending over the guacamole-maker-guy took forever.  It was very strange.  We got kicked out because they had reserved out table for a group that was coming later, which we thought was odd as there was a TON of empty tables around - seat them THERE, maybe?  I've only been here once before but I gotta tell you, I wouldn't want to go back for drinks: you'll find me at Lucky's for that.  The food is good - from what I've tried so far.  Good luck!
I was throughly pissed off with this airline and typically I have no issues and smooth travel. So this time I choose to do the early bird check in and what a waste of money.  Why you ask oh maybe because about 40 elderly ppl got on the plane bc they are old I'm sorry but I paid probably more than them for my ticket but it makes complete sense for all of them to be loaded first and out in the first seats so it takes twice as long when we get to our destination  bc they all need assistance. Second issue the lady standing in front of me in the boarding line up DID NOT pay for this early bird check in and I did needless to say I will be calling for a refund. Also the wifi I paid 8$ for didn't work at all also needing a refund.  I think that if they aren't going to have assigned seats they you can give special attention to other ppl regardless of age or size of group if it is going to be random boarding then it should be that way. So with that said I'm very irritated w southwest this go round.
This target is the WORST! I've had to see customer service the past 3 times I've checked out because the items were scanned wrong. I've been over charged or had items doubled. Make sure you're checking your receipt if you go here!
The people here have always been very friendly. I really mean that. But, I'm not too crazy about the food. I think it's fairly-good typical American-oriented Mexican food, but certainly nothing special. This restaurant got me sick one time.... I've never felt this was the cleanest place. Service has always been very good.
I shop both the Round Rock and Arbor Walk Joann's regularly. I have had to make up my mind to suck up a 10-20 minute wait in line to check out just about every time that I shop there. But my experience today with a friend was way beyond that slight inconvenience. After going thru the usual wait in line to check out we left the store and went to lunch where my friend discovered she had a coupon on her phone and could have saved $15. We returned to the store and waited at the customer service desk for help. We were then told that returns were done by the cashiers and to get in line. We waited at least 5 minutes for a cashier and then spent 45 minutes while the cashier line item voided everything on the receipt (getting help from another cashier 2x)and then began re-ringing the entire purchase and getting so confused that the other cashier came back to help and eventually just took over. The second cashier was very pleasant and gave an ever bigger discount but if Joann's wasn't one of the few yarn and fabric stores in the area I would not go back.
When you first drive up the the hotel of course it looks nice from the outside and the lobby is beautiful ... but then again after driving for 10 and a half hours with a toddler anything would look nice...  the Hotel staff was very nice and we got to check in a little early got to out room it was nice but these aren't queen size beds it's more like a twin  but they were comfortable to sleep in the tv is great ...UMMMMM my view was......THE FREEWAY !!!!!THE LOUD FREEWAY !!!! Not only did I have to hear car and trucks and helicopters all night for 3 days my neighbors are so close I was laying in the bed and I could see then walking and hear them talking ...hear them talk a shower.... hear what that was watching on tv .... it was HORRIBLE!!! And I ask to be on the highest floor because I didn't want to hear people running above my head ... well they put me on the 9th floor and it goes to 14 floors still heard kids above my head....smh.... OH AND DID I MENTION THAT NO ONE SPEAKS ENGLISH !!!!! HOUSEKEEPING NO WHAT SPEAKS ENGLISH !!!! But they are supper nice tho ...I couldn't hold a conversation with then what ever i needed I just held it up and she say Si'... it worked. And then the third night I want 3 hours for some blankets and I never got them I had to walk all the to the front desk and the guy at the desk gave me some stank ass little then blankets they smelled dirty that was the worst that happened my 3 days here if they blanket issue would have never happened idk maybe I would have enjoyed a little more.... the pool was great and the bar was kool ... but most of the guest was from other countries and they are rude af like literally Rude af...they staff at the hotel is nice beside the guy they gave me these funky ass blankets with a attitude one of the janitor lady's that clean the pool area at night she rude af too... I asked if this was a smoking area she before I can't finish my question she rolls her eyes and say I don't know ....no speak no english but I thought she was African American but I guess i was wrong  ......but would I stay here again idk  possible because of the location
I phoned to inquire about a property and the agent did not realize that she had not placed my call on hold and I could hear her speaking to the owner Doug Melcher. He was giving her advice and telling her to do unscrupulous things by  -- number one -- not disclosing to me that the property I was inquiring about was no longer available and he was telling her how to deceive me into seeing other properties. The place is just riddled with such dishonesty all around. Proceed with great caution.
Crepes were super yummy! But the girl behind the counter is rude as hell! She made a mistake and scream at the customers telling them it's not her fault if they took the wrong order when the customer wasn't complaining but telling them that they got all their order correct.
Ordered Take-out from Le's and told us that the food was going to arrive at 6:35. I went out with a friend to meet the driver at the expected delivery time and pick-up point. Driver (and food) was nowhere to be seen. Called the restaurant after ten minutes, the restaurant told us to call the driver. The driver wouldn't pick up the phone so my friend called the restaurant, telling them that the driver won't pick up. The restaurant proceeded to tell us to wait for the driver and to call the driver again. Following the instructions of the restaurant, we called the driver, yet no results prevailed. Being a bit fed up, since the food was well over 30 minutes late, my friend tried calling the restaurant again; the restaurant did not pick up her call. The restaurant probably recognized my friend's California number, so I proceeded to call with my number (an Illinois number). The restaurant picked up, and my friend inquired about the status of our food once again, the restaurant told us to call the driver again. Knowing that the driver probably won't pick up, we still gave the restaurant and the driver the benefit of the doubt, we called. Our assumptions were right; the driver still wouldn't pick up. This time, being fed up as the restaurant was wasting our time (we're hungry college students who are studying for finals), and with the food being almost an hour late, we called the restaurant yet again, asking for a refund. The person who picked up was very rude, almost astonished that we were asking for a refund (which is justifiable since we didn't get our food), and told us to call the driver again. We asked the restaurant to call the driver themselves, and they said that the driver already dropped off the food. We were surprised as we had been sitting at the predesignated location for well over an hour waiting for the driver to come. Unwilling to cooperate with us, the restaurant eventually started to ignore both our calls. We still haven't gotten our food, we had to get cafeteria food from the school.
So sick of this place, and after getting ripped off again on developing film I had to give them a bad review.
Only reason this place gets 1 star is for creativity.. we waited 30 minutes for a waitress to come over... She looked in our direction once but then never came back over.. we had menus if front of us even... FAIL.
Boston lobster feast. What can we say? If you've ever been to a real lobster feast you'll understand this is not the place. We know everyone has their own opinion on what's good in bad. The quality and variety of the foods along with the lobsters was subpar. On a scale of A being the best and D being the worst I give them a C minus. Sorry to say but it is what we feel. Unfortunately we have to give them 2 Thumbs Down Way down. Good luck I hope you have a better experience than we did.
Ordered the three of a kind fried fish taco to-go. The waitress said it would be 10 to 15 mins. 20 mins go by and we're still waiting... Finally 35 mins later we get it. Only to go back home and find out that it still had pico (we asked it be removed) and the tortillas were not warmed and the fish heavily battered and soggy. Never coming back here!!!
We have been to Disney many times in the past and often to this "resort" which, as others have pointed out, is a value motel, really. Others have also pointed out the flaws at the Food Court correctly. You might have to go through several lines to get you food, then lines for flatware, beverages. Food is cold long before you sit. Upholstery in booths is all ripped. Beverage stations are messy & sticky. Tables are sticky. Food was never fantastic but used to have more selection and was ok. Now it's like they do not even try. For example, I tried the sesame chicken which was shown on a photo with broccoli. I thought that at least the broccoli would be healthy because there aren't a lot of healthy options. But the guy threw potatoes on it even though broccoli was there. He was doing the same for everyone's plate, no matter what it was supposed to come with.  There used to be several choices of pasta but now there is one, though it tastes ok.   I agree with what others have said about the proximity of the rooms and bus service.   The Magic Bands are new to us but we are not fans. They can be annoying to wear. They often don't work. They are positioned so that if your hands are full you have to put everything down and twist your arm so that you can use it to open the hotel room door. If you rent a car, you can't reach the sensor at the gate with it so you have to take it off. That one seems to not always work. At Animal Kingdom the entrance lines merge so that, while our own bands worked there, we actually had to wait for the people in the line in front of us, because theirs did not work. The worker there was rude. I have found that they are generally a lot more rude than in the past. In the past, they were Disney friendly. Not any more.   On this trip, many areas of the parks are blocked off with giant construction panels which are an eyesore & restrict the space available to the great influx of people. This is probably the quietest time of year, which is probably why they are doing it everywhere now, but it is really annoying. A lot of attractions are closed. I feel like we are always walking between walls of wood.
I think this place is just too hyped up for what its worth. After seeing all there hipster frames pretty disappointed that they don't have "plain jane/regular joe" types. I completely understand that they are newbury street and there going to the edgy-college aged person but, I feel like it just gets old really quick i mean how many black plastic frames can you really sell?.  There plastic frames feel EXTREMELY cheap and not made with the greatest quality. This place just seems like they pump out mass produced mainstream frames at prices that aren't reasonable.
This was the strangest, most unprofessional experience I have ever had at a doctor/dentist's office.  I just moved to Boston and found Dr. Swerdlick through my dental insurance referral site.  When I called to make my appointment, I asked for their fax number so I could have my old dentist fax my health records and x-rays over, and the receptionist told me they didn't have fax OR e-mail (REALLY?) so I could just bring the records myself.  Ok.    I showed up today for my appointment and the receptionist (some girl in sloppy clothes with a backwards basball cap) barely lifted her head up from the desk, where she was apparently taking a nap, to give me new patient forms to fill out.  As I was filling them out, she moaned and groaned about how exhausted she was and how she just wanted to leave and go to sleep.  At one point she said "Ugh, I guess I should put my coat on," took a white(ish) lab coat off of a hanger and smelled it, made a face and put it on.  She then put her head back down on the desk.  Five minutes after my scheduled appointment, she decided to call the dentist on his cell because she didn't know where he was.  He appeared a few minutes later, handed me a laminated packet about plaque and gingivitis and said "Look over this, this is what we'll be talking about today."  He then proceeded to go into the back room and have a ten minute phone conversation about buying a tv for his son.  I probably should have gotten up and walked out by this point, but I really wanted to get my teeth cleaning over with, so I decided just to stay.  Things only got weirder when he took me back into the examination room and started introducing me to his stuffed animals.  His lab coat was covered with stains (including red ones that looked like blood.)  I'm getting even more grossed out as I write this!  Hopefully I will not get any infections ;/  If you need a dentist in the Brookline area, PLEASE look into one that is more professional and clean.
I used to love this place.  But every time my boyfriend come eat with me here.  He usually lives unsatisfied.  I know he is a picky eater so i dont come as often i wanted too.  Last time we we here he order grilled chicken but he subsitude the steam rice for fried rice.  He loved it.  So today rainey day perfect day for a pho "i thought"  i order a 12 and he order his favorite dish 41.  Asked to substitute steam rice for fried rice.   They'd brought him "chicken fried rice".  Chicken not even closed to the flavor of the grilled chicken.  We called the server and then another guy came.  He said they dont do substitutions anymore.  And that if we want it grilled chicken it will come with steam rice. Even when we said we were willing to pay extra for the special request.  He said "no, I can't do it".  This is the worst customer service I have ever encounter.  I was starving but i had to get off and leave.  Things that also contributed to me having to get off and leave at that momment.  I have a 7 month old baby i went into rest room to change her but there was no baby changer station.  I had to go back to my seat without being able to change my baby diaper.  2nd I asked something to the guy that brought the first plate which was my pho and i guess ge didnt speak english but instead of smile and bring someone else to answer my question.  He did a "don't care face" turn and left.  The guy not willing to substitute our steam rice for a fried rice when we said we would pay extra for the request was just what absolutetely may it imposible for me to stay there.  It has one star because it did not let me continue without putting at least one.   But i believe customer service is #1.  Most of theit food might be great but if they are not into customer service.  Its not worth leaving my money there.
Drinks were great but the food was meh.  The steak had good flavor but was cold for one of us and super chewy and fatty for me. The wait staff were really unfriendly and spilled water on my friend and never said a word about it.  The drinks were fantastic and the bartenders were super nice though. It's too bad I remember going here years ago and the food was fantastic.
If I could rate it with no stars, I would have.   It was the worst take out I've ever had.  -Watery beef that looked like dirty bath water -Noodles were overcoked and mushy -Shrimp was ovbiously frozen and not fresh -Green beans were from a can  Don't eat here. Ever.
Party City is one of the only stores that requires a receipt for returns. No receipt means no return with no exception. Every other store you just need the card you used for the purchase. So I will no longer shop here because of this. I stopped shopping at Babies R Us for the same reason years ago.
If you're reading this review, you probably already know that gluten-free bakeries means you're going to pay a premium and your bill will be EXPENSIVE. Most grocery stories carry gluten-free products on shelves that will rival what you find here. So, if want to roll the dice with your money/time -- then this is not a bad place to check out on a whim. However, I found their quality control and service to be inconsistent enough to be unreliable and would not necessarily trust them to place an order for my gluten-free son/daughter's birthday cake.  In all fairness, all businesses go through down-periods so maybe months after these winter reviews (I see some other 1-star, 2-star reviews from this time period), things will improve. In fact, I hope it does improve. The owner seems like her heart is in the right place.
I came here to read reviews and see if anyone shared my experience.  I felt pretty awkward about it and thought it might just be me, but no, a few of you have provided confirmation.    The coffee is really good. So good that I'm trying to decide if I can overlook the poor service.  I have been here 3 times and each time I walk in, approach the register. Some barista is behind the counter busily constructing a drink or heating up a quiche. Maybe they look up, maybe they don't, but the definitely don't SAY anything.  So I stand there awkwardly waiting to be helped.  When they approach the register they say very little, if anything. They quietly make my drink, put it up on the counter, without a word. I'm just guessing it's mine so I take it, it's delicious. I leave still contemplating if the coffee is good enough for another go around with the shitty staff.    Even if you are busy a "hi" or "i'll be right with you" goes a long way, but honestly, I've never been in there when they are busy.  I may go back to Aurora where the coffee is good enough, everyone is friendly, the wifi doesn't require a pass and everything feels alright.
I walked in today to buy a couple of Robert Talbott sports shirts. The owner didn't allow me to try them on because he couldn't re-fold them if I didn't make a purchase.  Robert Talbott shirts cost over $200 a shirt, yet the customer is not allowed to try it on prior to purchase.  Absolutely horrible service.  I walked down the street to Ari Boston and bought three great shirts.  If you're thinking about high end men's suits or sportswear skip Zareh and go to Ari. The owner, Ari Gil, is amazing, and his collection of Canali and Belvest suits and Eaton shirts is the terrific.  I've purchased over 5 suits and a dozen shirts from Ari and I've been blown away by the quality and service.  Also, Ari's made-to-measure service is the best in Boston, and his prices are very reasonable.  Zareh used to be one of the premier men's clothing stores in Boston.  However, somewhere along the way it lost its way.  It's really too bad, because they carry Vineyard Vines and Robert Talbott - two great brands that are not readily available in other stores in Boston.
New management here is incompetent, in a non emergency situation, water is being shut off for majority of a day, no big deal, except they don't give notice until late afternoon the day before. Wonderful surprise to come home after a long day of work and planning on using my only day off this week to do laundry, just to see that I will now have to spend it at a laundry mat.  Just another thing to add to the long list of changes for the worst around here, like how we can not have packages delivered to office for pick up anymore, they are either left at door easy to steel or you have to go to post office within a narrow time frame to retrieve your package before it is returned to sender.  I use to do a lot of ordering off the internet and having the ability to have packages delivered safely and conveniently is more than just a factor that played into me signing a lease here, it was an amenity that was part of my rent.  You want to strip away amenities like package deliveries and running water, then you should compensate by lowering the rent.
I don't even remember my sub. The wait was way too long. I was late getting back to work which was only 5 minutes away. It is purely chaotic in there. It's hard to move around the tables. Not set up well.
Poor peficure routine, uneven toenails and barely cut cuticle, toes and toenails do not look like after pedicure, nail polish was put over the cuticle. Wish I could post photos here. My heels were scretchy and I had to fix it all myself at home.  Also the pedicure master tried to upsell most expensive package and after I refused and chose Basic Pedicure started to rush through.
I'm generally a big fan of izakayas and I really wanted to like it, but we came in for lunch and I honestly wasn't too impressed.  I had the buta katsu teishoku and it was dry. Worse, the sauce had far too much alcohol in it and was rather sharp and unpleasant as a result, enough so that it I found myself actively trying to avoid it.  On the plus side, it's a nice space and the service was perfectly good. Given the other reviews, I'd probably be willing to give it one more try (probably at dinner rather than lunch) in case we just caught them on an off day.
A friend recommended UFood grill to me. Well, recommended is too strong a word, he said that he had eaten there. This mistakenly led me to believe the food was edible.    The service was worse than I would expect at a McDonalds, I couldn't eat my burger at all. The fries were...okay.     Ufood: "Healthy" fast food...which is twice as expensive, a quarter as delicious, and with ten times the attitude from the person behind the counter.
THEY DO NOT LISTEN TO YOUR INSTRUCTION ON ALTERATION! 1st Visit: I told them to sew the length of my dress in a specific manner. 2nd Visit: They didn't listen to me. The hemming was UNPROFESSIONAL and my dress was STAINED with oil from the sewing machine! 3rd Visit: The purchase tag from my dress was missing. Why in the world you take off the purchase tag without owner's permission? I planned on reselling the dress and authenticating the brand by not removing the tag from the dress.  UNPROFESSIONAL - INCONSIDERATE people working here.
We came here on a Sunday night based on the great reviews. We were the only ones in the restaraunt. We constantly heard the microwave going on and when we got our food it was clear most of if not our entire meal was cooked in the microwave. The coconut crusted chicken was very dry, and luke warm with a side of rice. Both definitely came out of the microwave. Disappointed by the quality of food.
Terrible, the worst Applebee's in the state of Georgia. The only thing that was good was the beer that's it. The food is terrible stay away from this place do not waste your money or waste your time. AkA Just Nasty. It used to be an okay Place back in the day when you used drive all the way around the building, in the last 20 something years they have fell all the way down to the bottom never having any kind of good Cook's that have a clue. If you do not know how to grill a medium well steak or grill a chicken breast without burning the hell out of it you need to get out of the kitchen and go work at McDonald's or Burger King. I can go on and on about this dump but I would never ever ever go back there again, NOT Memorial Drive HE'LL NO. THE FOOD SUCKS !!
Very unreliable.  I keep going through the drive-through to get a $1 coffee.  Maybe half the time they actually get the order right...the rest of the time leaving out the flavor, or putting sweetened rather than unsweetened flavor, etc.  It's not a hard order, and we have started asking for confirmation that they understand the 'UNsweetened' part because I really dislike sweet coffee.  This week we tried to go through the drive-thru in the rain...they kept starting to ask for the order on the intercom, then disappearing...which is more of a problem when it is raining and the rain is pouring in to the car while we wait for them to actually take the order.  So we drove around and I ran in to order.  After several minutes I am handed my coffee and I ask to confirm, 'UNsweetened', right?  And I am assured that yes, it is unsweetened.  Nope.  Plus there is syrup all over the cup so it sticks to my hands and gets on everything.  It is a convenient location and the coffee deal is good, but not worth it when it is wrong at least half the time.
This place is usually fine (touristy, cover-bandy, but fine), but I had a really BAD experience this past Friday. My group of five had been eating and drinking at a table for a bit when the server came up to us and told us it was a 2.5-hour wait, and we had to go. WHAT?  Then the waitress hovered over us while we were trying to quickly to divide the check, and out of frustration one of my friends just ended up putting the whole thing on his card so we could get out of that uncomfortable situation. NOT OKAY to pressure us to leave, really rude to stand there hurrying us as we split a five-way check.  We were comped a pitcher of beer, but ended up drinking it standing up - I spoke to the manager, but nothing came of it.  Look, it's just NOT OKAY to tell a table to leave, even if they aren't ordering anything (again, we were ordering, and had planned to stay longer, not that it matters). If other people don't want to wait 2.5 hours to sit, that's for them to manage, not the other patrons. And not that it matters, but by the time we'd finished our free pitcher, there WAS space to sit - so it didn't appear that that was even the real reason we were booted.   We were so irked we went and spent our money at a different bar.
I've been there 3 times over the past 3 years in an attempt to use local business.  Unfortunately each time I came away disappointed.   One episode occurred when I tried to get an inspection sticker.  I arrived and and asked an older guy how I go about getting one.  He informed of the three things I had done wrong in my quest.   I can only assume he has more business than he needs.
